THE POLITICS OF FRIENDSHIP 


Jacques Derrida 
Translated by George Collins 





VERSO 


ondan « New York 


This book is supported by the French Ministry for Foreign Affairs as part of the 
Burgess Programme, headed for the French Embassy in London by the Institut 
Francais du Royaume Uni 
li institut francais 
Originally published as Politiques de l’amitié by 
Editions Galileé, Paris 1994 
© Editions Galileé 1994 


Translation first published by Verso 1997 
© George Collins 1997, 2020 
This edition published by Verso 2020 


All rights reserved 
The moral rights of the author and translator have been asserted 
13579108642 


Verso 
UK: 6 Meard Street, London W1F 0EG 
USA: 20 Jay Street, Suite 1010, Brooklyn, NY 11201 
www.versobooks.com 


Verso is the imprint of New Left Books 


ISBN-13: 978-1-78873-859-0 
ISBN-13: 978-1-78960-262-3 (US EBK) 
ISBN-13: 978-1-83976-305-2 (UK EBK) 


British Library Cataloguing in Publication Data 
A catalogue record for this book is available from the British Library 


Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data 
A catalog record for this book is available from the Library of Congress 


an > & WN 


eo SG NN 


10 


Contents 


Foreword 

Oligarchies: Naming, Enumerating, Counting 

Loving in Friendship: Perhaps — the Noun and the Adverb 
This Mad ‘Truth’: The Just Name of Friendship 

The Phantom Friend Returning (in the Name of ‘Democracy’) 


On Absolute Hostility: The Cause of Philosophy and the Spectre of the 
Political 


Oath, Conjuration, Fraternization or the ‘Armed’ Question 
He Who Accompanies Me 

Recoils 

‘In human language, fraternity...’ 

‘For the First Time in the History of Humanity’ 


Notes 


Quocirca et absentes adsunt ... et, quod difficilius dictu est, mortui vivunt.... 
(Cicero, Laelius de Amicitia) 


Foreword 


This essay resembles a lengthy preface. It would rather be the foreword to a 
book I would one day wish to write. 

In its present form, opened by a vocative (‘O my friends’), its form is 
thus that of an address — hazardous, without the least assurance, at the time 
of what was only the first session of a seminar conducted with this title, 
‘Politics of Friendship’, in 1988-89. The trajectory of an introduction of 
this sort is here quite long, certainly, but it is strictly respected throughout 
its argumentation, stage by stage, in its scansion, in its logical schema as 
well as in most of its references. Hence the explanation, if not the 
justification, of the inchoate form of the project: preliminary rather than 
problematic. 

I count on preparing for future publication a series of seminar studies 
within which this one actually finds its place, well beyond this single 
Opening session, which thus presupposes its premisses and its horizon. 
Those that immediately preceded it, then, if it is anything but useless to 
recall the logical development at this point, were centred on: Nationality 
and Philosophical Nationalism (1. Nation, Nationality, Nationalism [1983— 
84]; 2. Nomos, Logos, Topos [1984-85]; 3. The Theological-Political 
[1985-86]; 4. Kant, the Jew, the German [1986—87]); and Eating the Other 
(Rhetorics of Cannibalism) [1987-88]. Subsequent seminars concerned 
Questions of Responsibility through the experience of the secret and of 
witnessing [1989-93]. 

Be it artifice or abstraction, if I here detach one of these numerous 
sessions, and only the first for the moment, it is because, for apparently 


contingent reasons, this session gave birth to several conferences.! In 


addition, this session has already been published abroad, in slightly 
different, generally abridged versions.7 

In the course of the academic year 1988-89, each session opened with 
these words from Montaigne, quoting a remark attributed to Aristotle: ‘O 
my friends, there is no friend’. Week after week, its voices, tones, modes 
and strategies were tried on, to see if its interpretation could then be 
sparked, or if the scenography could be set in motion around itself. This 
work, taking its time, replays, represents, only the first session. This 
representation thus repeats less a first act than a sort of preview. It is no 
doubt anything but a primal scene, although the figure of the friend, so 
regularly coming back on stage with the features of the brother — who is 
critically at stake in this analysis — seems spontaneously to belong to a 
familial, fratemalist and thus androcentric configuration of politics. 

Why would the friend be /ike a brother? Let us dream of a friendship 
which goes beyond this proximity of the congeneric double, beyond 
parenthood, the most as well as the least natural of parenthoods, when it 
leaves its signature, from the outset, on the name as on a double mirror of 
such a couple. Let us ask ourselves what would then be the politics of such 
a ‘beyond the principle of fraternity’. 

Would this still deserve the name ‘polities’? 

The question is no doubt valid for all ‘political regimes’, but it is 
undoubtedly more crucial with respect to what is called democracy — if, at 
least, one still understands by this term the name of a regime which, as is 
well known, will always have been problematic. 

The concept of politics rarely announces itself without some sort of 
adherence of the State to the family, without what we will call a schematic 
of filiation: stock, genus or species, sex (Geschlecht), blood, birth, nature, 
nation — autochthonal or not, tellurian or not. This is once again the abyssal 
question of the phusis, the question of being, the question of what appears 
in birth, in opening up, in nurturing or growing, in producing by being 
produced. Is that not life? That is how life is thought to reach recognition. 

If no dialectic of the State ever breaks with what it supercedes [reléve] 
and from which it arises [ce dont elle reléve] (the life of the family and civil 
society), if politics never reduces within itself this adherence to familial 
generation, if any republican motto almost always associates fraternity with 
equality and freedom, as for democracy, it is rarely determined in the 
absence of confraternity or brotherhood. 


Literally or through a figure, but why this figure? 

Democracy has seldom represented itself without the possibility of at 
least that which always resembles — if one is willing to nudge the accent of 
this word — the possibility of a fraternization. The fratriarchy may include 
cousins and sisters but, as we will see, including may also come to mean 
neutralizing. Including may dictate forgetting, for example, with ‘the best of 
all intentions’, that the sister will never provide a docile example for the 
concept of fraternity. This 1s why the concept must be rendered docile, and 
there we have the whole of political education. What happens when, in 
taking up the case of the sister, the woman is made a sister? And a sister a 
case of the brother? This could be one of our most insistent questions, even 
if, having done so too often elsewhere, we will here avoid convoking 
Antigone, here again the long line of history’s Antigones, docile or not, to 
this history of brothers that has been told to us for thousands of years. 

As we know, what still links democratization, perhaps more today than 
ever before, to fraternization cannot always necessarily be reduced to 
patriarchy in which the brothers begin by dreaming of its demise. Patriarchy 
never stops beginning with this dream. This demise continues endlessly to 
haunt its principle. 

At the centre of the principle, always, the One does violence to itself, and 
guards itself against the other. 


In principle, then, we should also think — even though we did not mention 
it in the course of the sessions, even if we were not thinking it — about the 
political crime. 

We are not referring necessarily to those crimes called political crimes, 
those assassinations with political motivation which litter History with so 
many corpses. Rather — a second hypothesis — a thinking of that crime in 
which, allowing for the difference of a repression, the political being of 
politics, the concept of politics in its most powerful tradition is constituted 
(the ‘real possibility’ of the enemy being Ai//ed, in which — much time will 
be devoted to this — Carl Schmitt identifies politics as such, and which he 
would desperately wish to distinguish from crime as well as from murder). 
Unless — and here is a third hypothesis — we must think the crime against 
the possibility of politics, against man qua political animal, the crime of 
stopping to examine politics [arraisonner la politique], reducing it to 
something else and preventing it from being what it should be. 


One may say: here are three crimes and three hypotheses that very 
inadequately usher in prolegomena to friendship. A foreword would thus 
accumulate provisionally all the figures of grief’ This word may be 
understood in French as: damage, blame, prejudice, injustice or injury, but 
also accusation, resentment or complaint, the call for punishment or 
vengeance. In English the same word means primarily pain or mourning, 
but grievance also expresses the subject of the complaint, injustice, conflict, 
a wrong that must be righted, a violence to be repaired. 

‘O my friends, there is no friend’: this is perhaps a complaint, and a 
grievance, the complaint of one who complains, to oneself, of oneself, or 
complains of the other, to others. But here, with whom will the complaint 
about the other be lodged, given that we are addressing friends to inform 
them that there are none? That they are not present, that they are not there, 
present and living, be it only to receive the complaint or to deem it 
admissible? Be it only to understand, in a totally different way, the very 
grammar of this sentence, a kind of orphaned quotation in its original 
idiom? 

Unless they should come, those friends, in small numbers. 

How many are there? How many of us will there be? 

(Yes, in small numbers, as Aristotle would characteristically insist, 
friends must be few in number, otherwise they could not be the friends of 
this friend. 

—In small numbers, but what is a small number? Where does it begin and 
end? At one? At one plus one? One plus one man? One plus one woman? 
Or none whatsoever? Do you mean to say that it begins with all men and all 
women, with anyone? And does democracy count? 

— Democracy counts, it counts votes and subjects, but it does not count, 
should not count, ordinary singularities: there is no numerus clausus for 
arrivants. 

— It is perhaps still necessary to calculate, but differently, differently with 
one and with the other.) 


Lest they come, perhaps, one day, the friends, whatever their number, and 
the unique friend would be enough as well, to receive the sentence for 
which each remains singularly the improbable addressee. Theirs is the task 
of countersigning the sentence to give it its chance, always, each time its 
first and only chance. Consequently, each time is the last. 


But it will have been necessary to endure the crime. Three crimes, as we 
were saying, which are mutually exclusive. For we might perhaps, in the 
case of this grievance, have only the choice between these crimes which, 
however, seem irreducible. Between these incriminations and 
recriminations, between these forms of grief in which accusation mingles 
with mourning to cry out from an infinite wound. As if nothing could 
happen or be thought elsewhere than between these imputable crimes, 
between sentiments of guilt, responsibilities, compassions, testaments and 
spectres: endless processions and trials. 

The infinite abysses of imputability open on to mourning in the shadow 
of each and every event of death. These events always threaten to carry 
limits away to their bottomless bottom. On the edges of the juridical, the 
political, the techno—biological, they risk sweeping away such very 
fundamental but today so precarious distinctions, more problematic and 
fragile than ever. Are we sure we can distinguish between death (so-called 
natural death) and killing, then between murder tout court (any crime 
against life, be it purely ‘animal’ life’, as one says, thinking one knows 
where the living begins and ends) and homicide, then between homicide 
and genocide (first of all in the person of each individual representing the 
genus, then beyond the individual: at what number does a genocide begin, 
genocide per se or its metonymy? And why should the question of number 
persist at the centre of all these reflections? What is a génos, and why 
would genocide concern only a species — a race, an ethnic group, a nation, a 
religious community — of ‘the human race’?), then between homicide and — 
we are told this would be an altogether different matter — the crime against 
humanity, then between war, the crime of war — which, we are told, would 
be something else again — and the crime against humanity. All these 
distinctions are indispensable — de jure — but they are also less and less 
applicable, and that cannot, de facto and de jure, fail to affect the very 
notion of the victim or the enemy — in other words, the grief. 

We will then ask ourselves what a decision is and who decides. And if a 
decision is — as we are told — active, free, conscious and wilful, sovereign. 
What would happen if we kept this word and this concept, but changed 
these last determinations? And we will ask ourselves who sets down the law 
here. And who founds the law as a right to life. We will ask ourselves who 
grants or imposes the right to all these distinctions, to all these preventions 
and all the sanctions that they give rise to. Is it a living being? A living 


being purely and simply living, presently living? A living present? Which 
one? God? Man? Which man? For whom and to whom? Whose friend or 
enemy? 


‘O my friends, there is no friend.’ Opening with an apostrophe, this essay 
could simply let a call be heard, certainly, providing the appellation of the 
call be drawn out, to call it in turn, well before any destination is set down 
in its possibility, in the direction of familiar sentences, sentences bound by 
two locutions: to appeal and to take one’s mark [faire appel, prendre appel] 

The decision ‘to appeal’ would involve a procedure of re-examination. 
There is a grievance concerning the judgement handed down, concerning its 
givens, and the most accredited concepts of politics and the standard 
interpretation of friendship, as to fraternization: with a view to protesting or 
contesting — that is to say, to appealing — before another testimonial agency, 
from fact to law and from law to justice. 

As for the impetus in ‘taking one’s mark’, this gathers up a stooping 
body, first folded in on itself in preparatory reflection: before the leap, 
without a horizon, beyond any form of trial. 


| 


Oligarchies: 
Naming, Enumerating, Counting 


‘O my friends, there is no friend.’ 


I am addressing you, am I not? 

How many of us are there? 

— Does that count? 

— Addressing you in this way, I have perhaps not said anything yet. 
Nothing that is said in this saying. Perhaps nothing sayable. 

Perhaps it will have to be admitted, perhaps I have not yet even 
addressed myself. At least, not to you. 

How many of us are there? 

— How can you count? 

— On each side of a comma, after the pause, ‘O my friends, there is no 
friend’ — these are the two disjoined members of the same unique sentence. 
An almost impossible declaration. In two times [deux temps], Unjoinable, 
the two times seem disjoined by the very meaning of what appears to be at 
once both affirmed and denied: “my friends, no friend’. In two times but at 
the same time, in the contretemps of the same sentence. If there is ‘no 
friend’, then how could I call you my friends, my friends? By what right? 
How could you take me seriously? If I call you my friends, my friends, if I 
call you, my friends, how dare I add, to you, that there is no friend? 

Incompatible as they may appear, and condemned to the oblivion of 
contradiction, here, in a sort of desperately dialectical desire, the two times 


already form two theses — two moments, perhaps — they concatenate, they 
appear together, they are summoned to appear, in the present: they present 
themselves as in a single stroke, in a single breath, in the same present, in 
the present itself. At the same time, and before who knows who, before who 
knows whose law. The contretemps looks favourably on the encounter, it 
responds without delay but without renunciation: no promised encounter 
without the possibility of a contretemps. As soon as there is more than one. 

But how many of us are there? 

And first of all — you already sense it — in pronouncing ‘O my friends, 
there is no friend’, I have yet to say anything in my name. I have been 
satisfied with quoting. The spokesman of another, I have reported his 
words, which belong in the first place (a question of tone, syntax, of a 
gesture in speech, and so on) to a slightly archaic language, itself unsettled 
by the memory of borrowed or translated speech. Having signed nothing, I 
have assumed nothing on my own account. 

‘O my friends, there is no friend’ — the words not only form a quotation 
that I am now reading in its old French spelling. They have a different ring: 
already, such a very long time ago, they bore the quotation of another reader 
hailing from my homeland, Montaigne: ‘that saying which’, he says, 
‘Aristotle often repeated’. It is found in the Essays,' in the chapter ‘On 
Friendship’. 

This, then, is a cited quotation. But the quotation of a saying attributed, 
only attributed, by a sort of rumour or public opinion. ‘O my friends, there 
is no friend’ is, then, a declaration referred to Aristotle. There will be no 
end to the work of glossing its attribution and its very grammar, the 
translation of these four words, three or four in Greek, since the only 
substantive in the sentence is repeated. Like a renowned filiation, an origin 
thus nicknamed seems, in truth, to lose itself in the infinite anonymity of the 
mists of time. It is not, however, one of those proverbs, one of those 
‘sayings’ with no assignable author, whose aphoristic mode is seldom in the 
form of the apostrophe. 


Quotation of friendship. A quotation coming from a chapter entitled ‘On 
Friendship’, after a title that repeats, already, an entire tradition of titles. 
Before naming Aristotle, Montaigne had massively quoted Cicero, his De 
Amicitia as much as the Tusculanes. Occasionally he had drawn the 
Ciceronian treatise within the genius of his paraphrase, precisely around 


this ‘O my friends’. The ‘sovereign and master-friendship’ had then to be 
distinguished from ‘friendships common and customary, in relation to 
which you must employ that saying which Aristotle often repeated’. 

We have in memory our Laelius de Amicitia: we already hear the 
Ciceronian echo. Let us specify, in anticipation, just that the Ciceronian 
distinction between the two friendships (‘true and perfect’ or ‘vulgar and 
mediocre’) works only with an arithmetical twist. How many friends? How 
many of us are there? Determining a nomination and a quotation (pauci 
nominantur. those who are named or whose name is quoted are few and far 
between when true or perfect friendship is named), the distinction expresses 
rarity or the small in number. We shall never forget that. Are friends rare? 
Must they remain rare? How many are there? What account must be taken 
of rarity? And what about selection or election, affinity or proximity; what 
about parenthood or familiarity (oikeiotés, as Plato’s Lysis already put it), 
what about one’s being-at-home or being-close-to-oneself in regard to that 
which links friendship to all laws and all logics of universalization, to ethics 
and to law or right, to the values of equality and equity, to all the political 
models of the res publica for which this distinction remains the axiom, and 
especially in regard to democracy? The fact that Cicero adds democracy as 
an afterthought changes nothing in the force or the violence of this 
oligophilial |oligophilique| note: 


And I am not now speaking of the friendships of ordinary folk, or of ordinary people (de vulgari 
aut de mediocri) — although even these are a source of pleasure and profit — but of true and perfect 
friendship (sed de vera et perfecta loquor), the kind that was possessed by those few men who 


have gained names for themselves as friends (qualis eorum, qui pauci nominantur, fuit). 


An important nuance: the small in number does not characterize the friends 
themselves. It counts those we are speaking of, those whose legendary 
friendship tradition cites, the name and the renown, the name according to 
the renown. Public and political signs attest to these great and rare 
friendships. They take on the value of exemplary heritage. 

Why exemplary? Why exemplary in a very strict sense? Rarity accords 
with the phenomenon, it vibrates with light, brilliance and glory. If one 
names and cites the best friends, those who have illustrated ‘true and 
perfect’ friendship’, it 1s because this friendship comes to i//uminate. It 
illustrates itself, makes happy or successful things shine, gives them 
visibility, renders them more resplendent (secundas res splendidiores facit 


amicitia). It gives rise to a project, the anticipation, the perspective, the pro- 
vidence of a hope that illuminates in advance the future (praelucet), thereby 
transporting the name’s renown beyond death. A narcissistic projection of 
the ideal image, of its own ideal image (exemplar), already inscribes the 
legend. It engraves the renown in a ray of light, and prints the citation of the 
friend in a convertibility of life and death, of presence and absence, and 
promises it to the testamental revenance [ghostly apparition of the revenant, 
the ‘ghost’, its haunting return on the scene (Translator’s note)] of more [no 
more] life, of a surviving that will remain, here, one of our themes. 
Friendship provides numerous advantages, notes Cicero, but none is 
comparable to this unequalled hope, to this ecstasy towards a future which 
will go beyond death. Because of death, and because of this unique passage 
beyond life, friendship thus offers us a hope that has nothing in common, 
besides the name, with any other. 

Why is the future thus pre-illumined, beyond life, by the hope that 
friendship projects and inspires in this way? What is absolute hope, if it 
stems from friendship? However underdeveloped it may be, the Ciceronian 
answer leans sharply to one side — let us say the same side — rather than to 
the other — let us say the other. Such a response thus sets up the given state 
of our discussion. In two, three or four words, is the friend the same or the 
other? Cicero prefers the same, and believes he is able to do so; he thinks 
that to prefer is also just that: if friendship projects its hope beyond life — an 
absolute hope, an incommensurable hope — this is because the friend is, as 
the translation has it, ‘our own ideal image’. We envisage the friend as such. 
And this is how he envisages us: with a friendly look. Cicero uses the word 
exemplar, which means portrait but also, as the exemplum, the duplicate, the 
reproduction, the copy as well as the original, the type, the model. The two 
meanings (the single original and the multipliable copy) cohabit here; they 
are — or seem to be — the same, and that is the whole story, the very 
condition of survival. Now, according to Cicero, his exemplar is projected 
or recognized in the true friend, it is his ideal double, his other self, the 
same as self but improved. Since we watch him looking at us, thus watching 
ourselves, because we see him keeping our image in his eyes — in truth in 
ours — survival is then hoped for, illuminated in advance, if not assured, for 
this Narcissus who dreams of immortality. Beyond death, the absolute 
future thus receives its ecstatic light, it appears only from within this 
narcissism and according to this logic of the same. 


(it will not suffice to claim exactly the contrary, as we will attempt to do, 
in order to provide a logical demonstration, in a decidable discourse; 
another way and another thought will be necessary for the task.) 

This text by Cicero will also have been in turn, for a history (long and 
brief, past and to come), the glorious witness, the illustrious exemplar, of 
Ciceronian logic. This tradition is perhaps finished, even dying; it always 
will have been in its essence finishing, but its ‘logic’ ends up none the less, 
in the very consequence of the same, in a vertiginous convertibility of 
opposites: the absent becomes present, the dead living, the poor rich, the 
weak strong. And all that, acknowledges Cicero, is quite ‘difficult to say’, 
which means difficult to decide. Those who snigger at discourses on the 
undecidable believe they are very strong, as we know, but they should begin 
by attacking a certain Cicero as well. By reading him, then: 


For the man who keeps his eye on a true friend, keeps it, so to speak, on a model of himself 
(tamquam exemplar aliquod intuetur sui). For this reason, friends are together when they are 
separated, they are rich when they are poor, strong when they are weak (et imbecilli valent), and — 
a thing even harder to explain — they live on after they have died (mortui vivunt), so great is the 
honour that follows them, so vivid the memory, so poignant the sorrow. That is why friends who 
have died are accounted happy (ex quo illorum beata mors videtur), and those who survive them 


are deemed worthy of praise (vita laudabilis).° 


In this possibility of a post mortem discourse, a possibility that is a force as 
well, in this virtue of the funeral eulogy, everything seems, then, to have a 
part to play: epitaph or oration, citation of the dead person, the renown of 
the name after the death of what it names. A memory is engaged in 
advance, from the moment of what is called life, in this strange temporality 
opened by the anticipated citation of some funeral oration. I live in the 
present speaking of myself in the mouths of my friends, I already hear them 
speaking on the edge of my tomb. The Ciceronian variety of friendship 
would be the possibility of quoting myself in exemplary fashion, by signing 
the funeral oration in advance — the best of them, perhaps, but it is never 
certain that the friend will deliver it standing over my tomb when I am no 
longer among the living. Already, yet when I will no longer be. As though 
pretending to say to me, in my very own voice: rise again. 

Who never dreams of such a scene? But who does not abhor this theatre? 
Who would not see therein the repetition of a disdainful and ridiculous 
staging, the putting to death of friendship itself? 


This premeditation of friendship (de amicitia, peri phillas) would also 
intend, then, to engage, in its very space, work on the citation, and on the 
citation of an apostrophe. Of an apostrophe always uttered close to the end, 
on the edge of life — that is to say, of death. 

What transpires when an apostrophe is quoted? Does an apostrophe let 
itself be quoted, in its lively and singular movement, here and now, this 
impulse in which I turn towards the singularity of the other, towards you, 
the irreplaceable one who will be my witness or whom I single out? Can the 
transport of this unique address be not only repeated but quoted? 
Conversely, would the apostrophe ever take place, and the pledge it offers, 
without the possibility of a substitution? 

We will read these themes of the apostrophic pledge and its quotation 
later on; they are no doubt inseparable from the theme of the name: from 
the name of the friend and, in the name, from the mortality of the friend, 
from the memories and from the testament which, using precisely the same 
appellation, these themes call up. 

Familiarities. What is familiarity? What is familial proximity? What 
affinity of alliance or consanguinity (Verwandschaft) is concerned? To what 
elective familiarity could friendship be compared? In reading Montaigne, 
Montaigne reading Cicero, Montaigne bringing back a ‘saying’ ‘often 
repeated’, here we are already — another testament — back with Aristotle. 
Enigmatic and familiar, he survives and surveys from within ourselves (but 
how many of us are there?). He stands guard over the very form of our 
sentences on the subject of friendship. He forms our precomprehension at 
the very moment when we attempt, as we are about to do, to go back over 
it, even against it. Are we not obliged to respect at least, first of all, the 
authority of Aristotelian questions? The structure and the norm, the 
grammar of such questions? Is not Aristotle in fact the first of the maieutic 
tradition of Lysis, to be sure (Lysis, é peri philias), but beyond him, in 
giving it a directly theoretical, ontological and phenomenological form, to 
pose the question of friendship (peri philias), of knowing what it 1s (ti esti), 
what and how it 1s (poion ti), and, above all, if it is said in one or in several 
senses (monakhdos légatai é pleonakhés)?* 

It is true that right in the middle of this series of questions, between the 
one on the being or the being-such of friendship and the one on the possible 
plurivocity of a saying of friendship, there is the question which is itself 
terribly equivocal: kai tis o philos. This question asks what the friend is, but 


also asks who he is. This hesitation in the language between the what and 
the who does not seem to make Aristotle tremble, as if it were, 
fundamentally, one and the same interrogation, as if one enveloped the 
other, and as if the question ‘who?’ had to bend or bow in advance before 
the ontological question ‘what?’ or ‘what is?’. 

This implicit subjection of the who to the what will call for question on 
our part — in return or in appeal. The question will bring with it a 
protestation: in the name of the friend or in the name of the name. If this 
protestation takes on a political aspect, it will perhaps be less properly 
political than it would appear. It will signify, rather, the principle of a 
possible resistance to the reduction of the political, even the ethical, to the 
ontophenomenological. It will perhaps resist, in the name of another 
politics, such a reduction (a powerful reduction — powerful enough, in any 
case, to have perhaps constructed the dominant concept of the political). 
And it will accept the risk of diverting the Lysis tradition. It will attempt to 
move what is said to us in the dialogue elsewhere, from its first words, 
about the route and the name, the proper and the singular name, at that 
moment when this ‘maieutic’ dialogue on friendship (é peri philias) begins, 
at the crossing of who knows how many passages, routes or aportas, with 
love (érds). It begins as well, let us not forget, by ‘diverting’ Socrates from 
a path leading him ‘straight’ (euthu) from the Academy to the Lyceum. 

Yes, since when — whether we know it or not — have we ceased to be 
Aristotle’s heirs? And how many of us? And turned, by him already, 
towards the heritage itself, towards the theme of some last will, towards the 
testamentary in itself? The HEudemian Ethics, for example, inscribes 
friendship, knowledge and death, but also survival, from the start, in a 
single, se/fsame configuration. The same here is none other than the other. It 
has at least the figure of the other. The necessary consequence of this 
strange configuration is an opportunity for thought. Beyond all ulterior 
frontiers between love and friendship, but also between the passive and 
active voices, between the loving and the being-loved, what is at stake is 
‘lovence’ [aimance].> You must know how it can be more worthwhile to 
love lovence. Aristotle recalls not only that it is more worthwhile to love, 
but that you had better love in this way, and not in that way; and that hence 
it is more worthwhile to love than to be loved. From then on, a singular 
preference destabilizes and renders dissymmetrical the equilibrium of all 


difference: an it is more worthwhile gives precedence to the act over 
potentiality. An activity carries it away, it prevails over passivity. 

Ever-ready Aristotelian scholastics would tempt us confidently to take 
this a step further: this it is more worthwhile would acknowledge the 
preeminence of form over matter. And after a deduction of this sort, one 
would no longer be wary of a worrisome consequence. Rushing to the end, 
such a pre-eminence would then come, for once, with Aristotle, for a single 
time, not only to link lovence to dying, but to situate death on the side of act 
and on the side of form. For once, but irreversibly. 

How does this come about? How would act, this time, bear itself over to 
death’s side? How would it bear death? For it bears death in itself in this 
case; it contains death. Preference and reference. But it bears death in itself 
in bearing itself over to death. It transports itself in death by that which, in 
it, at the time of death, addresses its reference in a single stroke. 

Let us then see death coming on the road of this argumentation. Is not 
death, moreover, in question — death in so far as one sees it coming, and 
even in so far as a knowledge knows what it knows in seeing it coming, 
only in seeing it coming? 

Aristotle therefore declares: as for friendship, it is advisable to love 
rather than to be loved. Let us not forget the general horizon of this 
affirmation. Justice and politics are at stake. This passage from the 
Eudemian Ethics opens, in fact, with the question of what 1s just, the just (to 
dikaion) in friendship.© What arises in the first place is precisely the 
question of the just or of justice, dikaiosuné. Justice characterizes a way of 
behaving. It consists in behaving in a certain way: in accordance with the 
just, in harmony with the principle of the just. In its dignity as well as its 
necessity, this question is immediately equal to that of the beautiful and the 
desirable in friendship. It arrives, then, also in the first place, immediately 
following the general opening on the subject of friendship (peri philias): 
What is friendship? How or what is it? What is a friend? Is friendship said 
in one sense or in several?’ 

The whole task should certainly consist in determining this justice. But 
that seems possible only by forcing several aporias. We will begin, as 
always, with the implicit reference to Lysis (214-16), with the aporia of a 
friendship which seems doomed to the similar and to the dissimilar.® But 
even before this first aporia, the just will be said and the passage will be 
forced only by first aligning oneself on a commonly held opinion. This 


opinion concerns the very work of the political: the properly political act or 
Operation amounts to creating (to producing, to making, etc.) the most 
friendship possible (tés te gar politikés érgon einai dokei malista poiésai 
philian’). 

How is this the most possible to be understood? How many? Can that be 
calculated? How can you interpret the possibility of this maximum or this 
optimum in friendship? How is it to be understood politically? Must the 
most friendship [plus d’amitie] still belong to the political? 

In all good sense, what you hear above all is /oving; you must hear 
loving; you cannot fail to hear it in total confidence when the word 
friendship resounds: friendship consists in loving, does it not; it is a way of 
loving, of course. Consequence, implication: it is therefore an act before 
being a situation; rather, the act of loving, before being the state of being 
loved. An action before a passion. The act of this activity, this intention of 
loving, the philein, is more proper to friendship itself (kata ten philian) than 
the situation which consists in letting oneself be loved or inducing love, in 
any case in being loved (phileisthai). Being-loved certainly speaks to 
something of philia, but only on the side of the beloved (philéton). It says 
nothing of friendship itse/f which implies in itself, properly, essentially, the 
act and the activity: someone must love in order to know what loving 
means; then, and only then, can one know what being loved means. 

Friendship, the being-friend — what is that, anyway? Well, it is to love 
before being loved. Before even thinking about what /oving, love, lovence 
mean, one must know that the only way to find out is by questioning first of 
all the act and the experience of loving rather than the state or situation of 
being loved. Why is that? What is its reason? Can we know? Well, precisely 
by reason of knowledge — which is accorded or allied here to the act. And 
here we have the obscure but invincible force of a tautology. The argument 
seems, in fact, simple: it 1s possible to be loved (passive voice) without 
knowing it, but it is impossible to love (active voice) without knowing it. 
Science or self-consciousness knows itself a priori comprehended, 
comprehended and engaged in the friendship of the one who loves — to wit, 
in the friend — but science or self-consciousness is no longer comprehended 
or engaged, or is not yet so on the side of the one who is loved. The friend 1s 
the person who loves before being the person who is loved: he who loves 
before being the beloved, and perhaps (but this is something else, even 
though the consequence follows) he who loves before being loved. Engaged 


science or consciousness here means conscripted twice over: implicated as 
in a condition of possibility (theoretical chain) and held in a pledge, a 
promise, an alliance (performative chain). This view can always fall back 
on the following analytic evidence: one must start with the friend—who- 
loves, not with the friend—who-is—loved, if one is to think friendship. This 
is an irreversible order. One can be loved while remaining ignorant of that 
very thing — that one is loved — and in this respect remain as though 
confined to secrecy. It could be said that such a secret is never revealed. But 
one cannot love, and one must not love, in such a state of ignorance of 
friendship itself (ésti gar lanthdnein philodmenon, philotinta d’ou!). 
Axiom: the friendship I bear [porte] for someone, and no doubt love as 
well, cannot remain a secret for myself. Even before it is declared (to the 
other, in a loud voice), the act of love would thereby be, at its very birth, 
declared. It would be in itself declared, given over to knowledge or to 
consciousness. The declaration would in truth be inscribed upon its art of 
birth. One loves only by declaring that one loves. Let us call that, for 
convenience’s sake, an axiom: the premiss of this entire line of reasoning 
seems to appeal to good sense, it is posed as unquestionable. As 
incontestable, in fact: one cannot bear witness against it without being party 
to it. 

But there, in the dark, objections are massing up. We will abandon them 
to their virtuality for the moment. Being loved — what does that mean? 
Nothing, perhaps — nothing in any case of friendship itself in which the 
loved one, as such, has nothing to know, sometimes nothing to do. Being 
loved therefore remains — with regard to friendship itself, and therefore with 
regard to the friend — an accident (to men gar phileisthai sumbebekos''). 
Friendship, what is proper or essential to friendship, can be thought and 
lived without the least reference to the be—/oved, or more generally to the 
lovable — in any case, without having to set out from there, as from a 
principle. If we trusted the categories of subject and object here, we would 
say in this logic that friendship (philia) is first accessible on the side of its 
subject, who thinks and lives it, not on the side of its object, who can be 
loved or lovable without in any way being assigned to a sentiment of which, 
precisely, he remains the object. And if we do say ‘think and love’, as we 
shall see later, life, breath, the soul, are always and necessarily found on the 
side of the lover or of loving, while the being-loved of the lovable can be 
lifeless; it can belong to the reign of the non-living, the non-psychic or the 


‘soulless’ (en apsukhdé'*). One cannot love without living and without 
knowing that one loves, but one can still love the deceased or the inanimate 
who then know nothing of it. It is indeed through the possibility of loving 
the deceased that the decision in favour of a certain lovence comes into 
being. 

This incommensurability between the lover and the beloved will now 
unceasingly exceed all measurement and all moderation — that is, it will 
exceed the very principle of a calculation. It will perhaps introduce a virtual 
disorder in the organization of the Aristotelian discourse. (This ‘perhaps’ 
has already marked the hesitant gait of our reading.) Something trembles, 
for example, in what Aristotle calls the natural (phusei) hierarchy — that is, 
the hierarchy inscribed from birth between those inclined to love (to 
kissing, to caressing), the philetikoi, and on the other hand, below them, the 
last ones, the philotimoi. They prefer to be loved; they thus seek honours, 
distinction, signs of recognition.!? In addition, even if there were no 
essentially erotic dimension, no desire at work in the ever-more- 
dissymmetrical hierarchy of the philia, how will its formal structure in the 
relation between the sublunary world and the Prime Mover be respected? 

If Eros and Philia are indeed movements, do we not have here an inverse 
hierarchy and an inverse dissymmetry? Prime Mover or pure Art, God sets 
in motion without Himself moving or being moved; He is the absolute 
desirable or desired, analogically and formally in the position of the 
beloved, therefore on the side of death, of that which can be inanimate 
without ceasing to be loved or desired (apsukhon). Now in contrast to what 
takes place in friendship, no one will contest that this absolute object of 
desire is also found at the principle and at the summit of the natural 
hierarchy, whereas He does not allow himself to move or be moved by any 
attraction. 

Let us go back down to the sublunary world. The dissymmetry risks, 
apparently and at first glance, complicating the egalitarian schema of the 
isotés or — if I may use the term — the reciprocalist or mutualist schema of 
requited friendship (antiphilein), such as Aristotle seems to insist on 
privileging them elsewhere.'* The philein would therefore be more 
appropriate to the essence of friendship (kata ten philian); the act of loving 
would better suit friendship, if not the beloved (philéton). Aristotle, then, 
proposes to give proof or a sign (semeion) of this suitability. If a friend had 
to choose between knowing and being known, he would choose knowing 


rather than being known. Every time he evokes this alternative and 
determines the choice, Aristotle places himself in the hypothesis in which 
the two experiences (knowing and being known, loving and being-loved, 
the lover and the lovable) are not compatible, at the moment when they do 
not appear possible at the same time.'> Basically it makes little difference. 
Even if the movement of the act and the passivity of the state were 
simultaneously possible, if that could take place in fact, the essential 
structure of the two experiences and the two relations would remain no less 
different. This irreducible difference is that which counts and permits 
counting. It is what justifies the intrinsic hierarchy: knowing will never 
mean, for a finite being, being known; nor loving being loved. One can love 
being loved, but loving will always be more, better and something other 
than being loved. One can love to be loved — or to be lovable — but one 
must first know how to love, and know what loving means by loving. The 
structure of the first must remain what it is, heterogeneous to that of the 
other; and that structure, that of loving for the lover, will always — as 
Aristotle tells us, in sum — be preferable to the other, to that of the being- 
loved as lovable. Loving will always be preferable to being-loved, as acting 
is preferable to suffering, act to potentiality, essence to accident, knowledge 
to non-knowledge. It is the reference, the preference itself 

To make this understood, the Eudemian Ethics stages the example of 
what the women do in Antiphon’s Andromache. It is a matter of an example 
of adoption or of a nurse, of prosthetic maternity, of the substitution or the 
supposition of children, en tais upobolais, and here we are already in this 
familiarity of election which will everywhere remain our theme. These 
mothers confide their children to a nurse and love them without seeking to 
be loved in return. For to want to be known seems to be an ‘egoistic’ 
sentiment, as it is often translated; it is in any case a sentiment turned within 
oneself, in favour of oneself, for the love of self (autou éneka). It is passive, 
more in a hurry to receive or to enjoy the good than to do it, as Aristotle 
literally says (tou paskhein ti agathon alla mé poiein); but one could just as 
well say: ready to receive the good that one does not have rather than to 
give that which one possesses (or even, as Plotinus will one day say — and 
this is something else — ready to give that very thing that one does not 
have). The Nichomachean Ethics recalls the same example, in order to 
make the same point. But Aristotle insists at this point on maternal joy or 


enjoyment [jouissance], in seeing there once again a sign or a proof of the 
preference (semeion d’ai metéres t6 philein khairousai'®). 

How can you pass from maternal enjoyment to death? This passage is not 
visible in the immediacy of the text. Naming, cetainly, the enjoyment of 
maternal love in so far as it renounces reciprocity, the Nicomachean Ethics 
associates it neither with surviving nor with dying. The Eudemian Ethics 
speaks of the renunciation of the mother, in her very love, but without 
naming enjoyment and in order immediately to go on [enchainer] to death. 
We have just recalled this logical chain. To want to be known, to refer to 
self in view of self, to receive the good rather than to do it or to give it — 
this is an altogether different thing from knowing. Knowing knows in order 
to do and to love, for love and in view of doing and loving (to de gindskein 
tou poiein kai tou philein éneka), as Aristotle then says, concluding: ‘This is 
why we praise those who continue to love their deceased, for they know but 
are not known’ (dio kai tous emménontas to philein pros tous tethneotas 
epainoumen, ginoskousi gar, all’ ou ginoskontai'’). Friendship for the 
deceased thus carries this philia to the limit of its possibility. But at the 
same time, it uncovers the ultimate spring of this possibility: I could not 
love friendship without projecting its impetus towards the horizon of this 
death. The horizon is the limit and the absence of limit, the loss of the 
horizon on the horizon, the ahorizontality of the horizon, the limit as 
absence of limit. I could not love friendship without engaging myself, 
without feeling myself in advance engaged to love the other beyond death. 
Therefore, beyond life. I feel myself — and in advance, before any contract — 
borne to love the dead other. I feel myself thus (borne to) love; it is thus that 
I feel myself (loving). 

Autology provides food for thought, as always: I feel myself loving, 
borne to love the deceased, this beloved or this lovable being of whom it 
has already been said that he was not necessarily alive, and that therefore he 
was bearing death in his being-loved, smack against his being-lovable, in 
the range [portée| of the reference to his very being-loved. Let us recall it, 
and let us do so in the words of Aristotle. He explains to us why one can 
rejoice and why there is a place for rejoicing in loving (dio to philein 
khairein), but one could never rejoice — or at the very least, we would say, 
not essentially, not intrinsically — in being loved (all’ ou to phileisthai 
estin). Enjoyment, the self-rejoicing, is immanent not to the beloved but to 


the loving, to its act, to its proper enétgeia,'® The criterion of this 


distinction follows an apparently invisible line. It passes between the living 
and the dead, the animate and the inanimate, the psychic and the a-psychic. 
A question of respiration or inspiration: loving belongs only to a being 
gifted with life or with breath (en empsuko). Being loved, on the other hand, 
always remains possible on the side of the inanimate (en apsukho), where a 
psukhé may already have expired. ‘One also loves inanimate beings’ 


(phileitai gar kai ta Gpsukha).'° 


(We are striving to speak here in the logic of Aristotle’s two Ethics, doing 
everything that seems possible to respect the conceptual veins of his 
argumentation. The reader who is familiar with Aristotle may find that the 
tone has changed, however, along with the pathos and the connotations; he 
may suspect some slow, discreet or secret drift. Let us ask him — let us ask 
ourselves — what the law of this drift is and, more precisely, if there is one, 
and if it be pure, the purely conceptual, logical or properly philosophical 
law of order. A law which would not only be of a psychological, rhetorical 
or poetic order. What is taking place here? And what if what is taking place 
were taking place precisely between the two orders that we have just 
distinguished, at their very juncture? Let us not forget that in the case of 
psychology, the question of the psukhé, or of animate life, is at the heart of 
all philosophical reflection on philia. For Aristotle, neither rhetoric nor 
poetics could ever be excluded from this reflection; and poets are quoted, 
more than once called up to testify, even as judges of truth.) 


If philia lives, and if it lives at the extreme limit of its possibility, it 
therefore /ives, it stirs, it becomes psychic from within this resource of 
survival. This philia, this psukhé between friends, sur-vives. It cannot 
survive itself as act, but it can survive its object, it can love the inanimate. 
Consequently it springs forward, from the threshold of this act, towards the 
possibility that the beloved might be dead. There is a first and irreducible 
dissymmetry here. But this same dissymmetry separates itself, after a 
fashion, in an unpresentable topology; it folds, turns inside out and doubles 
itself at the same time in the hypothesis of shared friendship, the friendship 
tranquilly described as reciprocal. I do not survive the friend, I cannot and 
must not survive him, except to the extent to which he already bears my 
death and inherits it as the last survivor. He bears my own death and, in a 


certain way, he is the only one to bear it — this proper death of myself thus 
expropriated in advance. 


(I say that using the masculine gender {the [male] friend, he, and so 
forth} — not in the narcissistic or fraternal violence of a distraction, but by 
way of announcing a question awaiting us, precisely the question of the 
brother, in the canonical — that is, androcentric — structure of friendship.) 


In any case, philia begins with the possibility of survival. Surviving — 
that is the other name of a mourning whose possibility is never to be 
awaited. For one does not survive without mourning. No one alive can get 
the better of this tautology, that of the stance of survival [survivance] — even 
God would be helpless. 

Here again, the difference between the effective and the virtual, between 
mourning and its possiblility, seems fragile and porous. The anguished 
apprehension of mourning (without which the act of friendship would not 
spring forth in its very energy) insinuates itself a priori and anticipates 
itself; 1t haunts and plunges the friend, before mourning, into mourning. 
This apprehension weeps before the lamentation, it weeps death before 
death, and this is the very respiration of friendship, the extreme of its 
possibility. Hence surviving is at once the essence, the origin and the 
possibility, the condition of possibility of friendship; it is the grieved art of 
loving. This time of surviving thus gives the time of friendship. 

But such a time gives itself in its withdrawal. Jt occurs only through self- 
effacement. [Il n’arrive qu’a s’effacer, also: ‘It succeeds only in effacing 
itself.’| It delivers itself up and withdraws twice and according to two 
modalities, as we shall see, in two times as incompatible as they are 
indissociable: firm and stable constancy on the one hand and, on the other, 
beginning again, renewal, the indefinite repetition of the inaugural instant, 
always anew, once again, the new in re-iteration. And this double 
contretemps delivers up the truth of friendship in the eerie light of a contre- 
jour, the present presents itself there only from within a source of 
phenomenal light which comes neither from the present (it is no longer the 
source) nor from the place from which it arises or in which it appears — the 
place of the gaze, of the self or of the ‘subject’, if you like. The contre-jour 
of this contretemps disjoins the presence of the present. It inscribes both 
intemporality and untimeliness in at least one of the figures of what 


Aristotle regularly calls primary friendship (e prote philia). Primary 
friendship: primary because it is the first to present itself according to logic 
and rank, primary according to sense and hierarchy, primary because all 
other friendship is determined with reference to it, if only in the gap of the 
drift or the failure. Primary friendship does not work without time, 
certainly, it never presents itself outside time: there is no friend without 
time (oud’ dneu khronou philos*®) — that is, without that which puts 
confidence to the test. There is no friendship without confidence (pistis), 
and no confidence which does not measure up to some chronology, to the 
trial of a sensible duration of time (é de pistis ouk dneu khronou?'). The 
fidelity, faith, ‘fidence’ [fiance], credence, the credit of this engagement, 
could not possibly be a-chronic. It is precisely by taking off from this 
credence [croire| that something like a temporalizing synthesis or 
symbolicity can be apprehended — beyond the letter of Aristotle’s text, one 
might say. Engagement in friendship takes time, it gives time, for it carries 
beyond the present moment and keeps memory as much as it anticipates. It 
gives and takes time, for it survives the living present. The paradox of the 
grieving survival is concentrated in the ever-so-ambiguous value of 
stability, constancy and firm permanence that Aristotle regularly associates 
with the value of credence or confidence (pistis). In primary friendship, 
such a faith must be stable, established, certain, assured (bébaios); it must 
endure the test of time. But at the same time, if this may still be said, ama, it 
is this faith which, dominating time by eluding it, taking and giving time in 
contretemps, opens the experience of time. It opens it, however, in 
determining it as the stable present of a quasi-eternity, or in any case from 
and in view of such a present of certainty. Everything is installed at home, 
as it were, in this conjunction of friendship, of ‘fidence’ and stable 
certainty. There is no reliable friendship without this faith (ouk ésti d’aneu 
pisteds philia bébaios**), without the confirmed steadfastness of this 
repeated act of faith. Plato, too, associated philia with the same value of 
constancy and steadfastness. The Symposium recalls a few famous 
examples. A friendship that has become steadfast, constant or faithful 
(bébaios) can even defy or destroy tyrannical power.7* Elsewhere, as we 
know — in the Zimaeus, for example — the value of constancy is quite simply 
tied to that of the true or the veritable, in particular where it is a question of 
opinion or belief. 


In its sheer stability, this assured certainty is not natural, in the late and 
current sense of the term; it does not characterize spontaneous behaviour 
because it qualifies a belief or an act of faith, a testimony and an act of 
responsible freedom. Only primary friendship is stable (bébaios), for it 
implies decision and reflection: that which always takes time. Only those 
decisions that do not spring up quickly (me takhu) or easily (méde radios) 
result in correct judgement (ten krisin orihén).** This non—given, non— 
‘natural’, non—spontaneous stability thus amounts to a stabilization. This 
stabilization supposes the passage through an ordeal which takes time. It 
must be difficult to judge and to decide. A decision worthy of the name — 
that is, a critical and reflective decision — could not possibly be rapid or 
easy, as Aristotle then notes, and this remark must receive all the weight of 
its import. The time is the time of this decision in the ordeal of what 
remains to be decided — and hence of what has not been decided, of what 
there is to reflect and deliberate upon — and thus has not yet been thought 
through. If the stabilized stability of certainty is never given, if it is 
conquered in the course of a stabilization, then the stabilization of what 
becomes certain must cross — and therefore, in one way or another, recall or 
be reminded of — the suspended indecision, the undecidable qua the time of 
reflection. 

Here we would find the difference between spirit (the nous) and the 
animal body, but also their analogy. The analogy is as important as the 
difference, for it inscribes in the living body the habitus of this contretemps. 
It has its place in the very movement and in the possibility of such an 
inscription. The contretemporal habitus is the acquired capacity, the 
cultivated aptitude, the experimented faculty against the backdrop of a 
predisposition; it is the éxis that binds together two times in the same time, 
a duration and an omnitemporality at the same time. Such a 
contretemporality is another name for this psukhe, it is the being-animated 
or the animation of this life uniting the human spirit (the nous) and 
animality itself. This unifying feature conjugates man and animal, spirit and 
life, soul and body. It places them under the same yoke, that of the same 
liability [possibilité|, that of the same aptitude to learn in suffering, to cross, 
to record and to take account of the ordeal of time, to withhold its trace in 
the body. This conjugation will warrant the poetic figure of the analogy 
which we will quote in a moment and which precisely names the yoke, the 
yoke effect. 


It is starting from this analogy that the difference lets itself be thought. In 
the passage of time through time. Time exits from time. The ordeal of 
stabilization, the becoming-steadfast and reliable (bébaios), takes time. For 
this ordeal, this experience, this crossing (peira), withdraws time, it 
removes even the time necessary to dominate time and defeat duration. 
Bébaios: the stable but also the reliable. It determines a temporal but also 
intemporal modality, a becoming-intemporal or omnitemporal of time, 
whatever it affects (certainty, calculability, reliability, ‘fidence’, truth, 
friendship, and so forth). But it also marks — or rather, it hides in marking — 
the passage between two absolutely heterogeneous orders, the passage from 
assured certainty, calculable reliability, to the reliability of the oath and the 
act of faith. This act of faith belongs — it must belong — to what 1s 
incalculable in decision. We know that this break with calculable reliability 
and with the assurance of certainty — in truth, with knowledge — is ordained 
by the very structure of confidence or of credence as faith. 

Hence of friendship. This structure is both acknowledged and 
unrecognized by Aristotle. The truth of friendship, if there is one, is found 
there, in darkness, and with it the truth of the political, as it can be thought 
in Greek: not only in the word bébaios (for example, for we do not think it 
possible to load such a burden on one word, on this word), but throughout 
the culture, the technics, the political organization and the Greek ‘world’ 
that carry it. In a state of intense philosophical concentration, we have here 
the whole story of eidos all the way up to the Husserlian interpretation of 
the idealization or production of ideal objects as the production of 
omnitemporality, of intemporality gua omnitemporality. It takes time to 
reach a stability or a certainty which wrenches itself from time. It takes time 
to do without time. One must submit, one must submit oneself to time in 
time. One must submit it, but — and here is the history of the subject as the 
history of time — in submitting oneself to it. To conjugate it, to enslave it, to 
place it under the yoke, and to do so for the spirit of man or of woman as 
for cattle — under the yoke (upozugios): 


There is no stable friendship with confidence, but confidence needs time (dneu khronou). One 
must then make trial (dei gar peiran labein), as Theogms says: ‘You cannot know the mind of 
man or woman till you have tried (prin peiratheies) them as you might cattle (6sper upozugiou).-> 


But — as we shall see further on, in the course of one of our sallies to and fro 
— if primary friendship is excluded among animals, excluded between man 


and animal, excluded between the gods, between man and God, this is 
because éxis itself does not suffice for friendship. The disposition, the 
aptitude, even the wish — everything that makes friendship possible and 
prepares it — does not suffice for friendship, for friendship in act. Often éxis 
alone remains a simulacrum; it simulates or dissimulates real friendship, 
and makes the desire for friendship a case of wishful thinking, in which the 
signs of friendship are mistaken for friendship itself. The nub of the 
Aristotelian argument, as it can be formalized through development with 
other examples, certainly amounts to demanding and uncovering éxis, to 
taking into account a concrete and indispensable condition of possibility 
and describing it not as a formal structure, but — here, in any case — as a sort 
of existential opening (the power-of—being—a—friend, according to primary 
friendship, which is given neither to the animal nor to God). Aristotle, 
however, insists just as much, and with faultless rigour, on the insufficiency 
of this éxis, and thus on all conditions of possibility (liability [possibilite], 
aptitude, predisposition, even desire). The analysis of conditions of 
possibility, even existential ones, will never suffice in giving an account of 
the act or the event. An analysis of that kind will never measure up to what 
takes place, the effectivity — actuality — of what comes to pass — for 
example, a friendship which will never be reduced to the desire or the 
potentiality of friendship. If we insist, in turn, on this necessary limitation in 
the analysis of conditions of possibility, in this thought of the possible, it is 
for at least two reasons. 


1. First of all, beyond this singular context (Aristotle on primary 
friendship), the wake of such a limitation crosses an immense problematic 
field, that of history, of the event, of the singularity of that which comes to 
pass in general. It is not enough that something may happen for it to 
happen, of course; hence an analysis of what makes an event possible — 
however indispensable it may continue to be, especially in Aristotle’s eyes 
— will never tell us anything about the event itself. But this evidence would 
still be too simple if one merely deduced from it an order of good sense: 
one that goes from the possible to the real, and from a retrograde analytic of 
the possible to the taking into account of the event, in the novelty of its 
appearance and the uniqueness of its occurrence. One cannot merely 
analyse the conditions of possibility, even the potentiality, of what occurs 
‘once’, and then believe — this would be so naive — that one can say 


something pertinent about it. That which occurs, and thereby occurs only 
once, for the first and last time, is always something more or less than its 
possibility. One can talk endlessly about its possibility without ever coming 
close to the thing itself in its coming. It may be, then, that the order is other 
— it may well be — and that only the coming of the event allows, after the 
event [aprés coup], perhaps, what it will previously have made possible to 
be thought. To stay with our example: it is the experience of primary 
friendship, the meeting of its presence in act, that authorizes the analysis of 
éxis and of all predisposition — as well, for that matter, as of the two other 
types of friendships (derived, non-primary). 

Among the immense consequences of this strong logical necessity, we 
must reckon with those concerning nothing less than revelation, truth and 
the event: a thought (ontological or meta-ontological) of conditions of 
possibility and structures of revealability, or of the opening on to truth, may 
well appear legitimately and methodologically anterior to gaining access to 
all singular events of revelation — and the stakes of this irreducible 
anteriority of good sense or common sense are limitless. ‘In fact’, ‘in truth’, 
it would be only the event of revelation that would open — like a breaking— 
in, making it possible after the event — the field of the possible in which it 
appeared to spring forth, and for that matter actually did so. The event of 
revelation would reveal not only this or that — God, for example — but 
revealability itself. By the same token, this would forbid us saying ‘God, for 
example’. 

Is there an alternative here? Must one choose between these two orders? 
And is this necessary first of all in the case of the so-called ‘revealed’ 
religions, which are also religions of the social bond according to /oving 
(love, friendship, fraternity, charity, and so forth)? Must one choose 
between the priority of revelation (Offenbarung) and that of revealability 
(Offenbarkeit), the priority of manifestation and that of manifestability, of 
theology and theiology, of the science of God and the science of the divine, 
of the divinity of God??° And above all, supposing there were an alternative 
between these two orders, what difference would it make to introduce this 
Aristotelian proposition according to which there could never be (primary) 
friendship between God and man? We shall come across this question 
again, but it implicitly organizes all reflection on the possibility of a politics 
of friendship. 


2. The thought of the act or the event from which the Aristotelian 
argument derives its authority is also, rather than a thought of each (good 
sense and common sense), a thought of ‘each one’, of individual singularity. 
It is true that this thought of each one can take root, in order to return, in 
phronesis, in perspicacious judgement and in the prudence of common 
sense. If the indispensable possibility of éxis does not suffice, if for that one 
must pass to the act and if that takes time while overcoming time, this is 
because one must choose and prefer: election and selection between friends 
and things (pragmata), but also between possible friends — and this will 
soon lead us back to the vicinity of an ‘O philoi oudeis philos’, whose ‘O”’ 
we shall not determine for the moment, and to its arithmetic lesson. Why 
are the mean, the malevolent, the ill-intentioned (phauloi) not, by 
definition, good friends? Why do they ignore the sharing or the community 
of friends (koina ta philon)? Because they prefer things (pragmata) to 
friends. They stock friends among things, they class friends at best among 
possessions, among good things. In the same stroke, they thus inscribe their 
friends in a field of relativity and calculable hypotheses, in a hierarchical 
multiplicity of possessions and things. Aristotle affirms the opposite: in 
order to accomplish the antithesis of these mean people or bad friends, I 
assign (prosnémo) relations otherwise, and distribute the priorities 
differently. I include good things among friends or in view of friends. Here 
is a preference neglected by the wicked. They invert or pervert this good 
hierarchy in truth by including their friends among things or in view of 
things, instead of treating things as things of friendship, as affairs 
(pragmata) belonging to the sphere of friends, serving the cause of friends, 
assigned first and foremost to friends.’ 

Recommending this preferential attribution, Aristotle speaks, then, of 
friends rather than of friendship. One must not only prefer friendship, but 
give the preference to friends. Since it is a question of singularities, this is 
an inevitable consequence: one must prefer certain friends. The choice of 
this preference reintroduces number and calculation info the multiplicity of 
incalculable singularities, where it would have been preferable not to 
reckon with friends as one counts and reckons with things. So the arithmetic 
consideration, the terrible necessity of reckoning with the plurality of 
friends (philoi, this plural that we shall come across again later in the two 
possible grammars for the sentence quoted and examined by Montaigne), 
still depends on temporality, on the time of friendship, on the essence of 


philia that never works without time (aneu khronou). One must not have 
too many friends, for there is not enough time to put them fo the test by 
living with each one. 

For one must live with each him. With each her. 

Is that possible? 

Living — this is understood with with. Whatever the modalities may later 
be, living is living with. But every time, it is only one person living with 
another: I Jive, myself, with (suzao), and with each person, every time with 
one person. In the passage we will quote in translation, the conjunction 
between the test or the experience (peira) of time (khronos) and of 
singularity, of each one (ékastos) must yet again be underlined. This bond 
of time and number in the principle of singularity is never separated from 
the hierarchical principle: if one must choose, then the best must be chosen. 
A certain aristocracy is analytically encompassed in the arithmetic of the 
choice: 


The primary friendship (e philia e prote) then is not found towards many (en pollois), for it is hard 
to test many men (kalepon pollon peiram labein), for one would have to live with each (ekdsto gar 
an édei suzétat). Nor should one choose a friend like a garment. Yet in all things it seems the mark 
of a sensible man (tou noun ékhontos) to choose the better of two alternatives; and if one has used 
the worse garment for a long time and not the better, the better is to be chosen, but not in place of 
an old friend (anti tou palai philou), one of whom you do not know whether he is better. For a 
friend is not to be had without trial (aneu peiras) nor in a single day (mias éméras), but there is 


need of time (alla khrénou dei) and so ‘the bushel of salt’ has become proverbial.7° 


The bushel-of-salt proverb recalls simultaneously the test and _ the 
parcelling—out, the experience and the part taken: one must have eaten the 
whole bushel of salt with someone before one is able to trust him, in a 
stable, sure, time-tested way, but the time of renewed ‘fidence’ eludes time, 
it conquers time in yet another way. Previously, the stable steadfastness of 
the reliable (bébaios) appeared to us in the form of continuity, duration or 
permanence: the omnitemporality that in time overcomes time. But to pass 
to the act beyond éxis, to be renewed and reaffirmed at every instant, the 
reliable in friendship supposes a re—invention, a re-engagement of freedom, 
a virtue (areté) that interrupts the animal analogy we were discussing 
above. This is another way of negating time in time, this time in the form of 
discontinuity, through the reinvention of the event. But here again the 
economy of time, even of the ‘at the same time’ (dma), commands that the 
instant of the act and the plenitude of enérgeia be linked to the calculation 


of number. The test of friendship remains, for a finite being, an endurance 
of arithmetic. Indeed, the friend must not only be good in himself, in a 
simple or absolute (ap/6s) manner, he must be good for you, in relation to 
you who are his friend. The friend is absolutely good and absolutely or 
simply the friend when these two qualities are in harmony, when they are 
‘symphonious’ with one another. All the more so, no doubt, when the friend 
is useful to his friend even if he is not absolutely virtuous or good 
(spoudaios). This last passage?’ is famous for its reputed obscurity, but the 
conclusion seems clear: it is not possible to love while one is 
simultaneously, at the same time (ama), the friend of numerous others (to 
de pottois ama einai philon kai to philein kéluet); the numerous ones, the 
numerous others — this means neither number nor multiplicity in general but 
too great a number, a certain determined excess of units. It is possible to 
love more than one person, Aristotle seems to concede; to love in number, 
but not too much so — not too many. It is not the number that is forbidden, 
nor the more than one, but the numerous, if not the crowd. The measure is 
given by the act, by the capacity of loving in act: for it is not possible to be 
in act (energein), effectively, actively, presently at the heart of this 
‘numerous’ (pros pollous) which is more than simple number (ou gar oion 
te ama pros pollous energein). A finite being could not possibly be present 
in act to too great a number. There is no belonging or friendly community 
that is present, and first present fo itself, in act, without election and without 
selection. 

This will have been understood in a flash: if the question of arithmetic 
seems grave and irreducible here, the word ‘arithmetic’ remains inadequate. 
The units in question are neither things, these pragmata to which the friend 
must always be preferred, nor numbers. This restrained multiplicity calls for 
an account, certainly, and one must not have too many friends, but it 
nevertheless resists enumeration, counting—off, or even pure and simple 
quantification. 

Why do we insist on this difficulty here and now? First of all, because it 
announces one of the possible secrets — thus hiding it still — in the cryptic 
tradition of the apostrophe brought up by Montaigne and so many others. 
One of the secrets which has remained a secret for the reporters themselves, 
as if it had to reserve itself for a few people. We will come back to this later. 
Next, because this secret merges with virtue’s (ateté). We should not 
pretend to know what this word means without having thought the enigma 


of philein. No doubt they are one and the same. And finally, because the 
quantification of singularities will always have been one of the political 
dimensions of friendship, of a becoming-political of a friendship which may 
not be political through and through — not originarily, necessarily or 
intrinsically. With this becoming-political, and with all the schemata that we 
will recognize therein — beginning with the most problematic of all, that of 
fraternity — the question of democracy thus opens, the question of the 
citizen or the subject as a countable singularity. And that of a ‘universal 
fraternity’. There is no democracy without respect for irreducible 
singularity or alterity, but there is no democracy without the ‘community of 
friends’ (koina ta philon), without the calculation of majorities, without 
identifiable, stabilizable, representable subjects, all equal. These two laws 
are irreducible one to the other. Tragically irreconcilable and forever 
wounding. The wound itself opens with the necessity of having to count 
one’s friends, to count the others, in the economy of one’s own, there where 
every other is altogether other. 

But where every other is equally altogether other. More serious than a 
contradiction, political desire is forever borne by the disjunction of these 
two laws. It also bears the chance and the future of a democracy whose ruin 
it constantly threatens but whose life, however, it sustains, like life itself, at 
the heart of its divided virtue, the inadequacy to itself. Would virtue ever 
have existed without the chaos opening in silence, like the ravenous mouth 
of an immeasurable abyss, between one or the other of these laws of the 
other? There is no virtue without this tragedy of number without number. 
This is perhaps even more unthinkable than a tragedy. The unthinkable 
filters through Aristotle’s staid treatise, under his worldly-wise counsel, 
under the wisdom of his precepts: my friends, if you want to have friends, 
do not have too many. 

Note that the counsellor never says how many, nor at what number virtue 
becomes impossible. What knowledge could ever measure up to the 
injunction to choose between those whom one loves, whom one must love, 
whom one can love? Between themselves? Between them and the others? 
All of them? 

At stake is virtue, which is no longer in nature, this virtue whose name 
will remain suspended, without an assured concept, as long as these two 
laws of friendship will not have been thought. For the reliability of the 
stable (bébaios), that on which virtue depends — therefore of liberty, 


decision and reflection — can no longer be only natural. No more so than 
time, which does not belong to nature when it puts primary friendship to the 
test. In the history of the concept of nature — and already in its Greek 
history — the virtue of friendship will have dug the trench of an opposition. 
For it obliges Aristotle himself to restrain the concept of nature: he must 
oppose it to its other — here to virtue — when he classes friendship among 
stable things (ton bebaiori), in the same way as happiness belongs to self- 
sufficient and autarkic things (t6n autarkon). It is the same immanence that 
provides shelter from external or random causalities. And constancy is 
virtuous only by reason of its autonomy, of the autarky of decisions which 
renew themselves, freely and according to a spontaneous repetition of their 
own movement, always new but anew and newly the same, ‘samely’ new. 
This is not possible without some naturality, but that is not in nature: it does 
not come down to nature. Having quoted and approved Euripides’ Electra 
(e gar phusis bébaios, ou ta khremata: for nature is stable, not wealth), 
Aristotle adds that it is much more beautiful (polu de kallion) to say virtue 
(ateté) in this case rather than nature (polu de kallion eipein oti é areté tés 
phuiseds).°° Since friendship does not — and above all must not — have the 
reliability of a natural thing or a machine; since its stability is not given by 
nature but is won, like constancy and ‘fidence’, through the endurance of a 
virtue, primary friendship, ‘that which allows all the others to be named’ 
(di’én ai allai légontai), we must say that it is founded on virtue (é 
kat’aretén esti).>! The pleasure it gives, the pleasure that is necessary — this 
is the immanent pleasure of virtue. There may well be other forms of 
friendship, those whose name is thereby derived from primary friendship 
(for example, says Aristotle, with children, animals, and the wicked), but 
they never imply virtue, nor equality in virtue. For if all the species of 
friendship (the three principal ones, according to virtue, to usefulness or to 
pleasure) imply equality or equity (isdtés), only primary friendship 
demands an equality of virtue between friends, in what assigns them 
reciprocally to one another. 

What can such equality in virtue be? What can it be measured against? 
How do you calculate a non-natural equality whose evaluation remains both 
immanent, as we have just seen, but at the same time obliged to reciprocity 
— that is, to a certain symmetry? One wonders what is left of a friendship 
which makes the virtue of the other its own condition (be virtuous if you 
want me to love you), but one wonders, too, what would be left of 


friendship without this condition, and when the number without number 
intervenes, when virtue is not dispensed in excess. And how can we 
reconcile this first imperative, that of primary friendship, with what we 
have begun to uncover: the necessary umlaterality of a dissymmetrical 
philein (you are better off loving than being loved) and the terrible but so 
righteous law of contretemps ? 

Is there a conflict here in the philosophy of philein, in the Aristotelian 
philosophy of friendship? For other Aristotelian axioms, which we shall 
consider, seem to forbid or contradict the call of dissymmetry and this law 
of contretemps. For example, the axiom which holds that the friend is 
another self who must have the feeling of his own existence — an 
inseparable axiom which makes friendship proceed from self-love, from 
philautia, which is not always egoism or amour-propre. 

Unless one would find the other in oneself, already: the same 
dissymmetry and tension of surviving in self, in the ‘oneself thus out of 
joint with its own existence. To be able or to have to be the friend of oneself 
— this would change nothing in the testamentary structure we are discussing. 
It would break all ipseity apart in advance, it would ruin in advance that 
which it makes possible: narcissism and self-exemplarity. We are speaking 
about anything but narcissism as it is commonly understood: Echo, the 
possible Echo, she who speaks from, and steals, the words of the other 
[celle qui prend la parole aux mots de l’autre|, she who takes the other at 
his or her word, her very freedom preceding the first syllables of Narcissus, 
his mourning and his grief. We are speaking of anything but the exemplarity 
of the Ciceronian exemplar. An arche-friendship would inscribe itself on the 
surface of the testament’s seal. It would call for the last word of the last will 
and testament. But in advance it would carry it away as well. 

It would be extraneous neither to the other justice nor to the other politics 
whose possibility we would like, perhaps, to see announced here. 

Through, perhaps, another experience of the possible. 


2 


Loving in Friendship: 
Perhaps — the Noun and the Adverb 


Thy Friendship oft has made my heart to ake 
Do be my Enemy for Friendships sake. 
Blake 


Love of one’s enemies? I think that has been well learned: it happens thousandfold 


today....! 
The life of the enemy. He who lives to combat an enemy must see to it that he 


remains alive.” 
Nietzsche 


‘O my friends, there is no friend’: wisdom and last will. The tone of the 
address is at first uncertain, no doubt, and we shall try here only one 
variation among so many other possibilities.* 

But on a first hearing, one that lets itself be ingenuously guided by what 
some call ordinary language and everyday words, by an interpretation very 
close to some common sense (and that is quite a story already!), the 
sentence seems to be murmured. Mimicking at least the eloquent sigh, this 
interpretation takes on the sententious and melancholy gravity of a 
testament. Someone sighs; a wise man, perhaps, has uttered his last breath. 
Perhaps. Perhaps he is talking to his sons or his brothers gathered together 
momentarily around a deathbed: ‘Oh my friends, there is no friend’. 

The testament thereby reaches us who also inherit it, beyond its natural 
and legitimate heirs, through an unindicated channel and with the meaning 
of the inheritance remaining to be deciphered. We are first of all ordered to 


understand it correctly. Nothing can justify once and for all my starting off, 
as I am in fact doing, from the place of the language and the tradition in 
which I myself inherited it — that is to say, the French of Montaigne. It so 
happens that we worry over this love of language when, in the place of the 
other, it becomes a national or popular cause. Without denying this limit, 
which is also a chance (for one must indeed receive the address of the other 
at a particular address and in a singular language; otherwise we would not 
receive it), I would like to recognize here the locus of a problem — the 
political problem of friendship. 

The apostrophe ‘O my friends, there is no friend’ states the death of 
friends. It says it. In its ‘performative contradiction’ (one should not be able 
to address friends, calling them friends while telling them that there are no 
friends, etc.) this saying hesitates between the established fact — it has the 
grammatical form of such a fact — and the judgement of the sentence: so be 
it, since it is so; and keep it intact in memory, and never forget it. The 
address is addressed to memory but also comes to us from memory — and 
quoted from memory, for ‘the saying that Aristotle often repeated’, is 
quoted by Montaigne, as others had quoted it before him; he recites it by 
heart, where such an event is not attested by any literal document. 

The death of friends, as we were saying above: both the memory and the 
testament. Let us recall, to begin with, that the chain of this quoted 
quotation (‘O my friends, there is no friend’) displays the heritage of an 
immense rumour throughout an imposing corpus of Western philosophical 
literature: from Aristotle to Kant, then to Blanchot; but also from 
Montaigne to Nietzsche who — for the first time, so it would seem — 
parodies the quotation by reversing it. In order, precisely, with the upheaval, 
to upset its assurance. 

There is indeed something of an upheaval here, and we would like to 
perceive, as it were, its seismic waves, the geological figure of a political 
revolution which is more discreet — but no less disruptive — than the 
revolutions known under that name; it is, perhaps, a revolution of the 
political. A seismic revolution in the political concept of friendship which 
we have inherited. 

Let us try to hear the ancestral wisdom of the address from within this 
place of reversal. What is there that is so stunning [renversant] here, and 
what has thereby been reversed? Here we have, for the first time, someone 
— another witness — coming forward to contest. He refuses even the 


accepted propriety of its paradox, as if the stakes were, then, to make it 
avow its other truth. In the history of the quoted quotation, in the incessant 
working? of its unfurling, Nietzsche’s upheaval would arrive as an 
interruption. It would inscribe in that history the scansion of an 
unprecedented event; but — hence the upsetting structure of the event — it 
would interrupt less than recall (and call again for) a rupture already 
inscribed in the speech it interrupts. 

By starting with at least a clue to this event, at the other end of the chain, 
we would, once again, wish to throw up the question of friendship as the 
question of the political. The question of the political, for this question is 
not necessarily, nor in advance, political. It is perhaps not yet or no longer 
thoroughly political, once the political is defined with the features of a 
dominant tradition. 

This counter-testimony occurs, as it rightly must, in Human All Too 
Human, when the excess of the beyond itself folds back into immanence, 
when what is human in man folds into the hem of the ‘al/ too’ of 
Nietzsche’s title, in the hollow of its vague [vague] modality, trembling and 
inscrutable but all the more forceful [déferlante, as in ‘une vague 
déferlante’ (breaking wave)]|. The irresistible wave of the all too, a wave 
rolling up into itself, the enveloped violence of a wave welling up and 
falling back on itself. In this turn of the ‘all too’, around the ‘all too’ in its 
very revolution, another sentence begins in fact with a ‘perhaps’: there will 
come, perhaps; there will occur, perhaps, the event of that which arrives 
(und vielleicht kommt), and this will be the hour of joy, an hour of birth but 
also of resurrection; in any case, the passage from the dying to the living. 
Let us prick up our ears, for the moment, towards this perhaps, even if it 
prevents us from hearing the rest: 


Perhaps to each of us there will come the more joyful hour when we exclaim: 
‘Friends, there are no friends!’ thus said the dying sage; 


‘Foes, there are no foes!’ say I, the living fool.* 


Why madness? And why should thought, the thought of friendship to come, 
lend itself inevitably, maddeningly, to madness? This long sentence should 
be quoted again, and in its original language. But let us observe in advance: 
such an event presents itself, certainly; it is, thus in the present, the event of 
a saying that speaks in the present. In the living present. /t is the living fool 
that J am who is presently speaking to you. I say to you. Shouting, calling 


out (ruf ich...). An J is speaking to you. J am saying to you. You. I am 
speaking to you. To you, here and now, me: to remind or to announce, 
certainly; thus to tell you what is not yet, or what is no longer (the wisdom 
of the dying sage), but speaking to you in a perfectly present way. 

If it reaches us none the less with something of a delay — that of a 
quotation already — this saying of the living fool speaks in the present. It 
spoke to you, it was in the present speaking to you in order to make a 
promise. This is not, this was not, just any promise. The promise promises 
in that fundamental mode of ‘perhaps’, and even the ‘dangerous perhaps’ 
which will open, as Beyond Good and Evil prophesies, the speech of 
philosophers to come. 

What is going to come, perhaps, is not only this or that; it is at last the 
thought of the perhaps, the perhaps itself. The arrivant will arrive perhaps, 
for one must never be sure when it comes to arrivance; but the arrivant 
could also be the perhaps itself, the unheard-of, totally new experience of 
the perhaps. Unheard-of, totally new, that very experience which no 
metaphysician might yet have dared to think. 

Now, the thought of the ‘perhaps’ perhaps engages the only possible 
thought of the event — of friendship to come and friendship for the future. 
For to love friendship, it is not enough to know how to bear the other in 
mourning; one must love the future. And there is no more just category for 
the future than that of the ‘perhaps’. Such a thought conjoins friendship, the 
future, and the perhaps to open on to the coming of what comes — that is to 
say, necessarily in the regime of a possible whose possibilization must 
prevail over the impossible. For a possible that would only be possible 
(non-impossible), a possible surely and certainly possible, accessible in 
advance, would be a poor possible, a futureless possible, a possible already 
set aside, so to speak, life-assured. This would be a programme or a 
causality, a development, a process without an event. 

The possibilization of the impossible possible must remain at one and the 
same time as undecidable — and therefore as decisive — as the future itself. 
What would a future be if the decision were able to be programmed, and if 
the risk [/’aléa], the uncertainty, the unstable certainty, the inassurance of 
the ‘perhaps’, were not suspended on it at the opening of what comes, flush 
with the event, within it and with an open heart? What would remain to 
come should the inassurance, the limited assurance of the perhaps, not hold 
its breath in an ‘epoch’, to allow what is to come to appear or come — in 


order to open up, precisely, a concatenation of causes and effects, by 
necessarily disjoining a certain necessity of order, by interrupting it and 
inscribing therein simply its possible interruption? This suspension, the 
imminence of an interruption, can be called the other, the revolution, or 
chaos; it is, in any case, the risk of an instability. The unstable or the 
unreliable is what Plato and Aristotle spoke of as that which is not bébaios 
(not firm, constant, sure and certain, reliable, credible, faithful). Whether in 
its ultimate or minimal form, the instability of the unreliable always 
consists in not consisting, in eluding consistency and constancy, presence, 
permanence or substance, essence or existence, as well as any concept of 
truth which might be associated with them. This inconsistency and/or 
inconstancy is not an indetermination, but supposes a certain type of 
resolution and a singular exposition at the crossroads of chance and 
necessity. The unstable is as required here as its opposite, the stable or the 
reliable of constancy (bébaios), and is indispensable to the Platonic or 
Aristotelian philosophy of friendship. To think friendship with an open 
heart — that is, to think it as close as possible to its opposite — one must 
perhaps be able to think the perhaps, which is to say that one must be able 
to say it and to make of it, in saying it, an event: perhaps, vielleicht, perhaps 
— the English word refers more directly to chance (hap, perchance) and to 
the event of what may happen.° 

Now we know that this thought of the perhaps — this one and not any 
other — does not occur anywhere or anyhow. Far from being a simple 
indetermination, the very sign of irresolution, it just so happens that it 
occurs to Nietzsche in the upheaval of a reversing catastrophe: not so as to 
settle the contradiction or to suspend the oppositions, but at the end of a 
case pressed against ‘the metaphysicians of all ages’, precisely at the point 
where they stop in their ‘typical prejudice’ and their ‘fundamental faith’ 
(Grundglaube) — the ‘faith in antithetical values’ (Glaube an_ the 
Gegenséitze der Werthe)® — at that point where they are unable to think their 
reversal or inversion: that is, the non-dialectical passage from one to the 
other. This they cannot think, it frightens them; they are not able to endure 
the contamination coming from what is beyond both antithetical values. 
Despite the value that must be accorded to the ‘true’ and to the ‘veracious’, 
it is altogether ‘possible’, ‘1t might even be possible (es ware)’ that the very 
thing constitutive of the ‘value of good and honoured things’ — and virtue 
(areté) is one of them — is related, knotted, entangled (verwandt, verknupft, 


verhakelt) — perhaps (vielleicht) identical in its essence — (wesengleich) to 
its antithesis, to wicked things. ‘Perhaps!’ (Vielleicht!) 

Before we even reach this exclamation, to this one-word phrase 
(Vielleicht!), a great number of perhapses have rained down. They have 
multiplied themselves in the writing of Nietzsche before becoming a theme, 
almost a name, perhaps a category. First of all in defining the ‘frog 
perspective’ to which Nietzsche compares metaphysics: 


For it may be doubted, firstly whether there exist any antitheses at all, and secondly whether these 
popular evaluations and value-antitheses, on which the metaphysicians have set their seal, are not 
perhaps (vielleicht) merely foreground valuations, merely provisional perspectives, perhaps 
(vielleicht) moreover the perspectives of a hole-and-corner, perhaps from below, as it were ‘frog- 
perspectives’ (Frosch-Perpecktiven gleichsam), to borrow an expression employed by painters.’ 


The transmutation to which Nietzsche submits the concept of virtue — 
sometimes, as has often been remarked,® also in the Machiavellian sense of 
virtu — shudders in the tremor of this perhaps. In other words, in what is 
still to come, perhaps. This is something other than a reversal. The famous 
passage on ‘Our virtues’ (para. 214) from the same book turns resolutely 
towards us, towards ourselves, towards the ‘Europeans of the day after 
tomorrow’ that we are, and, first of all, towards the ‘first-born of the 
twentieth century’. It invites us, we the ‘last Europeans’, to be done with 
the pigtail and the wig of ‘good conscience’, the “belief in one’s own virtue 
(an seine eigne Tugend glauben)’. And here again, the shudder of the 
sentence, the shudder of an arrow of which it is still not known where and 
how far it will go, the vibration of a shaft of writing which, alone, promises 
and calls for a reading, a preponderance to come of the interpretative 
decision. We do not know exactly what is quivering here, but we perceive, 
in flight, at least a figure of the vibration. The prediction: ‘Alas! if only you 
knew how soon, how very soon, things will be — different! —’ (- Ach! Wenn 
ihr wuptet, wie es bald, so bald schon — anders kommt!?). 

What a sentence! Is it a sentence? Do we know that — that things will be 
different; and how very soon thing? will be different? Do we not already 
know that? Can that be measured by knowledge? If we knew that, things 
would no longer be different. We must not totally know this in order for a 
change to occur again. So, in order for this knowledge to be true, to know 
what it knows, a certain non-knowledge is necessary. But the non- 
knowledge of the one who says he knows that we do not know (‘Ah if you 


only knew’, a ploy or a figure which is neither a question nor an 
affirmation, not even a hypothesis, since you are going to know very soon, 
starting at the end of the sentence, that which you would know if you knew, 
and that therefore you already know: ‘Ah if you only knew!’) — to wit, what 
the person signing the said sentence (which is not a full sentence, but only 
an incomplete subordinate) cannot state without attributing to himself 
knowledge concerning what the other does not yet know, but already 
knows, having learned it in this instant — that is, instantaneously, and so 
soon (so bald) that it will not wait until the end of the sentence. 

The acceleration in the change or the alteration which the sentence in 
suspension speaks (wie es bald, so bald schon — anders kommt!) is in truth 
only its very rapidity. An incomplete sentence rushes to its conclusion at the 
infinite speed of an arrow. The sentence speaks of itself, it gets carried 
away, precipitates and precedes itself, as if its end arrived before the end. 
Instantaneous teledromatics: the race is finished in advance, and this is 
future-producing. The circle is perhaps future-producing — this is what will 
have to be assumed, however impossible it may seem. As with what 
happens at every instant, the end begins, the sentence begins at the end. 
Infinite or nil speed, absolute economy, for the arrow carries its address 
along and implies in advance, in its very readability, the signature of the 
addressee. This is tantamount to saying that it withdraws from space by 
penetrating it. You have only to listen. It advances backwards; it outruns 
itself by reversing itself. It outstrips itself [elle se gagne de vitesse]. Here is 
an arrow whose flight would consist in a return to the bow: fast enough, in 
sum, never to have left it; and what the sentence says — its arrow — is 
withdrawn. It will nevertheless have reached us, struck home; it will have 
taken some time — it will, perhaps, have changed the order of the world 
even before we are able to awake to the realization that, in sum, nothing 
will have been said, nothing that will not already have been blindly 
endorsed in advance. And again, like a testament: for the natural miracle 
lies in the fact that such sentences outlive each author, and each specific 
reader, him, you and me, all of us, all the living, all the living presents. 

By way of economy — and in order, in a single word, to formalize this 
absolute economy of the feint, this generation by joint and simultaneous 
grafting of the performative and the reportive, without a body of its own — 
let us call the event of such sentences, the ‘logic’ of this chance occurrence, 
its ‘genetics’, its ‘rhetoric’, its ‘historical record’, its ‘polities’, etc., 


teleiopoetic. Teleiopoios qualifies, in a great number of contexts and 
semantic orders, that which renders absolute, perfect, completed, 
accomplished, finished, that which brings to an end. But permit us to play 
too with the other fe/e, the one that speaks to distance and the far-removed, 
for what is indeed in question here is a poetics of distance at one remove, 
and of an absolute acceleration in the spanning of space by the very 
structure of the sentence (it begins at the end, it is initiated with the 
signature of the other). Rendering, making, transforming, producing, 
creating — this is what counts; but, given that this happens only in the auto- 
tele-affection of the said sentence, in so far as it implies or incorporates its 
reader, one would — precisely to be complete — have to speak of auto- 
teleiopoetics. We shall say teleiopoetics for short, but not without 
immediately suggesting that friendship is implied in advance therein: 
friendship for oneself, for the friend and for the enemy. We all the more 
easily authorize ourselves to leave the self of the autos in the wings, since it 
appears here as the split effect rather than as the simple origin of 
teleiopoesis [té/éiopoiése]. The inversion of repulsion into attraction is, in a 
way, engaged, analytically included, in the movement of philein. This is a 
logic that will have to be questioned: if there is no friend elsewhere than 
where the enemy can be, the ‘necessity of the enemy’ or the ‘one must love 
one’s enemies’ (seine Feinde lieben) straight away transforms enmity into 
friendship, etc. The enemies I love are my friends. So are the enemies of my 
friends. As soon as one needs or desires one’s enemies, only friends can be 
counted — this includes the enemies, and vice versa — and here madness 
looms. At each step, on the occasion of every teleiopoetic event. (No) more 
sense [Plus de sens]. That which is empty and that which overflows 
resemble one another, a desert mirage effect and the ineluctability of the 
event. 


(Of course, we must quickly inform the reader that we will not follow 
Nietzsche here. Not in any simple manner. We will not follow him in order 
to follow him come what may. He never demanded such a thing anyway 
without freeing us, in the same move, from his very demand, following the 
well-known paradoxes of any fidelity. We will follow him here to the best 
of our ability in order, perhaps, to stop following him at one particular 
moment; and to stop following those who follow him — Nietzsche’s sons. Or 
those who still accompany him — to them we shall return much later — as his 


brothers or the brothers of his brothers. But this will be in order to continue, 
in his own way again, perhaps, turning the virtue of virtue against itself; to 
dig deeper under this ‘good conscience’ of the ‘last Europeans’ that 
continues to impel Nietzsche’s statements. This good conscience perhaps 
leaves on them a mark of the most unthought tradition — and the tradition of 
more than one tradition — all the way down to the overwhelming thought of 
friendship. This following without following will be undertaken in several 
stages, in varying rhythms, but it will also derive its authority from an 
avowal, however ironic it may be. 

In ‘Our virtues’, Nietzsche continues to say ‘we’ in order to declare his 
appurtenance qua heir who still believes in his own virtues: 


And is there anything nicer than to look for one’s own virtues? Does this not also mean: to believe 
in one’s own virtues? But this ‘believing in one’s virtue’ — is this not at bottom the same thing as 
that which one formerly called one’s ‘good conscience’, that venerable long conceptual pigtail 
which our grandfathers used to attach to the back of their heads and often enough to the back of 
their minds as well? It seems that, however little we may think ourselves old-fashioned and grand- 
fatherly-respectable in other respects, in one thing we are none the less worthy grandsons of these 
grandfathers, we last Europeans with a good conscience (wir letzsten Europaer mit gutem 


Gewissen): we too still wear their pigtail (ihren Zopf).’ ' 


This good conscience of the last Europeans might well survive in 
Nietzsche’s head, beyond what he believes, what he thinks he believes, as 
well as in the heads of his ‘philosophers of a new species’: those who, in 
our century and beyond, have not broken any more radically than Nietzsche 
with the Greek or Christian canon of friendship — that is, with a certain 
politics, a certain type of democracy.) 


These philosophers of a new species will accept the contradiction, the 
opposition or the coexistence of incompatible values. They will seek neither 
to hide this possibility nor to forget it; nor will they seek to surmount it. 
And this is where madness looms; but here, too, its urgency indeed calls for 
thought. In the same paragraph, Beyond Good and Evil opens our ears, and 
delivers the definition of the fool we need to understand the ‘living fool’ of 
Human All Too Human, such as he presents himself (I who shout, who 
exclaim, I the living fool, ruf ich, der lebende Tor); at the very moment 
when he turns the address into its antithesis, when the friends become the 
enemies or when suddenly there are no more enemies. What in fact does 
Beyond Good and Evil say to us? That one must be mad, in the eyes of the 
‘metaphysicians of all ages’, to wonder how something might (konnte) rise 


up out of its antithesis; to wonder if, for example, truth might be born of 
error, the will to truth or the will to deceive, the disinterested act of egotism, 
etc. How is one to ask a question of this kind without going mad? Such a 
genesis (Entstehung) of the antithesis would end up contradicting its very 
origin. It would be an anti-genesis. It would wage war on its own lineage, as 
the ‘metaphysician of all ages’ believes; this would be tantamount to a 
monstrous birth, an ‘impossible’ origin (‘Solcherlei Entstehung ist 
unmoglich’). Anyone who merely dreams of such a possibility (wer davon 
traumt) immediately goes mad; this is already a fool (ein Narr). Here we 
have yet another way of defining, from the impossible thought of this 
impossible, both the direct lineage and the dream — and its madness. 


Perhaps! (Vielleicht!) But who is willing to concern himself with such dangerous perhapses! For 
that we have to await the arrival of a new species of philosopher (einer neuen Gattung von 
Philosophen), one which possesses tastes and inclinations opposite to and different from 
(umgekehrten) those of its predecessors — philosophers of the dangerous ‘perhaps’ (Philosophen 
des gefahrlichen Vielleicht) in every sense. — And to speak in all seriousness: I see such new 


philosophers arising (Ich sehe solche neue Philosophen heraufkommen).'! 


Nietzsche renews the call; he puts through — from a different place — this 
teleiopoetic or telephone call to philosophers of a new species. To those of 
us who already are such philosophers, for in saying that he sees them 
coming, in saying they are coming, in feigning to record their coming 
(further on: Eine neue Gattung von Philosophen kommt herauf'), he is 
calling, he is asking, in sum, “that they come’ in the future. But to be able to 
say this, from the standpoint of the presumed signer, these new 
philosophers — from the standpoint of what is being written, from where we 
(Nietzsche and his followers) are writing to one another — must already 
have arrived. Nietzsche makes the call with an apostrophe to his addressee, 
asking him to join up with ‘us’, with this ‘us’ which is being formed, to join 
us and to resemble us, to become the friends of the friends that we are! 
Strange friends. What are we doing, in fact, we the friends that we are, we 
who are calling for new philosophers, we who are calling you to resemble 
and to join up with us in shared enjoyment (Mitfreude, this 1s what ‘makes 
the friend’; macht den Freund, as we read elsewhere, 3 Mitfreude and not 
Mitleiden, joy among friends, shared enjoyment [jouissance]| and not shared 
suffering)? What are we doing and who are we, we who are calling you to 
share, to participate and to resemble? We are first of all, as friends, the 
friends of solitude, and we are calling on you to share what cannot be 


shared: solitude. We are friends of an entirely different kind, inaccessible 
friends, friends who are alone because they are incomparable and without 
common measure, reciprocity or equality. Therefore, without a horizon of 
recognition. Without a familial bond, without proximity, without oikeiotés. 

Without truth? We should wait and see. What truth is there for a 
friendship without proximity, without presence, therefore without 
resemblance, without attraction, perhaps even without significant or 
reasonable preference? How can such a friendship even be possible, except 
in a figure? Why still call this ‘friendship’ except in a misuse of language 
and a diversion of a semantic tradition? How could we not only be the 
friends of solitude, born friends (gebomen), sworn friends (geschwomen), 
jealous friends of solitude (eifersuchtigen Freunde der Einsamkeit), but 
then invite you to become a member of this singular community? 

How many of us are there? Does that count? And how do you calculate? 

Thus is announced the anchoritic community of those who love in 
separation [who love to stand aloof: gui aiment a s’éloigner]. The invitation 
comes to you from those who can love only at a distance, in separation [qui 
n’aiment qu’ a se séparer au loin]. This is not all they love, but they love; 
they love lovence, they love to love — in love or in friendship — providing 
there is this withdrawal. Those who love only in cutting ties are the 
uncompromising friends of solitary singularity. They invite you to enter into 
this community of social disaggregation [deéliaison], which is not 
necessarily a secret society, a conjuration, the occult sharing of esoteric or 
crypto-poetic knowledge. The classical concept of the secret belongs to a 
thought of the Community, solidarity or the sect — initiation or private space 
which represents the very thing the friend who speaks to you as a friend of 
solitude has rebelled against. 

How can this be? Is it not a challenge to good sense and to sense tout 
court? Is it possible? 

It is perhaps impossible, as a matter of fact. Perhaps the impossible is the 
only possible chance of something new, of some new philosophy of the 
new. Perhaps; perhaps, in truth, the perhaps still names this chance. Perhaps 
friendship, if there is such a thing, must honour [faire droit] what appears 
impossible here. Let us, then, underscore once again the perhaps (vielleicht) 
of a sentence, the one ending the second section of Beyond Good and Evil, 
entitled ‘The free spirit’ (para. 44). 


After the ‘frog perspective’, with the eye of the toad — on the same side 
but also on the other — we have the eye of the owl, an eye open day and 
night, like a ghost in the immense Nietzschean bestiary; but here too, above 
all, we have the scarecrow, the disquieting simulacrum, the opposite of a 
decoy: an artifact in rags and tatters, an automaton to frighten birds — the 
Vogelscheuchen that we are and should be in the world of today, if we are to 
save, with madness and with singularity itself the friendship of the solitary 
and the chance to come of a new philosophy. We shall focus on a moment 
of this clamour — only the conclusion of this long-winded [au long souffle] 
address. It should be allowed to ring out in a loud voice in its entirety, and 
in its original language. In the light of the night, for this solitude of which 
we are jealous is that of ‘midday and midnight’. Before quoting these few 
lines, let us recall, however, that this passage begins with an attack on a 
certain concept of the free spirit, of free thought. Nietzsche denounces the 
freethinkers, the levellers with their enslaved pens — in the service not of 
democracy, as they sometimes claim, but of ‘democratic taste’ and, in 
quotation marks, ‘modern ideas’. It is out of the question to oppose some 
non-freedom to the freedom of these free spirits (since they are in truth 
slaves); only additional freedom. These philosophers of the future (diese 
Philosophen der Zukunft) that Nietzsche says are coming will also be free 
spirits, ‘very free’ spirits (freie, sehr freie Geister). But through this 
superlative and this surplus of freedom, they will also be something greater 
and other, something altogether other, fundamentally other (Grundlich- 
Anderes). As for what will be fundamentally other, I will say that the 
philosophers of the future will be at once both its figure and its 
responsibility (although Nietzsche does not put it in this way). Not because 
they will come, if they do, in the future, but because these philosophers of 
the future already are philosophers capable of thinking the future, of 
carrying and sustaining the future — which is to say, for the metaphysician 
allergic to the perhaps, capable of enduring the intolerable, the undecidable 
and the terrifying. Such philosophers already exist, something like the 
Messiah (for the teleiopoesis we are speaking of is a messianic structure) 
whom someone addresses, here and now, to inquire when he will come. !4 
We are not yet among these philosophers of the future, we who are calling 
them and calling them the philosophers of the future, but we are in advance 
their friends and, in this gesture of the call, we establish ourselves as their 
heralds and precursors (ihre Herolde und Vorlaufer). 


This precursivity does not stop at the premonitory sign. It already 
engages a bottomless responsibility, a debt whose sharing out [partage] is 
differentiated enough to warrant a prudent analysis. Nietzsche sometimes 
says ‘I’ and sometimes ‘we’. The signatory of the precursory discourses 
addressed to you is sometimes me, sometimes us — that 1s, a community of 
solitary friends, friends ‘jealous of solitude’, jealous of their “proper and 
profound solitude of midday-midnight’ who call other friends to come. 

This is perhaps the ‘community of those without community’.!> 

But the declared responsibility, the Schuldigkeit thus named, is mine, that 
of the person saying I. /t says, J say, I must answer at the same time before 
the philosophers of the future to come (before them), before the spectre of 
those who are not yet here, and before the philosophers of the future that we 
(we) already are, we who are already capable of thinking the future or the 
coming of philosophers of the future. A double responsibility which 
doubles up again endlessly: I must answer for myself or before myself by 
answering for us and before us. I/we must answer for the present we for and 
before the we of the future, while presently addressing myself to you, and 
inviting you to join up with this ‘us’ of which you are already but not yet a 
member. At the end of the teleiopoetic sentence you, readers, may have 
already become, nevertheless, the cosignatories of the addresses addressed 
to you, providing, at least, that you have heard it, which you are invited to 
do to the best of your ability — which thus remains your absolutely and 
irreplaceably singular responsibility. 

This is a double but infinite responsibility, infinitely redoubled, split in 
two [dé-doublée], shared and parcelled out; an infinitely divided 
responsibility, disseminated, if you will, for one person, for only one — all 
alone (this is the condition of responsibility) — and a bottomless double 
responsibility that implicitly describes an intertwining of temporal ekstases; 
a friendship to come of time with itself where we meet again the interlacing 
of the same and the altogether other (‘Grundlich-Anderes’) which orientates 
us in this labyrinth. The to-come precedes the present, the self-presentation 
of the present; it is, therefore, more ‘ancient’ than the present, ‘older’ than 
the past present. It thus chains itself to itself while unchaining itself at the 
same time; it disjoins itself, and disjoins the self that would yet join itself in 
this disjunction. 

Shall we say that this responsibility which inspires (in Nietzsche) a 
discourse of hostility towards ‘democratic taste’ and “modem ideas’ is 


exercised against democracy in general, modernity in general; or that, on 
the contrary, it responds in the name of a hyperbole of democracy or 
modernity to come, before it, prior to its coming — a hyperbole for which 
the ‘taste’ and ‘ideas’ would be, in this Europe and this America then 
named by Nietzsche, but the mediocre caricatures, the talkative good 
conscience, the perversion and the prejudice — the ‘misuse of the term’ 
democracy? Do not these lookalike caricatures — and precisely because they 
resemble it — constitute the worst enemy of what they resemble, whose 
name they have usurped? The worst repression, the very repression which 
one must, as close as possible to the analogy, open and literally unlock? 


(Let us leave this question suspended, it breathes the perhaps’, and the 
perhaps to come will always have anticipated the question. It 1s a subsidiary 
question, always late and secondary. At the moment of its formation, a 
perhaps will have opened it up. A perhaps will perhaps always forbid its 
closing, where it is in the very act of forming. No response, no 
responsibility, will ever abolish the perhaps. The perhaps must open and 
precede, once and for all, the questioning it suspends in advance — not to 
neutralize or inhibit, but to make possible all the determined and 
determining orders that depend on questioning (research, knowledge, 
science and philosophy, logic, law, politics and ethics, and in general 
language itself): this is a necessity to which we are attempting to do justice 
in several ways. 

For example: 

1. By recalling this acquiescence (Zusage) more originary than the 
question which, without saying yes to anything positive, can affirm the 
possibility of the future only by opening itself up to determinability, thus by 
welcoming what still remains undetermined and indeterminable. It is indeed 
A perhaps that cannot as yet be determined as dubitative or sceptical,!® the 
perhaps of what remains to be thought, to be done, to be lived (to death). 
Now this perhaps not only comes ‘before’ the question (investigation, 
research, knowledge, theory, philosophy); it would come, in order to make 
it possible, ‘before’ the originary acquiescence which engages the question 
in advance with [aupres de] the other. 

2. By specifying recurrently: ‘if there is one’, by suspending the thesis of 
existence wherever, between a concept and an event, the law of an aporia, 
an undecidability, a double bind occurs in interposition, and must in truth 


impose itself to be endured there. This is the moment when the disjunction 
between thinking and knowing becomes crucial. This is the moment when 
one can think sense or non-sense only by ceasing to be sure that the thing 
ever occurs, or — even if there is such a thing — that it would ever be 
accessible to theoretical knowledge or determinant judgement, any 
assurance of discourse or of nomination in general. Thus we regularly say — 
but we could multiply the examples — the gift, if there is one; invention, if 


there is any such thing,'’ and so forth. This does not amount to conceding a 
hypothetical or conditional dimension (‘if, supposing that, etc.’) but to 
marking a difference between ‘there 1s’ and ‘is’ or ‘exists’ — that is to say, 
the words of presence. What there is, if there 1s one or any, is not 
necessarily. It perhaps does not exist nor ever present itself; nevertheless, 
there is one, or some; there is a chance of there being one, of there being 
some. Perhaps — although the French peut-étre is, perhaps, with its two 
verbs (pouvoir and Are), too rich. Would not the original possibility we are 
discussing efface itself better in the adverbs of other languages (vielleicht or 
perhaps, for example)? 

I underscore, then, we underscore — more precisely we, in turn, re-mark 
what the I itself (Nietzsche, if you like), will have underlined: its 
responsibility, the obligation to answer, the responsibility which consists in 
calling as much as in responding to the call, and always in the name of a 
singular solitude, proper solitude, solitude strictly speaking. In the name of 
the friend jealous of his solitude, jealous of his secret without secret. Let us 
then remark, too, the flexions and reflections of personal pronouns, between 
I, they, we and you: I feel responsible towards them (the new thinkers who 
are coming), therefore responsible before us who announce them, therefore 
towards us who are already what we are announcing and who must watch 
over that very thing, therefore towards and before you whom I call to join 
us, before and towards me who understands all this and who is before it all: 
me, them, us, you, etc. 


But in saying this I feel I have a duty (I feel I have the responsibility, the debt or the duty: fuhle 
ich ... die Schuldigkeit), almost as much towards them as towards us, their heralds and precursors, 
us free spirits! — to blow away from all of us an ancient and stupid prejudice and 
misunderstanding which has all too long obscured the concept ‘free spirit’ like a fog. In all the 
countries of Europe and likewise in America there exists at present something that misuses this 
name, a very narrow, enclosed, chained up species of spirits who desire practically the opposite of 
that which informs our aims and instincts — not to mention the fact that in regard to those new 
philosophers appearing (heraufkommenden neuen Philosophen) they must certainly be closed 
windows and bolted doors. They belong, in short and regrettably, among the /evellers (Nivellirer), 


these falsely named ‘free spirits’ — eloquent and tirelessly scribbling slaves of the democratic taste 
and its ‘modem ideas’, men without solitude one and all, without their own solitude (allesammt 
Menschen ohne Einsamkeit, ohne eigne Einsamkeit), good clumsy fellows who, while they cannot 
be denied courage and moral respectability, are unfree and ludicrously superficial, above all in 
their fundamental inclination to see in the forms of existing society the cause of practically all 
human failure and misery: which is to stand the truth happily on its head! (wobei the Wahrheit 
glucklich auf den Kopf zu stehn kommt!) What with all their might they would like to strive after is 
the universal green pasture happiness of the herd, with security, safety (Sicherheit, 
Ungefahrlichkeit), comfort and an easier life for all; their two most oft-recited doctrines and 
ditties are ‘equality of rights’ and ‘sympathy for all that suffers’ — and suffering itself they take for 
something that has to be abolished. We, who are the opposite of this ... [we think that] everything 
evil, dreadful, tyrannical, beast of prey and serpent in man serves to enhance the species man (der 


species Mensch). ® 


And here, once again, a ‘perhaps’ arrives to spread disquiet in the 
opposition itself. The perhaps carries away the extreme alterity, the 
possibility of this other end, this other term which structures no less the 
antidemocratic provocation, and results in there never being ‘enough to say’ 
or ‘enough to silence’: 


We do not say enough when we say even that much, and at any rate we are, in what we say and do 
not say on this point, at the other end (at the altogether other end, Nietzsche’s emphasis: am 
andern Ende) from all modern ideology and herd desiderata: as its antipodes perhaps (als deren 
Antipoden vielleicht)? 


At each instant the discourse is carried out to its limit, on the edge of 
silence: it transports itself beyond itself. It is swept away by the extreme 
opposition — indeed, the a/terity — by the hyperbole which engages it in an 
infinite build-up [surenchére| (freer than the freedom of the free spirit, a 
better democrat than the crowd of modem democrats, aristocrat among all 
democrats, more futural and futurist than the modem), swept away by the 
perhaps that arrives to undecide meaning at each decisive moment. 

All this (this surplus of democracy, this excess of freedom, this 
reaffirmation of the future) is not, so we suspect, very promising for the 
community, communication, the rules and maxims of communicational 
action. Nietzsche continues, in effect: 


Is it any wonder we ‘free spirits’ are not precisely the most communicative of spirits (die 
mitteilsamsten Geister)? that we do not want to betray in every respect from what (wovon) a spirit 
can free itself and to what (wohin) it is then perhaps driven? And as for the dangerous formula 
‘beyond good and evil’ with which we at any rate guard against being taken for what we are not: 
we are something different (wir sind etwas Anders) from ‘libres-penseurs’, ‘liben 
pensatori,#x2019;, Freidenket’, or whatever else all these worthy advocates of ‘modern ideas’ like 


to call themselves. !? 


And now, for the finishing touch, the owls in full light of day — ourselves 
again — the scarecrows that we owe it to ourselves to be today; friendship 
without friendship of the friends of solitude, the surplus of free will, and 
once again the perhaps in which I see you coming, you, the arrivants to 
come, you the arrivant thinkers, you the coming, the upcoming (das 
Kommenden), the new philosophers, but you whom I see coming, me, I who 
am already perhaps a little like you who are perhaps a little like us, a bit on 
our side, you the new philosophers, my readers to come, who will be my 
readers only if you become new philosophers — that is, if you know how to 
read me — in other words, if you can think what I write in my stead, and if 
you know how to countersign in advance or how to prepare yourself to 
countersign, always in imminent fashion, what you inspire in me here 
exactly, teleiopoetically: 


curious to the point of vice, investigators to the point of cruelty, with rash fingers for the 
ungraspable, with teeth and stomach for the most indigestible, ready for every task that demands 
acuteness and sharp senses, ready for every venture thanks to a superfluity of ‘free will’ (dank 
einen Uberschusse von ‘freiem Willen’), with fore-and back-souls into whose ultimate intenions 
no one can easily see, with fore-and backgrounds to whose end no foot may go, hidden under 
mantles of light, conquerors even though we look like heirs and prodigals, collectors and arrangers 
from morn till night, misers of our riches and our full-crammed cupboards, thrifty in learning and 
forgetting, inventive in schemata, sometimes proud of tables of categories, sometimes pedants, 
sometimes night owls of labour even in broad daylight (mitunter Nachteulen der Arbeit auch am 
hellen Tage); yes, even scarecrows when we need to be — and today we need to be: in so far, that 
is, as we are born, sworn, jealous friends of solitude, of our own deepest, most midnight, most 
midday solitude (unserer eignen tiefsten mitternachtlichsten, mittaglichsten Einsamkeit) — such a 
type of man are we, we free spirits! and perhaps you too are something of the same type, you 
coming men? you new philosophers? (und vielleicht seid auch ihr etwas davon, ihr Kommenden? 


ihr neuen Philosophen? —) {Nietzsche’s emphasis}.7° 


Community without community, friendship without the community of the 
friends of solitude. No appurtenance. Nor resemblance nor proximity. The 
end of oikeiotés? Perhaps. We have here, in any case, friends seeking 
mutual recognition without knowing each other. One who calls and 
questions oneself is not even sure that the new philosophers will be part of 
the free spirits that we are. The rupture will perhaps be radical, even more 
radical. Perhaps those whom I am calling will be unrecognizable enemies. 
In any case, I am not asking them to be like me, like us, as the French 
translation we have quoted puts it. Friends of solitude: this must be 
understood in multiple fashion: they love solitude, they belong together — 
that is their resemblance, in a world of solitude, of isolation, of singularity, 


of non-appurtenance. But in this singular world of singularities, these 
‘sworn friends of solitude’ are conjurers; they are even called to be 
conjurers by one of the heralds, the one who says I but is not necessarily the 
first, though he is one of the first in our twentieth century to speak this 
community without community. 

To speak to it and thereby — let us not hesitate to clarify this — to form or 
to forge it. And to do so in the language of madness that we must use, 
forced, all of us, by the most profound and rigorous necessity, to say things 
as contradictory, insane, absurd, impossible, undecidable as ‘X without X’, 
‘community of those without community’, ‘inoperative community’, 
‘unavowable community’: these untenable syntagms and arguments — 
illegible, of course, and even derisive — these inconceivable concepts 
exposed to the disdain of philosophical good conscience, which thinks it 
possible to hold out in the shade of the Enlightenment; where the light of 
the Enlightenment is not thought, where a heritage is misappropriated. For 
us there is no Enlightenment other than the one to be thought. 

This secretless conjuration plots itself between day and night, between 
midday and midnight, in the risk of the perhaps — that is, in the already 
incalculable anticipation of this risk, this thought of risk which will be 
characteristic of the new philosophy. This already of the perhaps acts. We 
have already undergone the effects of its action; we have this in memory, do 
we not? It acts within itself — in immanent fashion, we will say — although 
this immanence consists too in leaving self. Leaving oneself as of oneself, 
which can be done only by letting the other come, which is possible only if 
the other precedes and informs me — only if the other is the condition of my 
immanence. Very strong and very feeble, the already of the perhaps has the 
paradoxical force of a teleiopoetic propulsion. Teleiopoesis makes the 
arrivants come — or rather, allows them to come — by withdrawing; it 
produces an event, sinking into the darkness of a friendship which is not 
yet. 

Autobiographical as it remains in the circular movement of its arrow, a 
boomerang that none the less relentlessly pursues its progress towards 
changing the place of the subject, teleiopoesis also defines the general 
structure of political allocution, its lure and its truth. We have indeed come 
into a certain politics of friendship. Into ‘great polities’, not into the one 
with which the political scientists and the politicians (Sometimes too the 
citizens of modern democracy) entertain us: the politics of opinion. 


For one should not believe that our perhaps belongs to a regime of 
opinion. That would be a case of credulousness — just an opinion, and a 
poor one at that. Our unbelievable perhaps does not signify haziness and 
mobility, the confusion preceding knowledge or renouncing all truth. If it is 
undecidable and without truth in its own moment (but it is, as a matter of 
fact, difficult to assign a proper moment to it), this is in order that it might 
be a condition of decision, interruption, revolution, responsibility and truth. 
The friends of the perhaps are the friends of truth. But the friends of truth 
are not, by definition, in the truth; they are not installed there as in the 
padlocked security of a dogma and the stable reliability of an opinion. If 
there is some truth in the perhaps, it can only be that of which the friends 
are the friends. Only friends. The friends of truth are without the truth, even 
if friends cannot function without truth. The truth — that of the thinkers to 
come — it is impossible to be it, to be there, to have it; one must only be its 
friend. This also means one must be solitary — and jealous of one’s retreat. 
This is the anchoritic truth of this truth. But it is far from abstaining from 
afar from the political — and even if the anchorite plays the scarecrow, such 
a person overpoliticizes the space of the city. 

Hence this remarkable redoubling of the perhaps (this time in the form of 
‘in all probability’, wahrscheinlich genug) which responds to the question 
of knowing if, on their way or in the imminence of their arrival, the thinkers 
to come are ‘friends of the truth’. These friends of the truth that they will, 
perhaps, remain begin by denouncing a fundamental contradiction, that 
which no politics will be able to explain or rationalize, simply because it 
neither can nor has the right to do so: the contradiction inhabiting the very 
concept of the common and the community. For the common is rare, and the 
common measure is, a rarity for the rare, just as, not far from here, 
Baudelaire’s man of the crowds thought it. How many of them are there? 
How many of us are there? The incalculable equality of these friends of 
solitude, of the incommensurable subjects, of these subjects without subject 
and without intersubjectivity. 

How can a democrat handle this friendship, this truth, this contradiction? 
And this measurelessness? I mean the democrat whom we know so well, 
who is really not familiar with such things? Above all, he is unfamiliar with 
the practice of putting ‘truth’ in quotation marks. 

Let us listen, then. And first let us put into the present what the standard 
French translation deemed it necessary to render in a future tense. Those 


who are the future are on their way, now, even if these arrivants have not 
yet arrived: their present is not present, it is not in current affairs, but they 
are coming, they are arrivants because they are going to come. ‘Ils seront’ 
means: they are what is going to come, and what is to come is in the present 
tense; it speaks (in French) to the presentation of the future, sometimes 
planned, sometimes prescribed. In paragraph 43 of Beyond Good and Evil, 
the truth of these friends seems to be suspended between quotation marks: 


Are they new friends of ‘truth’ (and not, as in the French translation, seront-ils, [will they be], 
Sind es neue Freunde der ‘Wahrheit), these coming philosophers (diese kommenden 
Philosophen)? In all probability ([c’est assez vraisemblable {ou probable}], Wahrscheinlich 
genug, the French translations give here ‘probably’, thus losing this allusion to the true; for this 
response to the question of truth, of friendship for the truth, cannot be true or certain, certainly, it 
can only have a true-semblance [vrai-semblance], but already orientated by friendship for the 
truth): for all philosophers have hitherto loved their truths. 


I have underlined hitherto (bisher): we will come across its import again 
later. Their truths — theirs, without quotation marks this time — this is what 
the philosophers have loved. Is this not contradictory with truth itself? But 
if one must love truth (this is necessary, is it not?), how will one love 
anything other than one’s own truth, a truth that one can appropriate? 
Nietzsche’s answer (but how will a democrat handle it?): far from being the 
very form of truth, universalization hides the cunning of all dogmatisms. 
Being-common or being-in-common: a dogmatic stratagem, the cunning of 
the common sense of the community; what is placed in common can reason 
[raisonner| only in order to frame or set [arraisonner]. And as for the 
apparently arithmetical question, the question of the number of friends in 
which we have begun to perceive the Aristotelian dimension — the question 
of great numbers gua the political question of truth — we shall see that it 
does not fail to crop up here: 


for all philosophers have hitherto loved their truths (ihre Wahrheiten). But certainly (Sicherlich 
aber) they will not be dogmatists. It must offend their pride, and also their taste, if their truth is 
supposed to be a truth for everyman, which has hitherto (emphasis added) been the secret desire 
and hidden sense (Hintersinn) of all dogmatic endeavours. ‘My judgement is my judgement: 
another cannot easily acquire a right to it? — such a philosopher of the future may perhaps 
(vielleicht, once again) say. One has to get rid of the bad taste of wanting to be in agreement with 
many (mit Vielen ubereinstimmen zu wollen). ‘Good’ is no longer good when your neighbour 
takes it into his mouth. And how could there exist a ‘common good’ (‘Gemeingut’)!. The 
expression is a self-contradiction: what can be common has ever but little value. In the end it must 
be as it is and has always been: great things are for the great, abysses for the profound, shudders 
(Schuder, also shivers or quivers or thrills) and delicacies (Zartheiten, also fragilities and 
weaknesses, etc.) for the refined (Feinen, the delicate, the subtle, the weak also, the vulnerable, for 


the aristocracy of this truth of election is both that of force and weakness, a certain manner of 
being able to be hurt), and, in sum (tm ganzin und kurzen), all rare things for the rare. 


So that is what this philosopher of the future will say, perhaps. That, 
perhaps, is what he would say, the friend of truth — but a mad truth, the mad 
friend of a truth which ignores both the common and common sense (‘I, the 
living fool’), the friend of a ‘truth’ in quotation marks that reverses all the 
signs in one stroke. 


i. 


This Mad *Truth’: 
The Just Name of Friendship 


It seems to me that the meditations of a man of state must centre on the question of 
enemies in all its aspects, and he owes it to himself to have taken a keen interest in 
this saying of Xenophon: ‘the wise man will profit from his enemies’. 
Consequently, I have collected the remarks I have recently made, in approximately 
the same terms, on this subject, and I will send them to you. I have abstained as 
much as possible from quoting what I had written in my Political Precepts, since I 
see that you often have this book in hand.! 

Plutarch 


A good-natured hare wanted to have many friends. 

Many! you say — that is a major affair: 

A single friend is a rare thing in these parts. 

I agree, but my hare had this whim and didn’t know what 

Aristotle used to say to young Greeks upon entering his school: 
My friends, there are no friends. 

Complacent, assiduous, always driven by zeal, 

He wanted to make everyone a faithful friend, 


And believed himself loved because he loved them.” 
Florian 


Now. Perhaps we are ready, now, to hear and understand the Nietzschean 
apostrophe, the cry of the ‘living fool that I am’: ‘Friends, there are no 
friends!’ (Freunde, es gibt keine Freunde!) Perhaps we are better exposed to 
it, there where its destination also depends on us. Its destiny, perhaps, rides 
on the event of a response that has come, like the responsibility of a 
countersignature, from its addressees. Who will come to countersign? 
What? How? How many? 


The apostrophe resounds in Human All Too Human, in the chapter ‘Of 


friends’.* It also plays with a tradition deeper and wider than any of us 
could fathom: Aristotle, Montaigne, Plutarch, Gradan — Ordculo manual — 
Florian, and so many others awaiting us. Most often they appeal to a 
wisdom, and this wisdom usually derives its authority from a political 
experience. In any case, it draws from such experience political lessons, 
moralities and precepts to be used by wise politicians. 

Once again — we will hear it — the provocation strikes and opens with a 
‘perhaps’. It opens as much as it opens up, it breaks in. The irreducible 
modality of the ‘perhaps’ always gives the opening note. ‘Perhaps’ gives it 
as a sharp rap is administered. ‘Perhaps’ gives it with the announcement of 
a first act or a first scene; but also as the only chance granted to the future. 
More precisely, the chance of the future as chance itself. Future there is, if 
there ever is, when chance is no longer barred. There would be no future 
without chance. The rap of the ‘perhaps’ not only effects a catastrophic 
inversion, a reversal of the tradition — already paradoxical (‘O my friends, 
there is no friend’) — it provokes the avowal of the opposite, the confession 
of an error that is not foreign to the truth. This is perhaps truth itself, a 
superior or more profound truth. 


And perhaps to each of us there will come the more joyful hour, when we exclaim: 
‘Friends, there are no friends!’ thus said the dying sage; 
‘Foes, there are no foes!’ say J, the living fool. 


Und vielleicht kommt jedem auch einmal the freudigere Stunde, wo er sagt: 
‘Freunde, es gibt keine Freunde!’ so rief der sterbende Weise; 


‘Feinde, es gibt keinen Feind!’ — ruf ich, der lebende Tors 


Numerous roads promise to open up on a reading of this reversing 
[renversante] apostrophe — an overwhelming one, too, since it converts the 
friend into the enemy. Someone complains, in sum, about the disappearance 
of the enemy. Would it already have taken place? In any case, this person 
fears that it has; he recalls it, announces and denounces it as a catastrophe. 
We shall listen once again, at more or less regular intervals, to a double 
clamour, the two times and two voices, the two persons of this exclamation: 
he/I, he ~ exclaimed/I exclaimed, _past/present, _— dying/living, 
wisdom/madness. But a single cry answers the other: this is what the dying 
sage cried, this is what I cry, I, the living fool, etc.: so rief der sterbende 
Weise ... ruf ich, der lebende Tor. 


‘That saying which Aristotle often repeated’ is, then, indeed one of 
someone who is dying — his last will and testament — already speaking from 
the place of death. A testamentary wisdom to which must be opposed, even 
at the price of madness, the exclaiming insurrection of the living present. 
The dying person addresses friends, speaking of friends to them, if only to 
tell them there are none. As for the living person, he addresses enemies, 
speaking to them of enemies, if only to tell them there are none. The dying 
person dies, turning towards friendship; the living person lives on, turning 
towards enmity. Wisdom on the side of death, and the past came to pass: the 
being-past of the passer-by. Madness on the side of life, and the present 1s: 
the presence of the present. 

This is far from the only time, as we have seen, that Nietzsche associates 
the thought of the friend-enemy or of the brother-enemy with madness, with 
sheer madness that begins by inverting all the senses of sense into their 
opposites. For sheer madness is a priori inscribed in the very sense of sense. 
The fool is already on the premises as a guest who would have preceded his 
host. He haunts him in advance, his shadow is watching in the darkness of 
all hospitality: Human All Too Human is a fool addressing fools, his friends 
the fools. 

The book is literally dedicated to a corporation of fools (Narren-Zunft). 
The madness is the dedication and the signature at the end. The verse 
epilogue, the post-lude (Ein Nachspiet), is entitled ‘Among Friends’ (Unter 
Freunden), and it also addresses an apostrophe to them, the friends. He asks 
neither to be excused nor pardoned for this book of unreason (diesem 
unvernunftigen Buche), only for the kind of hospitality offered to mad 
arrivants. He requests only that they open the doors of their hearts to him, 
that they listen to him, welcoming him into their selves; that they put him 
up, honour him — and learn from him, in sum, a history of reason. Only a 
fool can tell this story, only he can know how to submit reason to reason, 
how reason becomes what it should have been: finally brought to its senses. 

Having said this, we are going to read the book’s final lines and the 
envoy. It, too, 1s pronounced in the form of a salute or a leavetaking. A 
moment of separation with friends at last — friends who have become 
friends — and the testamentary connotation is not absent. All the more so 
given that in the middle of the epilogue, the epilogual nature of the 
apostrophe — that is, the beginning of the end — does not fail to appear. We 


shall have to climb the road separating us from the cemetery: ‘Till we reach 
the grave together. Friends!...’ Bis wir in the Grube steigen. /Freunde! 

If the address requests that we go beyond excuse and pardon, it still 
moves in the religious space of benediction or malediction. Unless this 
space would at last be opened by it. It conjures up malediction (Fluch) and 
pronounces benediction twice (Amen!, Und auf Wiedersehn!) in offering the 
promised coming of the event — in exposing, rather, the arriving stance 
[arrivance] of the question of the perhaps (‘So soils geschehn?’): 


Shall we do this, friends, again? ... (Freunde! Ja! So soils geschehn?) 
Amen! Und auf Wiedersehn! 

No excuses! No forgiving! 

You who laugh and joy in living 

Grant this book, with all its follies (Diesem unvernunftigen Buche) 
Ear and heart and open door! 

Friends, believe me, all my folly’s (meine Unvemunft) 

Been a blessing heretofore! 


What I seek, what J discover — (Was ich suche, was ich finde —,) 

Has a book contained it ever? 

Hail in me the guild of fools! (die Narren-Zunft!) 

Learn what this fools-book’s (Narrenbuche) offence is: 

Reason coming to its senses! (Wie Vernunft kommt — ‘sur Vernunft’!) 
Shall we, friends, do this again? (Also, Freunde, soils geschehen? —) 
Amen! Und auf Wiedersehn! 


The envoy thus confirms that the friend cannot address anything other than 
a fool’s discourse to his friends. The truth of friendship is a madness of 
truth, a truth that has nothing to do with the wisdom which, throughout the 
history of philosophy qua the history of reason, will have set the tone of this 
truth — by attempting to have us believe that amorous passion was madness, 
no doubt, but that friendship was the way of wisdom and of knowledge, no 
less than of political justice. 

Let us return now to ‘Enemies, there is no enemy!’, at paragraph 376 of 
Human All Too Human, |. Let us recall only the following for the moment: 
that the reversal had been prepared by an avowal. By a sort of response to 
self; already, the same ‘sage’ — the presumed author of ‘O my friends’ — 
when he was not yet ‘dying’, accepted in the prime of life to contradict 
himself. In any case, he consented to declaring to himself an ‘error’ and an 
‘illusion’ while appealing, in sum, to responsibility. A responsibility which, 
following the more or less latent — and thus silent — logic of the argument, 
can be exercised only in silence — indeed, in secret — in a sort of 


counterculture of knowing-how-to-keep-silent. As though the sage were 
speaking silently to himself about silence, answering himself saying 
nothing — in order to appeal to responsibility. One must know how to reach 
such silence; ‘they’ must learn how (‘und Schweigen mussen sie gelemt 
haben’): 


When one realizes this, and realizes in addition that all the opinions of one’s fellow men, of 
whatever kind they are and with whatever intensity they are held, are just as necessary and 
unaccountable (unverantwortlich) as their actions; if one comes to understand this inner necessity 
of opinions originating in the inextricable interweaving of character, occupation, talent, 
environment — perhaps one will then get free of that bitterness of feeling with which the sage 
cried: ‘Friends, there are no friends! (Freunde, es gibt keine Freunde!).’ One will, rather, avow to 
oneself (Er wird sich vielmehr eingestehen): yes, there are friends, but it is error and deception 
regarding yourself that led them to you; and they must have learned how to keep silent in order to 
remain your friend (und Schweigen mussen sie gelernt haben um dir Freund zu bleiben); for such 
human relationships almost always depend upon the fact that two or three things are never said or 
even so much as touched upon: if these little boulders do start to roll, however, friendship follows 
after them and shatters. Are there not people who would be mortally wounded if they discovered 
that their dearest friends actually know about them? 


Friendship does not keep silence, it is preserved by silence. From its first 
word to itself, friendship inverts itself Hence it says, saying this to itself, 
that there are no more friends; it avows itself in avowing that. Friendship 
tells the truth — and this 1s always better left unknown. 

The protection of this custody guarantees the truth of friendship, its 
ambiguous truth, that by which friends protect themselves from the error or 
the illusion on which friendship is founded — more precisely, the bottomless 
bottom founding a friendship, which enables it to resist its own abyss. To 
resist the vertigo or the revolution that would have it turning around itself. 
Friendship is founded, in truth, so as to protect itself from the bottom, or the 
abyssal bottomless depths. 

That is why friendship had better preserve itself in silence, and keep 
silent about the truth. Over the abyss, on the shifting ground of our 
friendships: ‘how uncertain (uwnsicher) is the ground upon which all our 
alliances and friendships rest, ... how isolated (vereinsamt, solitary, 
insularized, ‘solitarized’) each man is’ (ibid.); that is what you will say to 
yourself, with so much experience of ‘misunderstandings’, ‘ruptures’, 
‘hostile fleeings’ [‘/uites hostiles’|. So you had better keep silent about this 
truth of truth. The truth of truth is that the truth is there to protect a 
friendship that could not resist the truth of its illusion. Nietzsche affects a 
mystical tone when he puts forward aphoristic precepts and sentences 


(Spruche) that he then names, in Latin, Silentium. Asceticism, kenosis, 
knowledge of how to evacuate words to gain breathing space for friendship. 
Here again, Nietzsche thinks silence from the standpoint of friendship, as 
though silence itself could not be spoken about, as though it could not be 
spoken elsewhere than in friendship, by friendship. Speech ruins friendship; 
it corrupts by speaking, degrades, belittles, undoes the speech (verredet) of 
friendship; but this evil is done to it on account of truth. If silence must be 
kept among friends, concerning friends, this is just as much so as not to tell 
the truth, a murderous truth. ‘Si/entium. One should not talk (reden) about 
one’s friends: otherwise one will talk away the feeling of friendship (sonst 
verredet man sich das Geftihl der Freundschaft).’> 

Not that friends should keep silent, among themselves or on the subject 
of their friends. Their speech would perhaps have to breathe with an 
implied silence. This is nothing other than a certain way of speaking: secret, 
discreet, discontinuous, aphoristic, elliptic, just in disjointed time to avow 
the truth that must be concealed; hiding it — because it is deadly — to save 
life. To avow or not to avow — what difference does it make, since the 
avowal consists in hiding the truth even more safely? What is the truth of a 
confession? Not the veracity of what it says, but its confessional truth? 

At least for the time being, let us speak this moment of avowal, for 
perhaps, perhaps the day of joy will come when the living fool (that I am) 
will dare to exclaim: ‘there is no enemy!’. This day of joy, as we recall, will 
be one of a shared rejoicing (Mitfreude), not fellow-suffering (Mitleid). For 
there would then be two communities without community, two friendships 
of solitude, two ways of saying to oneself — keeping silent, keeping it 
hushed — that solitude is irremediable and friendship impossible; two ways 
for desire to share and to parcel out the impossible: one would be the 
compassionate and negative way, the other affirmative, which would attune 
and join two disjointed rejoicings [jouissances| conjugated at the heart of 
the dissociation itself: heterogeneous allies, co-affirmed, perhaps affirmed 
in total darkness. An ecstatic rejoicing but one without plenitude, a 
communion of infinite wrenching. 

In the meantime, in the course of the first avowal’s moment, which still 
belongs to the community of compassion, you had better keep silence to 
preserve what remains of friendship. And as the friends know this truth of 
truth (the custody of what cannot be kept), they had better keep silent 
together. As in a mutual agreement. A tacit agreement, however, whereby 


those who are separated come together without ceasing to be what they are 
destined to be — and undoubtedly what they more than ever are: dissociated, 
‘solitarized’, singularized, constituted into monadic alterities (vereinsamt); 
where, as the phenomenologist says, what is proper to the alter ego will 
never be accessible, as such, to an originarily bestowing intuition, but only 
to an analogical apresentation. These two are not in solidarity with one 
another; they are solitary, but they ally themselves in silence within the 
necessity of keeping silent together — each, however, in his own comer. This 
is, perhaps, a social bond, a contemporaneity, but in the common 
affirmation of being unbonded, an untimely’ being-alone and, 
simultaneously, in joint acquiescence to disjunction. How can you be 
together to bear witness to secrecy, separation, singularity? You would have 
to testify where testimony remains impossible. You would have to witness 
the absence of attestation, and testify in behalf of that absence, as Blanchot 
says (‘Speech still to be spoken beyond the living and the dead, testifying 
for the absence of attestation.’®) How can one be silent, one and the other, 
one the very other [/’un l’autre méme]? 

This ‘miteinander Schweigen’ can always come to ruin our ontological 
assurances, our common sense, our concept of the concept, the One of the 
common that has always commanded our thought as well as our politics of 
friendship. How can a politics of separation be founded? Nietzsche dares to 
recommend separation, he dares to prescribe distancing in the code 
excluding distance, in this very distance, and as if he were provoking it, in 
the language that remains as much that of friendship as that of politics, of 
state, of family (affinity, kinship, Verwandschaft, appurtenance, the co- 
appurtenance of identity: Zusammengehorigkeit): 


In parting (Im Scheiden). It is not in how one soul approaches another but in how it distances 
itself from it that I recognize their affinity and relatedness (Verwandschaft und 


Zusammen gehorigkeit).! 


What is keeping silent? Keeping silent among friends, unter Freunden, in 
the rupture (im Scheiden), in the interruption that substitutes, as it must (for 
in silence, everything must be possible), testimony for know-how, faith for 
the test, ‘fidence’ for demonstration, the perhaps for certainty, the other for 
the same, friendship for calculation, etc.? The imperative and the enigma of 
the sense of decency [pudeur] are not far off; we shall link them in a 


moment to the perhaps, to the truth and to the question of sexual difference 
— in Nietzsche’s writing, his silence, his erasure without erasure. 

Perhaps this is an altogether different way of thinking the ‘among’, of 
apprehending the ‘among friends’, from within the silence of friends — and 
not the opposite. A particular ‘among’ would be incommensurable to all 
others. This is when the end begins, the incipit of the epilogue, the advent 
of the first verses of the Nachspiel whose second stanza we quoted. Silence 
among friends will not work without laughter, and laughter bares its teeth, 
as does death. And the more evil it is, the better. Doing and laughing, 
machen/lachen, doing evil and laughing at evil, making each other laugh 
about evil. Among friends. Not laughing evil away, but making ourselves 
laugh at evil. Among friends. 


(You will not, perhaps, have failed to register the fact that we are writing 
and describing friends as masculine — neuter-masculine. Do not consider 
this a distraction or a slip. It is, rather, a laborious way of letting a question 
furrow deeper. We are perhaps borne from the very first step by and towards 
this question: what is a friend in the feminine, and who, in the feminine, is 
her friend? Why do ‘our’ philosophers and ‘our’ religions, our ‘culture’, 
acknowledge so little irreducible right, so little proper and acute 
signification, in such grammar? In an unpublished passage of Beyond Good 
and Evil — precisely around paragraph 2 on the ‘dangerous perhaps’ of the 
‘new philosophers’ which we were questioning above — Nietzsche will have 
bequeathed us a certain number of unerased sentences. They take the 
movement of truth up into the folds of a veil, and this is always ‘truth’ 
suspended between inverted commas, the veiled truth of decency, as 
Nietzsche often says. But some of these phrases also inscribe the ‘perhaps’, 
which is never dissociated from veiled decency, in a staging of feminine 
seduction where it would be arduous to distribute place, praise, and blame. 
The veil, and decency too, may signify the absence of courage. In the first 
draft, in the insistent mode of ‘perhaps’, and not far from the ‘dangerous 
perhaps’, we can read, for example: 

But who has the courage to look on these ‘truths’ without a veil? Perhaps there exists a legitimate 

decency before these problems and possibilities, perhaps we are mistaken about their value, 


perhaps we all thereby obey this will, (emphasis added) 


A second draft contains two unerased conclusions: 


1. But who is willing to concern himself with such ‘perhapses’! That violates good taste, 
especially virtue, when truth becomes scandalous to this point and renounces all decency: one 
must recommend prudence before that lady. 


2. Perhaps! But who is willing to concern himself with these dangerous ‘perhapses’! That violates 
good taste, and also virtue. When truth becomes scandalous to this point, when this unscrupulous 
lady divests herself of her veils to this point and renounces all decency: away! Away with this 
seductress! May she henceforth go her own way! One can never be too prudent with a lady like 
that. You may tell me with a wink that ‘one is better off associating with a humble and modest 


error, with a nice little lie’. 


How much of a chance would a feminine friend have on this stage? And a 
feminine friend of hers, among themselves? See below.) 


Among Friends 
Epilogue 
1 
Fine to lie in quiet together 
Finer still to join in laughing — 
(Schon ists, miteinadander schweigen 
Schoner, miteinander lachen, —) 
Underneath a silken heaven 
Lying back among the grasses 
Join with friends in cheerful laughing, 
(Lieblich laut mit Freunden lachen) 
Showing our white teeth together. 


Am I right? let’s lie in quiet; 

Am I wrong? let’s join in laughing 

And in being aggravating, 

Aggravating, loudly laughing, 
(Schlimmer machen, schlimmer lachen), 
Till we reach the grave together. 

(Bis wir in the Grube steigen.) 


Not all silences chime together. Each time the quality, the modality, of the 
‘keeping quiet together’ eludes a common measure. Here, we have just 
apprehended the moment when the keeping silent of compassion broke into 
laughter, into a resounding laughter but without a word, still silent, aphonic 
in the sonority of its break into laughter, into the hysterical laughter of 
rejoicing among friends. 


[The question is one of tonality: Stimmung changes everything. Beyond 
the concept — even if it is the same one, and even if it becomes undecidable 
— Stimmung suspends or terrifies oppositions, converts the antithesis into its 
antithesis (friend into enemy, love into hate, etc.). There is little room for 


laughter in Heidegger. Nevertheless, if this subject did not result in too long 
a detour, we might recognize in the very possibility of this silence, the 
keeping-silent, the discretion, the secret of Schweigen or Verschwiegenheit, 
which Heidegger, as early as Sein und Zeit [Being and Time] (paras 34 and 
60), analyses at the heart of speech. Finding the resource of its own silence 
in the possibility of speaking, that which thus keeps silent belongs from 
then on to truth — more precisely, to one of the essential modes (to wit, 
speech or discourse, Rede) of opening or disclosedness (Erschlossenheit), 
disclosedness to truth — that is, of truth ‘in which’ Dasein 1s, a Dasein 
originarily responsible, indebted or ‘responsibilizable’ (schuldig), but ‘in’ a 
truth that is every bit as originarily an ‘untruth’ (‘But Dasein is 
equiprimordially [gleichursprunglich] in the untruth’).? We could 
demonstrate (and we would like to attempt this elsewhere) that this 
equiprimordiality of truth and untruth, like that of all the apparently 
opposite possibilities that are inextricably linked to it, destabilizes all the 
conceptual distinctions that seem to structure the existential analytic, 
dooming its logic to an Unheimlichkeit marking each of its decisive 
moments. In truth, it undoes, disidentifies, the identification of every 
concept. It appeals to a thinking beyond the concept, but a fortiori beyond 
intuition. It surpasses reason, but a fortiori the understanding too. This 
‘thought’ — always supposing that the name fits the named and retains its 
validity beyond these final frontier oppositions; always supposing a proper 
name could be found for it in any singular language; always supposing that 
it still speculates — this excessive ‘thought’ belongs as little to the 
disinterested or theoretical, even discursive, order of philosophical 
speculation as the unchained desires of love and hate, friendship and 
enmity, when they unite in death, at any moment, in the taste of each of our 
desires. Defying all oppositions, this Unheimlichkeit would here suffice to 
usher in, between friend and enemy, every and all conversion, inversion and 
revolution [vetournements|. It lodges the enemy in the heart of the friend — 
and vice versa. Why do we say it ‘lodges’ the other, the stranger, or the 
enemy? Because the word unheimlich is not unfamiliar, though it speaks 
precisely to the stranger, to the intimacy of the hearth and familial lodgings, 
to the oikeidtés; but above all because it provides a place, in a troubling 
way, for a form of welcome in itself that recalls the haunt as much as the 
home — Unterkunft, lodgings, shelter, hospitable habitat, said the epilogue 
we cited above; and in a moment we will hear the voice of the friend as the 


voice of the spectre. The fact that in its very depth the keeping silent of Sein 
und Zeit never laughs will one day indicate to us one of the places for 
hearing once again the colloquy between Nietzsche and Heidegger, what 
there is ‘among [those] friends’ as well as ‘among [those] enemies’. | 


We have just focused our attention on the avowed error, the endured 
illusion at the beginning of paragraph 376 of Human All Too Human — ‘Of 
friends’. The logic of avowal will justify, at the end of the paragraph, the 
inversion or conversion, the hour of joy that will come perhaps. This logic 
prepares the fool’s response, my living fool’s cry and the clamour of what 
could be called the call to the enemy: ‘Enemies, there is no enemy!’ 

Can an ‘alas!’, or an ‘if only there could be enemies’, or again: ‘instead 
of bewailing the friend, bewail the enemy!’, be inferred from this call? 
Perhaps. In all these hypotheses, this call to the enemy ipso facto converts 
the enemy into the friend: you must love your enemies, seine Feinde lieben, 
even if you pretend to love them, but no longer in a Christian fashion. And 
the friend is asked to convert himself into an enemy. No concept, nor any 
insurance contract between word and concept, vocable and meaning, is 
more stable, more reliable (bébaios, as Aristotle would say). 

This conversion, then, will allow us no respite. We will never have done 
with it. In a modest book or elsewhere, for this interminability is no 
accident: one cannot, any more than one must not, have done with it. This is 
not a surpassable moment. It remains the structural condition of that which 
it must yet survive in making it possible: the sentence, the decision, the 
responsibility, the event, death itself. 

Hence, we shall not finish with it. But the first reason that makes us wary 
of the opposition between the ‘dying sage’ and the ‘living fool’, and 
discourages any dwelling on the stabilized distinction between ‘Friends, 
there is no friend’ and ‘Enemies, there is no enemy’, is that one apostrophe 
can always feign to be the other. The dying sage can play fools, he can play 
the fool, and the fool can pretend to be wiser and deeper in death’s throes 
than the Greek philosopher that he has summoned to bear witness. The face 
of the fool can be a mask. Behind the mask, a sage wiser than the sage. 
Fundamentally, from one address to the other, the same person is speaking — 
him, me; and language liberates this substitution: ‘I’ is ‘me’, but an ‘I’ is a 
‘him’. One is the other. One guards and guards himself from the other. One 
does violence to oneself, becoming violence. Here again the infinite build- 


up [surenchere, also a ‘raising of the stakes’], A build-up that does not even 
need an author’s intention, or a deliberate decision: it is carried away, it 
carries itself away, it throws itself into turmoil with the disidentification of 
concepts and terms that we are analysing right now. 

But — no doubt by a stroke of luck — it happens that in another place, 
rather at one remove from here, Nietzsche himself seems to gloss these two 
sayings of the sage and the fool, the dying and the living, his saying and 
mine. He affects, perhaps, to provide us with a key for a reading of the 
score. Again it is in the Vermischte Meinungen und Spruch, paragraph 246. 
The French translation of the tide of this short section has: ‘The sage 
passing himself off as a fool’: Der Weise sich als Narren gebend: The sage 
giving himself up as a fool, the sage when he intends to give himself up for 
a fool, when he agrees to present himself as that which he is not. I prefer to 
keep, in its literality and playfulness, the reference to the present, the gift, to 
giving oneself up as. For the simulacrum of this sage knows how to offer 
himself, he makes a gift, he makes himself into a gift, inspired by a 
generous friendship. He thereby gives the good to avoid doing evil to his 
Umgebung: his entourage, milieu, relatives. And he feigns, lies, disguises or 
masks himself, out of friendship for mankind, out of 
Menschenfreundlichkeit. philanthropy once again, humanity, sociability. 
Here is the English translation which we will modify or compare with the 
words of the original version only when we consider it especially 
indispensable: 


Paragraph 246. The wise man pretending to be a fool. The wise man’s philanthropy (Die 
Menschenfreundlichkeit) sometimes leads him to pose as excited, angry, delighted (sich erregt, 
erzurnt, erfreut zu stellen), so that the coldness and reflectiveness of his true nature (of his true 
essence, seines wahren Wesens) shall not harm those around him. (original emphasis) 


Lie, mask, dissimulation, the simulacrum bestows. It also provokes vertigo: 
the sage, for friendship’s sake — this is what makes him a sage — takes on 
the disguise of the fool, and, for friendship’s sake, disguises his friendship 
as enmity. But what is he hiding? His enmity, for the coldness and lucidity 
of his true nature are to be feared only where they may hurt and reveal some 
ageressivity. In sum, the sage presents himself as an enemy in order to 
conceal his enmity. He shows his hostility so as not to hurt with his 
wickedness. And why does he take such pains? Out of friendship for 
mankind, philanthropic sociability. His pose (sich stellen) consists — in the 
sheer difference between hot and cold, exalted anger and icy lucidity — in 


feigning to be precisely what he is, in telling the truth to conceal the truth 
and especially to neutralize its deadly effect, to protect others from it. He 
loves them enough not to want to do them all the evil he wants for them. He 
loves them too much for that. 

And what if tomorrow a new political wisdom were to let itself be 
inspired by this he’s wisdom, by this manner of knowing how to lie, 
dissimulate or divert wicked lucidity? What if it demanded that we know, 
and know how to dissimulate, the principles and forces of social unbinding 
[déliaison], all the menacing disjunctions? To dissimulate them in order to 
preserve the social bond and the Menschenfreundlichkeit? A new political 
wisdom — human, humanistic, anthropological, of course? A new 
Menschenfreundlichkeit pessimistic, sceptical, hopeless, incredulous? 

A new virtue, from that point on? 

The Nietzschean thought of virtue will not be simplified here. So very 
many apparently heterogeneous propositions would have to be not only 
reread but harmonized. The immense but rigorously coherent medley of 
Zarathustra’s addresses to his ‘brothers’ would also — and this would be an 
awesome and hitherto unaccomplished feat — have to be taken into account. 
Addresses to his friends who are also brothers. This consequence, in its 
shimmering mobility, its untenable instability, appears no less rigorous even 
though it is not systematic: not philosophical, moral, or theological. Its 
expository mode can never be reduced to what it nevertheless also is: the 
discipline of a psychology, a prophecy, a poetics. Our hypothesis is that the 
‘genre’, the ‘mode’, the ‘rhetoric’, the ‘poetics’, and the ‘logic’ to which 
Zaradiustra’s songs belong — ‘Of the friend’, ‘Of the bestowing virtue’, ‘Of 
the virtuous’, Of the belittling virtue’ (examples of what interests us here) — 
could be determined, following old or new categories, only from the place 
of the very thing that is said there, in this specific place, about friendship 
and virtue, fraternity, and the saying of what is said there, in that way. We 
shall consider these passages when the time comes. 

This said and this saying call for a new type of address. They claim as 
much, in any case, teleiopoetically. To take saying and the virtue of 
speaking about virtue seriously is to acknowledge the address of a vocation: 
the brothers (past, present or to come) for whom Zarathustra destines such a 
harangue on friendship and on virtue, an ever-evil virtue. The brothers? 
Why the brothers? The addressees, as always, lay down the law of genre. 
We must meditate upon this: the addressees are brothers, and their coming 


virtue remains virile. The Gay Science (para. 169) says that declared 
enemies are indispensable for men who must ‘rise to the level of their own 
virtue, virility (Mannlichkeit), and cheerfulness’. 

We shall return to this later, then. But to confine ourselves here to the 
barest schema, let us note that the motive of virtue is never discredited — no 
more so than the word virtue, in its Greek or Judaeo-Christian cultural 
context. Virtue is regularly reaffirmed by Nietzsche according to a logic or 
a rhetoric that can be interpreted in at least three ways (at least three when 
the question concerns the author of ‘Our new “infinite” which never ceased 
to designate in this way a world that had become infinite again since 


opening for us onto an “infinity of interpretations.”’!°): 


1. the deliberate perversion of the heritage — the opposite meaning under 
the same word; 

2. the restoration of a meaning perverted by the inherited tradition 
(Greek, Jewish, or Pauline-Christian); 

3. or a hyperbolic build-up (more Greek or more Judaeo-Christian than 
the Greek or the Judaeo-Christian). 


For this reason, one must not hesitate to take the ‘Path to a Christian virtue’ 
(Weg zu einer christlichen Tugend):'' to learn from one’s enemies is the 
best path to loving them, for it puts us in a grateful mood towards them (one 
suspects that this is not the most Christian way of going down such a path, 
nor of thinking the unconscious of virtues). This again is a question of path, 
of progress along a path, of steps, gait, a way of walking, rather than a 
question of content. For there are ‘unconscious virtues’ — this, morality and 
philosophy could never admit — and like visible virtues, like those that one 
believes to be visible, these invisible virtues ‘follow their own course’ 
(gehen auch ihren Gang, with Nietzsche’s emphasis), but a ‘wholly 
different course’.!? This difference comes to light only under a microscope, 
a divine microscope capable of perceiving delicate sculptures on the scales 
of reptiles. 

Hence we will not be too surprised, alongside this praise of enmity or 
these calls to the enemy, to see Nietzsche honouring friendship, the ‘good 
friendship’ — even the Greek brand — and sometimes beyond ‘the things 
people call love’. 


‘Good friendship’ supposes disproportion. It demands a certain rupture in 
reciprocity or equality, as well as the interruption of all fusion or confusion 
between you and me. By the same token it signifies a divorce with love, 
albeit self-love. The few lines defining this ‘good friendship’!* mark all 
these lines of division. ‘Good friendship’ can be distinguished from the bad 
only in eluding everything one believed one could recognize in the name 
friendship. As if it were a question of a simple homonym. ‘Good 
friendship’ is born of disproportion: when you esteem or respect (achtet) 
the other more than yourself. Nietzsche points out that this does not mean 
that one /Joves more than oneself — and there is a second division, within 
lovence, between friendship and love. ‘Good friendship’ certainly supposes 
a certain air, a certain tinge (Anstrich) of intimacy, but one ‘without actual 
and genuine intimacy’. It commands that we abstain ‘wisely’, ‘prudently’ 
(weislich), from all confusion, all permutation between the singularities of 
you and me. This is the announcement of the community without 
community of thinkers to come. 

Is such a friendship still Greek? Yes and no. Does this question make 
sense? Yes and no. If what Nietzsche understands here under the name 
friendship, if what he wants to have us hear and understand or give us to 
hear and understand for the future still chimes with philia but is already no 
longer Greek, then this is another way of suggesting that this experience, 
with the help of no other, forbids us to place trust in some presumed unity 
of Greek culture, with respect to this point as to that of so many others. 

Nietzsche knows better than anyone, when he writes ‘In honour of 
friendship’,'* that he is speaking Greek and that his argument, illustrated 
with a tale, portrays a Greek possibility. He honours it, precisely. But the 
tale reveals an internal contradiction in the Greek concept of friendship, the 
Greek virtue of friendship — more precisely, in its philosophical concept, as 
it could be implemented in a philosopher’s life. Nietzsche notes that in 
Antiquity the feeling of friendship was the highest, more elevated than the 
most celebrated pride of the sages, who boasted of their independence, 
autonomy and self-sufficiency. Certainly, this ‘unique’ feeling seemed to be 
indissociable from this pride, this freedom of self-determination from which 
it thus stemmed. Now the tale, setting face-to-face a king and a philosopher, 
a Macedonian king and a Greek philosopher, tends to mark a split between 
this proud independence, this freedom, this self-sufficiency that claims to 
rise above the world, and a friendship which should agree to depend on and 


receive from the other. The Athenian philosopher disdains the world, 
refusing as a result the king’s gift (Geschenk) of a talent. ‘What!’ demanded 
the king. “Has he no friend?’ Nietzsche translates: the king meant that he 
certainly honoured the pride of a sage jealous of his independence and his 
own freedom of movement; but the sage would have honoured his humanity 
better had he been able to triumph over his proud self-determination, his 
own subjective freedom; had he been able to accept the gift and the 
dependency — that is, this law of the other assigned to us by friendship, a 
sentiment even more sublime than the freedom or self-sufficiency of a 
subject. The philosopher discredited himself in his ignorance of one of the 
two sublime sentiments, in truth ‘the more elevated’ of the two. 

A logic of the gift thus withholds friendship from its philosophical 
interpretation. Imparting to it a new twist, at once both gentle and violent, 
this logic reorientates friendship, deflecting it towards what it should have 
been — what it immemorially will have been. This logic calls friendship 
back to non-reciprocity, to dissymmetry or to disproportion, to the 
impossibility of a return to offered or received hospitality; in short, it calls 
friendship back to the irreducible precedence of the other. To its 
consideration [pré-venance, thoughtfulness of and for that which ‘comes 
before’]. But is there more or less freedom in accepting the gift of the 
other? Is this reorientation of the gift that would submit friendship to the 
consideration of the other something other than alienation? And is this 
alienation without relation to the loss of identity, of responsibility, of 
freedom that is also translated by ‘madness’, this living madness which 
reverses, perverts or converts (good) sense, makes opposites slide into each 
other and ‘knows’ very well, in its own way, in what sense the best friends 
are the best enemies? Hence the worst. 

What concept of freedom — and of equality — are we talking about? And 
what are the political consequences and implications, notably with regard to 
democracy, of such a rupture in reciprocity — indeed, of such a divorce 
between two experiences of freedom that pride themselves on being 
respectively the hyperbole of the other? 

With regard to democracy and with regard to justice? For we would be 
tempted to match Nietzsche’s gesture, as we have just seen it in outline, to 
the call he seems to be making for another justice: the one soon to be within 
reach of the new philosophers — the arrivants — the one already within their 
reach, since these arrivants, who are still to come, are already coming: ‘But 


what is needful is a new justice (Sondem eine neue Gerechtigkeit tut 


not!)’,!> just as we lack — it is the same sentence, the same need, the same 
exigency — ‘new philosophers’. The anchor must be raised with you, 
philosophers of a new world (for there is more than one [car il y en a plus 
d’un]), in a search for a justice that would at last break with sheer 
equivalence, with the equivalence of right and vengeance, of justice as 
principle of equivalence (right) and the law of eye for eye, an equivalence 
between the just, the equitable (gerecht), and the revenged (geracht) that 
Nietzschean genealogy has relentlessly recalled as the profound motivation 
of morality and of right, of which we are the heirs. What would an equality 
then be, what would an equity be, which would no longer calculate this 
equivalence? Which would, quite simply, no longer calculate at all? And 
would carry itself beyond proportion, beyond appropriation, thereby 
exceeding all reappropriation of the proper? 

This ‘disappropriation’ [dépropriation] would undoubtedly beckon to 
this other ‘love’ whose true name, says Nietzsche in conclusion, whose ‘just 
name’ is friendship (Ihr rechter Name ist Freundschaft).!° This friendship is 
a species of love, but of a love more loving than love. All the names would 
have to change for the sake of coherence. Without being able to devote to it 
the careful reading it deserves, let us recall that this little two-page treatise 
on love denounces, in sum, the right to property. This property right is the 
claim [revendication|] of love (at least, of what is thus named). The 
vindictive claim of this right can be deciphered throughout all the 
appropriative manoeuvres of the strategy which this ‘love’ deploys. It is the 
appropriating drive (Trieb) par excellence. ‘Love’ wants to possess. It 
wants the possessing. It is the possessing — cupidity itself (Habsucht); it 
always hopes for new property; and even the very Christian ‘love of one’s 
neighbour’ — charity, perhaps — would reveal only a new lust in this 
fundamental drive: ‘Our love of our neighbour — is it not a lust for new 
possessions? (Unsere Nachstenliebe — ist sie nicht ein drang nach neuem 
Eigentum?)’ 

This question is doubly important. In contesting the Christian revolution 
of love as much as the Greek philosophical concept of friendship — and just 
as much the norms of justice that depend on them — its target is the very 
value of proximity, the neighbour’s proximity as the ruse of the proper and 
of appropriation. The gesture confirms the warning accompanying the 
discourse on ‘good friendship’: not to give in to proximity or identification, 


to the fusion or the permutation of you and me. But, rather to place, 
maintain or keep an infinite distance within ‘good friendship’. The very 
thing that love — that which is thus named, ‘love between the sexes’, 
egotism itself, jealousy which tends only towards possession (Besitzen) — 1s 
incapable of doing. 

Is this to say that friendship, rightly named, will carry itself beyond Eros? 
Beyond Eros in general? Or beyond love between two sexes? 

Nietzsche does not unfold these questions in this form. But let us not 
conceal their radicality, which can become disquieting, particularly given 
the motive of the ‘new’ or of the ‘future’ that we perhaps too often trust as 
if it were univocal, simply opposed to the form of repetition and the work of 
the arch-ancient. For Nietzsche sees this drive of appropriation, this form 
always pushing for ‘new property’, at work everywhere, including where 
love loves in view of knowledge, of truth, of the novelty of the new, of all 
new reality in general: ‘Our love of our neighbour — is it not a lust for new 
possessions? And likewise our love of knowledge, of truth, and altogether 
any lust for what is new? (und uberhaupt all jener Drang nach 
Neuigkeiten?) 

If ‘new’ always means, again and again, once again, anew, the 
appropriative drive, the repetition of the same drive to appropriate the other 
for oneself, the truth, being, the event, etc., what can still take place anew? 
Anew? What remains to come? And what will become of our just 
impatience to see the new coming, the new thoughts, the new thinkers, new 
justice, the revolution or the messianic interruption? Yet another ruse? Once 
again the desire of appropriation? 

Yes. Yes, perhaps. 

And you must be coherent with this response. You must acquiesce to this 
principle of ruin at the heart of the most utterly new. It could never be 
eluded or denied. 

And yet. At the heart of this acquiescence, just when a yes could be 
proffered to the principle of ruin, beyond knowledge and truth, precisely, an 
empty place would be left — left by Nietzsche as we would perhaps like to 
read him: a place open for that which can perhaps still take place — by 
chance. Favourable to friendship and like friendship, the friendship that 
would then deserve its just name. More precisely, favourable to the love 
whose just name would be friendship. 


Because the adequation between the concept, the name, and the event 
could never be assured. Its appropriateness [jusresse] would not be 
regulated by the necessity of any knowledge. Perhaps, one day, here or 
there, who knows, something may happen between two people in love, who 
would love each other lovingly (is this still the right word?) in such a way 
that friendship, just once, perhaps, for the first time (another perhaps), once 
and only once, therefore for the first and last time (perhaps, perhaps), will 
become the correct name, the right and just name for that which would then 
have taken place, the condition being that it take place between two, ‘two 
people’, as Nietzsche specifies. But how can you adjust a name to what 
could take place only once, perhaps, for the first and last time? In other 
words — and in a much more general way this time — how can you name an 
event? For this love that would take place only once would be the only 
possible event: as an impossible event. Even if the right name for this 
unique love were to be found, how would you convince everyone else of its 
appropriateness? And what about the task of convincing the partner, at the 
moment of the act in which this love would essentially consist, that of 
giving him or her the name? 

There would be no better way of honouring this chance than by quoting 
Nietzsche: Was alles Liebe gennant wird. But let us not quote him without 
underscoring in advance a point of logic, rhetoric — or onomastics: what 
might, then, very well happen, by chance, between two, between two in 
love, would cause no ripple in the calm waters of semantics. There would 
be no substituting or opposing: of one concept for another, one name for 
another, a friendship for a non-friendship, a friendship for an enmity, or a 
friendship for love. No, the ‘new’ that will perhaps come will be radically 
new — who knows? — but it might also take on the form of a development or 
a prolongation (Fortsetzung) of love. It would then be a new form of 
‘lovence’, of the becoming-friendship of love, under the same name, but 
this time under the right same name, just for once, just this one time, 
adjusted rather to an incomparable time, unique and without a concept, at a 
particular date, between two. The friendship of these friends, if there are 
any of this kind, should their friendship take place one fine day, in the 
chance of a moment, an instant, with no assurance of duration, without the 
firm constancy of Aristotelian philia — this would be the condition of an 
improbable alliance in the thought of the perhaps. And since this thought to 
come is not a philosophy — at least, not a speculative, theoretical or 


metaphysical philosophy — not an ontology and not a theology, neither a 
representation nor a philosophical consciousness, at stake would be another 
experience of the perhaps: of thought as another experience of the perhaps. 
Hence another way of addressing, addressing oneself to the possible. Such 
a possible would no longer belong to the space of this possible, to the 
possibility of the possible whose concept would have assured its constancy, 
through so many mutations, from Aristotle to Hegel and Bergson. In order 
to open oneself to this other possibility of the possible, the word experience 
itself would have to refer to another concept. And attempt to translate itself 
if this other possibility were possible, into a political language. The price to 
pay, if this were necessary, would be having to change the meaning of the 
word ‘political’ — in other words, one would have to change politics. 

Such a change to come is perhaps under way. But let us not be blind to 
the aporia that all change must endure. It is the aporia of the perhaps, its 
historical and political aporia. Without the opening of an absolutely 
undetermined possible, without the radical abeyance and suspense marking 
a perhaps, there would never be either event or decision. Certainly. But 
nothing takes place and nothing is ever decided without suspending the 
perhaps while keeping its living possibility in living memory. If no decision 
(ethical, juridical, political) is possible without interrupting determination 
by engaging oneself in the perhaps, on the other hand, the same decision 
must interrupt the very thing that is its condition of possibility: the perhaps 
itself. In the order of law, politics or morality, what would rules and laws, 
contracts and institutions indeed be without steadfast (bébaios) 
determination, without calculability and without violence done to the 
perhaps, to the possible that makes them possible? We insist on the decision 
in order to introduce the aporia in which all theory of decision must engage 
itself, notably in its apparently modern figures — for example, that of 
Schmittian decisionism, of its ‘right-wing’ or ‘left-wing’ or even neo- 
Marxist heritage, which we will take up later. Such a decisionism, as we 
know, is a theory of the enemy. And the figure of the enemy, condition of 
the political as such, takes shape in this century against the backdrop of its 
own loss: we would be losing the enemy, and thereby the political. But 
since when? 

The aporia of the event intersects with, but also capitalizes or 
overdetermines, the aporia of decision with regard to the perhaps. There is 
no event, to be sure, that is not preceded and followed by its own perhaps, 


and that is not as unique, singular and irreplaceable as the decision with 
which it is frequently associated, notably in politics. But can one not 
suggest without a facile paradox, that the eventness of an event remains 
minimal, if not excluded, by a decision? Certainly the decision makes the 
event, but it also neutralizes this happening that must surprise both the 
freedom and the will of every subject — surprise, in a word, the very 
subjectivity of the subject, affecting it wherever the subject is exposed, 
sensitive, receptive, vulnerable and fundamentally passive, before and 
beyond any decision — indeed, before any subjectivation or objectivation. 
Undoubtedly the subjectivity of a subject, already, never decides anything; 
its identity in itself and its calculable permanence make every decision an 
accident which leaves the subject unchanged and indifferent. A theory of the 
subject is incapable of accounting for the slightest decision. But this must 
be said a fortiori of the event, and of the event with regard to the decision. 
For if nothing ever happens to a subject, nothing deserving the name 
‘event’, the schema of decision tends regularly — at least, in its ordinary and 
hegemonic sense (that which seems dominant still in Schmittian 
decisionism, in his theory of exception and of sovereignty) — to imply the 
instance of the subject, a classic, free, and wilful subject, therefore a subject 
to whom nothing can happen, not even the singular event for which he 
believes to have taken and kept the initiative: for example, in an exceptional 
situation. But should one imagine, for all that, a ‘passive’ decision, as it 
were, without freedom, without that freedom? Without that activity, and 
without the passivity that is mated to it? But not, for all that, without 
responsibility? Would one have to show hospitality to the impossible itself 
— that is, to what the good sense of all philosophy can only exclude as 
madness or nonsense: a passive decision, an originarily affected decision? 
Such an undesirable guest can intrude into the closed space or the home 
ground of common sense only by recalling, as it were, so as to derive 
authority from it, an old forgotten invitation. It would thus recall the type or 
the silhouette of the classic concept of decision, which must interrupt and 
mark an absolute beginning. Hence it signifies in me the other who decides 
and rends. The passive decision, condition of the event, is always in me, 
structurally, another event, a rending decision as the decision of the other. 
Of the absolute other in me, the other as the absolute that decides on me in 
me. Absolutely singular in principle, according to its most traditional 
concept, the decision is not only always exceptional, it makes an exception 


for/of me. In me. I decide, I make up my mind in all sovereignty — this 
would mean: the other than myself, the me as other and other than myself, 
he makes or I make an exception of the same. This normal exception, the 
supposed norm of all decision, exonerates from no_ responsibility. 
Responsible for myself before the other, I am first of all and also 
responsible for the other before the other. This heteronomy, which is 
undoubtedly rebellious against the decisionist conception of sovereignty or 
of the exception (Schmitt), does not contradict; it opens autonomy on to 
itself, it is a figure of its heartbeat. It matches the decision to the gift, if 
there is one, as the other’s gift. The aporetic question ‘what can “to give in 
the name, to give to the name of the other” mean?’!” could translate into the 
question of the decision, the event, the exception, sovereignty, and so on. To 
give in the name of, to give to the name of, the other is what frees 
responsibility from knowledge — that is, what brings responsibility unto 
itself if there ever is such a thing. For yet again, one must certainly know, 
one must know it, knowledge is necessary if one is to assume responsibility, 
but the decisive or deciding moment of responsibility supposes a leap by 
which an act takes off, ceasing in that instant to follow the consequence of 
what is — that is, of that which can be determined by science or 
consciousness — and thereby frees itse/f (this 1s what is called freedom), by 
the act of its act, of what is therefore heterogeneous to it, that is, 
knowledge. /n sum, a decision is unconscious — insane as that may seem, it 
involves the unconscious and nevertheless remains responsible. And we are 
hereby unfolding the classic concept of decision. It is this act of the act that 
we are attempting here to think: ‘passive’, delivered over to the other, 
suspended over the other’s heartbeat. For a few sentences earlier on, ‘its 
heartbeat’ had to be necessarily accorded thus: as the heartbeat of the other. 
Where I am helpless, where I decide what I cannot fail to decide, freely, 
necessarily, receiving my very life from the heartbeat of the other. We say 
not only heart but heartbeat: that which, from one instant to another, having 
come again from an other of the other to whom it is delivered up (and this 
can be me), this heart receives, it will perhaps receive in a rhythmic 
pulsation what is called blood, which in turn will receive the force needed 
to arrive. 

The reader will have sensed that this is what I would be tempted to call 
‘lovence’: love in friendship, lovence beyond love and friendship following 
their determined figures, beyond all this book’s trajectories of reading, 


beyond all ages, cultures and traditions of loving. This does not mean that 
lovence itself can take place figurelessly: for example, the Greek philia, 
courtly love, such and such a great current (as we call it) of mysticism. But 
a lovence cuts across these figures. 

Providing you open yourself, trembling, on to the ‘perhaps’. 

(We shall undoubtedly return to this point, directly or indirectly.) 

That is what can take place, if one thinks with a minimum of coherence 
the logic of the perhaps. This 1s, rather, what can happen fo /ogic following 
the experience of the perhaps. That is what may happen to experience, 
perhaps, and to the concept of experience. That is what could happen, if 
hope for such a thing were possible, among friends, between two, between 
two or more (but how many?), who love each other. 


(In speaking like this, saying that love or friendship is improbable, I am 
saying nothing, I am neither stating nor describing anything. First of all 
because it is not certain that something of the sort exists, that anything ever 
exists outside of what I have to say about it, which you are reading perhaps 
in your own way; and this is precisely what I mean in drawing the perhaps 
into this free zone — where we can rely on nothing, nor count how many of 
us there are. Next, because no predication, no judgement of attribution — we 
have now seen this in sufficient depth — can measure up to what lets itself 
be thus marked — indeed, signed — by such a perhaps. 

I am saying nothing, then, that can be said or is sayable. 

And yet my saying, the declaration of love or the call to the friend, the 
address to the other in the night, the writing that does not resign itself to this 
unsaid — who could swear that they are consigned to oblivion simply 
because no said can speak them exhaustively? 

The response no longer belongs to me — that is all I wanted to tell you, 
my friend the reader. And without knowing any longer if the rare or the 
numerous is preferable. 

I assume responsibility for speaking rightly, justly, on this point, up until 
now, up to the point when I am no longer responsible for anything. Hence 
the point from which all responsibility is announced.) 


This is undoubtedly only an active and hazardous, perhaps momentary, 
interpretation, of what Nietzsche thus said one day about chance, about the 
unknown factor, the ‘here and there’ of favour, of a sort of species of love, 


of the continuation or the follow-up to love, of a future for love the like of 
which it is not known if anyone will have ever had the experience. This is 
the conclusion of ‘The things people call love’ and, like a certain Aristotle, 
an Aristotle whose oligarchical recommendations no one, not even 


Nietzsche or Blanchot,!® will ever have disavowed, this conclusion 
pronounces something of a sentence on number. One must think and write, 
in particular as regards friendship, against great numbers. Against the most 
numerous who make language and lay down the law of its usage. Against 
hegemonic language in what is called public space. If there were a 
community, even a communism, of writing, it would above all be on 
condition that war be waged on those, the greatest number, the strongest 
and the weakest at the same time, who forge and appropriate for themselves 
the dominant usages of language — leaving open the question of knowing if 
the greatest force — in a word, hegemony or dynasty — 1s on the side of the 
greatest number; and if, as always according to Nietzsche, the greatest force 
be not on the side of the weakest — and vice versa. Cicero, as we recall, also 
explained in his own way this transmutation of weak into strong, dead into 
living, etc., and precisely as a history of friendship. This commutability is 
never alien to that which destabilizes the friend/enemy opposition. What, 
then, can the true name be? Of what ‘friendship’ can it be the ‘right name’? 
Is it only a name? Is it nameable, that which it is wearing itself out trying to 
name? 

As we were saying, it would be better now to quote Nietzsche, to honour 
this chance: 


At this point linguistic usage has evidently been formed (haben ... den Sprachgebrauch gemacht) 
by those who did not possess but desired {the unfulfilled, those that covet out of need: die 
Nichthesitzenden und Begehrenden}. Probably, there have always been too many of these (immer 
zu viele). Those to whom much possession and satiety were granted in this area have occasionally 
(hier und da) made some casual remark about “the raging demon”, as that most gracious and 
beloved of all Athenians, Sophocles, did; but Eros has always laughed at such blasphemers; they 
were invariably his greatest favourites (seine gréften Lieblinge). — Here and there (hier und da) 
on earth we may encounter a kind of continuation of love (eine Art Fortsetzung der Liebe) in 
which this possessive craving of two people for each other (bei der jenes habsuchtige Verlangen 
zweier Personen nacheinander) gives way to a new desire and lust for possession (einer neuen 
Begierde und Habsucht), a shared higher thirst [Nietzsche’s emphasis: einem gemeinsamen 
hdheren Durste] for an ideal above them. But who knows such love? Who has experienced it? Its 
right name is friendship (Ihr rechter Name ist Freundschaft). 


Questions remain. In this semantic upheaval, why these words and not 
others? And what do ‘reciprocal’ and ‘common’ and ‘ideal’ and ‘higher’ 


and ‘right’ mean? What does the adjective ‘just’ or ‘right’ mean for all 
these words? Friendship as a just name? Or enmity — supposing, precisely, 
that is its opposite? 

To take an example and to put these questions differently, what does 
Blake mean? Heartbroken, let down in a friendship he believes betrayed,!” 
he asks or pretends to ask Hayley, his friend, to become his enemy (Do be 
my enemy): but he ordains it also, since the phrase is in the imperative 
voice, in the name of friendship, for love of friendship (for Friendships 
sake). 

A last fidelity to some spectre of lost friendship? A living enemy, the 
friend would remain today more present, and more faithful in sum than 
under his misleading features, in the figure or the simulacrum of the 
unfaithful friend. There would be more attentive friendship, singular 
attention and consideration in a tension full of hatred. The enemy is then 
my best friend. He hates me in the name of friendship, of an unconscious or 
sublime friendship. Friendship, a ‘superior’ friendship, returns with the 
enemy. There would be an enemy’s fidelity. 

The two concepts (friend/enemy) consequently intersect and ceaselessly 
change places. They intertwine, as though they loved each other, all along a 
spiralled hyperbole: the declared enemy (Blake declares the enemy by 
ordering him to declare himself: be my enemy), the true enemy, is a better 
friend than the friend. For the enemy can hate or wage war on me in the 
name of friendship, for Friendships sake, out of friendship for friendship; if 
in sum he respects the true name of friendship, he will respect my own 
name. He will hear what my name should, even if it does not, properly 
name: the irreplaceable singularity which bears it, and to which the enemy 
then bears himself and refers. If he hears my order, if he addresses me, me 
myself, he respects me, at hate’s distance, me beyond me, beyond my own 
consciousness. And if he desires my death, at least he desires it, perhaps, 
him, mine, singularly. The declared friend would not accomplish as much in 
simply declaring himself a friend while missing out on the name: that which 
imparts the name both to friendship and to singularity. That which deserves 
the name. 

Every time, then, the issue involves the name. The name borne. The 
name which is imparted. The person imparting the name to the person to 
whom the name is handed down. The issue involves reference and respect. 
Each time, it involves what ‘declaring’ means: war, love, friendship. The 


difference between the two declarative regimes hesitates at this point 
between two truths, two logics of negation and denial, as between a logic of 
lying and a logic of the unconscious. These two logics cannot help but 
haunt one another. And share and separate even the concept of this haunting 
at work in the language of our time. 

Hence, every time, a concept bears the phantom of the other. The enemy 
the friend, the friend the enemy. 

In order to hear and understand this Blakeian vocative (Do be my Enemy 
for Friendships sake), one would have to do justice one day to the incessant 
return of his ghosts — of which there are so many in Blake — as well as to 
the infinite partition of all his divided spectres. Respect for the spectre, as 
Mary Shelley would say. 

Singularly, to all the spectres of Jerusalem: ‘Half Friendship is the 
bitterest Enmity...’ ‘his Spectre also divided.... But still the Spectre divided, 
and still his pain increas’d!/In pain the Spectre divided.... And thus the 
spectre spoke: Wilt thou still go on to destruction? Till thy life is all taken 


away by this deceitful Friendship?’*® 


4 


The Phantom Friend Returning 
(in the Name of ‘Democracy’ ) 


Friends as ghosts (Die Freunde als Gespenster) 
If we greatly transform ourselves, those friends of ours who have not been 
transformed become ghosts of our past: their voice comes across to us like the voice 
of a shade [in a frightfully spectral manner (schattenhaft-schauerlich)| — as though 
we were hearing ourself, only younger, more severe, less mature. ! 

Nietzsche 


we may wonder why democracy was unable to forge a specific language for itself 
.. nowhere else is the dissociation between the reality and name of democracy 


earned as far.... So, attacking democracy with its own weapons... 2 
Nicole Loraux 


We would, however, hesitate on the edge of a fiction. The world would be 
hanging on a sort of elementary, borderless hypothesis; a general 
conditionality would spread over all certainties. The virtual space and time 
of the ‘perhaps’ would be in the process of exhausting the force of our 
desires, the flesh of our events, the uttermost life of our lives. No, they 
would not be in the process of exhausting us, for the very presence of such 
a process would be reassuring and still too effective; no, they would be on 
the verge of success, and this imminence would suffice for their victory. It 
would suffice, not in the task of standing in opposition to this force and this 
life, nor in that of contradicting them — or even harming them — but, worse 
still, of making them possible, thereby making them simply virtual. From 
this virtuality they could never escape, even after their effectuation; this 
would, then, by the very fact, render them impossible, to the point of 


rendering their presumed reality simply possible. The modality of the 
possible, the unquenchable perhaps, would, implacably, destroy everything, 
by means of a sort of self-immunity from which no region of being, phusis 
or history would be exempt. We could, then, imagine a time, this particular 
time — in any case we would not have any other at our disposal — but we 
would hesitate to say ‘this particular time’, for its presence, here and now, 
and its indivisible singularity, would give rise to doubt. We would want to 
reappropriate for ourselves, here and now, even this hesitation, even the 
virtualizing, suspenseful abeyance of this epoch, in order to do it in, to open 
it in a single stroke on to a time that would be ours, and only ours: the 
contemporary, should such a thing ever present itself. But we would not 
dare to give it a name. For fear of virtualizing even more — both our desires 
and our events — precisely on account of this abeyance. Nothing there could 
any longer be recognized, neither a moment nor a state, not even a 
transition. This would be an unprecedented time; a time which, reserving 
itself in the unique, would then remain without relation to any other, 
without attraction or repulsion, nor living analogy. Without even this 
friendship for itself, nor this enmity: without the love or the hate that would 
make this time appear as such. But absolutely without indifference. A time 
said to be contemporary that would be anything but contemporary — 
anything, except proper to its own time. It would resemble nothing, nor 
would it gather itself up in anything, lending itself to any possible 
reflection. It would no longer relate to itself. There would, however, be 
absolutely no indifference; it would not be — in other words, it would not be 
present — either with the other or with itself. Should it present itself, should 
it with some word, say ‘I’, its speech could only be that of a madman; and if 
it described itself as living, this would again be — and more probably than 
ever — a sign of madness. 

One would then have the time of a world without friends, the time of a 
world without enemies. The imminence of a self-destruction by the infinite 
development of a madness of self-immunity. And anyone who would say 
‘O my friends, there are no friends’, and again, or again, ‘O enemies, there 
is no enemy’, would convince us, following a cool, directly logical analysis 
of his statements, that he does not yet have a friend, but already no longer 
has an enemy. Or conversely, at the present time. This would be, perhaps, as 
if someone had lost the enemy, keeping him only in memory, the shadow of 


an ageless ghost, but still without having found friendship, or the friend. Or 
a name for either. 

If we were not wary, in determining them too quickly, about precipitating 
these things towards an excessively established reality, we might propose a 
gross example, among an infinity of others, stmply to set a heading: since 
what a naive scansion dates from the ‘fall-of-the-Berlin-Wall’, or from the 
‘end-of-communism’, the ‘parhamentary-democracies-of-the-capitalist- 
Western-world’ would find themselves without a principal enemy. The 
effects of this destructuration would be countless: the ‘subject’ in question 
would be looking for new reconstitutive enmities; 1t would multiply ‘little 
wars’ between nation-states; it would sustain at any price so-called ethnic or 
genocidal struggles; it would seek to pose itself, to find repose, through 
opposing still identifiable adversaries — China, Islam? Enemies without 
which, as Schmitt would have said — and this is our subject — it would lose 
its political being; 1t would purely and simply depoliticize itself [se 
dépolitiserait]. 

These are questions we therefore murmur to ourselves — the whisper of 
the aforementioned fiction, just for a start; without an enemy, and therefore 
without friends, where does one then find oneself, gua a self? [ow se 
trouver, ou se trouver soi-méme]? With whom? Whose contemporary? Who 
is the contemporary? When and where would we be, ourselves, we, in order 
to say, as in Nietzsche’s unbelievable teleiopoesis, “we’ and ‘you’? Let us 
call these questions fictive questions, to recall an evidence of common 
sense: I can address them — these anguished, but abstract and fleshless 
questions — only to an addressee; I can only throw them out towards a 
reader, whoever he may be; I can only destine them with the precipitative 
supposition of a we that, by definition and by destination, has not yet 
arrived to itself. Not before, at the earliest, the end and the arrival of this 
sentence whose very logic and grammar are improbable. For the ‘I’ that 
feigns to address these fictive questions finds itself comprised and 
determined in advance by the fact that it belongs to the most suspended 
‘we’ of this supposed contemporaneity. It is the arrow of this teleiopoesis 
that we have been following, waiting for, preceding for such a long time — 
the long time of a time that does not belong to time. A time out of joint. 

Let us start again. We had just attempted, in the preceding chapter, a first 
interpretation. One among an infinite number of other possible ones, as 
Nietzsche himself said one day, an interpretation of one of his sayings, the 


exegesis of a fiction or an apostrophe, in memory of Montaigne, who said it 
himself as the heir of Aristotle and Cicero, in the great unending maieutic 
tradition of Lysis (é peri philias, maieutikos). 

Let us not forget that Lysis begins with the scene of a proper name which 
cannot at first be pronounced: who is the loved one? Will his name be 
cited? Will he be called by his name for the first time? Everything in the 
political question of friendship seems to be suspended on the secret of a 
name. Will this name be published? Will tongues be untied, and will the 
name be delivered over to public space? Will a public space be opened up? 
Centuries later, as we shall see, between Montaigne and La Boétie, the birth 
of friendship, the knowledge of the name and the question of public space 
will be caught up in the same knot. Here, the proper name to be quoted, 
Lysis, is not just any name. And it involves a knot. Maieutic as an effect of 
analysis [in English in the original], the Lysis quotes within itself its 
homonym, thereby tying itself to the common name (lysis) which 
designates, as if by chance, unbinding, detachment, emancipation, 
untangling, the tie undone or dissolved by analysis, solution — indeed, 
absolution, even solitude. Here we have an inaugural dialogue on 
friendship. Now, what is it called? Have we given it a thought? Its title 
quotes a proper name which commonly describes a knot undone, while 
engaging you in the analysis of what it means to be solitary. 

Quoted quotations, then, on the subject of the possibility of quoting great 
friends, the true ones. Even if there are more than two of them, the model 
(exemplar) will most often be furnished by a twosome, by some great 
couples of friends. Always men. Well, more often than not, and that is what 
counts; it is of them that one speaks — the two of them, it is the twosome that 
is kept in memory and whose legend is archived. Our culture, our school, 
our literature are the theatre of these couples — and the posterity of these 
great friends. La Boétie knew that in advance; that is what he promised for 
the two of them, before evoking ‘a secret pact of nature’, ‘the paternal sap’ 
and the change ‘in name’: 


Should destiny so desire, be assured that posterity 
Will place our names on the list of celebrated friends.* 


The interpretation involved here remains — there can be no doubt about it — 
insufficient and preliminary with regard to so many heritages, notably with 
regard to the Nietzschean corpus — an abundant, aphoristic and apparently 


unstable body of work. Our approach remains prudent and modest before 
this boundless provocation. We remain almost speechless before this 
demanding but, in its successive or simultaneous postulations, elusive 
indictment. Now, despite or on account of these precautions, such a reading 
may perhaps seem too philological, micrological, readerly — complacent, 
too, with the time it allows itself when matters are urgent, at just the 
moment when one should no longer wait. At a moment when our world is 
delivered over to new forms of violence, new wars, new figures of cruelty 
or barbarity (and not always to this ‘just’ and necessary barbarity that 
Benjamin sometimes called for against the other, the barbarity of the old 
culture), at a moment when hostilities are breaking out, no longer 
resembling the worst that we have ever known, the political and historical 
urgency of what is befalling us should, one will say, tolerate less patience, 
fewer detours and less bibliophilie discretion. Less esoteric rarity. This is no 
longer the time to take one’s time, as a number of our well-intentioned 
contemporaries must no doubt think — as if we had ever been allowed to 
take our time in history, and as if absolute urgency were not the law of 
decision, the event and responsibility, their structural law, which is 
inscribed a priori in the concept. Centuries of preparatory reflection and 
theoretical deliberation — the very infinity of a knowledge — would change 
nothing in this urgency. It is absolutely cutting, conclusive, decisive, 
heartrending; it must interrupt the time of science and conscience, to which 
the instant of decision will always remain heterogeneous. It is, nevertheless, 
true that we feel called upon, ‘live’, to offer answers or to assume 
immediate responsibilities. It is also true that these answers and 
responsibilities seem to be inscribed more naturally in the space of political 
philosophy. This is true — it will always be true — and in this respect we will 
always be in a state of lack [en défaut]. Our answers and our responsibilities 
will never be adequate, never sufficiently direct. The debt is infinite. Urgent 
because infinite. A priori infinite for a finite being, as soon as a duty, if 
there is one, presents itself to it. 

Without pretending to offer a defence or an adequate justification of our 
approach in this matter, let us nevertheless risk a limited hypothesis: 
questioned at once for itself and as a symptomatic effect, the event of the 
text signed ‘Nietzsche’ appears to us to mark, in already being a part of it, a 
mutation in the field of the political and of the community in general. No 
doubt Nietzsche is not the only one to have signalled this mutation. This is 


why we precisely speak, at least provisionally, of a field, even if the identity 
and closure of this field constitute precisely what is, from now on, most 
problematic. But who more or better than Nietzsche, who more thematically 
than he, would have called the politics and history of the world a history of 
the political (as political history), in its link to loving, precisely, to 
friendship as well as to love — more precisely, to the Greek, Jewish and 
Christian history of this link, of the binding and unbinding of this link? And 
thus to enmity, hatred, hostility and war? In other words, who would have 
better named our history, our memory, our culture, if there is one and if it is 
one? Who will have better represented what is happening to our world, 
what is happening to us, what is happening to us by affecting even the 
possibility of saying we — and precisely, concerning the political example of 
the friend/enemy opposition? Who better than he, from this point of view, 
will have represented the massive and molecular movement which, at the 
end of the last century, set out to agitate all the atoms — conceptual ones or 
not, the more or less semantic elements — of this unclosed ensemble? Who, 
if not Nietzsche, set out to overturn, to contest, even their elementary 
identity, to dissolve what is irreducible to analysis in them, to show the 
ineluctable necessity of this perversion which made opposites pass into one 
another: the friend into the enemy, the strong into the weak, the hegemonic 
into the oppressed, and so forth? And who brought it off, then, in an 
ensemble (or ‘field’, but one henceforth without an assignable limit, 
without assured and reassuring ground, but all the more finite for this very 
fact) — perhaps in a world, but in a world which suddenly no longer holds 
together, which has split asunder, no longer closes, is no longer within it, 
and appears to be delivered over to what resembles a chaotic madness, to 
disorder and randomness? 

Certainly this mutation does not belong only to the order of discourse or 
to that of the text, in the narrow, ordinary and outdated sense of these terms. 
It is not only philosophical, speculative or theoretical. Multiple, expandable 
and protean as it may be, the corpus of a singular individual named 
‘Nietzsche’ could not be its sole witness, even less contain it. As is the case 
in any mutation, this one is never exempt from repetition, but according to 
us, it would have affected the unity of this field, its closure as well as all the 
organizing concepts of something like a political community. Although this 
affirmation does not rely on any assured contemporaneity, we belong (this 
is what we take the risk of saying here) to the time of this mutation, which 


is precisely a harrowing tremor in the structure or the experience of 
belonging. Therefore of property. Of communal belonging and sharing: 
religion, family, ethnic groups, nations, homeland, country, state, even 
humanity, love and friendship, lovence, be they public or private. We 
belong to this tremor, if that is possible; we tremble within it. It runs 
through us, and stops us dead in our tracks. We belong to it without 
belonging to it. Within it we hear the resonant echo of all the great 
discourses (we have already named those of Bataille, Blanchot and Nancy, 
for example, but there are others, still so many others, far removed and 
quite close to us) where they assume the risk and the responsibility, but also 
where they give themselves over to the necessity of thinking and 
formalizing, so to speak, absolute dislocation, borderless disjoining; when 
these thinkers point to these obscure plights, sometimes according to the 
time without duration of a thunderbolt, sometimes following the regular 
revolutions of a watchtower, always emitting mad and impossible pleas, 
almost speechless warnings, words that consume themselves in a dark light, 
such as these typical and recurrent syntagms: ‘relation without relation’, 
community without community (‘the community of those without 
community’), ‘inoperative’ community, ‘unavowable’ communism or 
community, and all the ‘X without X’ whose list is, by definition, endless, 
finite in its infinitude. Yes, these warnings turn endlessly. Yes, like 
searchlights without a coast, they sweep across the dark sky, shut down or 
disappear at regular intervals and harbour the invisible in their very light. 
We no longer even know against what dangers or abysses we are 
forewarned. We avoid one, only to be thrown into one of the others. We no 
longer even know whether these watchmen are guiding us towards another 
destination, nor even if a destination remains promised or determined. 

We wish only to think that we are on the track of an impossible axiomatic 
which remains to be thought. Now, if this axiomatic withdraws, from 
instant to instant, from one ray of the searchlight to another, from one 
lighthouse to the next (for there are numerous lighthouses, and where there 
is no longer any home these are no longer homes, and this is what is taking 
place: there are no longer any homes here), this is because darkness is 
falling on the value of value, and hence on the very desire for an axiomatic, 
a consistent, granted or presupposed system of values. 

Now, what would a ‘history’, a science, or a historical action purporting 
to be resolutely and ingeniously extradiscursive or extratextual actually do? 


What would a political history or philosophy, at last realistic, in truth do, 1f 
they did not assume — so as to be confronted by and to account for the 
extreme formalization, the new aporias, the semantic inconstancy — all the 
disquieting conversions that we have just seen operating in these signals? 
What else could they do without attempting to read all the apparently 
contradictory possibles (‘relation without relation’, ‘community without 
community’, etc.) that these ‘sophisticated discourses’ impose on our 
memory? Let us answer: they could do very little, almost nothing. They 
would miss the hardest, the most resistant, the most irreducible, the 
othermost of the ‘thing itself. Such a political history or philosophy would 
deck itself out in ‘realism’ just in time to 611 short of the thing — and to 
repeat, repeat and repeat again, with neither consciousness nor memory of 
its compulsive droning. 

For in the end, what does the fact that we may henceforth speak of and 
with these signals say about what is taking place in the world? The fact that 
we must speak in this way? The fact that the convincing, rigorous, 
ineluctable voice of necessity — its most responsible voice, too — resounds in 
just this way? For example, what has become of the veal structure of the 
political — that of political forces and domination, the relations of strength 
and weakness, the ‘social bond’, the marks and the discourse that give it 
form — to allow us to speak of them in such a way today, seriously and 
solemnly? What has this reality become; but what was it in the first place, if 
that which goes beyond the understanding may now be heard and 
understood? Better yet, for it now to appear the most consistent? For it to be 
necessary for us to speak in this manner? For us to feel obliged to speak 
precisely in such a paradoxical, aporetic, impossible manner of community, 
law, equality, the republic and democracy? Fraternity? Of friendship, in 
sum, or enmity, given that the meaning of this ‘thing’ is implicit throughout, 
in each of these words? 

Were we even to trust the still so crude concepts of effect or symptom, in 
speaking of ‘those sorts of things’, it should not be forgotten that these 
‘things-texts’ consist precisely in a radical contestation of the traditional 
schemes of causality and signification, confronting us ceaselessly with the 
irreducibility of that which lies beyond this very discourse: the other, the 
event, singularity, power/weakness, differential force, the ‘world’, and so 
forth. How can one read these discourses as discourse, these writings, if you 
like (those of Bataille, Blanchot, Nancy, and others, all those whose advent 


Nietzsche’s text — this is what we have wished to demonstrate — announces, 
or rather calls for, bringing law and disorder into the secret of this call, 
already bringing about what has yet to come, in the same teleiopoetic 
sentence)? Even if they were considered as derivable effects or symptoms, 
we would still have to analyse and formalize that possibility pertinently. 
Pertinently, and if possible — but that is exactly what the question 1s all 
about — exhaustively. Its complete formalization would be necessary not 
only to determine of what these texts are the symptomatic effect, but one 
would have to know of what this supposed cause, the thing, the ‘real’ itself, 
will have been capable. To account for a symptom-effect from within that 
of which it is supposed to be the symptom-effect, one must, first of all, 
attempt to read it in the language in which it speaks, even if the account is 
not limited to such a reading. Reading also consists in not being thus 
limited, from one trace to the next. Otherwise, the ‘reality’ of this real or the 
‘history’ of this thing that one is claiming or that one has distinguished in 
the reading would remain both undetermined and imaginary. We know only 
too well how often this happens in the discourse — for let us not forget that 
theirs is a discourse as well — of countless ‘realistic’ champions of the 
historical referent and actuality [effectivitée]. 

It is, therefore, with this concern in mind that we embark on what looks 
like a long detour, the first step of which was taken long ago. With this 
concern in mind we shall outline once again a more directly political 
reading, if you like, of Nietzsche’s vocative phrase (‘O enemies...’), as the 
teleiopoesis that regularly turned the friend into an enemy, and vice versa, 
with the risk of spectralizing — others would say: of losing — both. 

— We have lost the friend, as it is said in this century. 

— No, we have lost the enemy, another voice says, in this same waning 
century. Both voices speak of the political, and that is what we wish to 
recall. They speak, in sum, of a political crime of which it is no longer 
known — this is a question of borders — if it is to be defined in the order of 
the political (for instance, when there is assassination, torture, or terrorism 
in a given political state for political reasons) or if it is a crime against the 
political itself, when in one way or another it puts to death that without 
which a political crime could no longer be defined or distinguished from 
other sorts of crimes, when appeal to political reason or to some critique of 
political reason would no longer be possible. Following this hypothesis, 
losing the enemy would not necessarily be progress, reconciliation, or the 


opening of an era of peace and human fraternity. It would be worse: an 
unheard-of violence, the evil of a malice knowing neither measure nor 
ground, an unleashing incommensurable in its unprecedented — therefore 
monstrous — forms; a violence in the face of which what is called hostility, 
war, conflict, enmity, cruelty, even hatred, would regain reassuring and 
ultimately appeasing contours, because they would be identifiable. The 
figure of the enemy would then be helpful — precisely as a figure — became 
of the features which allow it to be identified as such, still identical to what 
has always been determined under this name. An identifiable enemy — that 
is, one who is reliable to the point of treachery, and thereby familiar. One’s 
fellow man, in sum, who could almost be loved as oneself: he is 
acknowledged and recognized against the backdrop of a common history. 
This adversary would remain a neighbour, even if he were an evil neighbour 
against whom war would have to be waged. 

Among all the possible political readings of Nietzsche’s phrase, we are 
on the verge of giving precedence to one, specifically where — at least 
apparently — it would lead back to a tradition, a tradition already in 
modernity. One which the twentieth century would certainly have replayed; 
and would replay again under new conditions, between two world wars and 
from one mutation to another of its postwar periods. 

But it would lead back to a tradition of modernity which, in a naturally 
differentiated and complicated fashion, goes back at least to Hegel. 

This tradition takes on systematic form in the work of Carl Schmitt, and 
we believe it is necessary to dwell temporarily on it here. At length, but 
temporarily. Certainly on account of the intrinsic interest of Schmitt’s theses 
— their originality, where they seem, however, as ragingly conservative in 
their political content as they are reactive and traditionalist in their 
philosophical logic. But also on account of their heritage. Their paradox and 
equivocality are well known. Is it fortuitous that the same filiation unites 
several right-wing and left-wing (Marxist, post-Marxist, and neo-Marxist) 
families?# 

First reminder: for Schmitt, it is indeed nothing more and nothing less 
than the political as such which would no longer exist without the figure of 
the enemy and without the determined possibility of an actual war. Losing 
the enemy would simply be the loss of the political itself — and this would 
be our century’s horizon after two world wars. And today, how many 
examples could be given of this disorientation of the political field, where 


the principal enemy now appears unidentifiable! The invention of the 
enemy is where the urgency and the anguish are; this invention is what 
would have to be brought off, in sum, to repoliticize, to put an end to 
depoliticization. Where the principal enemy, the ‘structuring’ enemy, seems 
nowhere to be found, where it ceases to be identifiable and thus reliable — 
that is, where the same phobia projects a mobile multiplicity of potential, 
interchangeable, metonymic enemies, in secret alliance with one another: 
conjuration. 

Here is the Schmittian axiom in its most elementary form: the political 
itself, the being-political of the political, arises in its possibility with the 
figure of the enemy. It would be unfair, as is often done, to reduce Schmitt’s 
thought to this axiom, but it would nevertheless be indispensable to his 
thought, and also to his decisionism, his theory of the exception and 
sovereignty. The disappearance of the enemy would be the death knell of 
the political as such. It would mark the beginning of depoliticization 
(Entpolitisierung), the beginning of the end of the political. Facing this end, 
at the eschatological edge of this imminent death, at the moment when the 
political has begun to expire, the Christian sage or the fool might say, with a 
sighed alas: ‘there is no enemy! (es gibt keinen Feind!)’ But then, to whom 
would he address himself (‘Enemies ...!’ ‘Feinde ...!’), to which enemies? 
Perhaps to his political enemies with whom he would still share that love of 
war outside the horizon of which, according to Schmitt, there is no state. 
But perhaps he would also be addressing the enemies of the political, the 
ultimate enemies, the worst of them all, enemies worse than enemies. 

At any rate, the Schmittian axiom is also posited in a ‘Nietzschean’ 
posterity. The fact that it is attuned to a fundamentally Christian politics is 
certainly not insignificant even if in many respects this is considered 
secondary. In The Concept of the Political, Schmitt (whose massively 
attested Nazism remains as complex and overdetermined as his relation to 
Heidegger, Benjamin, Leo Strauss,° etc.) claims to have pinpointed the 
determining predicate, the specific difference of the political. He writes, for 
example: ‘The specific political distinction (die spezifisch politische 
Unterscheidung), to which political actions and notions can be reduced, is 
the distinction (Unterscheidung) between friend and enemy.”/ 

If the distinction or the differential mark (Unterscheidung), if the 
determination of the political, if the ‘political difference’ itself (die 
politische Unterscheidung) thus amounts to a_ discrimination 


(Unterscheidung) between friend and enemy, such a dissociation cannot be 
reduced to a mere difference. It is a determined opposition, opposition 
itself. This determination specifically assumes opposition. Should that 
opposition erase itself, and war likewise, the regime called ‘politics’ loses 
its borders or its specificity. 

Schmitt draws a great number of consequences from this axiom and these 
definitions, notably with regard to a certain depoliticization. There would 
be an essential risk for modern humanity tout court, which, gua humanity, 
ignores the figure of the enemy. There is no enemy of humanity. A crime 
against humanity is not a political crime. Alas, for humanity gua humanity, 
there is not yet, or already no longer, any enemy! Anyone who takes an 
interest in humanity gua humanity has ceased, according to Schmitt, to talk 
about politics, and should realize it. 

Is the person levelling this warning at us too much the sage or too much 
the fool? Schmitt claims that he has awakened a tradition that was 
beginning to lull. Whether we can substantiate them or not, some of his 
remarks must claim our attention here. We should underscore two of them. 
They deal on the one hand with the opposition public/private, and on the 
other with a certain concept of ethics. Let us begin with the first. The 
second will be taken up much later. 

Although he does not propose equivalence or symmetry for the friend, 
one of the opposing terms of the discrimination (Unterscheidung), Schmitt 
considers that the enemy has always been esteemed a ‘public’ enemy. The 
concept of a private enemy would be meaningless. Indeed, it is the very 
sphere of the public that emerges with the figure of the enemy: 


One may or may not share these hopes and pedagogic ideals. But, rationally speaking, it cannot be 
denied that nations continue to group themselves according to the friend and enemy opposition, 
that this opposition still remains actual today, and that it subsists in a state of real virtuality (als 
reale Moglichkeit) for every people having a political existence. 

Hence the enemy is not the competitor or the adversary in the general sense of the term. 
Neither is he the personal, private rival whom one hates or feels antipathy for. The enemy can 
only be an ensemble of grouped individuals, confronting an ensemble of the same nature, engaged 
in at least a virtual struggle, that is, one that is effectively possible (Feind ist nur eine wenigstens 
eventuell, d.h. der realen Moglichkeit nach kampfende Gesamtheit von Menschen the einer 


ebensolchen Gesamtheit gegenubersteht).® 


We have cited the letter of the last sentence of the original (slightly abused 
in the French translation) because the most obscure zone of the difficulty is 
enclosed therein. This last sentence points up in fact — but furtively, almost 


elliptically, as if it were self-evident — the innermost spring of this logic: the 
passage from possibility to eventuality (which is here specified as minimal 
eventuality) and from eventuality to effectivity-actuality (which in the 
sentence is named real possibility, ‘reale Moglichkeit’). This passage takes 
place, it rushes into place, precisely where the abyss of a distinction 
happens to be filled up. The passage consists in fact in a denial of the abyss. 
As always, the tank is replenished in the present, with presence [/e plein se 
fait au présent|: in the name of a present, by allegation of presence — here, 
in the form of a present participle (Aampfende). Schmitt emphasizes this 
present participle, as if to point to the sensitive spot of the operation, with 
an attentiveness which the translation, unfortunately, has passed over. As 
soon as war is possible, it is taking place, Schmitt seems to say; presently, 
in a society of combat, in a community presently at war, since it can present 
itself to itself, as such, only in reference to this possible war. Whether the 
war takes place, whether war is decided upon or declared, is a mere 
empirical alternative in the face of an essential necessity: war is taking 
place; it has already begun before it begins, as soon as it is characterized as 
eventual (that is, announced as a non-excluded event in a sort of contingent 
future). And it is eventual as soon as it 1s possible. Schmitt does not wish to 
dissociate the quasi-transcendental modality of the possible and the 
historico-factual modality of the eventual. He names now the eventuality 
(wenigstens eventuell), now the possibility (Moglichkeit), without 
thematizing the criterion of distinction. No account of this distinction is 
taken in the French translation.? As soon as war is possible-eventual, the 
enemy is present; he is there, his possibility is presently, effectively, 
supposed and structuring. His being-there is effective, he institutes the 
community as a human community of combat, as a combating collectivity 
(kampfende Gesamtheit von Menschen). The concept of the enemy is 
thereby deduced or constructed a priori, both analytically and synthetically 
— in synthetic a priori fashion, if you like, as a political concept or, better 
yet, as the very concept of the political. From then on, it is important that 
the concept be purified of all other dimensions — especially of everything 
opposed to the political or the public, beginning with the private: anything 
that stems from the individual or even the psychological, from the 
subjective in general. In fact, this conceptual prudence and rigour are bound 
to imply, as is always the case, some sort of phenomenological procedure. 
Following what resembles at least an eidetic reduction, all facts and all 


regions that do not announce themselves as political must be put in 
parentheses. All other regional disciplines, all other knowledge — economic, 
aesthetic, moral, military, even religious knowledge — must be suspended, 
although the theological-political tradition has to remain in operation for 
essential reasons — this is well known, but we shall return to it later — in this 
apparently secular thought of the political.!° This prudence, at once 
phenomenological and semantic, is often difficult to respect, but the stakes 
involved, for Schmitt, are decisive. This prudence sometimes receives 
authorization, at least in The Concept of the Political, from a distinction 
first marked in two languages, Latin and Greek (hostis/inimicus, 
polémios/ekhthros), as though the distinction of the political could not be 
properly formulated in more than two idioms; as if other languages, even 
the German language, could not have as clear an access to the distinction. 
But whether Schmitt allows himself this linguistic reference or whether it is 
used as a convenient pedagogic tool is difficult to say. He may well do both 
at the same time, as though the whole history of the political — that is, the 
rigorous determination of the enemy — sealed here or there, in a linguistic 
felicity, a universal necessity forever irreducible to it. In fact, following the 
publication of his book in 1932, Schmitt more than once returned to re- 
examine this linguistic limitation, in a context we shall specify in a 
moment. 


Would the question still be, as it always is, that of the ‘right name’, as 
Nietzsche would say? The question of the right name of friendship or of its 
supposed antithesis, enmity? We, speakers of Latin that we are, would have 
to understand, in adjusting our language on this point, that the antithesis of 
friendship in the political sphere is not, according to Schmitt, enmity but 
hostility. First consequence: the political enemy would not inevitably be 
inimical, he would not necessarily hold me in enmity, nor I him. Moreover, 
sentiments would play no role; there would be neither passion nor afrect in 
general. Here we have a totally pure experience of the friend-enemy in its 
political essence, purified of any affect — at least of all personal affect, 
supposing that there could ever be any other kind. If the enemy is the 
stranger, the war I would wage on him should remain essentially without 
hatred, without intrinsic xenophobia. And politics would begin with this 
purification. With the calculation of this conceptual purification. I can also 


wage war on my friend, a war in the proper sense of the term, a proper, 
clear and merciless war. But a war without hatred. 

Hence a first possibility of semantic slippage and inversion: the friend 
(amicus) can be an enemy (hostis); I can be, hostile towards my friend, I 
can be hostile towards him publicly, and conversely I can, in privacy, love 
my enemy. From this, everything would follow, in orderly, regular fashion, 
from the distinction between private and public. Another way of saying that 
at every point when this border is threatened, fragile, porous, contestable 
(we thus designate so many possibilities that ‘our time’ 1s accentuating and 
accelerating in countless ways), the Schmittian discourse collapses. It is 
against the threat of this ruin that his discourse takes form. It defends itself, 
walls itself up, reconstructs itself unendingly against what is to come; it 
struggles against the future with a prophetic and pathetic energy. But it is 
also from within this threat, from within the dread that it seems to provoke 
in this traditionalist and Catholic thinker of European law, that he is able to 
see coming, better than so many others, the force of the future in this 
threatening figure. This reactive and unscrupulous dread is often presented 
in the rigour of the concept, a vigilant, meticulous, implacable rigour 
inherited from the tradition — from a tradition, moreover, that this entire 
discourse intends to serve and repeat, in order to put it up against the 
novelty of what is coming and to see, so it would seem, that it carries the 
day. With the energy of a last-ditch effort. If one is not to lose the enemy, 
one must know who he is, and what, in the past, the word ‘enemy’ always 
designated — more precisely, what it must have designated. No, what it 
should have designated: 


The enemy is solely the public enemy (nur der 6ffentliche Feind), because everything that has a 
relationship to such a collectivity of men, particularly to a whole nation, becomes public by virtue 
of such a relationship The enemy is hostis, not inimicus in the broader sense; polémios, not 
ekhthros. As German and other languages do not distinguish between the private and political 
enemy, many misconceptions and falsifications are possible. The often quoted ‘Love your 
enemies’ (Matt. 5:44; Luke 6:27) reads diligite hostes vestros, agapdte tous ekhthrous umon and 
not diligite inimicus vestros. No mention is made of the political enemy. Never in the thousand- 
year struggle between Christians and Moslems did it occur to a Christian to surrender rather than 
defend Europe out of love toward the Saracens or Turks. The enemy in the political sense need not 
be hated personally, and in the private sphere only does it make sense to love one’s enemy, that is, 


one’s adversary. |! 


(We could say a great deal today, among so very many other analogous 
indications that abound in Schmitt’s text, on the choice of this example: 


Islam would remain an enemy even though we Europeans must love the 
Muslims as our neighbours. At a determining moment in the history of 
Europe, it was imperative not ‘to deliver Europe over to Islam’ in the name 
of a universal Christianity. You are obliged, you will always have been 
obliged, to defend Europe against its other without confusing the genres, 
without confusing faith and politics, enmity and hostility, friendship and 
alliance or confusion. However, a coherent reading of this example should 
go further: today more than ever such a reading should take into account the 
fact that all the concepts of this theory of right and of politics are European, 
as Schmitt himself often admits. Defending Europe against Islam, here 
considered as a non-European invader of Europe, is then more than a war 
among other wars, more than a political war. Indeed, strictly speaking, this 
would be not a war but a combat with the political at stake, a struggle for 
politics. And this holds even if it is not necessarily a struggle for 
democracy, which is a formidable problem in any reading of Schmitt. From 
then on the front of this opposition is difficult to place. It is no longer a 
thoroughly political front. In question would be a defensive operation 
destined to defend the political, beyond particular states or nations, beyond 
any geographical, ethnic or political continent. On the political side of this 
unusual front, the stakes would be saving the political as such, ensuring its 
survival in the face of another who would no longer even be a political 
enemy but an enemy of the political — more precisely, a being radically 
alien to the political as such, supposing at least that, in its purported purity, 
it is not Europeanized and shares nothing of the tradition of the juridical and 
the political called European.) 


Although it can never be reduced to a question of language or discourse, 
the differentiated rooting of this friend/enemy opposition in certain idioms 
could never be considered accidental or extrinsic. It recalls the too-evident 
fact that this semantics belongs to a culture, to structures of ethnic, social 
and political organization in which language is irreducible. One would then 
have to follow closely!” all the difficulties encountered by Schmitt in the 
justification of his terminological distinctions. Schmitt returns to this 
difficulty as if in passing, but regularly, in footnotes that one may be 
tempted to read as second thoughts, or at least as signs of worry. The Greek 
distinction (polémios/ekhthros) is sustained only with a brief reference to 
the Republic (V, 470), where Plato opposes war strictly speaking (pdlemos) 


to civil war, to rebellion or to uprising (stasis).!> Without specifying what 
type of relationship or connection this is, Schmitt recalls Plato’s insistence 
on the distinction ‘bound’ (verbunden) to that of two sorts of enemies 
(polémios and ekhthros) — that 1s, the distinction between pdlemos (‘war’) 
and stasis (‘riot, uprising, rebellion, civil war’). He adds: 


In Plato’s eyes, only a war between Greeks and barbarians (‘natural enemies’) is actually a war 
(wirklich Krieg), whilst struggles (die Kdmpfe) between Greeks are of the order of stdsis 
(internecine quarrels). The dominant idea here is that a people cannot wage war on itself and that a 
‘civil war’ is never but a rending of self but would perhaps not signify the formation of a new 


State, or even of a new people. !4 


This last hypothesis seems hardly Platonic. In any case, it would seem to us, 
not literally so and not in this context. Plato does say, in fact, that the 
Greeks, where there is a disagreement [differend] (diaphora) between 
themselves, consider it an internal discord (stasis), since it is quasi-familial 
(6s oikeious), but they never bestow on it the name of war (pdlemos) 
(471a). It is true that between themselves, the Greeks always end up in 
reconciliation (a theme that reappears in Menexenus), and never seek either 
to subjugate or to destroy. They attack only the ‘causes’, the authors of the 
disagreement — that is (a specification upon which, from different points of 
view, we shall not cease to insist) the few in number. But if Plato indeed 
says that the barbarians are natural enemies and that, as we will read, the 
Greeks are ‘by nature friends among themselves’, he does not conclude, for 
all that, that civil war (stasis) or enmity between Greeks is simply outside 
of nature. He invokes an illness, which is something else again. Above all, 
far from being satisfied with the opposition on which Schmitt relies so 
heavily, the Republic indeed prescribes its erasure. In this case, it is indeed 
recommended that the Greeks behave towards their enemies — the 
barbarians — as they behave today among themselves. This prescription is 
laid down like a law. 


I, he said, agree that our citizens ought to deal with their Greek opponents in this wise [semblable 
doit étre, ‘their policy must be similar’] (omolog6 outéd dein), while treating barbarians as Greeks 
now (0s nun) treat Greeks. Let us then lay down this law also (tith6men dé kai teuton ton nomon), 
for our guardians, that they are not to lay waste the land or burn the houses. Let us so decree 
(thomen), he said, and assume that this and our preceding prescriptions are right. (471bc 
[translation modified]) 


Although Schmitt, to my knowledge, does not do so — never with sufficient 
precision, in any case — it must also be recalled that we are dealing with the 


very famous passage in which, in view of what is proper to justice 
(diakaiosuné) and to injustice (adikia), Plato excludes the possibility of 
realizing this ideal State as long as philosophers do not reign over it, as long 
as the kings and sovereigns, the ‘dynasts’ who dispose of power, are not 
philosophers (473cd) — that is, as long as philosophia is not bound to 
political power, synonymous, if you will, with dunamis politike: in other 
words, as long as justice is not bound to power, as long as justice 1s not one 
with force. As long as this unity remains out of reach — that is, for ever — the 
conceptual unities that depend on it — in fact, every one that Plato proposes 
or recalls — remain ideal entities. No empirical language is in fact fully 
adequate to it. This improbability does not rule out, on the contrary, it 
commands, as we know if we follow Plato — the perfectly mgorous 
description of these pure structures of the ideal State; for they give their 
meaning, legitimately and on principle, to every concept, and hence to 
every term, of political philosophy. It is no less the case that the distinction 
polémios/ekhthros, considered precisely in its purity, already implies a 
discourse on nature (phusis) that makes us wonder how Schmitt, without 
looking into the question more closely, could incorporate it into his general 
theory. Let us never forget that the two names that Plato is intent on keeping 
should name rigorously, in their ideal purity, two things that are in nature. 
These two names (pdlemos and stasis) are in fact assigned to two kinds of 
disagreement, contestation, disaccord (diaphora). The disagreement 
(diaphora) between those who share kinship ties or origins (oikeion kai 
suggenes: family, household, intimacy, community of resources and of 
interests, familiarity, etc.) 1s stasis, the discord or war that is sometimes 
called civil. As for the diaphora between foreigners or foreign families 
(allotrion kai othneion), it is sheer war (pdlemos). The naturalness of the 
bond uniting the Greek people or the Greek race (Hellénikon génos) always 
remains intact [inentamée], in polemos as well as in stasis. The Greek génos 
(lineage, race, family, people, etc.) is united by kinship and by the original 
community (oikeion kai suggenés). On these two counts it is foreign to the 
barbarian génos (to de barbariko othneion te kai allotrion) (470c). As in 
every racism, every ethnocentrism — more precisely, in every one of the 
nationalisms throughout history — a discourse on birth and on nature, a 
phusis of genealogy (more precisely, a discourse and a phantasm on the 
genealogical phusis) regulates, in the final analysis, the movement of each 
opposition: repulsion and attraction, disagreement and accord, war and 


peace, hatred and friendship. From within and without. This phusis 
comprises everything — language, law, politics, etc. Although it defines the 
alterity of the foreigner or the barbarian, it has no other. ‘We shall then say 
that Greeks fight and wage war with barbarians, and barbarians with 
Greeks, and are enemies by nature (polemious phusei einat), and that war is 
the fit name for this enmity and hatred (kai palemon tén ékhthran tautén 
klétéon) (ibid.). But even when Greeks fight and wage war among 
themselves, we should say that they are no less naturally friends (phusei 
philous einat). Sickness is what then emerges, an equally natural sickness, 
an evil naturally affecting nature. It is divided, separated from itself. When 
such an event occurs, one must speak of a pathology of the community. In 
question here is a clinic of the city. In this respect the Republic develops a 
nosological discourse; its diagnostic is one of ill health and dissension, a 
faction inside Greece (nosein d’en t6 toioutd tén ‘Hellada kai stasidsein). 
Stasis, the name that should apply to this hatred or to this enmity (ékhthra), 
is also a category of political nosography. 

In following a certain logic staged by Menexenus, this accident, evil or 
sickness!> that internal dissension (stdsis) is could not be explained, even, 
in the last instance, by hatred, enmity (ékhthra) or malice. One would have 
to spot in this stasis a fetal disorder, a stroke of bad luck, misfortune 
(dustukhia) (244a). The question whether this staging is ironic (we shall 
return to this point!®), whether the most common logic and rhetoric, the 
most accredited eloquence of epitaphios, is reproduced by Plato in order to 
belittle it, only gives that much more sense to the fictive contents of the 
discourse attributed to Aspasia, that courtesan who, moreover, plagiarizes 
another fureral oration and mouths once again the ‘fragments’ of a 
discourse by Pericles (236b). We have here a gold mine of commonplaces. 
The fact that the satirical character of this fiction-in-a-fiction has been 
ignored so often and for such a long time can hence be explained. Among 
the commonplaces, then, there is the assiduity with which Greeks hasten to 
reunite with Greeks. This ease in reconciliation has no other cause than 
actual kinship, suggéneia, which produces a solid friendship founded on 
homogeneity, on hemophilia, on a solid and firm affinity (bébaion) 
stemming from birth, from native community. This kinship nurtures a 
constant and homophilial friendship (philian bébaion kai omophulon) not 
only in words but in fact, in deeds (ou logo all’ étgo). In other words, the 
effectivity/actuality of the tie of friendship, that which assures constancy 


beyond discourses, is indeed real kinship, the reality of the tie of birth (é t6 
onti suggéneia). Provided that it 1s real — and not only spoken or set by 
convention — this syngenealogy durably guarantees the strength of the 
social bond in life and according to life. 


(We insist on this condition: a dreamt condition, what we are calling here 
a phantasm, because a genealogical tie will never be simply real; its 
supposed reality never gives itself in any intuition, it is always posed, 
constructed, induced, it always implies a symbolic effect of discourse — a 
‘legal fiction’, as Joyce put it in Ulysses on the subject of paternity. This is 
true also — as true as ever, no matter what has been said, down to and 
including Freud — of maternity. All politics and all policies, all political 
discourses on ‘birth’, misuse what can in this regard be only a belief some 
will say: what can only remain a belief; others: what can only tend towards 
an act of faith. Everything in political discourse that appeals to birth, to 
nature or to the nation — indeed, to nations or to the universal nation of 
human brotherhood — this entire familialism consists in a renaturalization of 
this ‘fiction’. What we are calling here ‘fraternization’, is what produces 
symbolically, conventionally, through authorized engagement, a determined 
politics, which, be it left-or right-wing, alleges a real fraternity or regulates 
spiritual fraternity, fraternity in the figurative sense, on the symbolic 
projection of a real or natural fraternity. Has anyone ever met a brother? A 
uterine or consanguine (distantly related) brother? In nature?) 


Return to Menexenus. The supplementary proof of the ease with which 
the Greeks achieve reconciliation and pardon among themselves, the sign 
showing that stasis does not in any way originate in hatred but in 
misfortune (dustukhia), is us. We say so, and that is enough. The logic of 
testimony, the becoming-proof of a testimony that should never become 
equivalent to proof, can be found at work here in its privileged place: in 
kinship. We can testify, we the living, we the survivors who share this 
homophilia and who, therefore, are qualified to speak of it from within: 
‘And that such was the fact we ourselves are witnesses, we the living 
(martures ... oi zOntes): are of the same race with them, and have mutually 
received and granted forgiveness for what we have done and suffered.’!’ 
Aspasia’s discourse draws all the political consequences of proper birth 
[bonne naissance], of a eugenicism (eugéneia) that is nothing but — has no 


other function than that of — autochthony. The homage to the earth and to 
the mother goes hand in hand with the eulogy of fraternization — more 
precisely, of fraternal democracy, which no way excludes the aristocracy of 
virtue and of wisdom. It is equality of birth (isogonia), ‘natural’ equality 
(kata phusiri), that necessarily demands the search for ‘legal’ equality 
(isonomia kata nomon) — that is, an equality compatible with an aristocracy 
founded upon the reputation of virtue and wisdom (é€ aretes doxé kai 
phoneseos). Nature commands law; equality of birth founds in necessity 


legal equality. Having quoted this passage,!® we shall come back to the 
modality of this necessity. 

It comes as no surprise that such a discourse should have its privileged 
resource in the testimonial, testamentary fervour of the heir — in other 
words, in the funeral oration. 


(Our hypothesis here is that no great discourse on friendship will ever 
have eluded the major rhetoric of epitaphios, and hence of some form of 
transfixed celebration of spectrality, at once fervent and already caught in 
the deathly or petrified cold of its inscription, of the becoming-epitaph of 
the oration. The great examples awaiting us, from Montaigne to Blanchot, 
will not make us change our mind. But there would be so many, an infinite 
number, of other examples. What discourse does not call up the deceased? 
Does not appeal to the deceased? The becoming-epitaph of epitaphios, the 
impression in space of a funeral speech, is what the first word dedicated to 
the deceased promises. At the beginning of this /ogos, there is the promise 
of epitaph.) 


Aspasia’s discourse is a summons to appear before the dead. You must 
answer for the dead, you must respond to them. Here and now. But this 
responsibiity can be called for only by first of all summoning the dead. 
They are, after a fashion, made to be born again; they are convoked in an 
invocation, once again, of their birth. The oath of this co-engagement thus 
resembles a fraternal conjuration: 


A word is needed which will duly praise the dead and gently admonish the living, exhorting the 
brethren and descendants (ekgonois men kai adelphois) of the departed to imitate their virtue, and 
consoling their fathers and mothers and the survivors, if any, who may chance to be alive of the 
previous generation ... And first as to their [noble] birth. Their ancestors were not strangers, nor 
are these their descendants sojourners only (en té khora [météques dans le pays]), whose fathers 
have come from another country, but they are the children of the soil, dwelling and living in their 


own land (¢6 onti en patridi oikountas kai zontas). And the country which brought them up is not 
like other countries, a stepmother to her children, but their own true mother (all’upo metros tés 
khoras en é okoun); she bore them and nourished them and received them, and in her bosom they 
now repose. It is meet and right, therefore, that we should begin by praising the land which is their 


mother, and that will be a way of praising their noble birth (eugéneia). m 


After the eulogy of the authentic or veritable mother — that is, having 
reversed the order of precedence betweeen earth and mother (the latter 
imitates the former, and not the other way round (238a)) — the political 
consequence follows as a matter of course: the aristo-democracy of brothers 
according to virture. The name ‘democracy’ has less import, as we shall 
see, than the concept aimed at here: the right of the best, starting from 
equality at birth, from natural, homophilial, autochthonous equality. In 
truth, it is less a question of consequence than of political principle. It is the 
politeia that forms men, from the moment it regulates itself, in its laws, on 
phusis, on eugenics and on autochthony, giving them food and education 
(trophé) — not the other way round. This is what must be enunciated, this is 
what must be recalled, for at stake 1s an act of memory — this is what must 
engage memory in the present, in the presence of the dead, if that can be 
said; for however difficult this remains to say (Cicero will agree: difficilius 
dictu est, mortui vivunt), the dead live and the absent are present. They still 
keep watch over those who keep watch over them. And the given word [the 
‘pledge’, Ja parole donnée] before the living dead, before ‘the dead here 
present’, rushes up here and now, in the first person plural, in the faithful 
and present tradition of our politics: 


Thus born into the world and thus educated, the ancestors of the departed lived and made 
themselves a government (politeian [political regime]), which I ought briefly to commemorate. 
For government is the nurture of man (politeia gar trophé anthropon estin [le régime politique qui 
forme les hommes]), and the government of good men is good, and of bad men bad. And I must 
show that our ancestors were trained under a good government (en kale politeia etraphésan [(ils) 
ont été nourris sous un bon gouvernement]), and for this reason they were good, and our 
contemporaries are also good, among whom our departed friends are to be reckoned (6n oide 
tugkhdnousin ontes oi teteleutékotes). Then as now, and indeed always, from that time to this, 
speaking generally, our government was an aristocracy (aristokratia) — a form of government 
which receives various names, according to the fancies of men, and is sometimes called 
democracy (démokraid), but is really an aristocracy or government of the best which has the 
approval of the many (met’eudoxias pléthous aristokratia). For kings we have always had, first 
hereditary and then elected, and authority is mostly in the hands of the people, who dispense 
offices and power to those who appear to be most deserving of them. Neither is a man rejected 
from weakness or poverty or obscurity of origin, nor honored by reason of the opposite, as in 
other states, but there is one principle — he who appears to be wise (sophos) and good (agathos) is 
a governor and ruler (kratei kai arkhei). The basis of this our government is equality of birth (é ex 


isou génesis), for other states are made up of all sorts and unequal conditions of men, and 
therefore their governments are unequal — there are tyrannies and there are oligarchies, in which 
the one party are slaves and the others masters. But we and our citizens are brethren, the children 
all of one mother (mias métros pantes adelphoi phuntes), and we do not think it right to be one 
another’s masters or servants, but the natural equality (kata phusin) of birth compels us to seek for 
legal equality (isonomian anagkdazei zétein kata nomon), and to recognize no superiority except in 


the reputation of virtue and wisdom.”° 


(The brothers have just been named in this passage (adelphoi). They have 
called themselves — themselves, reflexively — ‘brothers’, ‘we and ours’. 
They have named themselves with the name ‘truly fair and full of love’ — 
that is, the ‘name of brother’, as Montaigne will say in ‘On Friendship’, this 
‘soldering that binds brothers together’, this “brotherly harmony’). Brothers 
have named themselves brothers in so far as they issue from one and the 
same mother: uterine brothers. But what will one say of brothers (‘distantly 
related’ or ‘consanguine’) who are thus called because they issue from the 
same father? And what about the sister? Where has she gone? 

Since the question of brother and sister will play for us, as the reader has 
already sensed, a determining role, let us refer immediately to Emile 
Benveniste’s indispensable information on the ‘two Greek words for 
“brother”, adelpkos and kasignétos’, as well as those on the ‘notion of 


phratér’ and phratria”! On this point as on so many others, this information 
sets out for us the immensity and complexity of the tasks at hand. If it were 
still necessary, it would be enough to recall us to prudence and modesty. 
The present essay risks only — I must insist on this once again — a barely 
preliminary step into these still so obscure regions. Benveniste’s article 
would have to be quoted in its entirety, and what stems from the most 
precious knowledge — but also what it sometimes introduces, in the 
apparent neutrality of its metalinguistic presentation, by way of 
unquestioned axioms — would have to be carefully analysed. I shall retain 
here only that which will be of the greatest import, from the vantage point 
of its contents as much as that of its methodology, to the outcome of my 
argument, notably with regard to a Christian semantics of fraternity or 
sorority. At stake would be, in short, the Christianization of fraternization, 
or fraternization as the essential structure of Christianization: 


Such is this complex history in which we see that, when a culture is transformed, it employs new 
terms to take the place of traditional terms when they are found to be charged with specific values. 
This is what happened to the notion of ‘brother’ in Ibero-Romance. As a term of kinship, Latin 
frater has disappeared, and it has been replaced by hermano in Spanish and irmdo in Portuguese, 


that is to say by Latin germanus. The reason for this is that in the course of Christianization, 
frater, like soror, had taken on an exclusively religious sense, ‘brother and sister in religion’. It 
was therefore necessary to coin a new term for natural kinships, frater and soror having become in 


some way classificatory terms, relating to a new classificatory relationship, that of religion.”” 


This passage points up an example of decisions made by the author of /ndo- 
European Language and Society, but left in the dark: why are these two 
kinships (said to be ‘natural’ or of an ‘exclusively religious’ nature) still 
kinships or classificatory kinships? What is the analogy? How does the 
tropical or homonymic passage from one register to the other take place? In 
what manner is it or is it not a question of rhetoric or of linguistics? Why 
should that force us to question again the concept of institution, of proof, 
indication, and linguistic testimony operating in this study (one of the 
exemplary places with regard to this, as we will attempt to demonstrate 
elsewhere, would be the chapter on ‘ius and the oath in Rome’ and 
everything concerning testimonial semantics)? What does ‘religious’ mean? 
And what does ‘natural’ mean, when one knows that no classificatory 
kinship is devoid of all religiosity? The rest of Benveniste’s article thus 
renews contact with the non-natural equivalent (Benveniste says mystical as 
in Joyce’s Ulysses, where paternity, as we have said, is named a /egal 
fiction and the entire mystique of kinship is restaged) of pre-Christian 
religiosity in a phratry which this time has issued from ‘the same father’ 
and not, as in Menexenus, from one and the same mother. ‘Apparently slight 
facts’, indications of a ‘profound transformation’, Benveniste rightly 
concludes: 


Similarly in Greek it was necessary to distinguish two types of kinship, and phratér now being 
used solely as a classificatory term, new terms for consanguineous ‘brother’ and ‘sister’ had to be 
forged. 

These lexical creations often overturn the ancient terminology. When Greek used for ‘sister’ 
the feminine form (adelphé) of the term for brother (adelphos), this instituted a radical change in 
the Indo-European state of affairs. The ancient contrast between ‘brother’ and ‘sister’ rested on 
the difference that all the brothers form a phratria mystically [Demda’s emphasis] descended from 
the same father. There are no feminine “phratriai’. But when, in a new conception of kinship, the 
connection by consanguinity is stressed — and this is the situation we have in historical Greek — a 
descriptive term becomes necessary, and it must be the same for brother and sister. In the new 
names the distinction is made only by morphological indication of gender (adelphos, adelphé). 
Apparently slight facts, like this one, throw light on the profound transformation which the Greek 
vocabulary of kinship has undergone. 


We have been taking our semantic bearings in the immense space of an 
adventuresome questioning, and we should like to question this ‘profound 


transformation’ in its intrinsic relation to the transformation that can affect 
the philia. This, then, is perhaps the place to quote, to doubly heuristic ends, 
Benveniste’s analogous conclusion, this time at the end of an article on 
philos. It deals in a first stage with the genealogy of civis (fellow citizen) in 
a familial group which is a group of friends as well. The social value of 
philos is linked to hospitality. The guest is philos. Philei is to ‘hospitize’. 
Philein, philotés imply the exchanged oath, philéma the embrace hailing or 
welcoming the guest. In Homer, philos is not only the friend, it has 
possessive value, at times without apparent friendly affect (‘his knees’, ‘his 
son’) and ‘without distinction’. At the end of a long article whose rich and 
detailed insights defy description, here is the conclusion which is of the 
greatest import for us: 


It would take many chapters to list and analyse with the necessary care all the examples of philos 
where it is said to be ‘possessive’. We believe, however, that we have interpreted the most 
important. This re-examination was necessary to expose a long-standing error, which is probably 
as old as Homeric exegesis, and has been handed down from generation to generation of scholars. 
The whole problem of philos deserves a full examination. We must start from uses and contexts 
which reveal in this term a complex network of associations, some with institutions of hospitality, 
others with usages of the home, still others with emotional behaviour; we must do this in order to 
understand plainly the metaphorical applications to which the term lent itself. 


Although he seems to have no doubts (where we would be more inclined to 
entertain them) about the possibility of ‘understanding plainly the 
metaphorical applications’, and first of all, of “plainly understanding’ what 
‘metaphor’ means in this context, Benveniste concludes — and these are the 
final words of the article: 


All this wealth of concepts was smothered and lost to view once philos was reduced to a vague 
notion of friendship or wrongly interpreted as a possessive adjective. It is high time we learned 
again how to read Homer. 

As to the etymology of philos, it is now clear that nothing which has been proposed on this 
subject holds good any longer [an allusion here to an interpretation proposed in 1936 at the 
‘Société de Linguistique’ that appeared in BSL 38, 1937, p. x]. We now know that the protohistory 
of the word belongs to the most ancient form of Greek: Mycenean already had proper names 
composed with philos-: pi-ro-pa-ta-ra (=Philopatra), pi-ro-we-ko (=Philowergos), and so on. The 
discussion about its origins is thus not finished. It is more important to begin to see what it 
signifies.”° 


“To begin to see what it signifies’? Indeed. 
In the passage from Menexenus that we were analysing, three points still 
have to be noted. The first concerns the necessity of equality, the next the tie 


Unking Greek fraternity to itself in polemos as well as in stasis. The last 
point has to do with the suspended usage of the word ‘democracy’. 

1. Necessity. Everything seems to be decided where the decision does not 
take place, precisely in that place where the decision does not take place 
qua decision, where it will have been carried away, where it will have got 
carried away in what has always-already taken place: at birth, in other 
words the day before birth, in this necessity which makes obligatory 
(anagkazei), at birth, in noble birth, in eugenic birth, the search for an 
equality before the law in conformity with equality of birth. We were saying 
above that nature commands law, that equality at birth founds in necessity 
legal equality. It is difficult to decide here if this foundation in necessity is a 
just foundation, just according to nature or just according to the law. If there 
is a justification to this foundation (this would be Begriindung in German, 
or Rechtfertigung), it is to the extent that the justification strictly speaking, 
nomological justification, 1s founded firmly on the physio-ontological 
ground of what is in nature, revealing itself in truth at birth. The same 
relation would thereby tie birth in general to what is noble in noble birth [ce 
qu’il y a de bon dans la bonne naissance| (eugéneia). Everything called 
democracy here (or aristo-democracy) founds the social bond, the 
community, the equality, the friendship of brothers, identification qua 
fraternization, and so forth, in the link between this isonomic and the 
isogonic tie, the natural bond between nomos and phusis, if you like, the 
bond between the political and autochthonous consanguinity. This is also a 
bond between a (theoretical or ontological) report and a performative 
commitment (promise, oath, fidelity to dead ancestors, and so forth). This 
bond between the two ties — this synthetic a priori necessity, if we can speak 
of it thus — ties what is to what must be, it obliges, it connects the obligation 
to the tie of birth which we call natural; it is the obligatory process of a 
natural law, the embedding of an ‘it is necessary’ in the filiation of what is, 
of what is born and what dies. It is the place of fraternization as the 
symbolic bond alleging the repetition of a genetic tie. Responsibility must 
imperatively answer for itself before what is, at birth and at death. In more 
modern terms, one might speak of the foundation of citizenship in a nation. 
Such a bond between two structurally heterogeneous ties will always 
remain obscure, mystical, essentially foreign to rationality — which does not 
mean simply irrational, in the equally modem sense of the term. It will 
always be exposed, to say the least, to the ‘sophistications’, mystifications, 


and perversions of rhetoric. Sometimes to the worst symptoms of 
nationalism, ethnocentrism, populism, even xenophobia. It is not sufficient 
to free the concept of public enemy of all private hatred — indeed, of all 
psychology of the passions, as Schmitt would have it — to exclude the 
xenophobic exclusion of this ‘logic’. Are we certain that throughout all the 
mutations of European history (of which, of course, the most rigorous 
account must be taken), no concept of the political and of democracy has 
ever broken with the heritage of this troubling necessity? Made a radical, 
thematic break with it? This is the question we are concerned with here. 

2. Fraternity. Since the distinction between polémios and ekhthros 
(enemy of war, political enemy and hated enemy, object of hatred in 
general, and so on), and then, between polemos and stasis (war/internal 
dissension, inter-ethnic, interstate or international war/internal or civil war, 
and so on) is so important to us in the deconstructive problematization of a 
certain Schmittian discourse, let us also emphasize that this same 
‘obligatory necessity’ binds the Greeks one to another at the same time in 
the war they wage on Greeks and in their war with barbarians. As long as 
they remain faithful to the memory of their dead, to the fathers of their dead 
— that is, to the spectres of their fathers of noble birth — they are bound by 
this testamentary tie which, in truth, is nothing other than their originary 
patrimony. A monumental memory begins by instituting them in telling 
them who they really are. The memory of their dead — their fathers of noble 
birth — recalls nothing less than their truth, their truth gua political truth. 
This memory inaugurates as much as it recalls or reproduces truth. The 
obligatory necessity of this bond of memory forms the condition of their 
political freedom. It is the element of their freedom, the sense of their world 
as the truth of their freedom. It is their freedom — indeed, for them, the only 
imaginable freedom. Truth, freedom, necessity, and equality come together 
in this politics of fraternity. One can hardly see how a perhaps could ever 
stand a chance in such a politics, the chance of an absolute housebreak or 
hospitality, an unpredictable decision or arrivance. Except by accident or 
fortuitously — and this is why we are speaking of chance — a perhaps always 
delivers itself to chance; thus one cannot, one must not, hope — for the 
perhaps — some essential or necessary possibility, or a non-accidental 
condition. On the contrary, perhaps the perhaps will have opened for this 
configuration (the bond between the two necessities, the two equalities, 
freedom, truth, fraternity: in a word, ‘the epitome’ of Greek politics) the 


possibility of configuring itself in a forgetting of the perhaps. This 
forgetting of the perhaps, this amnesia of the decision without decision, of 
the absolute arrivant — that is what is perhaps hidden in the Greek act of 
memory. Forgetting or memory, the Greek son or brother recalls them to 
himself in his combat for freedom on the outside and from within. This 1s 
how we might read the follow-up of Aspasia’s discourse: 


And so their and our fathers, and these too, our brethren, being nobly born and having been 
brought up in all freedom, did both in their public and private capacity (kai idia kai démostia) 
many noble deeds famous over the whole world. They were the deeds of men who thought that 
they ought to fight both against Hellenes for the sake of Hellenes on behalf of freedom (és 
eleutherias), and against barbarians in the common interest of Hellas. (239ab) 


3. The name ‘democracy’. The hesitation, even the indifference as to the 
name of ‘democracy’ will have been noted earlier on. One person calls it 
‘democracy’, someone else will give it another name ‘according to his 
fancy’ (an khairé). It is not the name but the thing or the concept that 
counts ‘in truth’: aristocracy, the power of the best (the most virtuous and 
the most wise) with the ‘approbation’ of the multitude (p/éthos), the right 
opinion (eudoxia) of the crowd, as it is sometimes translated, of the masses, 
the people, one could also say of the majority. Let us say of number — that 
is, the greatest number. 

(Among all the questions of number that should attract an essay on the 
politics of friendship, let us never give short shrift to what is called 
demography. It has always been a sensitive and classic stake of the 
democratic tradition. How far beyond a certain number of citizens can a 
republic still claim to be a democracy? If this becomes problematic well 
before the canonical examples of Athens, Corsica, Geneva or Poland, if this 
begins with number itself, with the supplement of ‘one more [plus un, also 
‘no more’]’, what will be said, beyond the billions, of a universal 
democratic model which, if it does not regulate a world State or super-State, 
would still command an international law of European origin?) 


If the word ‘democracy’ allies itself or competes with that of aristocracy, 
it is because of number, of the reference to the required approbation of the 
greatest number. We are giving preference to this translation by ‘number’ — 
legitimately, we believe — the better to highlight the arithmetical dimension 
that will mark the entire history of the concept of friendship, at least since 
Aristotle, and that will later determine our way of listening to ‘O philoi, 


oudeis philos’ (in the way we are for the moment transcribing it: without 
accents and without breathing, for the question of number will arise again 
with this grammatical choice and reading decision). Must friends be in 
number? Numerous? In great numbers? How many will there be? At what 
point do ‘great numbers’ begin? What does ‘a friend’ mean? ‘A friend’ in 
the feminine? ‘Some friends’ in the masculine or feminine? ‘No friend’, in 
either gender? And what is the relationship between this quantum of 
friendship and democracy, as the agreement or approbation of number? We 
are saying here number as the greatest number, to be sure, but in the first 
place number as the deployment of countable unity, of the ‘one more’ and 
of this calculable form of presentable unity, the voice of the subject. 

Let us put these questions aside for the moment, but not before 
registering this nominalist or conventionalist style of hesitation of the 
subject of the name ‘democracy’. This hesitation, even this indifference, is 
relative; it does not fall into arbitrariness. It limits itself by itself in keeping 
an irreducible bond to conceptual necessity. This necessity amounts twice 
over to number — that is, to presumed calculability: once in the form of 
decision (no democracy without the decided and declared approbation of 
the greatest number) and once in the form of that which passes, predicts and 
makes the decision possible: birth — this is the so-equivocal concept of 
double equality (isonomy founded on isogony). 

But providing these conceptual traits are maintained, providing they are 
associated with eugenics (autochthony plus consanguinity) on the one hand, 
and with the aristocracy of virtue on the other, the name could, if one 
wished, be changed. 

There is a strategy here whose stakes are limitless, even if we situate its 
effect in a quite particular place: in a text, one of Plato’s dialogues whose 
authenticity used to be called into question (but this, it would seem, is no 
longer the case today,” and it is of little import to our subject) and, within 
this dialogue, in the form of an epitaphios put, to satiric ends, in the mouth 
of a courtesan and plagiarizer. Even if we took into account its irony, and 
underwrote it here (and why shouldn’t we? Who would deny it? Let us say 
that to this extent at least, our critical or ‘deconstructionist’ worries still 
belong to a certain Platonic heritage of this irony: they participate in the 
heritage or share it, perhaps, therefore divide it), let us not forget that Plato 
is dealing with a thematics and an eloquence corresponding to the most 
stable structures, the dominant, most accredited topoi of a Greek discourse. 


This is not to say to a homogeneous Greek discourse or people, identical to 
themselves — we do not believe so — but, let us say, to what in them 
represents the ‘greatest number’ precisely, whether it be a matter of the 
political in general or of democracy in particular. If an orator is all the more 
eloquent in praising his listeners, as Socrates suggests in Menexenus (235d), 
in listening to him the ‘exemplary’ image (in the Ciceronian sense of which 
we have already spoken) or the ‘ideal self of the people applauding can be 
determined. This image can either pre-exist the orator or form itself, re form 
itself, in the mirror thus held out. In both cases, it is a matter of a people in 
so far as it can identify itself, in so far as it 1s what it is or would wish to be. 
And it would be easy to show that under the eloquence of the epitaphios 
that Menexenus seems to denounce, and at the very moment when Socrates 
belittles Aspasia, who knows precisely how to say ‘what should be 
delivered’ (236b) to flatter the expectations of the orator’s public, one meets 
again, precisely for this very reason, the axioms, the conceptual veins, the 
oppositions and associations which structure not only dominant Greek 
discourse but, on the other hand, elsewhere, Plato’s least ironic political 
discourse, in the most numerous places of the Platonic ‘corpus’, especially 
in the Republic, with regard, precisely, to the political enemy qua polemos 
or stasis. 

To be sure, we cannot thereby absolutely justify the privilege of this 
reference to Menexenus. There will never be an absolute justification to 
such a limit. We shall attempt only this: an appeal to another reason to 
explain our choice in part. This reason intersects with the preceding 
reasons, and one has already sensed what it is: the genre of epitaphios, of 
the funeral oration, of the discourse of mourning in general, of heritage and 
testament, whose theme has preoccupied us for quite some time. Our 
reflection on friendship, where it will have intersected the political thing [/a 
chose politique], will regularly pass through this moment of political 
mourning. It seems to us to be constitutive, with the figure of the brother, of 
the model of friendship that will have dominated, in all its canonical 
authority, the Greek or Christian discourses. One should, more prudently, 
say “Greek, Christian, and beyond’, to designate those places towards which 
we are still timorously advancing: Judaism and Islam, at the very least, 
where the figure of the brother accumulates so many virtues, of course, but 
above all starting from and sti// in Nietzsche’s wake, and the entire passage 
beyond whose movement bears his name. That is to say, everywhere (it is 


‘our time’, the out-of-jointness proper to our time, if it is one, to our 
experience of being ‘out of joint’ [in English in the text]), in every place 
where a tradition thus tends of itself to break with itself, not being able to 
do so, by definition, in anything but an irregular and a trembling fashion. 

Nevertheless, considered in itself, beyond the ruses and irony that may 
mark Menexenus, this hesitation over the name ‘democracy’ will always 
provide food for thought. If, between the name on the one hand, the concept 
and the thing on the other, the play of a gap offers room for rhetorical 
effects which are also political strategies, what are the lessons that we can 
draw today? Is it still in the name of democracy that one will attempt to 
criticize such and such a determination of democracy or aristo-democracy? 
Or, more radically — closer, precisely, to its fundamental radicality (where, 
for example, it is rooted in the security of an autochthonous foundation, in 
the stock or in the genius of filiation®>) — is it still in the name of 
democracy, of a democracy to come, that one will attempt to deconstruct a 
concept, all the predicates associated with the massively dominant concept 
of democracy, that in whose heritage one inevitably meets again the law of 
birth, the natural or ‘national’ law, the law of homophilia or of autochthony, 
civic equality (isonomy) founded on equality of birth (isogony) as the 
condition of the calculation of approbation and, therefore, the aristocracy of 
virtue and wisdom, and so forth? 

What remains or still resists in the deconstructed (or deconstructible) 
concept of democracy which guides us endlessly? Which orders us not only 
to engage a deconstruction but to keep the old name? And to deconstruct 
further in the name of a democracy to come? That is to say, further, which 
enjoins us still to inherit from what — forgotten, repressed, misunderstood, 
or unthought in the ‘old’ concept and throughout its history — would still be 
on the watch, giving off signs or symptoms of a stance of survival coming 
through all the old and tired features? Would there be in the concept of 
eudoxia (reputation, approbation, opinion, judgement), and in the concept 
of equality (equality of birth, isogonia, and equality of rights, isonomia) a 
double motif that might, interpreted differently, exclude democracy from 
autochthonous and hemophilic rooting? Is there another thought of 
calculation and of number, another way of apprehending the universality of 
the singular which, without dooming politics to the incalculable, would still 
justify the old name of democracy? Would it still make sense to speak of 
democracy when it would no longer be a question (no longer in question as 


to what is essential or constitutive) of country, nation, even of State or 
citizen — in other words, if at least one still keeps to the accepted use of this 
word, when it would no longer be a political question? 

This last hypothesis may lead to two types of rejoinder to the Schmittian 
project or, if you prefer, to two distinct sides of the same answer to The 
Concept of the Political, that is, to the reconstruction of the political. On the 
one hand, we seem to be confirming — but not by way of deploring the fact, 
as Schmitt does — an essential and necessary depoliticization. This 
depoliticization would no longer necessarily be the neuter or negative 
indifference to all forms of the social bond, of the community, of friendship. 
On the other hand, through this depoliticization, which would apply only to 
the fundamental and dominant concept of the political, through this 
genealogical deconstruction of the political (and through it to the 
democratic), one would seek to think, interpret and implement another 
politics, another democracy. One would seek to say it, to thematize it, to 
formalize it in the course of a deconstruction — the course of the world — 
under these old names. Saying, thematizing, formalizing are not neuter or 
apolitical gestures, arriving after the fact from above [en surplomb]. These 
gestures are positions staked out in a process. Calling this experience (for it 
is an experience that crosses through and ventures out before being a 
philosophical, theoretical or methodological statement) ‘genealogical 
deconstruction’ would here no longer be naming, as was often done, an 
operation proceeding only through genealogical analysis, retrospection and 
reconstitution. At stake would thus be a deconstruction of the genealogical 
schema, a paradoxical deconstruction — a deconstruction, at once 
genealogical and a-genealogical, of the genealogical. It would concern, by 
way of a privilege granted — thus its attribute — the genealogical. Wherever 
it commands in the name of birth, of a national naturalness which has never 
been what it was said to be. It would concern confidence, credit, credence, 
doxa or eudoxia, opinion or right opinion, the approbation given to filiation, 
at birth and at the origin, to generation, to the femiliarity of the family, to 
the proximity of the neighbour — to what axioms too quickly inscribe under 
these words. This is not to wage war on them and to see evil therein, but to 
think and live a politics, a friendship, a justice which begin by breaking 
with their naturalness or their homogeneity, with their alleged place of 
origin. Hence, which begin where the beginning divides (itself) and differs, 


begin by marking an ‘originary’ heterogeneity that has already come and 
that alone can come, in the future, to open them up. If only unto themselves. 

Saying that to keep this Greek name, democracy, is an affair of context, 
of rhetoric or of strategy, even of polemics, reaffirming that this name will 
last as long as it has to but not much longer, saying that things are speeding 
up remarkably in these fast times, is not necessarily giving in to the 
opportunism or cynicism of the antidemocrat who is not showing his cards. 
Completely to the contrary: one keeps this indefinite right to the question, 
to criticism, to deconstruction (guaranteed rights, in principle, in any 
democracy: no deconstruction without democracy, no democracy without 
deconstruction). One keeps this right strategically to mark what is no longer 
a strategic affair: the limit between the conditional (the edges of the context 
and of the concept enclosing the effective practice of democracy and 
nourishing it in land [sol] and blood) and the unconditional which, from the 
outset, will have inscribed a self-deconstructive force in the very motif of 
democracy, the possibility and the duty for democracy itself to de-limit 
itself. Democracy is the autos of deconstructive  self-delimitation. 
Delimitation not only in the name of a regulative idea and an indefinite 
perfectibility, but every time in the singular urgency of a here and now. 
Precisely through the abstract and potentially indifferent thought of number 
and equality. This thought certainly can impose homogenizing calculability 
while exalting land and blood, and the risk is as terrifying as it is inevitable 
— it is the risk today, more than ever. But it perhaps also keeps the power of 
universalizing, beyond the State and the nation, the account taken of 
anonymous and irreducible singularities, infinitely different and thereby 
indifferent to particular difference, to the raging quest for identity 
corrupting the most indestructible desires of the idiom. 

But we have undoubtedly just given in to precipitation. We will now have 
to decelerate slightly, and again take up a patient reading of Schmitt. We 
were drawn into this detour — as the reader will perhaps recall — by the 
highly elliptical justification that Schmitt gives in a few lines to the choice 
of his words, sometimes to his concepts: private enemy /public or political 
enemy (ekhthros/polémios, inimicus/hostis), war and internal dissension, 
war and civil war (pdlemos/stasis). The detour was necessary in order to try 
to understand what ‘enemy’, ‘on our side, on the home front’, has meant 
over the centuries. And in what respect, if Schmitt is to be believed, politics 
could never be thought without knowing what ‘enemy’ means, nor a 


decision made without knowing who the enemy is. That is to say: without 
the identification by which the enemy is identified, himself, and by which 
one 1s identified, oneself. 

We shall try to show further on in what respect this double identification 
engages in privileged fashion both brother friends and brother enemies in 
the same process of fraternization. 

Henceforth, things have begun to appear a little more complicated than 
Schmitt has it. In any case, in the Platonic justifications he finds for a 
semantics without which his discourse would become dangerously fragile. 
We shall take them into account in making a few more steps in our reading 
of The Concept of the Political (1932) and in the singular itinerary that this 
work will have begun, down to the Théorie du partisan. Note incidente 
relative au concept du politique (1962). 


a 


On Absolute Hostility: 
The Cause of Philosophy and 
the Spectre of the Political 


The two fundamental principles of Empedocles — philia and neikos — are, both in 
name and function, the same as our two primal instincts, Eros and destmctiveness, 
the first of which endeavours to combine what exists into ever greater entities, 
while the second endeavours to dissolve these combinations and to destroy the 
structures to which they have given rise.... And no one can foresee in what guise 
the nucleus of truth contained in the theory of Empedocles will present itself to later 


understanding. ! 
Freud 


By overturning the address attributed to Aristotle (‘O friends, no friend’, to: 
‘O enemies, no enemy’), Nietzsche’s ‘living fool’ intensified a first seizure 
of vertigo. With this second stanza, this second apostrophe, one’s head spins 
even fester. 

This is not due only to the structure of the sentence, with which we have 
certainly not finished, not by a long shot. It is first of all due to a sort of 
hyperbolic build-up that is perhaps the very origin of good and evil, both 
beyond being (the Republic once defined the Good by this hyperbole that 
ranges beyond being): a hyperbole at the origin of good and evil, common 
to both, a hyperbole qua the difference between good and evil, the friend 
and the enemy, peace and war. It is this infinite hyperbole common to the 
two terms of the opposition, thereby making them pass into one another, 
that makes one’s head spin. Is there any hope for the person addressing his 


friends or his enemies in this way? An interviewer of the ‘dying sage’ and 
the ‘living fool’ would have asked them: ‘Are you “pessimistic” or 
“optimistic’’?’. For where is the ultimate in optimism? Its hyperbole? In still 
addressing oneself to friends to inform them of such a sombre piece of news 
(their nonexistence or their disappearance)? Or in announcing to one’s 
enemies that there is no enemy? And what, on the contrary, is the ultimate 
in pessimism, if that can be said? Declaring that there is ‘no friend’, or still 
bemoaning the fact that there is no enemy? Would the ultimate of the 
ultimate be a theory of absolute ambivalence, in the Empedoclean tradition 
of Freud — that is, one hospitable to the death instinct? Herein, perhaps, lies 
the shared secret of the ‘dying sage’ and the ‘living fool’. It will have been 
understood that they have never stopped speaking an initiatory language. 
And to hit it off, laughing at one another: like fellows, companions, as thick 
as thieves. 

While declaring: The question is not settled by psychological comments 
on “optimism” or “pessimism”? — words he deliberately leaves in quotation 
marks — Schmitt resolutely affirms, more than once, that only ‘pessimistic’ 
thinkers of human nature are systematic, authentic, and coherent thinkers of 
the political fact [Ja chose politique] (Machiavelli, Hobbes, etc.*). But 
would these thinkers have recognized themselves better in the sentence of 
the ‘dying sage’ or in that of the ‘living fool’? Their pessimism, from the 
moment there is no longer anything ‘psychological’ or moral about it, 
nevertheless consists only in the fact that they ‘presuppose (voraussetzen) 
in truth ... only the actuality/effectivity or the real possibility of the 
distinction of friend and enemy (die reale Wirklichkeit oder Moglichkeit der 
Unterscheidung von Freund und Feind)’.* 

We shall have to question the logic of this presupposition. What is this 
‘actuality/effectivity’? This ‘possibility’? Here, in one case as in the other, 
in one case or the other, what does ‘real’ mean? Under what conditions, 
from within what axiomatic, can Schmitt be assured that a knowledge is 
‘right’ or ‘correct’ (richtige) in acknowledging — as does Hobbes, for 
example — that the conviction of possessing the truth, the good, the just, is 
what sparks the worst hostilities, or that ‘the war of all against all’ is neither 
the unchained monstrosity of a delirious imagination nor the ‘free 
competition’ of bourgeois capitalism, but ‘the fundamental presupposition 
of a specific political philosophy’?° 


Let us retrace our steps. Schmitt thinks there would be a difference 
between two forms of disagreement (diaphora). He believes he can 
substantiate this when he defines the enemy — in other words, the political — 
when he thinks he can appeal so briefly to Plato to describe, explain and 
illustrate this divide. One has the impression that sometimes the appeal to 
Plato serves as its justification. Attempting to take a closer look at the 
question, we were intent on emphasizing, among other points, that such a 
difference amounts to the same thing, that it belongs to the same. The two 
different forms of the disagreement are both natural, ‘physical’. They 
remain natural even if one of them, civil war (stasis), sometimes takes on 
the figure of denaturalization. For this would then be a de-naturalization of 
nature in nature: an evil, an illness, a parasite or a graft — a foreign body, in 
sum, within the body politic itself, in its own body. The body politic should, 
no doubt — but it never manages to — identify correctly the foreign body of 
the enemy outside itself. The purity of the distinction between stasis and 
polemos remains in the Republic a ‘paradigm’,® accessible only to 
discourse. Occasionally, as we have seen,’ Plato recommends, from a 
certain vantage point, that this paradigmatic limit be erased, and that the 
enemies from outside be handled as the enemies within. Whether one 
claims to respect or to erase this limit, in any case its purity cannot be put 
into practice. It is impossible to implement the rigour of such a conceptual 
limit. One cannot do what one says. Neither what one says one will do nor 
what should be done. No praxis can correspond to indications contained in 
a léxis. Plato emphasizes this limit of the limit, this inevitable bastardization 
of opposed terms. In other words, marking in sum the inaccessibility of the 
border (the Une of separation between concepts, as much as the one 
between the inside and outside of the body politic, the city, State or 
country), he sharpens all the more the cutting edge of this difference 
between praxis and léxis in the difference between the two sorts of 
disagreement: this difference is also in nature. This is a law of phusis: 
practical implementation does not get as close to truth as does discourse.® 

Practical conclusion: 1n practice, in other words, in this political practice 
that history is — this difference between the disagreements never takes 
place. It can never be found. Never concretely. As a result, the purity of 
polemos or the enemy, whereby Schmitt would define the political, remains 
unattainable. The concept of the political undoubtedly corresponds, as 
concept, to what the ideal discourse can want to state most rigorously on the 


ideality of the political. But no politics has ever been adequate to its 
concept. No political event can be correctly described or defined with 
recourse to these concepts. And this inadequation is not accidental, since 
politics is essentially a praxis, as Schmitt himself always implies in his 
ever-so-insistent reliance on the concept of real, present possibility or 
eventuality in his analyses of the formal structures of the political. 

Here we have another way of marking the paradox: the inadequation to 
the concept happens to belong to the concept itself. This inadequation of the 
concept to itself manifests itself pre-eminently in the order of the political 
or political practice, unless this order — or rather, its possibility — would 
situate the very place, the phenomenon or the ‘reason’ of an inadequation of 
any concept to itself: the concept of disjunction gua the conceptual being of 
the concept. It follows that even what is called politics, an ideal politics, a 
regulative and programmatic aim — indeed, an idea of politics in general — 
could never regulate (itself on) such a ‘concept of the political’. 

What makes us so sensitive to this problem? And why is it — precisely in 
a Schmittian-style discourse — something other than a methodological, 
epistemological, theoretical, speculative, even simply discursive problem, 
like an equivocation which logico-rhetorical precautions could easily 
eliminate? Because, in the remarkable effort of what can be called a modern 
‘political expert’ to recover possession of the concept opening and 
commanding the field of his own discourse, the effect of this limit is 
capitalized ‘en abyme’. We are saying ‘political expert’ here, for if Schmitt 
is a jurist-historian-of-the-theological-political, and so on, he would offer de 
jure its conceptual foundations, its phenomenogical and semantic axioms to 
a science of the political as such: he is a political expert who would 
acknowledge no other regional knowledge, no other experience than the 
‘political’, the right to found a political discourse [politologie]: an ontology 
or an epistemology of the political. Only the purely political can teach us 
how to think and formalize what is purely political. From the very first 
words of the 1963 preface to the second edition of The Concept of the 
Political, this concern is recalled: concern for the tableau, spatial and 
taxonomic concern, methodological and topological concern. A concern 
which cannot last without hierarchical classification. The assigned task, the 
duty, is to frame and to enframe (eruadrieren), to put into order (orden), to 
propose ‘a theoretical framework for a measureless problem.’ Hence a 
framework (ein Rahmen) had to be given also to the problematic of the 


theory of right, to order its ‘entwined thematic’, and to discover ‘a topology 
of its concepts’. 

Despite or on account of such an aim, Schmitt tirelessly claims concrete, 
living and relevant pertinence for the words of political language. Among 
these words, first and foremost for the word ‘political’. These vocables 
must not and cannot remain, in their ‘ultimate consequence’, the correlate 
of ideal or abstract entities. Now this necessity of concrete determination 
would stem from the ‘polemical sense’ that always determines these terms. 
It is therefore all the more troubling that the meaning of pdlemos remains, 
as we have just suggested, both natural and blurred, naturally and 
irreducibly blurred. And precisely where Schmitt would exclude politics 
from naturalness. This blurred impurity stems from the fact, recalled by 
Schmitt, that all political concepts have a ‘polemical sense’, in two respects, 
as we Shall see: these are concepts of the polemical, and they are never 
implemented except in a polemical field. These concepts of the polemical 
have a strictly polemical 

There are moments when the form of this paradox can be judged pathetic. 
Schmitt goes to great lengths — in our judgement totally in vain, a priori 
doomed to failure — to exclude from all other purity (objective, scientific, 
moral, juridical, psychological, economic, aesthetic, etc.) the purity of the 
political, the proper and pure impurity of the concept or the meaning of the 
‘political’. For he wants, moreover — he will never renounce this — the 
polemical sense of this purity of the political to be, in its very impurity, still 
pure. Failing this, it could not be distinguished from anything from which it 
distinguishes itself. Schmitt would like to be able to count on the pure 
impurity, on the impure purity of the political as such, of the properly 
political. He would wish — it is his Platonic dream — that this ‘as such’ 
should remain pure at the very spot where it is contaminated. And that this 
‘as such’ should dissipate our doubts concerning what ‘friend’ and ‘enemy’ 
mean. More precisely — and this difference is important here — the doubts 
must disappear not so much relative to the meaning of friendship or 
hostility but, above all, relative to who the friend and enemy are. If the 
political is to exist, one must know who everyone is, who is a friend and 
who is an enemy, and this knowing is not in the mode of theoretical 
knowledge but in one of a practical identification: knowing consists here in 
knowing how to identify the friend and the enemy. The practical 
identification of self — and from one self to another — the practical 


identification of the other — and from other to other — seem to be sometimes 
conditions, sometimes consequences, of the identification of friend and 
enemy (we shall have to come back to the logic of philautia or narcissism — 
even the fraternal double — working obscurely away at this discourse). 

Schmitt wants to be able to count on the opposition, and reckon with it. 
Even if no pure access to the eidos or essence is to be had, even if, in all 
conceptual purity, it is not known what war, politics, friendship, enmity, 
hate or love, hostility or peace are, one can and must know — first of all 
practically, politically, polemically — who is the friend and who is the 
enemy. This, it would seem to us, is the singular torsion marking, for 
example, the passage we shall quote shortly. The weight of the semantic or 
conceptual determination is carried in this passage, as we shall point out, by 
the word ‘concrete’. Schmitt’s entire discourse posits and supposes in fact, 
as we Shall verify, a concrete sense of the concrete which he opposes — as if 
only in passing, and without the word being kept in the French translation — 
to the spectral (gespenstisch). In this analysis, the spectral is evoked in 
passing — as if in passing, like a passer-by — as a synonym of ‘abstract’ or 
‘empty’. But why would they be synonyms? Would there be no difference 
between emptiness, the abstract, and the spectral? What are the political 
stakes of this figure? On the other hand, the unending insistence here on 
what would be the opposite of the spectral — the concrete; the compulsive 
and obsessional recurrence of the word ‘concrete’ as the correlate of 
‘polemical’ — does indeed provide food for thought. What thought? Perhaps 
that the concrete finally remains, in its purity, out of reach, inaccessible, 
unbreachable, indefinitely deferred, thereby inconceivable to the concept 
(Begriff); consequently as ‘spectral’ (gespenstisch)? as the ghost on its 
periphery, which one opposes to it and which could never be set apart. We 
shall see how this concretion of the concrete, this ultimate determination to 
which Schmitt ceaselessly appeals, is always exceeded, overtaken — let us 
say haunted — by the abstraction of its spectre. Is it not for this reason that 
so much effort must be exerted — vain effort — to find an intuition and a 
concept adequate to the concrete? 

These efforts create the very tension of this strange book. They are 
remarkably at work in the passage devoted to the polemical sense of the 
political. It will not be a matter of the polemological contents of the concept 
of the political, in so far as it implies the enemy, war, polemos, hence qua 
concept of the polemical. It will be a matter, as we have announced, of only 


the polemical use of this concept of the political, its concrete use, the 
practical and effective modality of its implementation — let us say its very 
performativity. Such a necessity cannot leave intact a so-called theoretical 
discourse on it, a meta-discourse, a meta-polemical or meta-political 
discourse, a polemico-logical or politico-logical discourse. Can one 
conclude that Schmitt’s discourse claims this pure theoreticity? In certain 
respects, we believe, the answer is yes, and this is to a large extent what 
makes his project interesting: it offers a pure and rigorous conceptual theory 
of the political, of the specific region of that which is properly and without 
polemical rhetoric called the ‘political’, the politicity of the political. Within 
this region, in the enclosure proper to a theoretical discourse, all examples, 
all facts, all historical contents should thus issue in knowledge; indeed, in 
those forms of disinterested theoretical reports called diagnostics,!° But 
would Schmitt say, for all that, that his discourse on politics is of a 
theoretical nature, and that it is not affected by the polemical modality, and 
therefore by the performativity, whose incessant contamination he has, on 
the other hand, described? Would he refuse his theorems the signification of 
taking sides, an act of war, a certain war? We are not sure that he would. 
His attitude around this subject would undoubtedly be unstable and wily, 
and his cunning all the more significant. What appears to us more certain, 
on the other hand, is that the politological or polemological project and the 
political-polemical engagement are indissociable. It cannot be denied that 
their respective purity is a priori inaccessible. This is tantamount to saying 
that it can only be denied. This structural disavowal informs and constructs 
the political discourse and the discourse on the political. One like the other, 
one qua the other. We shall neither determine nor denounce here the fatality 
of this performative disavowal as a logical fault, even less as a symptom 
that could be dissolved in analysis. It inscribes again, and at the same time, 
a principle of ruin and affirmation at the heart of the most coherent gestures, 
when their greatest force simultaneously takes on the figure of a 
performative contradiction, or — and this may amount to the same thing — 
the figure of a tautology that we were earlier calling teleiopoetic. We have 
already given many examples of this. Here, then, is another, one that we 
have just announced (we emphasize in the passage the word ‘concrete’; all 
other emphasis is Schmitt’s, even if the English translation we are quoting 
[which will be slightly modified] does not always point it out): 


But the fact that the substance of the political is contained in the context of a concrete antagonism 
(konkrete Gegensatzlichkeit) is still expressed in everyday language (der landlaufige 
Sprachgehrauch), even where the awareness of the extreme case (of ‘a case of war’: das 
Bewusstsein des ‘Ernstfalles’) has been entirely lost. 

This becomes evident in daily speech and can be exemplified by two obvious phenomena. 
First, all political concepts, images and terms have a polemical meaning (einen polemischen Sinn). 
They are focused on a concrete conflict (eine konkrete Gegensatzlichkeit) and are bound to a 
concrete situation (an eine konkrete Situation gebunden); the result (which manifests itself in war 
or revolution) is a friend—enemy grouping (Freund—Feindgruppierung), and they turn into empty 
and ghostlike (spectral) abstractions (werden zu leeren und gespenstischen Abstraktionen) when 
this situation disappears. Words such as state, republic, society, class, as well as sovereignty, 
constitutional state, absolutism, dictatorship, economic planning, neutral or total state, and so on, 
are incomprehensible if one does not know concretely (in concreto) who is to be affected, 
combated, refuted, or negated by such terms. Above all the polemical character determines the 
usage by language of the word political itself, regardless of whether the adversary is designated as 
‘apolitical’ (‘unpolitisch’) (in the sense of: foreign to the world [weltfremd], who is lacking the 
[sense of the] concrete [das Konkrete verfehlend]), or vice versa if one wants to disqualify or 
denounce him as political in order to portray oneself as ‘apolitical’ (in the sense of: purely 
objective (rein sachlich) purely scientific, purely moral, purely juristic, purely aesthetic, purely 


economic, or on the basis of similar purities) and thereby superior.!! 


This would be the first of the two announced phenomena. One may already 
wonder whether Schmitt places his own discourse — and within it this very 
passage, precisely — in the order of the ‘purely objective’ or that of the 
‘purely scientific’. The doubts we have already formulated relative to his 
theoretical neutrality would not be dissipated by the allusion to ‘everyday 
language’. This language must not mystify. Schmitt cannot analyse an 
‘everyday language’ from the standpoint of a discursive instance that would 
be superior or foreign to it. The words and syntax forming the framework of 
his book forever belong to ‘everyday language’. No refinement can extract 
them from it, if only because of the natural language in which they are 
found, which forbids any absolute formalization. A single indication would 
suffice to confirm this once again: Schmitt constantly considers it 
indispensable to justify his choice of terms — beginning with the words 
‘friend’, ‘enemy’, ‘war’, or ‘civil war’ — by reference to everyday or 
predominant usage in such and such a natural European language: Greek, 
Latin, English. There is no other criterion for these quotations, and no other 
guarantee, than the statistical reference to the ordinary usage of the natural 
language. 

The second of the two announced phenomena belongs to the logic 
already evoked in parentheses, when Schmitt names war and revolution as 
the two manifestations of the friend/enemy figure. This alternative had 


already marked a sort of logical contradiction in Schmitt’s development, to 
the extent that he claimed to align his definition of the political on the 
possibility of exterior war, and then referred to Plato, to polemos so sharply 
distinguished from stasis. Now, though, in order to describe the second 
phenomenon, Schmitt must transport the entire polemical necessity of the 
discourse analysed hitherto in general to the order of domestic politics. But 
instead of presenting this alternative (foreign affairs/domestic politics) as a 
pair of symmetrical possibilities, he considers the interiorization, as it were, 
the becoming-civil of this polemic, as a weakening of the political unity of 
the State. Not of the political in general, but of this State form of the 
political that Schmitt intends to distinguish, whereas he often uses it as the 
télos or guiding thread of his definition of the political. But for all that, it 
would be a mistake to neglect the initial warnings of the work. On the very 
first page, there is a reminder that the concept of the State presupposes the 
concept of the political, not the other way round, even if the State — this 
particular modality of the mode of existence of the people (Volk) — lays 
down the law in ‘decisive’ moments and even if, therefore, it constitutes, 
with regard to all thinkable ‘statuses’, the Status itself, the Status par 
excellence (der Status schlechthin), the stasis or the irreducible static stance 
[statique| that we have linked back up — on a suggestion from Schmitt 
himself, and at the price of considerable difficulties — with stdsis.!* The 
State is the Status. Only the State can bestow status on the political, 
supposing that should be necessary. For even if he denounces the 
inadequacy of the vicious circle (ein unbefriedigender Zirkel), the errors 
and meanderings induced by this equation (the State = the political), can it 
not be said that at the precise moment when he distinguishes them, Schmitt 
continues to make one the teleological pole of the other? Does he not see 
the State as the political par excellence, that which serves as an exemplary 
guide for the definition of the political? If this were the case, despite the 
precautions we have just evoked and the wealth of differentiated analyses 
that such prudence and carefulness allow, Schmitt would still belong (and 
he would undoubtedly admit to this readily, at least concerning this 
particular point) to what he himself identifies as the German tradition of the 
doctrine of the State in its Hegelian form. With regard to society, this 
doctrine considers the State other than and superior to it (qualitativ 


verschieden und etwas Hoheres).'> Our hypothesis is that the path, at once 
continuous and discontinuous, coherent and — willy-nilly — self-critical (or 


auto-critical?), separating The Concept of the Political (1932) from The 
Theory of the Partisan (1962) is thoroughly informed by this logical matrix: 
the State presupposes the political, to be sure, hence it is logically 
distinguished from it; but the analysis of the political, strictly speaking, and 
its irreducible core, the friend/enemy configuration, can only privilege, 
from the beginning and as its sole guiding thread, the State form of this 
configuration — in other words, the friend or enemy qua citizen. 

In ‘everyday language’ a second signal could be found to confirm that 
everything in politics is said in the polemical mode. It is that ‘in the modes 
of expression of the polemic everydayness interior to state affairs (In der 
Ausdrucksweise der innerstaatlichen Tagespolemik) [the English translation 
gives: ‘in usual domestic polemics’], the adjective ‘political’ is most often 
used today in the sense of ‘party politics’ (‘parteipolitisch’). This does 
mark the absence of ‘objectivity’ (‘Unsachlichkeit’) of all political 
‘decisions’; it can provide only the ‘reflection’ (Reflex) of the 
discriminations between friend and enemy in so far as it is ‘immanent’ to all 
political behaviour. The ‘depoliticization’ at which some of these 
manoeuvres aim is but a ruse designed to promote and impose a party 
politics. Schmitt’s diagnostic 1s one of a weakening of the State. When the 
thought of the ‘political unit’ (‘that of the State’, specifies Schmitt in 
parentheses), ‘loses its force (seine Kraft verliert)’, internal antagonisms 
win out in terms of ‘intensity’ over the unit or the community on which the 
foreign affairs are based. From this point the ‘real possibility of combat’ 
(die reale Moglichkeit des Kampfes), which should be ever-present 
(vorhanden) ‘when one is talking about the political’, no longer refers to 
war between units of peoples organized into States or Empires but, 
‘logically’, ‘coherently’, to civil war.'* This weakening of the State calls for 
‘internal pacification’ and attends the rise of the concept of the ‘domestic, 
[or internal], enemy’, a public enemy for which public law had a name in 
the Greek democracies as well as in Rome, as Schmitt recalls (po/émios or 


hostis!>). 


We must attempt to shed light here on at least two concepts and 
emphasize several typical problems. At stake each time is the obscure status 
of a possibility or eventuality said to be ‘real’ and ‘present’. It is only under 
the condition of this ‘real possibility’ (veale Moglichkeit), under the 
condition that it ‘remain present’ (vorhanden bleiben), that the ‘concept of 


the enemy has its meaning’. We have already alluded to this, and must 
return to it now. 


How can Schmitt, at one and the same time, privilege the State (even if 
he does not reduce the political to it), base the concept of enemy on the 
possibility of war between States, and nevertheless symmetrically align, as 
he does, exterior war and civil war — as if the enemy were sometimes the 
foreigner, sometimes the fellow citizen? The answer to this question would 
seem to lie in the prevailing determination of civil war in this analysis. At 
once both a paradox and a piece of good sense, this determination 
establishes civil war as a war between two States, a war in view of the 
State, a war between a weakened State and a potential State to be 
constituted, a war for the seizure or reconstitution of State power. War 
within a State would be but one case of war in general, war in the proper 
sense — that is, war between States. This specification is given in passing, in 
parentheses, when Schmitt seems to be aligning symmetrically the two 
concepts of the enemy with the two concepts of war, civil or domestic war 
and exterior war. In truth, there is only one concept of war, and the notion 
of real possibility as present (vorhanden) ensures the synthetic mediation 
between the two predicates: 


For to the enemy concept belongs the ever present possibility of combat (im Bereich des Realm 
liegende Eventualitdt eines Kampfes). All peripherals must be left aside from this term, including 
military details and the development of weapons technology. War is armed combat between 
organized political entities; civil war is armed combat within an organized unit (but called up into 
question again by this very fact). (We emphasize this last phrase in parentheses: dadurch aber 


problematisch werdenden.)' 


In both cases, it is an armed combat. In view of killing. ‘Weapon’ 
designates here, in the concept of its essence, the means in view of 
‘physical’ death, as the killing of a man (ein Mittel physischer Totung von 
Menschen). The death of a human being, thus implied in this concept of the 
enemy — that is, in all war, exterior or civil war — is neither natural death, 
since the enemy must be killed, nor murder, for wartime killing is not seen 
as a crime. The war crime is something else again; it would consist in 
transgressing this law to revert to the savageness of a violence that no 
longer respects the laws of war and the rights of people (Schmitt doesn’t 
like that at all, although he is quicker to denounce this transgression on the 
part of the stranger or enemy). What is said here of the enemy cannot be 


indifferent to what is said of the friend, since these two concepts co- 
determine one another. But the correlation can formally follow three logical 
chains: 

1. One can infer symmetrically that there is no friend without this 
possibility of killing which establishes a non-natural community. Not only 
could I enter into a relationship of friendship only with a mortal, but I could 
love in friendship only a mortal at least exposed to so-called violent death — 
that is, exposed to being killed, possibly by myself. And by myself, in 
lovence itself, in an essential, not an accidental, manner. To love in love or 
friendship would always mean: I can kill you, you can kill me, we can kill 
ourselves. Together or one another, masculine or feminine. Therefore, in all 
cases, we already are (possibly, but this possibility is, precisely, real) dead 
for one another. We shall later question in several ways this possibility that 
intersects with the one Freud analyses in his own style, under the heading of 
ambivalence, during a war and exactly in “Thoughts for the Times on War 


and Death’ (1915).!/ 

2. But to this logic one can, precisely, oppose opposition: what is true of 
the enemy (I can or I must kill you, and vice versa) is the very thing that 
suspends, annuls, overturns or, at the very least, represses, transfigures or 
sublimates friendship, which is therefore simultaneously the same 
(repressed) thing and something altogether different. What is said of the 
enemy is not symmetrical and cannot be said of the friend, even under the 
heading of structural or shared conditions of possibility. Friendship would 
consist in the suspension of this structure of possibility. To love in love or in 
friendship (unless the distinction which interests us would pass at this exact 
place between the two, and ‘killing’ would be an affair of love, not of 
friendship), would precisely be the opposite of killing, of this putting to 
death, this putting of death (mise de mort), this deadly stake — even if, as 
Freud recalls, the most categorical, the most unconditional ‘thou shalt not 
kill’ confirms, and hence says, the real possibility that the interdict orders to 
be interrupted while expressing it. 

3. Let us not forget that the political would precisely be that which thus 
endlesly binds or opposes the friend-enemy/enemy-friend couple in the 
drive or decision of death, in the putting to death or in the stake of death. 
We were speaking of the political enemy at the beginning of this analysis. A 
hypothesis, then: and what if another lovence (in friendship or in love) were 
bound to an affirmation of life, to the endless repetition of this affirmation, 


only in seeking its way (in loving its way, and this would be phileia itself) 
in the step beyond the political, or beyond that political as the horizon of 
finitude, putting to death and putting of death? The philein beyond the 
political or another politics for loving, another politics to love, for love (a 
aimer)? Must one dissociate or associate altogether differently polis, 
politeia, philia, Eros, and so forth? If a choice between these three 
hypotheses and these three logical chains were simply or clearly possible, 
we would make that choice, we would choose one immediately. In this very 
place. 

Hence we must be patient at the crossroads and endure this undecidable 
trivality. Without it — and this is the thesis and the decision — no decision 
would be possible, nor ever any friendship. There are we. In this very 
place? No, there. 

Let us return to Schmitt, who names this putting to death unequivocally. 
He sees in it a sense of ontological origination (im Sinne einer 
seinsmassigen Urspriinglichkeit) that one must recognize in the words 
‘enemy’ and ‘combat’; but first of all and on the backdrop of a fundamental 
anthropology or ontology of ‘human life’: it is a ‘combat’ (‘Kampf’), and 
every person is a ‘combatant’ (“Kampfer’), says Schmitt, with the inverted 
commas necessary in the ontological distinction of this definition. This does 
not so much mean that the being-for-death of this human life cannot be 
separated from a being-for-putting-to-death or for-death-in-combat. One 
may induce the naturalness of this determination (it is the plight of all 
‘beasts’ who would ignore the law and eat each other from one species to 
another), as well as the indispensable rupture with naturalness (laws of war 
and non-cannibalistic respect for individuals of the same species). One 
would say, in a Hegelian sense, that a being-for-death that would not be a 
being-for-putting-to-death would still be too natural or simply biological.!* 
As for this originary and ontological sense, war between enemies cannot be 
reduced either to competition or intellectual discussion, nor to a simply 
symbolic struggle. Just as hostility is entirely dependent on the real 
possibility of this putting-to-death, so also, correlatively, there is no 
friendship independent of this deadly drive — which is not necessarily to 
say, this criminal drive. The deadly drive of the friend/enemy proceeds from 
life, not from death, not from some attraction of death by death or for death. 
This deadly necessity could not be purely psychological, although it is 
anthropological. Impossible as it may seem and, in truth, remain for us, 


what would have to be thought is a hostility without affect or, at least, 


without an individual or ‘private’!? affect, a purified aggressivity, with all 
passion and all psychology removed: a pure hostility and, ultimately, a 
purely philosophical one. As we shall see below, Lenin is, for Schmitt, an 
illustrious representative — and a radical one, too — of such a pure hostility, 
but in a tradition whose first moment, in The Theory of the Partisan, 1s 
extremely difficult to determine. 

This possibility can remain a possibility, and this is why it becomes the 
object of an analysis and a report which make a claim to neutrality — 
indeed, to some kind of positivism in the diagnostic: Schmitt says it is not 
bellicist, pacifist, militarist or imperialist — it is, all in all, purely theoretical. 
(We have just expressed doubts about this kind of theoreticity which can be 
nothing else but a cunning or a strategy indissociable from the political 
practice of Schmitt himself.) But even if this possibility remains a 
possibility, it must already be, or still be, concrete, ‘real’, and, to this extent, 
‘present’. The realization is but the passage to the limit, the extreme 
accomplishment, the éskhaton of an already real and already present 
possibility. The realization is not the actualization of a possible but 
something altogether different: the radicalization of a possible reality or a 
real possibility. Here we are no longer in the conventionally Aristotelian 
opposition of potentiality and act. This is why Realisierung should not be 
translated, as it has been, by ‘actualization’: 


The friend, enemy and combat concepts receive their real meaning (ihren realen Sinn) precisely 
because they refer to the real possibility of physical killing (auf the reale Moglichkeit der 
Physischen Tétung). War follows from enmity, for war is the existential negation of the enemy 
(seinsmassige Negierung eines anderen Seins). It is the most extreme realization of enmity (die 
duperste Realisierung der Feindschaft). It does not have to be common, normal, something ideal, 
or desirable. But it must nevertheless remain present as a real possibility (als reale Méglichkeit 


vorhanden bleiben) for as long as the concept of the enemy remains valid.7° 


The logic of this discourse implements a strategy that is at once original (a 
displacement of the traditional concept of possibility) and classic (in the 
recourse to a condition of possibility in a transcendental-ontological type of 
analysis). This logic is this strategy. It consists in a sophisticated (or 
ingenuous or naive) oscillation between two situations, two stratifications 
of the political: sometimes the political is a particular and grounded stratum 
(with the following consequence: you may very well live something other 
than politics, or, if you will, beyond politics, and you may love your 


(political) enemy; but you will not love him politically, you will love him 
from another angle: as friend, lover, neighbour, human being — the political 
should not be confused with something else, etc.); sometimes the political, 
qua real possibility, invades the entire fundamental or grounding stratum of 
existence, whether individual, or communal. All the eventualities we have 
just summarily considered would then be excluded or contaminated in 
advance by the real possibility of the very thing from which they are cut. 
This fundamentalist stratification makes the political at once both a regional 
stratum, a particular layer, however grounding the layer is, and the 
supplementary or overdeteimining determination cutting through all other 
regions of the human world or of the cultural, symbolic, or ‘spiritual’ 
community. This is what allows Schmitt to affirm that ‘all of the concepts 
of the spiritual sphere (der geistigen Sphare), including the concept of spirit 
(Geist)’ must be ‘understood in terms of concrete political existence’. They 
cannot be neutral or neutralizable, nor can they be reduced to unity; they are 
‘pluralistic’: ‘each nation has its own concept of nation’, and so forth. One 
can see what such a warning frees for the differentiated analysis of all these 
concepts. But one can also sense to what alliance of politicism and 
empiricism it can expose itself. 

This is the strategy of presupposition (Voraussetzung). In some of its 
features, it could be analogous to Heidegger’s existential analytic. This said, 
it always demands that the presupposition of real possibility or eventuality 
be present in a determined (vorhanden) mode. And this presupposed 
presence is that of political decision: the decision deciding who the enemy 
is. The question ‘who’ is at the heart of the principle, 1t summons and 
commands [mande et commande]. The major moments of political decision 
are those of the response to the question: ‘who is the enemy?’. Cromwell is 
exemplary here in his jubilant denunciation of ‘The Enemies to the very 
Being of these Nations’: ‘Why, truly, your great Enemy is the Spaniard. He 
is a natural enemy. He is naturally so; he is naturally so throughout — by 
reason of that enmity that is in him against whatsoever is of God ... enmity 
is put into him by God.’ He is ‘the natural enemy, the providential enemy’ 
[in English in the text], ‘and he who considers him to be an “accidental 
enemy” is “not well acquainted with Scripture and the things of God”.’?! 

Victorious war and revolution belong neither to the ‘social’ nor to the 
‘ideal’. Military combat is not the pursuit of politics by other means, as in 
the Clausewitzian definition, ‘generally incorrectly cited’. War has its own 


rules and perspectives, its strategies and tactics, but they presuppose 
(voraussetzen) a political decision (politische Entscheidung). They 
presuppose, in fact, that this decision, naming ‘who is the enemy’ (wer der 
Feind ist), 1s preliminary (bereits vorliegt). It is no easy task to determine 
the place assigned by Schmitt to this pure preliminary decision, nor is it 
easy to know if, gua free act, it breaks with or is in accord with the state of 
belonging to a people, group, class, etc. In short, it is no easy task to decide 
whether this decision supposes, rends, undermines or produces the 
community; or to decide what binds it to itself in a friendly attraction or a 
self-conservation which resembles philia or philautia. The fact remains that 
this allegation of presupposition, always present as real possibility, allows 
at one and the same time for war to be waged as the political’s condition of 
possibility without it being for all that, in any respect, the aim, the finality 
or even the content of the political! 
Let us read Schmitt emphasizing the word ‘presupposition’: 


War is neither the aim nor the purpose nor even the very content of politics. But as a real 
possibility it is an ever present presupposition (die als reale Moglichkeit immer vorhandene 


Voraussetzung) which determines in a characteristic way human action and thinking and thereby 
22 


creates a specifically political behaviour. 
This is neither the time or the place to follow up the decisive occurrences of 
this surprising and strategically precious concept of ‘real possibility’. It 
would also be possible to see it as a rhetorical ploy in a disguised polemic. 
Let us be content with situating the play with the sensitive notion of 
neutrality which the ploy, for example, allows, simultaneously in the 
theoretical sense (a scientific, phenomenological or ontological discourse 
which analyses or describes without taking sides) and in the polemico- 
political sense (a State that has not declared war). The real possibility of 
‘real possibility’, as one might say, enables two contradictory propositions 
to be held successively or simultaneously: yes, neutrality is always possible, 
but no, it is impossible, unless it be the end of the political. And the enemy 
(O enemies, there is no enemy!’). And thereby, the end of the friend (‘O my 
friends, there is no friend!’). The very concept of neutrality, as we shall see, 
is Swept away by its own possibility; it contradicts itself and is destroyed in 
itself. There is a neutrality of the neutral, but it cannot be found politically. 
One would be friend or enemy, friend and enemy before all possible 
neutrality, yet that would not keep neutrality from being possible. How is 


this; how could this be possible? This question has especial import to us in 
that a certain thought of the neutral (which is certainly not political 
neutrality, but cannot, in any case, remain foreign to its grammar) will, in 
this century, notably in the work of Blanchot, have been bound to an 
experience and a thought of friendship that we shall strive to hear later. 

For Schmitt, the criterion of the friend/enemy distinction does not in fact 
entail that a ‘determined people’ should have to be for all eternity the friend 
or the enemy of another. This suggests that the ‘decision’ we have been 
talking about is not linked to communal appurtenance, is not caused by it, 
even though the decision reaffirms appurtenance. Nor does it mean that ‘a 
state of neutrality is not possible (moglich) or could not be politically 
meaningful (politisch sinnvoll)’: 


As with every political concept, the neutrality concept is also subject to the ultimate 
presupposition of a real possibility of a friend-enemy grouping (unter dieser letzten Voraussetzung 
einer realen Moglichkeit der Freund-und Feindgruppierung). Should only neutrality prevail in the 
world, then not only war but also neutrality would come to an end. The politics of avoiding war 
terminates, as does all politics, whenever the possibility of fighting disappears. What always 
matters is the possibility of this decisive eventuality taking place (die Moglichkeit dieses 
entscheidenden Falles), the actual war (des wirklichen Kampfes), and the decision whether this 
eventuality is or is not the given case (die Entscheidung dariiber, ob dieser Fall gegeben ist oder 


nicht).7> 


(Such a singular decision that decides if it is the case or not, if an 
eventuality is or is not ‘given’ — is this an active or a passive decision? 
Conscious or unconscious? Free or not? Responsible or not? A decision as 
to what is given, and to whom, relative to knowing who, ‘who is who,’ etc.? 
One does not know, with this decision, whether a decisionism informs it in 
depth or, on the contrary, whether it does not negate such a decisionism, 
sweep it away, forget it, unless the decision would always be linked to 
oblivion itself.) 


The exception is the rule — that, perhaps, is what this thought of real 
possibility thinks. The exception is the rule of what takes place, the law of 
the event, the real possibility of its real possibility. The exception grounds 
the decision on the subject of the case or the eventuality. The fact that the 
case or situation (dieser Fall) arises only exceptionally (nur 
ausnahmsweise) does not suspend, sublate or annul (hebt ... nicht auf) its 
‘determining character’. On the contrary, this exceptionality grounds 
(begriindet) the eventuality of the event. An event is an event, and a 


decisive one, only if it is exceptional. An event as such is always 
exceptional. 

As for war, this is a paradoxical consequence, concerning killing also, 
which here is not just one example among others: it is because killing is 
exceptional that it remains the decisive ordeal. And, one might say, the 
more exceptional, unusual, improbable it is, the more it weighs decisively 
on decision. A diagnostic for our times: today, notes Schmitt, if wars are 
less frequent, less usual and more exceptional (if that can be said of the 
exception) than in former times, the ‘total’ purchase of their power has 
increased in the same proportion. The real possibility of killing tends to be 
infinite. That means that today war, the state of war, the case of war (der 
Kriegsfall), still remains the decisive ordeal, the serious thing, the major 
critical affair, the kArinein of crisis, the very seriousness of the decision, 
which in German is called ‘Emstfall’, which also means, in military 
language, the ‘case of war’. The serious decision is the case of war, the 
absolute hostility which, therefore, always decides between the friend and 
the enemy. The decision discriminates, we will say, recalling that in Latin 
discrimen is at once separation, distinction, difference and the moment of 
decision, instance in the two senses of the term. Schmitt plays with this 
word ‘Ernstfall’ in inverted commas when he says that ‘yet today’ the case 
of war is the ‘case of war’: ‘Audi heute noch ist der Kriegsfall der 
“Ernstfall”’.’ 

It is, then, the improbable situation, the exceptional case (der 
Ausnahmefall), the ‘perhaps’, perhaps, which carries ‘a_ particularly 
determinating signification’ (or discriminating, decisive: eine besonders 
entscheidende ... Bedeutung); but it is the improbable situation, and no 
other, which, exceptionally, gua exception, unveils the essence, the centre 
and the heart of things. It is that which may not happen, that which happens 
only in so far as it might just as well not happen, this undecidable 
eventuality gua real possibility, that informs decisions and forms truth [fait 
la décision et fait la vérité]. This undecidable decision bestows the force of 
unveiling. This deciding signification which unveils the kernel of thing? 
(den Kern der Dinge enthiillende Bedeutung) accrues to the decision. The 
unveiling of things, of the heart of things in the coming asunder of decision, 
is perhaps accomplished not in the act of war which bears death, but surely 
in the asundering possibility, of a killing, in this possibility gua real and 
present possibility. The latter can uncover the heart of things only in 


undressing the other, in uncovering the possibility of what Schmitt called 
above ‘physical killing’. 

Hence the oscillation and the association between actuality/effectivity 
and possibility. As if it were sufficient that an event be possible for it to 
happen, for it to have already actually taken place in its very perhaps, at the 
end of the sentence naming its possibility (this is perhaps the spring of the 
teleiopoetic or quasi-messianic logic that we were analysing above in terms 
of Nietzschean statements, whose possibility, however, verily haunts all 
statements. Yes, haunts them. For what is this ‘real possibility’ haunting 
Schmitt if not the very law of spectrality?). Oscillation and association, the 
conjunctive disjunction binding real actuality/effectivity and possibility — 
that is how the conjunction conjuncts and disjuncts at one and the same 
time. It is found at the end of the paragraph speaking to the ‘case of war’ as 
‘case of war’ (we stress actual/effective and possibility): 


For only in actual/effective combat (im wirklichen Kampf) is revealed the most extreme 
consequence (die ausserste Konsequenz) of the political grouping of friend and enemy. From this 
most extreme possibility (Von dieser extremsten Moglichkeit her) human life gains (gewinnt) its 
specifically political tension (Spannung).”4 


This tension is to be conquered: it is not a given fact, it is conquered like a 
place to which one gains access; it is won as a victory is, when a resistance 
must be overcome; it is conquered as an intensity which can always 
increase and gain on itse/f out to its extreme limit. 

The extreme consequence of these propositions, the one which would 
seem to us as unavoidable as it is properly disastrous, is of course not drawn 
by Schmitt, at least not in this form, but we must draw it: if it is true, as has 
been said above, that the rarer or the more improbable the situation of 
exception or of decision (war, hostility, the political event as such, etc.), the 
more decisive, intense and revealing it is, and in the end the more it 
politicizes (as would be the case in the modernity of the rarefaction of wars, 
according to the Schmitt of 1932), then one must conclude that rarefaction 
intensifies the tension and the revealing power (the ‘truth’ of the political): 
the less war there is, the more the hostility, etc. This is less a default of 
‘common sense’ than it would appear, to be sure, but it does inevitably lead 
to a change in all the signs, and therefore to having to measure 
politicization in terms of the degree of depoliticization. 


What would the symptom of neutralization and depoliticization 
(Entpolitisierung) that Schmitt learnedly denounces in our modernity 
reveal? In truth, an over-or hyperpoliticization. The less politics there is, the 
more there is, the less enemies there are, the more there are. The number of 
friends increases according to exactly the same proportion and in the same 
proportion. Hence the inversion and the vertigo, hence the mirror reflection 
in which the ‘dying sage’ and the ‘living fool’ reflect themselves. This is in 
fact the same number and the same calculation. The inversion and the 
vertigo are not sophisms. These enunciations unfold a structure of decision 
and of the event, and account for any logic purporting to calculate their 
incalculable singularity. We are simply formalizing a principle of ruin or 
spectrality at the heart of this discourse on the political, a discourse of 
madness allied to an excess of common sense. A double hyperbole, a 
chiasmus of double hyperbole. When we suggested above that Schmitt did 
not draw this consequence himself, we specified ‘at least not in this form’. 
For The Theory of the Partisan can be considered the intrepid exercise of 
this paradoxical consequence. Through an exploration of the future of the 
Second World War and of everything preceding it over centuries, Schmitt 
analyses a general hyperbolization of the political. But the unleashing of 
pure hostility appears to him, gives itself over to his diagnostic, through all 
the phenomena of depoliticization, through everything that is destructive of 
the classical limits of the political. 

Consequently, depoliticization, the ‘without politics’ which is not 
necessarily the ‘withdrawal of the political’,?°> could characterize a world 
which would no longer be a world, a ‘world without polities’, reduced to a 
‘terrestial globe’ abandoned by its friends as well as its enemies; in sum, a 
dehumanized desert. And this is indeed what Schmitt literally says — we 
shall quote him again. But he could say exactly the opposite (and he will 
say it later, willy-nilly). In both cases, the ‘possibility’ of combat remains 
the arbiter: ‘A world in which the possibility (die Moglichkeit) of war is 
utterly (without a remainder: restlos) eliminated, a completely pacified 
globe, would be a world without the distinction of friend and enemy and 
hence a world without politics.’”° 

This ‘world without politics’ may present all manner of oppositions, 
contrasts and competitions, but no enemy (and thus no friend) will be found 
there, nor this antagonism which ‘authorized to shed blood, and kill other 


human beings’.?’ The allusion to blood is anything but secondary and 


rhetorical (no more so than in Rosenzweig, or Benjamin — precisely on the 
theme of state violence). To kill without bloodshed, with the help of new 
techniques, is perhaps already to accede to a world without war and without 
politics, to the inhumanity of a war without war. Regardless of whether this 
‘world without politics’ is an ideal (and Schmitt’s decision on this subject is 
clear, even though he pretends to be interested only in the theoretical and 
neutral determination of political non-neutrality), the only conclusion The 
Concept of the Political purports, then, to hold after this properly 
phenomenological neutralization of the two ‘ideals’ is that the 
‘phenomenon of the political’ cannot be grasped or apprehended (begreifen) 
without this reference to the ‘real possibility (die reale Moglichkeit) of the 
friend and enemy grouping’.*® Whatever consequences may be drawn from 
this ‘real possibility’ — that 1s, from the structure of the political — whether 
these consequences be moral, religious, aesthetic, or economic, they will 
not be able to reduce the properly political phenomenality of this ‘real 
possibility’. We believe it is necessary to insist on the recurrence of this call 
to a ‘real possibility’. Not only because its concept remains obscure, but 
because the haunting nature of this recurrence confirms both a difficulty 
and a necessity. We have just referred to phenomenology (and it 1s indeed a 
matter of a phenomenology of the friend as well as of the enemy) because 
at stake is indeed the ‘phenomenon of the political’, as Schmitt himself 
says, and the sense of this phenomenon, the presentation of its presence 
after the eidetic reduction of everything it is not; but also because what 1s at 
stake in the same stroke is indeed a phenomenalization as revelation, 
manifestation, unveiling. 

The three criteria (reality, possibility, presence) intertwine here at the 
heart of the same ‘eventuality’. At the heart of a selfsame eventness of the 
event. How does the friend/enemy grouping manifest itself, how does it 
present itself? How 1s their ‘real possibility’ presented or realized, either as 
possible or as real? How can this reality mark sometimes presence, 
sometimes possibility itself? In war. In any case in war as an extremity, as 
the extreme limit of a state of exception, as ‘extreme eventuality’ (als 
extreme Eventualitat). It is on this account that this reality is revealing; it 
constitutes a fact from which an essence can be read — surely — but read first 
of all from an uncommon, non-empirical fact, exemplary in a teleological 
(the telos as extreme limit) and paradigmatic sense. The ‘presence’ 
(Vorhandenheit) thereby manifested in the real possibility, this real or 


possible presence, is not that of the fact or example, it is that of a telos. Not 
that of a political telos, of one or another political end, of one or another 
politics, but that of the te/os of the political (life opposed to itself, and not to 
death, as we recalled above, spirit opposed to itself, the life of spirit 
opposing itself to itself: there is only life, and this is why, in sum, there are 
enemies). War, gua the ‘most extreme (extremste) of political means, 
manifests (offenbart) the possibility of this friend/enemy discrimination 
which ‘founds’ all political representation; and it has no meaning, it is 
‘sinnvoll, as long as this discrimination is ‘actually present’ (real 
vorhanden), or at least actually possible (oder wenigstens real moglich). 
‘The sole remaining question’, Schmitt then concludes, is that of knowing if 
the friend/enemy grouping which determines the opposition as purely and 
solely political (not religious, moral, or economic) ‘is or is not present as 
possibility or as real actuality/effectivity (als reale Moglichkeit oder 
Wirklichkeit vorhanden ist oder nicht)’. The syntax of this question, which 
we have already cited, does not admit of a decision on whether the double 
alternative (oder ... oder) is of the order of presence (vorhanden ist oder 
nicht) or of the order of modalities of this presence (real or effective/actual 
possibility, real possibility or real effectivity/actuality: reale Moglichkeit 
oder Wirklichkeit). In the first case the grouping of the political 
(friend/enemy) would always be present, in one mode or another; in the 
other, it could be present or not. The consequences of these two distinct 
alternatives — certain, but apparently subtle and fragile — indeed seem 
limitless: what does ‘politically’ ‘present’ mean? And present in this mode 
(Vorhandenheit)! On this subject there is no need to refer to a Heideggerian 
style of questioning (for example, regarding the Vorhandenheit) to 
recognize the necessity, be it political or not, of these interrogations. 
Sometimes it is presence itself that seems spectral, a disappearing virtuality 
of apparition. Sometimes the sole presence (at once permanent and 
recurrent) figures that to which a call must be made, a despairing call, in 
order to resist the return of the spectral — in a word, to exorcize, to conjure, 
to ‘repress’ the returning ghost [/e revenant]. As for the meaning of war, 
and the question of knowing under what condition a war is sinnvoll, Schmitt 
never hesitates: he judges it indubitable that war always has a meaning; war 
has a meaning, and no politics, no social bond gua social bond, has 
meaning without war, without its real possibility. But this does not 
necessarily mean that in his eyes war is good, useful, that it has meaning in 


the moral or religious sense of an ideal or of a fe/os to be attained. It simply 
means that in order for the concept of war (and hence politics) to have 
meaning, for the phenomenological and semantic determination of the 
discourse on war, conditions of possibility must be ascertained. And this is 
what The Concept of the Political purports to do. If it is not a telos in the 
sense of a moral or religious ideal, nor even in the sense of a determined 
political ideal, this semantico-teleological content is _ nevertheless 
intrinsically teleological. Its structure is ideologically immanent, auto-and 
tauto-teleological (war aims at the death of the enemy, etc.), even if — or, 
rather, because — this political te/os is irreducible to any other. But it does 
seem that, as a conscious or unconscious strategy, the Schmittian phrase 
strives to dissociate the two teleological values (war is not good in view of 
another end, moral, religious, etc., but it has its end in itself) while 
constantly oscillating from one to the other, going so far, in the operation of 
a ‘partisan’, as to smuggle in one for the other. This seems to be made 
possible — and easy — by the constant presence, by the surviving presence — 
in any case by the presence of war ‘yet today’ — as ‘real possibility’. Even if 
today, in the form of ‘the very last war of humanity’, wars are waged in a 
particularly inhuman manner, morally discrediting the enemy to the point of 
making him an inhuman monster and thereby pretending to ‘exceed the 
political’ (tiber das Politische hinausgehend [Schmitt’s emphasis]), making 
the enemy someone who must be ‘annihilated’, not only driven back and 
‘led back within its boundaries’ (Schmitt’s emphasis, and one wonders what 
difference he sees between ‘physical killing’, whose aim he judges 
indispensable, and the annihilation which he seems to condemn. He would 
no doubt answer that physical killing concerns the individual life of soldiers 
but not the annihilation of a people or a State); well, this war ‘yet today’ 
attests, despite everything, to the presence of the political as ‘real 
possibility’: ‘The possibility of such war is particularly illustrative 
(besonders deutlich) of the fact that war as a real possibility (als reale 
Moglichkeit) is still present today (heute noch vorhanden ist), and this fact 
is crucial for the friend-and-enemy antithesis and for the knowledge [or 
recognition, the determinating identification, the accounting, Erkenntnis| of 
the political.’?° 

We have already sensed and suggested that when Schmitt says that this is 
clear (deutlich) he is relying on a logic of inference, of proof, of indication 
and of testimony which allows him always to decide for the presence of the 


political. He decides thus either in terms of positive and univocal signs of 
the presence of the political, or in terms of what the disappearance of these 
signs witnesses of their possible and permanent presence — indeed 
demonstrates it, a contrario, through a denegation which would 
indiscernibly be in the things themselves, in real history and in the 
Schmittian discourse — in truth, in the entire tradition which he represents 
and repeats with so much cunning as authority. This disavowal potentializes 
a logic of negativity that will always allow, from The Concept of the 
Political to The Theory of the Partisan, for the multiplication of refined 
intuitions — so crucial for an analysis of our times — while at the same time 
diagnosing a depoliticization which, in sum, would be but the 
supplementary and inverted symptom, the abyssal hyperbole, of a 
hyperpoliticization. This depoliticization would apparently blur the criteria 
for boundaries of the political; it would neutralize them only to expand the 
control of the political to the point of absolute hostility, in its most pristine 
philosophical purity. 

We shall see how absolute hostility would then be the affair of 
philosophy, its very cause. 


6 


Oath, Conjuration, Fraternization 
or the ‘Armed’ Question 


Following its meaning in German (as in so many other languages), ‘friend’ is 
originally only the person to whom a genealogical bond unites. Originally the friend 
is but the friend of blood, the consanguine parent or again the ‘parent by alliance’ 


through marriage, oath of fraternity, adoption or other corresponding institutions. ! 
Carl Schmitt 


If, then, you two are friendly to each other, by some tie of nature (phusei pé oikeioi) 
you belong to each other.” 
Plato 


We have become attuned to a certain effect of haunting. Where it seems 
inaccessible to intuition and concept, the purely concrete starts to resemble 
the ghost, just when you start to believe that you can tell them apart. This is 
the tormented experience of the inversion of signs. Such an experience 
allows itself, then, to be revealed in Schmitt’s obsessional insistence on the 
‘concrete’ and on ‘real possibility’, at the very point at which these values 
were opposed to the ‘spectral’ (gespenstisch). We are constantly reminded 
that only a concrete, concretely determined enemy can awaken the political; 
only a real enemy can shake the political out of its slumber and, as we 
recall, out of the abstract ‘specularity’ of its concept; only the concrete can 
awaken it to its actual/effective life (as ‘the /iving fool that I am’, when it 
bemoans the fact that there is no longer, or not yet, an enemy). But there is 
the spectre, lodged within the political itself; the antithesis of the political 
dwells within, and politicizes, the political. The spectre might well be — it 


might well already have been, in 1932 — this ‘partisan’ who no longer 
respects the normal conditions and the juridically guaranteed boundaries of 
war. And this has not begun today, nor did it begin yesterday, or the day 
before. 

Negativity, disavowal and politics, haunting and dialectics. If there is a 
politicism in Schmitt, it lies in the fact that it it is not enough for him to 
define the political by the negativity of polemics or opposition. He defines 
antagonism or opposition (oppositional negativity in general) — which is not 
at all the same as defining the political — as teleologically political. The 
political is all the more political for being antagonistic — certainly, but 
opposition is all the more oppositional — supreme opposition, gua the 
essence and te/os of opposition, negation, and contradiction — when it is 
political. It 1s impossible here — as it is impossible in any absolute 
proposition of speculative idealism, and hence of ideal dialectics — to 
distinguish between subject and predicate. Schmitt does not so much define 
the political by oppositional negation as define the latter by the political. 
This inversion stems from a teleological law of power or intensity. The 
stronger a contradiction or oppositional negativity, the more its intensity 
tends towards a limit, the more political it is. Example: ‘Political 
antagonism (der politische Gegensatz) 1s the most intense (intensiviste) and 
extreme (dusserste) antagonism, and every concrete antagonism 
(Gegensatzlichkeit) becomes that much more political the closer it 
approaches the most extreme point (sich dem dussersten Punkte ... nahert), 
that of the friend-enemy grouping.”* 

It will come as no surprise when this politicism of oppositional negativity 
calls on Hegel. The discrimination between friend and enemy would also 
be, in Hegelian terms, an ‘ethical difference’ (sittliche Differenz), the first 
condition of ethical determination, which does not mean moral 
determination. The modern definition of hostility, perfectly distinct from 
enmity, would be due to Hegel and Marx (despite the economistic and 
hence depoliticizing tendency that would make the latter a nineteenth- 
century thinker*). And if Schmitt evokes this debt to Marx and Hegel, it is 
not simply to stress that this concept of hostility — in his view the only 
purely political concept of the political — is also an ethical concept. He is 
intent on already denouncing the misunderstanding in which modern 
philosophers begin to apprehend this logic of the political. They tend to 
avoid it — qua the political in sum — in so far as it is linked to a certain 


concept and to a certain practice of war. Although Hegel may at times show 
a ‘double face’, he must be inscribed in the great tradition of ‘specifically 
political’ thinkers (Machiavellli, Hobbes, Bossuet, de Maistre, Donoso 
Cortés, Fichte — ‘as soon as he forgets his humanitarian ideallsm!’) who 
knew how to break with an optimistic anthropology (‘Man would be 
fundamentally and originally good’). In this discourse on Man, on his 
original innocence or on his accidental or extrinsic corruption, Schmitt 
denounces a strategy too often enrolled in the service of anti-State 
liberalism. ‘Authentic’ political theories, on the other hand, all presuppose a 
Man essentially ‘evil’, ‘dangerous’, a ‘dynamic’ and ‘problematic’ being: 


Hegel ... remains everywhere political in the decisive sense.... Of a specifically political nature 
also is his dialectic of concrete thinking.... 

Hegel also offers the first polemically political definition of the bourgeois. The bourgeois is an 
individual who does not want to leave the apolitical riskless private sphere. He rests in the 
possession of his private property, and under the justification of his possessive individualism he 
acts as an individual against the totality. He is a man who finds his compensation for his political 
nullity in the fruits of freedom and enrichment and above all in the total security of its use. 
Consequently he wants to be spared bravery and exempted from the danger of a violent death. 
{Wissenschaftliche Behandlungsarten des Naturrechts (The Methods of the Science of Natural 
Right), 1802, Lasson edn p. 383; Glockner | edn p. 499.} Hegel has also advanced a definition of 
the enemy which in general has been evaded by modern philosophers. ‘The enemy is the ethical 
difference [die sittliche Differenz| (not in the sense of morality [nicht im moralischen Sinne], but 
in the perspective of ‘absolute life’ in the ‘eternal being of the people’), as the Foreigner to be 
negatived in his living totality (als ein zu negierendes Fremdes in seiner lebendigen Totalitat). ‘A 
difference of this sort is the enemy, and this difference, posited in its ethical bearing, exists at the 
same time as its counterpart, the opposite of the being of its antithesis, i.c., as the nullity of the 
enemy, and this nullity, commensurate on both sides, is the peril of battle. For ethical life (fiir des 
Sittliche) this enemy can only be an enemy of the people and itself only a people (nur ein Volk). 
Because single individuality comes on the scene here, it is for the people that the single individual 
abandons himself to the danger of death.’... ‘This war is not a war of families against families, but 
between peoples, and hatred becomes thereby undifferentiated and freed from all personal 


elements (von aller Personlichkeit frei)” 


To remain consistent with itself, this homage to a Hegelian paternity must 
reach out and embrace Hegel’s Marxist posterity. This consistency plays no 
small role in the notable sympathies this hyper-traditionalist jurist of the 
Catholic right wing will always have inspired in certain circles of leftist 
political thought. These ‘friends’ on the left do not correspond to a 
fortuitous or psychological formation born of some interpretative confusion. 
In question is an immense historico-political symptom the law of which 
remains to be thought. Be this as 1t may, Schmitt regrets that Hegel’s spectre 


has deserted Berlin to reappear elsewhere: with those of Lenin and Marx in 
Moscow: 


The question is how long the spirit of Hegel (der Geist Hegel) has actually resided (residiert hat) 
in Berlin. In any event, the new political tendency which dominated Prussia after 1840 preferred 
to avail itself of a conservative philosophy of state, especially one furnished by Friedrich Julius 
Stahl, whereas Hegel wandered to Moscow via Karl Marx and Lenin. His dialectical method 
became established there and found its concrete expression in a new concrete-enemy concept, 
namely that of the international class enemy, and transformed itself, the dialectical method, as well 
as everything else, legality and illegality, the state, even the compromise with the enemy, into a 
weapon of this battle. The actuality of Hegel is very much alive in Georg Lukacs. [History and 
Class Consciousness, trans. Rodney Livingstone, Merlin Press, London 1971; Lenin: A Study of 


the Unity of his Thought, trans. Nicholas Jacobs, New Left Books, London 1970]° 


The salute to Lenin forms the link between the two texts that we have been 
distinguishing, opposing and comparing, in order to understand how the 
second (The Theory of the Partisan) confirms the first (7he Concept of the 
Political) precisely at that point where the former seems to contradict the 
latter. 

We are unable to follow in detail the argument of a work which, in its 
time, multiplies in an impressive and often pointed fashion valuable insights 
into the many transformations taking place in the political space of 
modernity. Regarding the classical European jus belli (interstate war 
between regular armies), and to the extent that its regulation was ever 
respected, the partisan remains a marginal figure until the First World War. 
The preferred example of Schmitt, as it was for Clausewitz, is first the 
Spanish guerrilla fighting against the Napoleonic army. The modern 
partisan, on the contrary, leaves this initial marginality, expecting from his 
enemy no respect for the rights of conventional warfare. In the course of 
civil war, as of colonial war, the partisan transforms the concept of 
conventional hostility and blurs its boundaries. Apparently the partisan is no 
longer an enemy, and has no enemy in the classical sense of the term. Real 
hostility henceforth extends, through terrorism and counter-terrorism, all the 
way to extermination. Yet the definition of the partisan will long maintain 
the tradition of autochthony, the telluric dimension on which we have 
insisted so much. It is, for example, the autochthony of the Russian 
partisans against the Napoleonic army, then the readaptation of this ‘myth 
of the national and autochtonomous partisan’ by Stalin in the course of the 
Second World War. This ‘myth’ serves a worldwide communist politics. 
With Mao Tse-tung it represents a new stage in the history of the partisan, 


and therefore in the process of rupture with the classical criteriology of the 
political and that of the friend/enemy grouping. The partisan not only 
simply transgresses, he confuses the two _ classical distinctions 
(regular/irregular, legal/illegal from the standpoint of constitutional or 
international law). One of the numerous advantages of these analyses is the 
precise and differentiated account of the relation to space (land, sea, or 
aerial space) — that 1s, first of all to technics or to tele-technology (the speed 
and expanse of transmission, mobilization and motorization) — as one of the 
essential factors in the mutation of the classical concept of the enemy and 
even in what had become the ‘classical concept’ of the partisan. 

This question of technics appears doubly decisive. 

On the one hand, although he does not say so explicitly in this form, the 
question is found to be at the heart of what Schmitt calls ‘a process of 
concept dissolution’, ‘a remarkable sign of the times’.’ Such a dissolution 
of concepts induces a ‘metaphoric’ but not necessarily improper use of the 
partisan concept. Schmitt himself acknowledges having recourse to it. This 
uncontrollable extension is due in particular to the criteria chosen for the 
definition of the partisan. These criteria authorize a limitless generalization 
(‘every human being is a being who struggles’; thus he is found to be ‘his 
own partisan’, which is practically meaningless). Indispensable as they may 
be, these criteria are false ones, quasi-concepts, criteria of degree of 
intensity — that is, indefinitely extensive. Now, along with (1) irregularity 
and (2) the intensity of political engagement, we find (3) ‘the high degree of 
mobility of active combat’® — that is, the appropriation of space by the 
science of the tele-technical prosthesis. 

On the other hand, and as a consequence, this speed of motorization, and 
hence that of tele-technical automation, produces a break with autochthony. 
This rupture cuts the telluric roots characteristic not only of the classical 
enemy but of the first form of the partisan guerrilla war. It must be specified 
that telluric autochthony, ground warfare, the consideration of geographical 
configurations, and the lay of the terrain no doubt persist throughout this 
mutation; Schmitt takes note of this and gives numerous examples: Mao 
Tse-tung, whose revolution has a ‘better telluric base than that of Lenin’,? 
Ho Chi Minh, Fidel Castro, the war for independence in Algeria, the 
Cypriot war, and so forth. But also — and first of all — this means that this 
territorial drive has itself always been contradicted, tormented, displaced 
and delocalized. And that this is the very experience of place. That is what 


Schmitt does not acknowledge explicitly. In any case, he draws no visible 
and conceptually rigorous consequence from it. He shows no interest in the 
fact that telluric autochthony is already a reactive response to a 
delocalization and to a form of tele-technology, whatever its degree of 
elaboration, its power, or its speed. This law undoubtedly governs 
historically different events, places and contents. But what Schmitt is right 
in saying of the modern partisan, whose agrarian autochthony is driven by 
technical and industrial progress, whose mobility is reinforced by a 
motorization which interrupts the ‘local bond’ and destroys the ‘telluric 
character’, could have been said of the most ‘classical’ combatant. We 
should not consider this a simple problem of dating or periodization. At 
stake are the relations between the history of the political and the structure 
of theoretical concepts which one claims to articulate upon it. For this is not 
without effect on the two axes of the Theory of the Partisan. First of all on 
the juridical axis (the critical examination of ‘equivocations’, ‘floating 
concept’ and the ‘default of clarity’ in the concepts of the Hague 
Agreement (1907) and the Geneva Conventions (1949);!° an examination 
highly ‘motivated’, let us say, by the example of the indictment of German 
generals after the Second World War). Secondly, the properly political axis 
which is our main interest here. The case made against the four Geneva 
Conventions in fact introduces this political axis. Having paid them 
exaggerated insistent homage (they are admirable for their sense of justice 
and humanitarian virtue, as well as their respect for the tradition of 
international law of European origin), Schmitt accuses them of having 
‘weakened’ — indeed, compromised — the ‘system of essential distinctions’: 
war and peace, the military and the civilian, enemy and criminal, interstate 
war and civil war. From that point, the road was clear for a form of war 
which ‘deliberately destroys these clear-cut distinctions’. The 
normalizations of compromise that the law then proposed would be, for 
Schmitt, but fragile gangways above the ‘abyss’.!! 

The abyss occasions vertigo, which engulfs, in sum, the conceptual banks 
of these ‘clear-cut distinctions’. It is definitively sweeping away the 
reassuring littoral on which it was believed possible to discern, in a word, 
Man, the humanity of Man, Man as ‘political animal’. 


(We shall not multiply the glosses on the edge of this abyss. First of all 
because to speak of the abyss can be done only from the shore, and there we 


have a first immoderateness, sometimes even an unbearable indecency. We 
shall not take advantage of this pretext for pathetic eloquence over the 
bottomless depths of a chaos which is ours today, this great yawning mouth 
which cannot ‘talk politics’ without screaming, shouting hunger or 
suffering, without swallowing in one gulp all the assurances of ‘clear-cut 
distinctions’ to remain, finally, ‘voiceless’. 

To be ready to /isten to this screaming chaos of the ‘voiceless’, one has 
only to lend an ear to any ‘news item’. At the very instant when I am 
rereading the previous sentence, a// points in the world, all the places of the 
human world, and not only on the earth, and not only in Rwanda and in 
Italy, in ex-Yugoslavia and in Iran, in Israel and in Palestine, Cambodia and 
Ireland, Tahiti and Bangladesh, Algeria and France, Ukraine and the Basque 
Country, etc., are — and will always have been — just so many forms of the 
abyss for Schmitt’s ‘clear-cut distinctions’ and his nostalgia. Still to give 
them country names is to speak a language without an assured foundation. 
To be ready to listen, we were saying: at the very instant when I reread this, 
a new stage has opened up (but have we not known that for such a long 
time?) with the ‘Clipper’ chip, a new bugging device — that is, a new stage 
in modern technics to lose the ‘distinction’ between private and public in 
the abyss. Why does Schmitt take no account of the fact that the police and 
spy network — precisely, the police gua spy network (the ‘spectre’ of the 
modem State of which Benjamin speaks in ‘For a Critique of Violence’) — 
points to what, precisely in the service of the State, ruins in advance and 
from within the possibility of the political, the distinction between private 
and public? What would he have thought of the new cryptographies, and of 
the unassignable ‘political’ status that is the singular institution of 
psychoanalysis — of which he never speaks? And what about cybercrime, 
consisting today in breaking into the electronic files of the State, the army, 
the police, banks, hospitals and insurance companies? A debate (of course, 
a hopeless one) is under way today (in the United States, naturally) between 
the State and citizen associations (all assuredly ‘democrats’ and ‘liberals’) 
concerned over the right to initiative, invention, communication, commerce, 
and safeguarding privacy. The citizens contest the state monopoly on the 
production and control of the ‘Clipper’ chip, designed to protect the secrecy 
of private communication in an age when, capable of intercepting and 
recording everything, the highways of numeric transmission leave no 
leeway or chance to the heart of hearts. Today we have a State just as 


‘liberal’ and ‘democratic’, just as concerned over its responsibilities, as its 
citizens, but providing it can maintain its hold on the means of protecting 
internal security and national defence — that is, the possibility of bugging 
everything every time it deems it necessary — politically necessary — to do 
so (internal and external security). 

— Fundamentally, one will say that there is nothing new here, despite the 
leap of technological mutation which also produces structural effects. 


— Certainly, but the novelty of these structural effects must not be 
neglected; this is the entirety of the ‘concrete’ in politics. 

The choice of this topical example, among an infinity of others, is 
designed only to recall that a reflection on the politics of friendship should 
not be distinguishable from a meditation on secrecy, on the ‘meaning’, the 
‘history’, and the ‘techniques’ of what is still called today, with the old 
Latin word, secret. We shall return to this later — with Kant.) 


Let us return to Schmitt, supposing that we ever left his company. When 
did this abyss open up? Schmitt claims to know. He believes he is able to 
determine bearings, events, dates. However worthwhile _ these 
determinations may be, however interesting and instructive these historical 
soundings are, they always admit of some counter-example or of an anterior 
example in an infinite regression. When Schmitt accuses specialists of the 
right of European peoples with ‘repression’ (these specialists are said to 
have repressed from consciousness the image of transformations visible 
from the beginning of this century!) this accusation can be levelled against 
Schmitt himself. What does he himself do? Does he not situate in this 
century the mutation whose premisses — and the premisses of those 
premisses — he is obliged, retreating step by step, to admit without 
admission? For example: the Bismarckian moment of the acherontic 
(Acheronta movere, as Bismarck used to say: to foment revolution and to 
take control at any price of the national forces pitted against the adversary) 
had a precedent in 1812-13, when an elite corps of Prussian officers sought 
to mobilize, with all the means at their disposal, the national forces hostile 
to Napoleon. Even if this was not, strictly speaking, a partisan war, ‘this 
brief revolutionary moment nevertheless has incredible importance for the 
theory of the partisan’.!> Then Schmitt quotes Clausewitz’s On War, and 
also an edict of the king of Prussia calling, in sum, for partisan war. Schmitt 


cannot conceal his admiration for these ten pages signed by a legitimate 
king. Without hesitation he classes them, in a fervent tremor, ‘among the 
most extraordinary pages of the world’s collections’. These pages were 
made to seduce and to fascinate Schmitt: the paradox of a military legality, 
political legitimacy, Prussian nationality regularly enrolled in the service of 
the irregularity of a revolutionary war, of a partisan war — against the 
French emperor! Against, in sum, the occupying forces whose 
expansionism masked in ‘humanitarian ideology’!*7he Concept of the 
Political had already revealed thirty years earlier. Is it not on account of 
Napoleon that Fichte and Hegel restored Machiavelli to a place of honour, 
to allow the German people to resist such an enemy? Along with the 
Spaniards and all the Europeans, Prussia, the Prussian king, invented 
partisan war against the French occupying forces. He wrote a ‘kind of 
Magna Carta of the partisan’. At the end of the book, at the other end of the 
same tradition, in the same lineage as Clausewitz, Lenin and Mao, in 1962, 
it is General Salan — yes, General Salan — who, in the eyes of a Schmitt 
alternately convincing and hardly credible, comes to reincarnate the concept 
and the determination of this struggle — once again against the French State, 
even if it be in the name of its former colonial empire. 

But let us stay with what is most important to us, from the vantage point 
we have chosen to privilege here: the question of philosophy. Friendship 
qua philosophy, philosophy gqua_ friendship, philosophical-friendship, 
friendship-philosophy, will always in the West have been a concept 
indissociable within itself: no friendship without some philosophia, no 
philosophia without philia. Friendship-philosophy: from the outset we have 
been inspecting the political next to this hyphen. Now, here is Schmitt 
asking us — and it is perhaps not different, since it is still a matter of the 
political itself — to think war, hence killing, and finally what he calls 
absolute hostility, as philosophy’s thing. Although this move belongs to the 
end of the Theory of the Partisan, to an essay registering the evolution of 
the concept of the political and an evolution contradictorily described in one 
place as a ‘dissolution’,!° in another as an ‘upheaval’,!® the reader of The 
Concept of the Political should not be surprised by this call to philosophy. 
Philosophy represents the properly productive agency of the purely 
political, and hence of pure hostility — and this, from within the historical 
process that develops the concept and the practice of the partisan: that is, 
that which calls into question the classical and stabilized, the regular 


concept of the political. Despite certain signs of ironic distrust in the areas 
of metaphysics and ontology, The Concept of the Political was, as we have 
seen, a philosophical type of essay to ‘frame’ the topic of a concept unable 
to constitute itself on philosophical ground. But in the Theory of the 
Partisan, it is in the same areas that the topic of this concept is both 
radicalized and properly uprooted, where Schmitt wished to regrasp in 
history the event or node of events that engaged this uprooting 
radicalization, and it is precisely there that the philosophical as such 
intervenes again. Quite precisely at the moment of the partisan’s Magna 
Carta, at the moment of Prussian, Spanish, and Russian resistance to the 
Napoleonic armies and their ‘humanitarian ideology’. But why does the 
philosophical discovery of the partisan occur only in Berlin? Because 
however Prussian it is, and uniquely Prussian, it owes something to the 
‘French philosophy of the Enlightenment’ and to the French Revolution. 
The Spanish guerrilla war, just like the 1809 uprising in Tyrol and the 
Russian partisan war of 1812, were, Schmitt says, insurrections of an 
‘underdeveloped people’. Catholic or Orthodox culture remained untouched 
by the Revolution and the Enlightenment. But the latter, on the contrary, are 
very much present in Berlin, in the age of the philosopher Fichte, the poet 
Kleist, and even those soldiers ‘of genius and vast culture’: Scharnhorst, 
Gneisenau, Clausewitz, ‘witnesses to the enormous spiritual potential of 
Prussian intelligence prepared for action in this critical moment’. Such a 
nationalism was not one of a simple, illiterate people: ‘The philosophical 
discovery of the partisan and the historical possibility of its theory took 
place in this atmosphere, in which an aggravated national feeling united to a 
philosophical culture.’ !” 

This properly philosophical theory of the partisan could not fail to feature 
a doctrine of war. Clausewitz had given courses on guerrilla warfare at the 
Berlin School of War in 1810-11 and had also written in 1809, as an 
anonymous soldier, a letter to Fichte, author of a study on Machiavelli, 
author of Zhe Art of War. Yet this philosophical event, this unique and 
decisive invention of the partisan, was also, to Clausewitz’s great 
disappointment, an abortive attempt, a semi-failure. On this subject Engels 
spoke of a semi-insurrectional war. This unaccomplished event betrayed at 
once both a philosophical default and a political one. Philosophy, here, was 
not yet philosophical enough; it had failed to realize itself outside of 
discourse and representation. It remained a still-abstract ‘theoretical form’ 


and, as such, a spark, a bolt in the dark, a flame, a witness awaiting its heir: 
‘The spark which, flashing out in Spain in 1808, had reached the North 
found in Berlin a theoretical form allowing the flame to be conserved for 
transmission to other hands.’!® The Acheron was hidden in the canals of 
state order: the dominant philosophy of Hegel, and the conservative 
reconciliation between the State and revolution. But the ‘ideological arm’ 
remained available, even in Hegel, and always ‘more dangerous than the 
philosophy of Rousseau in the hands of the Jacobins’. Its immediate heirs, 
Marx and Engels, were still too purely philosophers, thus by no means 
philosophical enough: thinkers rather than activists of revolutionary war. A 
‘professional revolutionary’ was still awaited: Lenin. The first authentic 
heir of the Prussian Magna Carta, he is in turn followed and radicalized by 
Mao. He would replace the classical concept of the political founded in the 
eighteenth and nineteenth centuries on the State based on the right of 
European peoples, and on interstate war, with the revolutionary war of 
parties. The latter assumes, certainly, in its Clausewitzian form, the 
friend/enemy distinction, but it becomes radicalized by carrying hostility to 
its absolute limit. ‘In the eyes of Lenin, only revolutionary war is true war, 
for it is born of absolute hostility.’!? Only this absolute hostility confers 
upon war ‘its meaning and its justice’.2? Only this absolute hostility 
repoliticizes space throughout a modern depoliticization which will have 
neutralized political oppositions in the classical age. A single question then 
remains to be asked, and it is the coincidence of the purest philosophy and 
the most intense concrete determination: who, in concreto, is the absolute 
enemy? Response: the class enemy, the Western bourgeois and capitalist, 
wherever he imposes his social order. 

Such was the passage between possible reality, real reality, and 
philosophical consciousnesss; this was, at present, the ‘alliance (Bundnis) 
of philosophy and the partisan’. This alliance frees new and unexpected 
explosive forces, and sets off ‘the splintering of this entire Eurocentric 
world which Napoleon had hoped to save, which the Vienna Congress had 
hoped to restore’.*! In this absolute present, in this parousia of the political, 
the identification of the two movements — depoliticization and 
overpoliticization — still necessarily leaves some leeway. A diastemic 
inaduquation gives history its chance. For example: if at last, and in turn, 
Lenin determines the absolute enemy in a way that is still ‘too abstract and 


intellectual’,?” Stalin, then Mao (‘the greatest practitioner of subversive 
war’ and its ‘most famous theoretician’), know how to provide this same 
war with its telluric rooting. Here would be the absolute accomplishment, 
the philosophical and historic concretization of absolute hostility. 

From this re-tellurization and its analysis given by Schmitt, we shall 
retain, in the economy of our argument, only one clue. It is of the utmost 
importance to us, even if it seems non-apparent, or seems to disappear as 
soon as it appears. We deem it important, in truth, for this very reason and 
because Schmitt points it out furtively — twice — as if in passing, like a 
passer-by who would go unnoticed. The double passage of a brother, in 
effect. 

How could a brother be the subject of absolute hostility? The hypothesis 
will have to be inverted. There can be absolute hostility only for a brother. 
And the history of friendship is but the experience of what in this respect 
resembles an unavowable synonymy, a murderous tautology. 

The absolute war Schmitt talks about, the revolutionary war that drives 
the theory of the partisan to its extremity, the war that violates all laws of 
war, can be a fratricidal war. And thereby have the fraternal figure of the 
friend return. As a brother enemy. This is an immense tradition, biblical and 
Greek. The first allusion refers to a Stalinian moment (the ‘fratricidal’ 
struggle of Tito, ‘helped by Stalin’, against Mihailovic, his ‘enemy from 
within’, supported by the English).7* The second allusion recalls the Maoist 
moment (‘race’ hostility, ‘class’ hostility, ‘national hostility opposed to the 
Japanese invader of the same race, hostility regarding the brother of the 
same nation, growing stronger throughout fierce, interminable civil 
wars’), 

If, in what is worse than civil war, worse than an unleashing of modern 
stasis, absolute hostility can aim at the brother and convert, this time, 
interior war into true war, into absolute war, hence absolute politics, does 
not this vertiginous reversal in the truth of the political occur at the moment 
when it touches its limit — to wit, itself or its double, the twin, this absolute 
friend who always returns with the features of the brother? And if the 
brother is also the figure of the absolute enemy, what does fraternization 
mean? 


(— But, I ask you, what is a brother? 
— Yes, what is a brother? Is one born a brother? 


— The question seems ridiculous, dear friend. Of course. 

— Not likely. Have you encountered brothers in nature? In nature and in so- 
called animal births? Fraternity requires a law and names, symbols, a 
language, engagements, oaths, speech, family and nation. 

— It is difficult, however, to erase this memory of ‘real’, perceptible birth, 
and birth of an identical, hence identifiable,*> mother. The memory of an 
identifiable birth, nature or nation. 

— Perhaps it is just the opposite. Well, it is indeed the same thing, if you 
prefer, but it is perhaps the opposite: instead of saying ‘difficult to erase this 
memory’, I would prefer to say ‘difficult not to remember’. Now that 
changes everything. To find the brother, the unfindable brother who is never 
found in an experience of perception, should you not start from memory’s 
injunction, and thus from some oath? Do you not think, dear friend, that the 
brother is always a brother of alliance, a brother in law or an adoptive 
brother, a foster brother? 

— And the sister? Would she be in the same situation? Would she be a case 
of fraternity?) 


It seems to me that Schmitt never speaks of the sister. He speaks little of 
the brother, but always in a significant and serious way: the originary friend 
as a brother of alliance or brother by oath, ‘sworn brother’”° (fraternization 
or fraternity according to the Schwurbruderschaft, in the passage quoted in 
our epigraph), but also — and this is the same one — the friend killed in 
absolute war: the absolute political enemy. Much later, as we shall soon see, 
to the question ‘Who can be my enemy?’ Schmitt will answer: ‘Myself or 
again my brother’; ‘My brother is found to be my enemy’. But he responds 
in this way to what, in effect, is in the form of a question; he responds to an 
enemy question, to the question of an enemy, as if he were speaking to the 
other gua enemy (‘O enemy...’), to the enemy present in the very form of 
the question, to what calls the questioner into question. The enemy would 
then be the figure of our own question, or rather, if you prefer this 
formulation, our own question in the figure of the enemy. We will hear 
Schmitt quoting: ‘Der Feind ist unser eigne Frage als Gestalf — ‘The enemy 
is Our Own question as figure’. 

There would be not a question of the enemy, or of the brother. The 
brother or the enemy, the brother enemy, is the question, the questioning 
form of the question, this question that I ask because it is first of all put to 


me. I ask it only from the moment it descends upon me with blunt violence, 
in an offensive and in offence. In crime or in complaint. The question 
injures me; it is a wound within myself. I pose this question only, I pose it 
effectively, only when I am called into question by the question. 
Aggression, traumatism, war. The enemy is the question, and through the 
brother, the brother enemy, it originarily resembles, indiscernibly 
resembles, the friend, the original friend (Freund) qua brother of alliance, 
sworn brother, according to the ‘oath of fraternity’ (Schwurbruderschaft). 
The question is armed. It is an army, a friend enemy army. 

It would be easy to show — but we will not spend too much time doing so 
— that the history of the question, starting with the question of being, 
likewise for the entire history governed by it (philosphia, epistémé, istoria, 
research, inquest, appeal, inquisition, requisition, and so forth), could not 
have taken place without polemical violence, without strategy and without 
arms techniques. This should be known, this can be known, without 
concluding that the question should be disarmed, or that only disarmed 
questions should be addressed. But without renouncing any question, hence 
any knowledge, and in order to keep investigating with vigilance, before 
and outside all war, what enables the deployment of this question of which 
Heidegger said one day that it was the ‘piety of thought’,*’ perhaps once 
again it will be necessary — and this would, perhaps, be the friendship of the 
perhaps, the perhaps ‘prior to’ the question, even ‘prior to’ the affirmation 
that opens it up and of which we were speaking above — to move back up 
the question, to move back along the question, further back than it, with and 
without it, next to it before it — at least before it takes form, when the friend 
and the enemy pass into one another through the figure of the brother. 
Before any question, before the question mark, an exclamation mark would 
then have to be heard. And this double clamour would have to be heard 
again, addressed to the friend who is no longer or who is not yet ((O my 
friends, there is no friend!’), as well as to the enemy who no longer is or 
who is not yet (‘O enemies, there is no enemy!”). 

‘“Enemies, there is no enemy!” shouts the living fool that I am’ — would 
this reversing apostrophe, this cat’ apostrophe, be ours? Can we at least 
dream of reappropriating it as an event of our times — ‘modem or 
postmodern’, as some would say? Nothing is less clear. To believe it, we 
should have, at least, to be convinced that it both affects and characterizes, 
at its edges, a modernity against which it rises up in indignation, to be sure 


(modernity, you are losing the enemy and deserting grand politics!, it seems 
to say; you neutralize and depoliticize; you must find the absolute enemy 
again!) but against which it also rises up like a figure against a ground. 
Rising up like a figure against a ground to which it belongs, this 
cat’apostrophe thus also marks and delimits a landscape, that of a political 
age for which it is so difficult, as we have seen, to mark off the limits. The 
‘living fool’ could certainly want to say, among many other things at least 
as enigmatic as this one: there is no more politics, there is no more ‘great 
politics’ — the same news Nietzsche shouts elsewhere. In complaining rather 
than rejoicing. Deploring, in sum, what Schmitt will call ‘neutralization’ 
and ‘depoliticization’. But, as we have just seen, this depoliticization 
broaches and conditions the build-up of an overpoliticization. The figure of 
the absolute enemy, in this reversing passage, starts to resemble that of the 
absolute friend: the deadliest tragedy of fratricide. 


(We could look for our examples in the Bible, which in sum speaks of 
nothing else, starting with Cain and Abel, whose ghosts we will see 
haunting Schmitt in his prison cell. Let us choose Atreus and Thyestes 
instead. In what is thus doomed to incest and to anthropophagy (to have the 
sons eaten by the father rather than the father by the sons), the stakes are, 
among brothers, those of politics, heritage, sharing out and assumption of 
power. In the absence of the father or the king. This is a matrix for a more 
strictly political rereading, a conjoined reading of ‘The Purloined Letter’ 
and the Theory of the Partisan, even the Ex Captivitate Salus. Such a 
reading would not play on the fact that Dupin introduces himself as a 
‘partisan’, and that a certain feminization of the rivals seems to be on the 
programme. Before copying these lines from Crébillon: ‘““Un dessein si 
funeste/S’il n’est digne d’Atrée, est digne de Thyeste.”’ They are to be found 
in Crébillon’s Atrée.’ Dupin had talked politics, he had declared his 
‘political prepossessions’ (‘In this matter, I act as a partisan of the lady 
concerned’); he had predicted the end, in truth the political suicide of his 
rival, the self-destruction of his brother enemy. The latter will vouch for 
himself, if that can be said, to disappear, he will doom himself to his own 
political destruction (‘Thus will he inevitably commit himself, at once, to his 
political destruction’). But what is it that you do in designating the self- 
destruction that resembles you like a brother? There are so many 
contradictory perversions, so many monstrosities (with all these words we 


are speaking here, of course, of truth as monstrosity). These monstrous 
truths call up the equivocal admiration of the brother enemy, of the double 
or the rival; they excite his pitiless sympathy; for if he refuses him all 
compassion, Dupin has trouble rejecting this feeling so close to, even 
indissociable from, pity: sympathy. A pitiless sympathy: this would be the 
most striking figure of war and death among brothers. War to death 
according to the phantasm of the symbiotic, not far from the genius, the 
congeneric and the congenital: ‘Jn the present instance I have no sympathy 
— at least no pity — for him who descends. He is that monstrum horrendum, 
an unprincipled man of genius.’) 


Schmitt has been reproached for making the enemy rather than the friend 
the ‘properly positive conceptual criterion (das eigentlich positive 
Begriffsmerkmal)’ of his definition of the political. In the preface to the 
1963 edition of The Concept of the Political he responds to this objection, 
which he considers a ‘stereotype’. In his apparently classical role as 
logician or dialectician — as didactician too — intent on methodically 
teaching the topic of concepts, Schmitt invokes the privilege that negation 
must be maintained in a dialectical determination of the ‘life of law’ and the 
‘theory of law’; but also, let us recall, in the life of the living in general. The 
law of killing (the enemy, war, politics, etc.) no more presupposes a 
‘philosophy of death’ — indeed, the essential existence of something like 
death (for Schmitt, paradoxically there is no death) — than the unceasing 
insistence on the enemy would in any way imply a prevalence of the 
negative, or at least the ‘primacy’ of what is thereby ‘negated’. It is as if — 
in a language which is not literally his own, but which seems to me to 
impose his own logic — Schmitt responded, in sum: I insist first of all on the 
enemy rather than the friend, and this is proper strategy because it is correct 
method. Should I have to start from the friend, as you invite me to do, I 
would first have to provide its preliminary definition. Now, such a 
definition would be possible only in reference to the opposed term: the 
enemy. I must therefore start from this oppositional negativity, hence from 
hostility, in order to attain the political. ‘To start from the enemy’ is not the 
opposite of ‘to start from the friend’. It is, on the contrary, to start from the 
opposite without which there is neither friend nor enemy. In short, hostility 
is required by method and by definition — the very definition of the 
definition. By the dialecticity or diacriticity, by the necessity of the topic as 


well, which cannot function without the possibility of war. There is no 
space, nor is there any place — neither in general nor for a thought, for a 
definition or for a distinction — without the real possibility of war. 

No doubt Schmitt’s language is, in appearance, more strictly juridical 
than this, but his response to the objections moves back up to the very 
genesis of a juridical concept as such. Hence his response affects the non- 
juridical or pre-juridical origin of the juridical. It is a question of knowing 
what to put at the beginning if one wishes to go about thing? in the right 
way: 


The objection claiming that I give primacy to the enemy concept is a quite generally widespread 
cliché (allgemein verbreitet und stereotyp). It fails to understand that any development of a 
juridical concept (jede Bewegung eines Rechtsbegriffs) issues, by dialectical necessity, from 
negation (aus der Negation). In the life of law as in the theory of law, to include the negation 
means anything except a ‘primacy’ of the negated contents (altes andere als ein ‘Primat’ des 
Negierten). A trial qua legal action is conceivable only once a right has been negated. It is not a 
fact (Jat) but a wrongdoing (Untat) that penal action and penal law pose (setzen) at their 
commencement (an ihren Anfang). Would this, for all that, be a ‘positive’ conception of 


wrongdoing and a ‘primacy’ of crime?7® 


Like the Aristotelian discourse on friendship, this argument could also be 
inscribed in the logic — at least, in one of its moments — of the unsettling 
logic of Lysis: once the enemy had disappeared, the friend would disappear 
at once. He would vanish in the same stroke, actually/effectively and 
virtually, in his very possibility. The possibility, the meaning and the 
phenomenon of friendship would never appear unless the figure of the 
enemy had already called them up in advance, had indeed put to them the 
question or the objection of the friend, a wounding question, a question of 
wound. No friend without the possible wound. The tension between 
friendship and enmity would be pharmacological. Friendship to remedy a 
wrongdoing, friendship to answer a possible wrongdoing or crime, 
friendship of consolation or of mourning, friendship of reparation — in the 
hypothesis that there could ever be another. But it is true — there are quite a 
number of differences — that this passage from Lysis represents only a stage 
in a process. It is equally true that Lysis names the friend rather than the 
enemy. And, what is more, the enemy is ekhthros, not polémios: 


For if there is nothing any more to hurt us, we have no need whatever of any assistance (oudemias 
Ophelias deoimetha). And thus you see it would then be made apparent that it was only on account 
of evil that we felt regard and affection for good (dia to kakon tagathon egapomen kai 
ephiloumen), as we considered good to be a medicine (6s pharmakon) for evil, and evil to be a 


disease. But where there is no disease, there is, we are aware, no need of medicine (nosématos de 
mé ontos ouden dei pharmakou).... It follows, then, I think, that the original thing to which we are 
friendly, that wherein all those other things terminate to which we said we were friendly for the 
sake of another thing, bears to these things no resemblance at all. For to these things we called 
ourselves friendly for the sake of another thing to which we were friendly, but that to which we 
are really friendly (to de t6 nti philon) appears to be of a nature exactly the reverse of this, since 
we found that we were friendly to it for the sake of a thing [we could go so far as to translate: by 
reason of, in view of, indeed by virtue of the enemy, thanks to the enemy, ekhthrou éneke] to 
which we were unfriendly, and, if this latter be removed, we are, it seems, friendly to it no 


longer.7” 


Here the analogy between the foregoing argument and Schmitt’s would end 
— or so it would seem. After this logic of contradiction (the friend as the 
adverse response to the enemy, the friend as the rejoinder to the enemy) 
Lysis seeks another reason to love, another cause of loving and being loved 
(alle tis aitia tou philein te kai phileisthai). In order to prevent the foregoing 
from becoming ‘idle talk’, a kind of ‘lengthy poem’, the hypothesis of 
desire (é€pithumia) is then put forward: the friend is the friend of what he 
desires, but if he can desire only that which he lacks, and if what is lacking 
can be only that of which he has been deprived (that which has been taken 
away), then one must indeed imagine that before this feeling of privation, 
and precisely in order to experience it, friendship (philia), qua éros and 
epithumia, must indeed be found to be linked to what is proper, suitable, 
appropriate and familiar (oikeios) to it. 

The value of oikeiotés dominates the end of the dialogue. It is most often 
translated as ‘suitability’. It frequently qualifies the bond of friendship 
itself, an always natural bond (we necessarily recognize in philein some 
kinship or natural familiarity, to men dé phusei anagkaion €min péphantai 


philein,*® but it forms an indissociable network of significations which are 
of import to us here, a semantic locus totally assembled, precisely, around 
the hearth (oikos), the home, habitat, domicile — and grave: kinship — literal 
or metaphorical -— domesticity, familiarity, property, therefore 
appropriability, proximity: everything an economy can reconcile, adjust or 


i! 


harmonize, I will go so far as to say present,’* in the familiarity of the near 


and the neighbour. 


(if the hearth is found within the semantic locus of philia, and if philia 
cannot function without oikeiotés, then little would stand in the way of 
saying that the central question of this essay — and we have already seen 
why this ‘question’ comes ‘before’ the question — indeed, ‘before’ the 


affirmation that precedes it, from the moment of the perhaps that they both 
presuppose — would be that of a friendship without hearth, of a philia 
without oikeiotés. Ultimately, a friendship without presence, without 
resemblance, without affinity, without analogy. Along with presence, truth 
itself would start to tremble. Like this prayer which, as Aristotle reminds us, 
could be neither true nor false. Is an aneconomic friendship possible? Can 
there be any other friendship? Must there be another? Can one answer this 
question otherwise than with a ‘perhaps’ — that is, by suspending in advance 
the very form of a ‘question’, and the alliance of the ‘yes’ — in order to 
think and to dream before them? And must not this reflection account for a 
certain end of Lysis, in its final leavetaking? Must not this question take as 
its starting point this place where it is avowed, after the ordeal and the 
experience of oikeiotés, after the so strong distinction between ‘oikeion’ and 
‘homoion’: between the familiar and the proper on the one hand and the 
homogeneous and the like on the other: ‘we have not as yet been able to 
discover what we mean by a friend’. Departure after the departure of certain 
‘pedagogues’, these ‘demons’ who speak ‘bad Greek’ (upobarharizontes). 
They have, then, departed, those who seemed ‘hardly fit to talk’: 


We owned ourselves vanquished, and broke up the party. However, just as they were leaving, I 
managed to call out, Well, Lysis and Menexenus, we have made ourselves rather ridiculous today, 
I, an old man, and you children. For our hearers here will carry away the report that though we 
conceive ourselves to be friends with each other — you see I class myself with you — we have not 
as yet been able to discover what we mean by a friend. 


The structure of this conclusion announces the reported statement of 
Aristotle — such, at least, as it is most often translated. Here, too, someone is 
addressing friends. He speaks to them to tell them, in the vocative élan of 
the apostrophe: we who are, among ourselves, friends, my friends, we who 
call ourselves friends, we do not know what a friend is. And we should 
have to imagine, we should never exclude the possibility, that perhaps, 
therefore, there are none. Or perhaps so few.... Exactly how many friends, 
if there are any, are there, my friends?) 


Let us return to Schmitt, and expand our perspective. That which a 
macroscopic view is able to align, from afar and from high above, is a 
certain desert. Not a woman in sight. An inhabited desert, to be sure, an 
absolutely full absolute desert, some might even say a desert teeming with 
people. Yes, but men, men and more men, over centuries of war, and 


costumes, hats, uniforms, soutanes, warriors, colonels, generals, partisans, 
strategists, politicians, professors, political theoreticians, theologians. In 
vain would you look for a figure of a woman, a feminine silhouette, and the 
slightest allusion to sexual difference. 

At any rate, this seems to be the case in the texts that deal with the 
political, with the political as such (The Concept of the Political and the 
Theory of the Partisan). Granted, there are indeed these two allusions to 
fratricide, but they are so brief. They lead to no reflection on the difference 
between a brother and a sister. Sisters, if there are any, are species of the 
genus brother. In this Christian space (we will speak later of the Christian 
scansion in the history of fraternity), one remembers that letter of the great 
and good Saint Francis of Assisi, who could not help but write to a nun: 
‘Dear Brother Jacqueline’. 

Granted, there is this remark that we picked up on a ‘stasiology’ that was 
to deal with civil war within the Holy Family or with a conflict interior to 
the Trinity — and it seems to us potentially ripe with the most serious 
consequences. But Schmitt does seem to give it short shrift — at least, in so 
far as it concerns sexual difference. Granted, too, there is this essay on 
Hamlet or Hecuba, but that deals more with ‘the queen’s taboo’ and with 
being an accomplice, perhaps, to a fratricide.*? 

What could, then, be massively evident in this immense, modern and 
ageless procession, in this theory of the political working its way in the 
middle of the desert, what strikes us in this philosophy of merciless war, in 
this staging of ‘physical’ killing, in this implacable logic of absolute 
hostility, what should be massively evident but goes as unnoticed as 
absence itself, what disappears in becoming indiscernible in the middle of 
the desert, is the woman or the sister. Not even a mirage. Nothing. Desert 
and absolute silence, it would seem. Not even a woman-soldier. Not even 1n 
the theory of the partisan is there the least reference to the role played by 
women in guerrilla warfare, in the wars’? and the aftermath of wars of 
national liberation (in Algeria today, for example — for another liberation, 
since Schmitt speaks of the Algeria of Salan). Never a word for the action 
of women in resistance movements (Schmitt is then more eloquent, let it be 
said in passing, when he evokes the resistance against the Napoleonic 
empire, against French imperialisms in general; and he remains so discreet 
on the subject of those women whom the Nazi occupation forces 
encountered not so long ago; they could nevertheless have provided him 


with interesting examples at the time of the theory of the partisan). If the 
woman does not even appear in the theory of the partisan — that is, in the 
theory of the absolute enemy — if she never leaves a forced clandestinity, 
such an invisibility, such a blindness, gives food for thought: what if the 
woman were the absolute partisan? And what if she were the absolute 
enemy of this theory of the absolute enemy, the spectre of hostility to be 
conjured up for the sake of the sworn brothers, or the other of the absolute 
enemy who has become the absolute enemy that would not even be 
recognized in a regular war? She who, following the very logic of the 
theory of the partisan, becomes an enemy all the more awesome in not 
being able to become a female enemy (une ennemie); in his blurring, in her 
blurring and interference with the reassuring limits between hostility and 
hatred, but also between enmity and its opposite, the laws of war and 
lawless violence, the political and its others, and so forth. 

Is this a question? Is it a question in the form of an objection? 

Nothing is less certain. 

If it were the rhetorical ploy of an objection — a ‘rhetorical question’, as it 
is called in English — it would be so foreseeable, so massive (which does 
not mean, for all that, unjustified), that it would undoubtedly issue in an 
amused and condescending protestation on the part of Schmitt. He would 
hardly put himself out, he would hardly lift his little finger, to start up the 
argumentative machine which has proved its worth. ‘Of course,’ he would 
say, ‘there is reason to be worried about the absence of woman in this 
analysis; one can even find therein what you are calling her clandestinity. 
One may, on the subject of woman, pursue sociological or psychoanalytical 
explanations. You can even protest in the name of morals, justice, or the 
universal equality of the Rights of Man. This may all be legitimate, even 
urgent, and I would be ready, under certain conditions, to join you, and to 
share in your interest in the cause of women — who, moreover, are indeed 
indispensable in the formation of enemy groups and peoples without which 
there would be no politics. But mind you, such a cause may derive from all 
these disciplines: psychoanalysis, morals, law, even religion; and you may 
even deal with the question from the vantage point of economics. But it 
remains the case that all this has no political pertinence as such. All this is 
undoubtedly — like love or friendship in general, between men, between 
women, between men and women — a universal human cause, but I have 
shown that what concerns humanity in general, and as such, had no political 


significance. Reread the sixth chapter of my Concept of the Political. | 
explain that the concept of humanity is an efficient “ideological instrument 
of imperialist expansion”; and, “in its ethico-humanitarian form, a specific 
vehicle of economic imperialism’. The universal concepts of humanity, the 
earth, or the world are, by definition, foreign to the political. What you call 
“globalization” is a strategy of depoliticization enrolled in the service of 
particular political interests. What is more, the analysis I propose — in 
which, in effect, sexual difference plays no part, and the women never 
appears — is above all a diagnosis. It is a matter of saying what is: the 
subject of the political is genderless; moreover, it has always been, in fact 
and as such, a man, a group of men determining his or their enemy and 
determined to “physically kill him”, as you have just explained. I never do 
anything but diagnose.’ 

How are we to respond to this rejoinder? We have already called into 
question this pretension to diagnosis and to the pure delimitation of regions, 
the very topic of this discourse. We shall not return to that, although we 
could now add the hypothesis according to which Schmittian strategy — as 
well as his topology, perhaps — has as its clandestine finality only this 
sealing away, this clandestine house arrest, this phallogocentric 
neutralization of sexual difference. In question would not be waging war on 
this being called a woman — or the sister — but repeating and consolidating 
in the diagnosis a general structure keeping under control and under 
interdiction the very thing which constitutes it — and which has for so long 
been called the political — indeed, the theologico-political. 

There would, then, remain only one choice, and it would call for a 
decision: 


1. Either to admit that the political is in fact this phallogocentrism in act. 
Schmitt would record the fact; and we could not fail to recognize that 
indeed, so many indications attest to it in all European cultures, in the Bible 
and in the Koran, in the Greek world and in Western modernity: political 
virtue (the warrior’s courage, the stakes of death and the putting to death, 
etc.) has always been virile virtue in its androcentric manifestation. Virtue is 
virile. Woman’s slow and painful access to citizenship would go hand in 
hand with the symptoms of depoliticizing neutralization noted by Schmitt. 
This structure can be combated only by carrying oneself beyond the 
political, beyond the name ‘polities’; and by forging other concepts, 


concepts with an altogether different mobilizing force. Who would swear 
that this is not in progress? 


2. Or else keep the ‘old name’, and analyse the logic and the topic of the 
concept differently, and engage other forms of struggle, other ‘partisan’ 
operations, and so forth. 

If there were a single thesis to this essay, it would posit that there could 
be no choice: the decision would once again consist in deciding without 
excluding, in the invention of other names and other concepts, in moving 
out beyond this politics without ceasing to intervene therein to transform it. 

For example, here. This double gesture would consist in not renouncing 
the logic of fraternization, one fraternization rather than such and such 
another, therefore one politics rather than some other, all the while working 
to denaturalize the figure of the brother, his authority, his credit, his 
phantasm. The preference given to one or another fraternization (the 
democratic one) presupposes such work, presupposes that the brother figure 
not be a natural, substantial, essential, untouchable given. This same work 
would affect, in changing it, democratic fraternization — everything which, 
in democracy, still presupposes this natural fraternity, with all the risks and 
limits it imposes. 

To be consistent with this de-naturalization of fraternal authority (or, if 
you prefer, with its ‘deconstruction’), a first necessity, a first law, must be 
taken into account: there has never been anything natural in the brother 
figure on whose features has so often been drawn the face of the friend, or 
the enemy, the brother enemy. De-naturalization was at work in the very 
formation of fraternity. This is why, among other premisses, one must recall 
that the demand of a democracy to come is already what makes such a 
deconstruction possible. This demand is deconstruction at work. The 
relation to the brother engages from the start with the order of the oath, of 
credit, of belief and of faith. The brother is never a fact. 

Nor any bond of kinship. Thus when Schmitt classes the ‘oath of 
fraternity or the fraternity of the oath (Schwurbriiderschaft)’ among bonds 
of birth or alliance implied in the ‘originary’ concept of the friend, when he 
sees it only as a case or an example, he still argues for a distinction between 
the bond of alliance and the natural bond, between the structure of credit (or 
of faith) and a ‘natural’ attachment which would go beyond credit. Now, 
such a distinction, however powerful its effects, remains a phantasm. It rises 


up on the background of that phantasmatics or that general symbolics in 
which, in particular, all bonds of kinship are determined. If, elsewhere, 
Schmitt privileges the brother, even in the fatality of fratricide, it 1s still in 
the vigilance of the frightened watchman. A watchman on edge [aux 
aguets| would still protect himself: in his watchtower, in the fort of a 
fortress, from the tower or the loophole, he would remain in this logic of the 
political that we think is deconstructible, in the process of deconstruction. 
‘Wisdom of the prison-cell’:*+ after the war, through his prison 
experience, Schmitt recalls Max Stimer. Stirner is convoked like the 
phantom of Schmitt’s childhood. Like a brother as well, an admirable but 
estranged brother. ‘Max Stirner kenne ich seit Unterprima.’ For he had read 
Stirner in his public-school years, this ghost, this childhood friend, this 
same Stirner whose spectres The German Ideology was already conjuring 
up. Schmitt then acknowledges his debt, knowing that Stirner had prepared 
him for what would happen to him today, which would otherwise have 
surprised him. ‘Poor Max’, he notes just before 1948, belongs part and 
parcel to ‘what is exploding today’ and to what ‘was in preparation before 
1848’. And now Stirner ‘pays him a visit’ in his prison cell, the spectre of 
the man who invented ‘the most beautiful tide in German literature: Der 
Einzige und sein Eigentum’. Schmitt cites The Ego and its Own; he 
paraphrases it, he plays in its wake with the words Pan and Plan, ‘this 
beautiful example of the oracular power immanent in our German 
language’. Having meditated on nakedness and on its opposite, on 
economic planning, productivity, technics, the ‘technologized earth’, the 
new Man and the new paradise, he takes up the theme of deceit or 
imposture — more precisely, of illusion about oneself, the ‘deceiving oneself 
(Selbstbetrug), of this Narcissus victim of the ‘dupery of self proper to 
solitude’, of this ‘poor Self who can only marry his own Echo’ (as if Echo 
could not have been able to speak in turn, and Schmitt quickly forgets his 
Metamorphoses, yes, as 1f Echo had not invented the necessary ruse for 
speaking in its own name, for reclaiming the floor, for calling the other 
while feigning to repeat the ends of sentences). The prisoner evokes, then, 
the terrible anxiety of Descartes pursued by the evil genius, the deceitful 
one par excellence, by the other spirit, the spiritus malignus. In the anxiety 
of dupery, the philosopher masks himself, he shields himself from 
nakedness. Larvatus prodeo. Schmitt quotes and echoes, in the first person: 
he speaks of himself in taking on the mask of Descartes. From one end to 


the other of these red-hot and despairing pages — haughty ones, too — whose 
rhetoric does not always avoid, with a certain pride, a landscape and 
commonplaces only too familiar today, they are the confession of one who 
confesses his doubts about confession. The anxiety is all the more 
terrifying, he admits, when it gives birth to new impostures. He throws 
himself headlong into this anxiety, having imagined himself, in order to 
conjure it away, confronting deceit head-on: ‘Imposture of feeling and 
understanding, imposture of the flesh and the spirit, imposture of vice and 
virtue, imposture of husband and wife.’ These vis-d-vis are all equivalent. 
Then comes death: ‘Komm, geliebter Tod’, ‘Come, beloved death’. These 
words appear to close a chapter; they follow immediately the sigh of the 
deceit of man and woman (Betrug des Mannes und des Weibes). 


Yet another chapter, for there is more: ‘death can also abuse us’. It is the 
next-to-last chapter; a ‘fraternal kiss’ will be spoken of. The phantom of the 
friend, Stimer’s phantom, has returned, the phantom of the thinker of 
phantoms. Everything the latter will have done to shield and to barricade 
himself is but the ‘greatest deceit of self. “As anyone is mad with self, mad 
with the I Uich-verrtickte)’, mad with me — sick of me, as we say — ‘he sees 
the enemy in the non-I (sieht er im Nicht-Ich den Feind)’. ‘Then the whole 
world becomes his enemy.’ For now we have him imagining that the world 
should let itself be caught when, “guarding its freedom, it offers him the 
fraternal kiss (den Bruderkuss)’. He then hides from the ‘dialectical 
dissociation’ of the ego, and seeks to escape from the enemy in the very 
time of deceit. ‘But the enemy is an objective force.’ It 1s impossible to 
escape him: ‘the authentic enemy will not brook deceit’. 

This last phrase then opens a brief meditation, a few lines, on the enemy. 
The enemy in the figure of the brother. We see Schmitt, the thinker of the 
enemy, he who in this century will have become famous for having made 
the enemy his theme, his concept, his theatre, in his prison putting his head 
in his hands and beginning the final anamnesis. He is ready to put himself 
in question, precisely on the subject of the enemy. He will not do so, he will 
never do it, no more than he will ever avow or disavow his Nazism.*> But 
he will attempt to say — on the subject of what calls into question, of what 
calls me into question — something that will still be called the enemy, the 
brother enemy. The question that resounds in this cell is not the converse of 
the question in Lysis (Who is the friend?), nor even the general or 


ontological question (What is the enemy? What is hostility or the being- 
hostile of the enemy’?). No, it is the question ‘who?’ as the concrete 
question J put to myself, and for which I will have to conclude that with this 
question the enemy puts me in question. It is the question ‘who’, to be sure, 
but first of all or simply ‘who for me?’ ‘Wer ist denn mein Feind?’ Who, 
then, is my enemy, mine, here, now? ‘Is it my enemy, he who feeds me in 
my cell? He even dresses and houses me (Er kleidet und behaust mich 
sogar). The cell is the piece of clothing that he has offered to me. I 
therefore ask myself: who can finally be my enemy? ‘Wer kann denn 
tiberhaupt mein Feind sein?’ 

Before this question, the jurist finds a second wind; he is willing to 
confess, but he recalls, across general considerations, that he is a jurist, not 
a theologian. These general conditions redialecticize the question. A 
dialectic of recognition (Anerkennung): in order to identify my enemy, I 
must recognize him, but in such a way that he recognizes me also: ‘In this 
reciprocal recognition of recognition resides the grandeur of the concept.’ 
That is hardly a fitting piece for an ‘age of the masses’ and its “pseudo- 
theological myths of the enemy’. ‘The theologians tend to define the enemy 
as something which must be annihilated (vernichtet). But I am a jurist, not a 
theologian.’ 

Oh really? What does he mean, exactly? That contrary to what certain 
‘theologians’ claim, the ‘enemy’, the concept of enemy, must not be 
annihilated? This, indeed, is exactly what he has always maintained. Or else 
that the enemy himself would not be ‘something which must be 
annihilated’? But had he not defined the enemy in these terms, and more 
than once? Had he not repeated that the enemy is first and foremost he who 
must be ‘physically’ killed? And as for his refusal to be a theologian, one 
wonders who said — and often in so convincing a manner — that all the 
concepts of the modern theory of the State are secularized theological 
concepts, and that one must start from theology if one is to understand 
them, and if one is to understand the concepts of decision, exception and 
sovereignty.°° What game is this man playing, then, when he says he is a 
‘jurist’, not a ‘theologian’? Should he not be the first to smile at this 
distinction? 

After this dialectical exercise (a Hegelian one, it must be said), the 
question returns, more or less identical, literally. One simply passes from 
being-enemy to the recognition of the enemy — that is, to his identification, 


but to an identification which will carry me to my identification, finally, 
myself, with the other, with the enemy whom I identify. Previously, the 
sentence was: ‘I wonder, then, who can finally be my enemy?’; now it is: 
‘Whom may I finally recognize as my enemy?’ Response: ‘Manifestly, he 
alone who can put me in question (der mich in Frage stellen kann). In so far 
as I recognize him as my enemy, I recognize that he can put me in question. 
And who can effectively put me in question? Only myself. Or my brother. 
That’s it. The other is my brother. The other is revealed as my brother, and 


the brother reveals himself as my enemy.’*’ 

The power and the sleepwalking levity of this progression. The prudence 
and the sureness of a rhetoric. The prisoner gropes about in the night, from 
one corner of his cell to another. He hazards a step, then another, then stops 
to meditate. 

1. We first went from a question (Whom can be my enemy? Whom can I 
recognize as such?) to the preinscription of the question itself, as a calling 
into question, in the ‘who’ to be identified, in the enemy as he who calls 
into question. Who is my enemy? How is he to be recognized but in the 
very question, which puts me in question? The question is no longer a 
theoretical question, a question of knowledge or of recognition, but first of 
all, like recognition in Hegel, a calling into question, an act of war. The 
question is posed, it is posed to someone; someone puts it to himself like an 
attack, a complaint, the premeditation of a crime, a calling into question of 
the one who questions or interrogates. It is posed to oneself in terms of a 
break into the other, or its breaching. One cannot question oneself on the 
enemy without recognizing him — that is, without recognizing that he is 
already lodged in the question: this is what the ‘wisdom of the cell’ teaches 
the solitary prisoner. The enemy is properly unavoidable for the person who 
thinks a little — if, at least, thinking begins with the question. The quotation 
of a verse by Daubler will express this in a moment: the enemy has the 
figure of the question, of our question — he is ‘our own question as figure 
(als Gestalt)’. 

2. Another step in the night — we then went from ‘calling into question’ 
to ‘calling oneself into question’. The enemy in question is he who calls 
into question, but he can call into question only someone who can call 
himself into question. One can be called into question only in calling 
oneself into question. The enemy is oneself, I myself am my own enemy. 
This concept of ‘one’s own enemy’ at once confirms and contradicts 


everything Schmitt has said about the enemy up to now. It confirms the 
necessity, so often stressed, of correctly determining, concretely, one’s 
enemy; but it contradicts the same necessity, for nothing is less proper, 
proper to self, than one’s enemy. The solution to this problem — the 
response that comes from a word like a key found inside the home, whereas 
it was being sought outside — 1s ‘Oder mein Bruder’. The ‘or’, the ‘or else’, 
oscillates between the oscillation of the alternative or the equivalence of the 
equation (aut or vet). Who can put me into question? Myself alone. ‘Or my 
brother.’ Oder mein Bruder. 

This is an a priori synthesis of the following sequence (I am, myself, the 
other who puts me in question, puts myself in question, the other is my 
brother, my brother is my enemy, and so forth). The a priori synthesis, the 
armed tautology, the genetic pleonasm comes down to making the enemy 
he who is at one and the same time the closest, the most familiar, the most 
familial, the most proper. Oikeiotés would gather up the totality of these 
values to define the friend in Lysis. But now oikeiotés characterizes the 
enemy, my own enemy, in the brother figure, myself as my brother: myself 
or, if it is not me, my brother. 

Such would be the originary complaint. We shall abandon as of little 
interest the question of knowing if that reverses or repeats Platonism. One 
does not exclude the other, since thanks to my brother, on his account, I am 
the other, and the closest is the most removed, the most proper is the most 
foreign. 

Why do we suspend the question of Platonism or its reversal? To some 
extent because for some time now it has been slightly wearisome. But 
above all because what follows and finishes this brief meditation brings 
together in the filiation of the brother a biblical lineage and a Greek lineage. 
And we are all the more intent on marking off this genealogical bifurcation, 
which will divide the history of friendship gua the history of fraternity, 
given that it announces the argument of subsequent chapters of this work. 
Which brother are we talking about? Who are these brother enemies? And 
which one is their father? Where were they born? On biblical or Hellenic 
ground? In a finite family or an infinite one? And what if these two families 
of brothers were precisely giving birth (procreating) the brother enemies, 
the true brothers truly enemies? And what if both, twice two — what if these 
two couples of brother enemies had exactly in common the fact that they 
never renounce either belonging (to a natural ethnic group or to a group of 


choice, to the family and to the fatherland, to the phratry, to the nation, to 
blood and to the earth) or the universalism for which they claim 


responsibility (‘all men are brothers’**), a responsibility that is always, of 
course, exemplary? 

The powerful and traditional logic of exemplarity would allow all the 
brothers in the world to reconcile the two imperatives. To believe it 
possible, in any case, to allow it or to have it believed. A brother is always 
exemplary, and this is why there is war. And among all the meanings of this 
exemplarity we do not exclude that of the exemplar, this Ciceronian model 
of friendship with which we decided to begin, a model at once both the 
original and the copy, the face and its mirror, one and the other. 

In the very next paragraph, Schmitt grafts one family on to another. And 
again dialecticizes. Deliberately or not, he names Cain and Abel, then a 
‘father of all things’ who cannot not cite a certain Heraclitean polemos 


(‘Pélemos panton men pater esti’).°? The Bible and Greece: 

‘Adam and Eve had two sons, Cain and Abel. Thus begins the history of 
humanity. That is how the father of all things appeared. It is the dialectical 
tension that maintains the history of the world in movement, and the history 
of the world is not yet over.’ 

Between the Greek family and the biblical family appears the thinker of 
the infinite — the thinker of the ‘true infinite’, not the ‘false infinite’. He has 
the features and bears the name of ‘philosopher’. We recognize the spectre 
of Hegel, even though he is not explicitly named. Schmitt ventriloquizes 
once again, to recall that the infinite passes through the annihilation of self. 
An allusion to all the exterminators face to face with one another; we are in 
the aftermath of the war, Schmitt writes from his prison: 


Prudence, then, one does not write in levity of the enemy. One is classed according to one’s 
enemy. One situates oneself according to what one recognizes as enmity (hostility, Feindschaft). 
The exterminators are assuredly sinister, who justify themselves in the allegation that the 
exterminators must be exterminated. But all extermination is but self-extermination. The enemy, 
on the other hand, is the other. Remember the formidable propositions of the philosopher: the 
relation to oneself in the other — there we have the true infinite. The negation of the negation, says 
the philosopher, is not neutralization; what is truly infinite on the contrary depends on it. But what 
is truly infinite is the fundamental concept (der Grundbegriff) of his philosophy. 


Then he quotes Theodor Daubler’s verse: ‘The enemy is our own question 


qua figure’: ‘Der Feind ist unser eigne Frage als Gestalt,’ *° 


Immediately afterwards, just before the epilogue, a double echo resounds 
in this prison cell. The ‘wisdom’ of the solitary one lets two apostrophes 
ring out: one attributed to Aristotle, the ‘dying sage’, and the one that 
Nietzsche cried out, in the name of the ‘living fool’. Two grievances, two 
complaints and two warnings name here the friend, there the enemy; each 
time the friend or enemy one has not. A double echo, to be sure, both wise 
and mad, but yet another language — that of the man who is undoubtedly 
awaiting judgement: 


Woe to him who has no friend, for his enemy will sit in judgement upon him. 
Woe to him who has no enemy, for I shall myself be his enemy on judgement day. 


Epilogue. Here everything is in the form of epilogue and epitaph. 
Everything chimes with this dying voice [in English] of which Schmitt 
speaks so much in his Hamlet or Hecuba. Will it be said once again, in 
conclusion, that the sister is altogether mute in this interminable and 
eloquent dialectic of inimical brothers? And Antigone between all these 
families, finite or infinite, of inimical brothers.*! No, one would do better to 
become attentive to several enigmatic signs in the epilogue of this ‘Weisheit 
der Zelle’. Something of a eulogy to Echo can be heard; her name appears 
twice. It is true that she speaks German, and celebrates her belonging to the 
German language. ‘Such is the wisdom of the cell’, Schmitt notes. ‘I lose 
my time and gain my space.’ He then pulls up short on the word space: 
Raum. The same word as Rom. He is admiring the marvels of ‘the German 
language’, its potential and its powers, its spatial energy and its generating 
force, its spatial and germinal dynamic (die Raumkraft und the Keimkraft 
der deutschen Sprache). In his own language speech and place rhyme (Wort 
und Ort). His language was able to safeguard in the word ‘rhyme’ its spatial 
sense and its space-of-sense (seinen Raum-Sinn), while bestowing on its 
poets the ‘obscure play’ that brings together, untranslatably, Reim and 
Heimat, rhyme and the motherland, rhyme and the ‘at-home’ [/e chez-soi| 
(let us not attempt to translate the assonance, for that would be to translate 
what should not be translated: precisely the untranslatable, that which does 
not have the good fortune of echo in another language, another nation, 
especially France, as we shall see). 

And here it is: no, not yet Echo’s sister, but already the kinship of 
brother-and-sister: in the very rhyme in which the word seeks the fraternal 
resonance (den geschwistelichen Klang) in its sense [ad son sens] (Im Reim 


sucht das Wort den geschwistelichen Klang seines Sinnes). But 
geschwisterlich qualifies the fraternal gua kinship between brother and 
sister. And the fraternity of this rhyme is German, ‘German rhyme’, not the 
‘traffic signal’ (Leuchtfeuer) or the ‘fireworks’ of a ‘Victor Hugo’! ‘She is 
Echo (Er ist Echo), the clothing and the finery’ (the heart of the text is the 
theme of nakedness and clothing); she is the ‘witch’s broomstick’ for the 
place (Ort) of sense — its location and its dislocations. 

Schmitt then evokes the speech of ‘sibylline’ poets, his ‘friends’, in fact, 
Theodor Daubler and Konrad Weiss. ‘The obscure play of their rhymes 
becomes sense and prayer.’ 

This is the obscure friendship of rhyme: alliance, harmony, assonance, 
chime, the insane Unking [appariement] of a couple. Sense is born in a pair, 
once, randomly and predestined. 

The friendship of these two friends (and that makes three) would 
opportunely remind us that a friendship should always be poetic. Before 
being philosophical, friendship concerns the gift of the poem. But sharing 
the invention of the event and that of the other with the signature of a 
language, friendship engages translation in the  untranslatable. 
Consequently, in the political chance and risk of the poem. Would there not 
always be a politics of the rhyme? 

The prisoner lends an ear to the speech of his poet friends; he is 
suffering, and sees that he is not naked but ‘dressed and on the way home’ 
(bekleidet und auf dem Weg zu einem Haus). 

The last words are those of a poem. As untranslatable as its rhymes. 
Naming Echo, it calls out to her as, naturally, she is born, grows or matures 
(wachst), like puhsis, in front of each word, before all speech; and she in 
effect comes first, she is the first word of the poem. 

Echo wachst vor jedem Worte. 

Everything begins with Echo. But only in a language, for a people, and 
for a nation. Rhymes sign, and in cadence seal a belonging. Rhymes attune 
the word of a language with place, then with a place’s gate, an ‘open place’, 
but ‘our gate’. And the stamp of the rhyme, like the hammer of a storm, 
bestows on Echo — we will be hearing it — an accent as exalted as it is 
sinister: 


wie ein Sturm vom offnen Orte 
hdmmert es durch unsre Pforte. 


A sinister exaltation, for one would have had to remind Schmitt — among so 
many other thing?, so as to warn him, if it were not too late — that in all 
languages — all languages — and therefore for all peoples, a rhyme can 
become a ‘traffic signal’. And sometimes worse still. Such a risk is 
inscribed flush with the structure of rhyme, in the insane couple it forms 
with itself, in the philautie of its linkage. It is also a technique, and can 
become mechanized to serve the law of the worst. To speak, soberly, only of 
traffic signals — all languages fall prey to them, as do the great poets of all 
languages. And nothing looks more like the traffic signals of one country 
than those of another, in Europe or elsewhere: this is the law. 

On another occasion, we shall say something different to honour Echo — 
the Echo of the Metamorphoses, in any case. This is not the place. 

Here, in its ‘obscure play’ — yes, in what such play recalls of what is most 
sombre — a particular German Echo retains the power to make both those 
who agree to hear her and those who prefer to remain deaf tremble. 

We shall therefore translate neither for the former nor for the latter: 


Echo wachst vor jedem Worte 
wie ein Sturm vom offnen Orte 
hdmmert es durch unsre Pforte. 


7 
He Who Accompanies Me 


Amor enim, ex quo amicitia nominala est ... 


Ex quo exardesdt sive amor sive amicitia. Utrumque enim ductum est ab amando ... 
1 


Cicero 


nature, the minister of God and the governor of men, has made all of us in the same 
form, in the same mould as it were, so that we should recognise each other, as 
fellow-beings — or rather, as brothers.... Rather must we believe that in giving 
greater shares to some and less to others, she wanted to leave scope for the exercise 
of brotherly love, with some people being in a position to offer assistance and 
others needing it. Since then our good mother nature has given all of us the whole 
world as our dwelling, and has, so to speak, lodged us all in the same house, and 
has designed us on the same pattern so that each of us could see himself reflected in 
others and recognise himself in others, and has given us all the great gift of speech 
so that we could come to a still deeper acquaintance and brotherhood, and acquire a 
common will by sharing our thoughts one with another, and has striven by every 
possible means to bind us together in the tight embrace of kinship and 
companionship, and has shown in everything she does that her intention was not so 
much to make us united as to make us one — we cannot doubt that we are by nature 
free, since we are companions of each other. And nobody can imagine that nature 
has placed anyone in a position of servitude, since she has made each of us the 
companion of all others.” 

La Boétie 


But there is no example yet of woman attaining to it. 
Montaigne 


And the brother is revealed as my enemy, Schmitt said. My own enemy. 
The suitability [convenance: also affinity, correspondence, appropriateness, 
convenience] of the enemy. The suitability of the enemy at one’s own 


convenience. The enemy had indeed to be there already, so near. He had to 
be waiting, lurking close by, in the familiarity of my own family, in my own 
home, at the heart of resemblance and affinity, within parental ‘suitability’, 
within the oikeidtés which should have lodged no one but the friend. This 
enemy was a companion, a brother, he was like myself, the figure of my 
own projection; but an exemplarity more real and more resistant than my 
own shadow. My truth in painting. The enemy did not rise up; he did not 
come after the friend to oppose or negate him. He was already there, this 
fellow creature, this double or this twin; I can identify and name him. 

The proof? He has disappeared, he has slipped off and I must call him 
back. The proof, above all others, is that I am still able to address him, him 
as well as them (‘Enemies, there is no enemy!’) for there immediately are, 
and by this very token, more than one of them, for the enemy, by definition, 
includes me.... To the point of madness: how many of them, of us, are 
there? Are we going to count the enemies now? And suddenly, how many 
brothers? I can call the enemy to appeal to him. I can do so owing to him, 
owing to his being the origin as well as the destination of the call. When did 
this begin? Who began? 


‘“Friends, there are no friends!” cried the dying sage; 
“Enemies, there is no enemy” shouts the living fool that I am.’ 


A moment ago, we were saying that I can call the enemy. The friend too. 
Theoretically, I can talk to both. But between talking to them and speaking 
of them there is a world of difference. In the apostrophe, there are first of all 
the friends to whom the dying sage was talking, and the enemies whom the 
living fool addresses. This is in each case the first part of the sentence, the 
vocative moment of the interjection. Then come the friends and enemies — 
the second part of the sentence — of whom the sage and the fool speak, on 
the subject of whom they pronounce a verdict. On the subject of whom 
something is said in the form of assertion, predication, judgement. And as if 
by chance, from the moment they are spoken of instead of being spoken fo, 
it is to say that they are no longer, or not yet, there: it 1s to register their 
absence, to record [constater| after having called. They are summoned to 
be spoken to, da, then dismissed, fort, saying to them, speaking of them, 
that they are no longer there. One speaks of them only in their absence, and 
concerning their absence. 


We are now going to deal with this difference. We are going to speak of it 
while speaking to you, through several detours. In English, this would be to 
address the possibility of this question. The question lies clandestinely on 
the threshold of our sentence, restlessly occupying the grammatical secret 
of its first word, a single letter, @. We are going to speak of it, talk with it, 
talk to it, across several philological debates around the unstable status of 
this initial Oméga. Everything, in effect, begins with the last letter; 
everything begins in a certain undecidability of the 6méga. But before 
saying even one word about it, we can divine a certain friendship towards 
the enemy to whom we are talking, and sometimes this friendship is more 
intense than the one with the friend of whom we speak. But nothing 1s ever 
certain. 

When you speak to someone, to a friend or an enemy, does it make any 
sense to distinguish between his presence or absence? In one respect, I have 
him come, he is present for me; I presuppose his presence, if only at the end 
of my sentence, on the other end of the line [au bout du fil], at the 
intentional pole of my allocution. But in another respect, my very sentence 
simultaneously puts him at a distance or retards his arrival, since it must 
always ask or presuppose the question ‘are you there?’. This drama of 
presupposition is at work in the messianic sentence we were speaking of 
above® (the incredulous believer who presently addresses the Messiah, 
while the latter, in rags in one of the capital’s suburbs, moves about, as 
always, incognito: ‘When will you come?’, thereby removing or deferring 
into the future the very thing whose coming he verifies, calls for, salutes 
and perhaps fears). There is nothing fortuitous in the fact that this same 
contretemps also dictates, being itself just as insane and inevitable, the 
teleiopoetic sentence, an example of which we recognized in _ the 
Nietzschean promise of philosophers to come, philosophers of the perhaps 
who may perhaps come but who are already, perhaps, at the end of the 
sentence promising them — providing your friendship for me lets you hear 
it. 

In both cases, appealing to the other presupposes his advent. By this very 
gesture the other is made to come, allowed to come, but his coming is 
simultaneously deferred: a chance is left for the future needed for the 
coming of the other, for the event in general. For, furthermore, who has ever 
been sure that the expectation of the Messiah is not, from the start, by 
destination and invincibly, a fear, an unbearable terror — hence the hatred of 


what is thus awaited? And whose coming one would wish both to quicken 
and infinitely to retard, as the end of the future? And if the thinkers of the 
‘dangerous perhaps’ can be nothing other than dangerous, if they can 
signify or bring nothing but threat and chance at one and the same time, 
how could I desire their coming without simultaneously fearing it, without 
going to all ends to prevent it from ever taking place? Without going to all 
ends to skip such a meeting? Like teleiopoesis, the messianic sentence 
carries within it an irresistible disavowal. In the sentence, a structural 
contradiction converts a priori the called into the repressed, the desired into 
the undesired, the friend into the enemy. And vice versa. I must, by 
definition, leave the other to come (the Messiah, the thinker of the 
dangerous ‘perhaps’, the god, whoever would come in the form of the event 
— that is, in the form of the exception and the unique) free in his movement, 
out of reach of my will or desire, beyond my very intention. An intention to 
renounce intention, a desire to renounce desire, etc. ‘I renounce you, I have 
decided to’: the most beautiful and the most inevitable in the most 
impossible declaration of love. Imagine my having thus to command the 
other (and this is renunciation) to be free (for I need his freedom in order to 
address the other gua other, in desire as well as in renunciation). I would 
therefore command him to be capable of not answering — my call, my 
invitation, my expectation, my desire. And I must impose a sort of 
obligation on him thereby to prove his freedom, a freedom I need, precisely 
in order to call, wait, invite. What I thus engage in the double constraint of 
a double bind is not only myself) nor my own desire, but the other, the 
Messiah or the god himself. As if I were calling someone — for example, on 
the telephone — saying to him or her, in sum: I don’t want you to wait for 
my call and become forever dependent upon it; go out on the town, be free 
not to answer. And to prove it, the next time I call you, don’t answer, or I 
won’t see you again. If you answer my call, it’s all over. 

‘Enemies, there is no enemy.’ The enemy is not given. Nietzsche’s 
cat’‘apostrophe was long since prepared, as we have seen, by such an 
avowal of hostility in self, within oneself. Not necessarily by a declaration 
of hostility but in the avowal of enmity — and in that of an enmity within the 
very intimacy of friendship. Prepared before Hegel, whose powerful 
heritage we have just recognized in The Concept of the Political, older than 
him in the patrimony, the ancestral interlocutor is once again he whose 
paternity Hegel was most inclined to invoke at every turn: Aristotle the 


grandfather. We must then return once more — and it will not be the last time 
we do so — to the one who will have been credited with these four incredible 
words that we are still transcribing without accent and without breathing, in 
an approximative spelling (O philoi, oudeis philos). We must return to the 
one to whom will have been lent, with so much interest, in a doubtful 
syntax, the indestructible capital of what, one day, one time, he would have 
given up to be heard ‘by the young Greeks admitted into his school’ — that 
is, this time citing Florian’s quotation: 


‘My friends, there are no friends.’ 


The epigraph of the preface (1963) to The Concept of the Political, prior 
even to its first word, also convokes Aristotle. It does not relate at that point 
what Aristotle said about friendship or war. Nor what is said of what he 
said. But what he is said to have reported. For though his sayings are 
sometimes reported (like ‘O my friends, there is no friend’), Aristotle also 
reported the sayings of other sages. Schmitt’s epigraph, then, reports what 
Aristotle is said to have reported of what numerous sages declare and want 
to say, what they think of friendship as well as war, institution as well as 
destruction. It 1s said that Aristotle subscribed and spoke in unison with 
these sages (und spricht es mitsambt in). Like them, he believed that the 
cause (Ursache) of the institution (Stiftung) — hence the cause of the social 
and political bond, but also that of destruction (Storung) — is friendship on 
the one hand, war on the other. 

Now for the epigraph, again a quotation: ‘Aristotle reports what 
numerous sages say and think, and he speaks with them: friendship and war 
are the origin of all institutions and all destruction.”* 

If something is converted or inverted in the two Nietzschean apostrophes, 
this is perhaps not so much because of the content of the utterances: the 
reversal of friendship into enmity. Once again, a reversal would perhaps 
leave things unaltered. What is of more import is what is inscribed rather, 
earlier [plutot, plus tot], prior to their contents, in the modalities of the 
uttering. Here and now, the quotation in the past tense (so rief), the 
exclamation attributed to a dying sage (der sterbende Weise), is replaced by 
a quotation — or rather, by the performative uttering of an exclamation in the 
present tense (ruf ich). A first-person singular responds to it, a person 
presented precisely as a living fool (ruf ich, der lebende Tor), a fool and 


living by that very token — and perhaps, too, because the loss of the enemy 
no longer leaves him either enough reason or enough force to identify 
himself, to pose himself in opposing himself, to present himself in the 
present or to gather himself as himself (ego cogito, ego sum, ‘the I think’ 
which acampantes all my representations, transcendental consciousness, 
Jemeinigkeit of Dasein, etc.). Without an enemy, I go mad, I can no longer 
think, I become powerless to think myself, to pronounce ‘cogito, ergo sum’. 
For that I must have an evil genius, a spiritus malignas, a deceitful spirit. 
Did not Schmitt allude to this in his cell? Without this absolute hostility, the 
‘I’ loses reason, and the possibility of being posed, of posing or of opposing 
the object in front of it; ‘I’ loses objectivity, reference, the ultimate stability 
of that which resists; it loses existence and presence, being, /ogos, order, 
necessity, and law. ‘I’ loses the thing itself. For in mourning the enemy, I 
have not deprived myself of this or that, this adversary or that rival, this 
determined force of opposition constitutive of myself: I lose nothing more, 
nothing less, than the world. 

How will reason be safeguarded in such a mourning? How is the enemy 
to be mourned? How 1s that to be worked out, however timidly? But at this 
point, how will you avoid thinking that reason is intimately linked to 
enmity, that reason 1s the friend of the enemy? 

Philosophy is at stake here, and this is what the cry of the living fool 
gives up to be heard. This is the piece of news brought forth on the winds of 
rumour, in its direct and continuous propagation (‘O my friends...’) or in 
inverted form (‘Enemies...’). 

Hence a first question: in what respect does Nietzsche here reverse a 
Greek and properly philosophical tradition of philia? In what respect, in a 
context which would rather be Zarathustra’s, does he denounce, instead, the 
Christian mutation that prefers the neighbour, to the Greek friend? And the 
neighbour, this other brother — is he not something else again than the 
Greek friend, than the near one of oikeiotés or — to speak Ciceronian — the 
near one of propinquitas, the proximity of neighbourhood and familial 
alliance? Would this neighbour be something altogether different from my 
relatives, something else again in being simply altogether other, the trace or 
the son or the brother of the altogether other? 

At the origin there is a rumour, an ‘it is said’, an ‘it 1s said that he is 
supposed to have said’. The origin of a rumour is always unknown. Indeed, 
this is how a rumour is identified. To say ‘the origin is not known and never 


will be’ is always — let us not doubt the importance of this risk — to open up 
the space of rumour and to license the ‘it is said’, ‘idle talk’, and the myth. 
But the question ‘Who signs a rumour?’ does not necessarily amount to the 
question ‘Who becomes responsible for its proverbialization?’. 

If the author of these four words, their very first signatory, is a matter of 
conjecture, can you at least trust the /etter of the reported remark? The very 
spelling and grammar of the transcription? Nothing is less certain. From 
quotation to quotation, from glosses to glosses, from poems _ to 
philosophemes, from fables of morality to precepts of wisdom, from 
Montaigne to Deguy and Blanchot, including Florian, Kant, Nietzsche, and 
so many others, an impressive convoy of Western culture has perhaps 
opted, at one particular marshalling yard, for a mistake on the part of a 
copyist or specialist in hermeneutics. Perhaps: there can be no testament 
without the possibility of a philological sidetracking. A testament is read, 
offers itself to readings, but also ordains readership; the testament is the 
Bible of hermeneutics. The feble would then not be The Hare, its Friends 
and the two Chipmunks but, rather, what the storyteller accuses the hare of 
not knowing: what Aristotle is reported to have said: 


... but my hare had this whim / and didn’t know what Aristotle / Used to say to young Greeks 
upon entering his school: / My friends, there are no friends ... 


Come now, would Aristotle ever have said that? And what if it were a 
feble? And even supposing he said it, what could he have meant by it? 

Let us first take note of this: the citational rumour does not seem to have 
any origin. It would never have begun, but would have simply alleged the 
simulacrum of its inauguration. In his Lives of Eminent Philosophers, 
Diogenes Laertius does not himself quote the sentence Aristotle is reported 
to have said. He is already playing the spokesperson for what Favorinos 
reports in his Memoirs. 

Everything here seems to issue from a last will and testament. Explicit 
arrangements were entrusted to lawful authorities by a mortal. The 
reference to Aristotle’s testament (diathéké) is its tone-imparting context. 
Friendship will never be described differently. Its description requires the 
last will and testament. Diogenes Laertius describes the contents of the 
testament like a public notary, a friend of the family, sharing in their 
mourning. He 1s, as it were, one of the legatees. As if he were conducting an 
inventory, he first reports the fine sentences and attractive apophthegms 


attributed to the philosopher. He is said to have answered the question ‘what 
is a friend?’ (ti esti philos) through the economic figure of habitat. The 
body houses the soul, offers its hospitality, inviting it to stay over. But how 
is this topology of habitat in friendship to be thought? ‘What is a friend?’ 
Response: ‘One soul in twin bodies’.° 

Dislodging the logic and identity of the territory in general, designating a 
principle of errancy, the letter of this response might well leave no one at 
peace. It would provide food for thought: a friend, having more than one 
place [‘twin bodies’|], would never have a place of his own. He could never 
count on the sleep or nourishment of the economic intimacy of some 
‘home’. The body of the friend, his body proper, could always become the 
body of the other. This other body could live in his body proper like a guest, 
a visitor, a traveller, a temporary occupant. Friendship would be unheimlich. 
How would unheimlich, uncanny, translate into Greek? Why not translate it 
by atopos: outside all place or placeless, without family or familiarity, 
outside of self, expatriate, extraordinary, extravagant, absurd or mad, weird, 
unsuitable, strange, but also ‘a stranger to”? Fundamentally, ‘unsuitable’ 
would be the most ominous, since friendship was so often defined by that 
suitability (oikeiotés) fitting to familiarity, as in a bonding affinity. And here 
we have madness rising up on the premisses. If we are stressing this strange 
atopia of the friend, the reason lies in the irreducible tension that may ensue 
in its confrontation with the principle, at once topical and familial — 
precisely the principle of suitability — which elsewhere defines the political, 
but in its bond to the bond of friendship. 

[A digression here, remaining between square brackets, on suitability, 
unsuitability. Montaigne draws the most audacious and the most 
uncontestable consequence of this — if you like — doubly singular definition 
of the friend: the friend gua one soul (singularity) but in two bodies 
(duplicity). Here again quoting Aristotle, keeping to the letter of his 
discourse, Montaigne nurtures this double singularity. He maintains its 
rigour to the point of the most troubling paradoxes in the logic of gift, loan, 
debt or duty — indeed, in the logic of gratitude — and therefore in the 
genealogy of morals. For any and all calculations are impossible, and these 
very words lose their meaning if it is true that friends are ‘one soul in 
bodies twain following that most apt definition of Aristotle’s’. The 
impossibility of this calculation, the ruin of the ordinary meaning of words, 
the avalanche of logical and grammatical absurdities, are the signs that 


allow the difference between ‘sovereign and masterful’ friendship and 
‘other ones’ to be determined. The philia most devoted to the other, the 
most heterotopical or heterophilial, is no other, finally, than the friendship 
of self, philautia, 1f not narcissism — and that’s not bad for a start. No more 
gifts or debts or duties between friends. If someone is to say thank you, it is 
the person giving to the person accepting. Montaigne has just quoted 
Aristotle (“O my friends, there is no friend!’), and he then moves on: 


In this noble relationship, the services and good turns which foster those other friendships do not 
even merit being taken into account: that is because of the total interfusion of our wills. For just as 
the friendly love I feel for myself is not increased — no matter what the Stoics may say — by any 
help I give myself in my need, and just as I feel no gratitude for any good turn I do to myself: so 
too the union of such friends, being truly perfect, leads them to lose any awareness of such 
services, to hate and to drive out from between them all terms of division and difference, such as 
good turn, duty, gratitude, request, thanks and the like. Everything is genuinely common to ‘them 
both: their wills, goods, wives, children, honour and lives; their correspondence is that of one soul 
in bodies twain, according to that most apt definition of Aristotle’s, so they can neither lend nor 
give anything to each other. (I emphasize ‘corrspondence’ [convenance]; earlier Montaigne had 
defined friendship as the ‘correspondence of wills’ [convenance des volontez].)| 


Such is the ineluctable communal and communist consequence (stylistically 
at once both Platonic and Aristotelian) of this absolute community qua the 
community of souls. But a communism dreaming in secret of the secret, as 
we Shall see, a political and apolitical communism which does not count — 
no further than to ‘one’, and therefore not even up to ‘one’. (Not even 
‘Against One’, to cite the second tide given to On Willing Slavery by the 
Protestants, which Montaigne, at the outset of his chapter ‘On Friendship’ — 
on this great testamentary stage — recalls. The allusion to ‘our civil wars’ at 
the beginning of the chapter gives us the clue: we are going to speak again 
of stasis and fraternity, of stasis among brothers.) What is, in fact, the 
inevitable conclusion of this ‘correspondence’, this so-beautiful word often 
used to translate oikeidtés? If correspondence is another name for an 
indivisible community of the soul between lovers, why should it harbour 
this taste of death, of the impossible, of the aporia? When friends 
correspond, when they suit one another, are a good match, when they 
match, one matching the other, when they agree to come to each other, then 
division would affect only their bodies, it would not harm the soul of those 
who thus love each other in sovereign friendship. In a moment Montaigne 
will draw from this indivisibility (‘For the perfect friendship which I am 
talking about is indivisible’) still other consequences — dangerous and 


abyssal ones! They will interest us under the heading of number, secrecy, 
and brotherhood [confrérie]. 

For the moment let us follow the economy of the gift, the gift without gift 
that Montaigne deduces from this joint ownership of the soul. In this gift 
without gift consequent upon the joint ownership of the soul, Montaigne 
recognizes not so much an indistinction, a confusion or a communion but, 
rather, a disproportionate inversion of dissymmetry: the ‘liberal’ is the one 
who consents to receive, the debtor the one who gives. The gift is not 
impossible, but it is the recetver who gives, and from this point on neither 
measure nor reciprocity will legislate in friendship. Neither synchrony nor 
symmetry. As if friends were never contemporaries. Broaching this passage, 
we shall be wondering whether the model of this friendship with neither 
measure nor reciprocity, this break with the mutuality of exchange, still 
derives from the Greek paradigm of philia, from which Montaigne still 
literally seeks inspiration. And whether this question makes sense, whether 
there is such a paradigm — if it is one — which would be an example of one 
(an exemplary model or artifact) and would be one. 

The person who gives is therefore the one who receives, as we are told in 
‘On Friendship’. The former thus gives only on condition that he does not 
have what he gives. The great but discreet tradition of this “giving what one 
does not have’ — which is bequeathed from Plotinus to Heidegger, then to 
Lacan (they do not return or give the gift back, of course; thus no one is in 
possession of it) — would now have to include Montaigne. 

But we should underscore the fact that Montaigne, by presenting 
marriage, as he typically does,° as that which bears only an ‘imaginary 
resemblance’ to this ‘holy bond’ of sovereign friendship, silently dismisses 
heterosexual friendship, excluding a holy bond that would unite anyone 
other than two men, two male ‘companions’, in the figure and the oath of 
friendship, if not in so-called natural fraternity. The bond between female 
companions or between a woman-friend and her companion could never be 
equal to its model: the bond of two male companions. The person who 
accompanies me, if he is the friend of the friend that I am, is a man. In any 
case, it indeed seems as if friendship between a man and a woman cannot 
be, in Montaigne’s view, ‘sovereign’ and capable of joint ownership: 


That is why those who make laws forbid gifts between husband and wife, so as to honour 
marriage with some imagined resemblance to that holy bond, wishing to infer by it that everything 
must belong to them both, so that there is nothing to divide or to split up between them. In the 


kind of friendship I am talking about, if it were possible for one to give to the other it is the one 
who received the benefaction who would lay an obligation on his companion. For each of them, 
more than anything else, is seeking the good of the other, so that the one who furnished the means 
and the occasion is in fact the more generous, since he gives his friend the joy of performing for 
him what he most desires. When Diogenes the philosopher was short of money he did not say that 
he would ask his friends to give him some but to give him some back! And to show how this 
happens in practice I will cite an example — a unique one — from Antiquity, (p. 214; emphasis 
added) 


Once again, it is always the example of a testament: poor Eudemus 
bequeathes nothing to his two rich companions, nothing but a responsibility, 
a duty, a debt: to provide for his mother until her death, and to provide the 
dowry for his daughter’s marriage. He is the liberal, since he “bestows a 
grace and favour on his friends when he makes use of them in his necessity. 
He left them heirs to his own generosity, which consists in putting into their 
hands the means of doing him good.’ But for Montaigne, this is only a 
pretext for posing the question of number. This example supposes ‘more 
than one friend’ (at least two, since Eudemus made one of the heirs the 
potential heir of the other). How are you going to reconcile ‘more than one 
friend’ with what ‘perfect friendship’ maintains of the ‘indivisible’? Each 
‘gives himself so entirely’ to his friend that he has nothing left to share with 
another, to ‘share elsewhere’. But arithmetic defies arithmetic. Here 
indivisibility permits and interdicts counting. Yes, indivisibility, that of the 
soul and of friendship, but the perfect friend that I am, totally united in my 
soul to my friend, I wish to give him so much that I would prefer to see this 
singularity multiply to give him even more. I give of myself entirely, but 
this is not enough — I wish, so great is my love (in fact it is infinite), to 
multiply, to double, triple, quadruple my very entirety, so as to give myself 
entirely more than once: 


For the perfect friendship I am talking about is indivisible: each gives himself so entirely to his 
friend that he has nothing left to share with another: on the contrary, he grieves that he is not 
twofold, threefold or fourfold and that he does not have several souls, several wills, so that he 
could give them all to the one he loves. Common friendships can be shared. 


We touch here on the most sensitive spot, the fragile and indispensable 
distinction, once again, between two kinds of fraternities, the natural one 
and the other. Natural fraternity (Montaigne, like Schmitt and so many 
others, seems to believe in the existence of such a thing) is not 
indispensable to perfect friendship; it would even be improper to it, as is 
natural paternity, for there can be no correspondence in the factual family 


(‘Father and son can be of totally different complexions: so can brothers’’). 
Likewise natural friendship can be only one of the attributes which I 
appreciate in the other, one among others in those ‘common, customary 
friendships’ which are by definition divisible. Whereas the fraternity of 
alliance or election, the figure or the oath, the correspondence of 
convention, the fraternity of the ‘covenant as one would say in English, the 
fraternity of spiritual correspondence, is the indivisible essence of “perfect 
friendship’. Natural fraternity is only an attribute; spiritual fraternity is a 
full-fledged essence, the very indivisibility of the soul in the coupling of 
sovereign friendship: 


Common friendships can be shared. In one friend one can love beauty; in another, affability; in 
another, generosity; in another, a fatherly affection; in another, a brotherly one; and so on. But in 
this friendship love takes possession of the soul and reigns there with full sovereign sway: this 
cannot possibly be duplicated. If two friends asked you to help them at the same time, which of 
them would you dash to? If they asked for conflicting favours, who would have the priority? (p. 
215) 


Not only the indivisibility, nor the uniqueness of the soul, but the 
singularity of the couple. Montaigne seems perfectly certain that one friend, 
one true friend, can never demand ‘conflicting favours’ of you (this 
contradicts — at least — the desire for ‘several souls and several wills’, a 
desire properly immanent to the one [true friend] and recognized as such by 
Montaigne). Montaigne, above all, marks off the simultaneously political 
and apolitical, or a-civic, structure of a perfect friendship which assumes 
the impossibility of honouring multiple demands and doing one’s duty 
beyond the couple of friends. This tension between politicism and 
apoliticism is all the more paradoxical since the model of the fraternal 
couple for such comparisons is regularly engaged in an extremely 
politicized scene. Here we have an invariant feature of which the friendship 
with the author of Against the One is only an example. Yet Montaigne also 
seems to mark off a certain transcendence of friendship with respect to the 
public or civic realm. Not without a subtle equivocation for which we shall 
have to account. It occurs at least twice in ‘On Friendship’. 

1. The first time when Montaigne insists on the exceptional nature of this 
sovereign friendship. If it is exceptional, it depends on fortune, on what 
happens: tukhé; and if ‘it is already something if Fortune can achieve it 
once in three centuries’,® no political project can predict, prescribe or 
programme it. No one can legislate on the matter. A passive decision, an 


unconscious one, the decision of the other in myself. Exceeding all 
generality. If Aristotle tells us that ‘good lawgivers have shown more 
concern for friendship than for justice’, this 1s precisely because the former 
should be placed above the latter, and even that such legislation is perhaps 
no longer of a juridical or political order. (Michelet will say in his Journal — 


and we shall come back to this — ‘Fraternity is the law above the law’.”) The 
law of friendship here seems — at least for the Montaigne who refers in his 
own way to Aristotle’s authority — heterogeneous to political laws. Better 
yet, its universality being only one of exceptional singularities, it would be 
heterogeneous to genericity, to all law — indeed, to all concepts that would 
not form the genus of the non-genus, the genus of the unique. The unique 
must be, every time, as is said of genius, a genus: in its own unique respect 
its own genus. The condition for the outburst of the ‘I love you’ of love or 
friendship. Hence the obligatory conclusion that spiritual fraternity is 
ageneric and a-geneological. There is no law of the genus for such unique 
brothers: 


thus preparing for that loving-friendship between us which as long as it pleased God we fostered 
so perfect and so entire that it is certain that few such can even be read about, and no trace at all of 
it can be found among men of today. So many fortuitous circumstances are needed to make it, that 
it is already something if Fortune can achieve it once in three centuries. 

There seems to be nothing for which Nature has better prepared us than for fellowship — and 


Aristotle says that good lawgivers have shown more concern for friendship than for justice. !° 
Within a fellowship the peak of perfection consists in friendship; for all forms of it which are 
forged or fostered by pleasure or profit or by public or private necessity are so much the less 
beautiful and noble — and therefore so much the less ‘friendship’ — in that they bring in some 
purpose, end or fruition other than the friendship itself. 

Nor do those four ancient species of love conform to it: the natural, the social, the hospitable 
and the erotic, (p. 207) 


Friendship at the principle of the political, to be sure, but then — and to this 
very extent — friendship beyond the political principle — is that right? Is that 
the good (beyond being)? The friendship of a justice that transcends right 
[le droit], the law [/a lot] of friendship above laws — is this acceptable? 
Acceptable in the name of what, precisely? In the name of politics? Ethics? 
Law? Or in the name of a sacred friendship which would no longer answer 
to any other agency than itself? The gravity of these questions finds its 
examples — endless ones — every time a faithful friend wonders whether he 
or she should judge, condemn, forgive what he decides is a political fault of 


his or her friend: a political moment of madness, error, breakdown, crime, 
whatever their context, consequence, or duration. 

2. The second time, in praising the response of Blosius when he declares 
his allegiance to the orders of Gracchus — an apparently unconditional 
fidelity, since 1t would have held even if Gracchus had ordered him to set 
fire to the temples. But, perhaps things are not so clear: 


They were more friends than citizens; friends, more than friends or foes of their country or friends 
of ambition and civil strife. Having completely committed themselves to each other, they each 
completely held the reins of each other’s desires; granted that this pair were guided by virtue and 
led by reason (without which it is impossible to harness them together, Blosius’ reply is what it 


should have been.!! 


The dividing line between the political and the apolitical is no longer 
assumed as soon as the unconditional engagement (and therefore the 
apparently transcendental engagement with respect to the public realm) 
with the friend supposes a priori reason and virtue. They could never incite 
wrongdoing, nor even allow something harmful to the public sphere to be 
done. Friendship can exist only between good men, repeats Cicero.!? 
Reason and virtue could never be private. They cannot enter into conflict 
with the public realm. These concepts of virtue and reason are brought to 
bear in advance on the space of the res publica. In such a tradition, a 
virtuous reason or a rational virtue that would not be in essence 
homogeneous to the best reason of State is unthinkable. All the couples of 
friends which serve as examples for Cicero and Montaigne are citizen 
couples. These citizens are men whose virile virtue naturally tends, 
however successful or unsuccessful the attempt, to the harmonization of the 
measure of friendship — unconditional union or affection — with the equally 
imperative reason of the State. 

The friendship between these two men who are as brothers is also the 
passion of a love. At least love is its origin, for Cicero never fails to recall 
the affinity of friendship and love which gives the former its name (‘Amor 
enim, ex quo amicitia nominata est.’'*) There is no secret capable of 
separating two experiences in which sometimes, in the singularity of an 
occurrence, what is fundamentally the same socius, the same friendship, the 
same virtue, the same reason, is revealed. This identity is sometimes 
revealed, it is perhaps bestowed by fortune and in a state of wonder: the 


tukhé of what happens to a virile couple of friends, ‘once every three 
centuries’. 

Yet Montaigne seems to continue to dream of a fundamental apoliticism 
or transpoliticism, which would command secrecy, an equally unconditional 
secrecy. Placing the law of secrecy above the laws of the city, this apolitical 
drive divides reason or virtue. The apolitical drive allows the essence of 
secrecy — or the interdiction of perjury — and, simultaneously, the essence of 
the political, to be read. Essences not qua facts or orders, but gua two oaths, 
two engagements, two responsibilities. Here again, this double bind does 
not happen to fraternity like an accident, but draws an interior and tragic 
structure out to its limit. One must choose between the sovereign fraternity 
of secrecy between two, in the friendship of exception, and, on the other 
hand, the brotherhood or the conjunction of political secrecy, which begins 
with three: 


If one entrusted to your silence something which it was useful for the other to know, how would 
you get out of that? The unique, highest friendship loosens all other bonds. That secret which I 
have sworn to reveal to no other, I can reveal without perjury to him who is not another: he is me. 
It is a great enough miracle for oneself to be redoubled: they do not realize how high a one it is 
when they talk of its being tripled. The uttermost cannot be matched. If anyone suggests that I can 
love each of two friends as much as the other, and that they can love each other and love me as 
much as I love them, he is turning into a plural, into a confraternity, that which is the most ‘one’, 
the most bound into one. One single example of it is moreover the rarest thing to find in the world, 


(p. 215) 


In each feature of this sovereign friendship (exception, improbable and 
random unicity, metapolitical transcendence, disproportion, infinite 
dissymmetry, denaturalization, etc.), 1t might be tempting to recognize a 
rupture with Greek philia — a testamentary rupture, as some would hasten to 
conclude, a palaeo-or neo-testamentary rupture. How easy that would be! 
The irruption of the infinite! A reassuring principle would thereby be found, 
the diachronic order of a scansion, a periodization which the painstaking 
historian would then have to refine or overdetermine. But the fact is here 
before us: we have just verified that this new ‘paradigm’ is not the coherent 
and applied consequence of a Greek principle of correspondence or 
suitability (oikeidtés). This logical concatenation could rightly, even 
literally, place itself under the aegis of Aristotle, under that of his argument 
reported by Diogenes Laertius — that ‘correspondence’ is but one ‘of one 
soul in bodies twain, according to that most apt definition of Aristotle’s’; 
that therefore friends ‘can neither lend nor give anything to each other’. If 


this continuity spreads across a logic, a rhetoric, and a politics of ‘spiritual’ 
friendship, then it would be difficult indeed, more reckless than might be 
believed, to oppose a Christian fraternity to some form of Greek fraternity. 
Not that the discrepancies are negligible — they are undoubtedly profound 
and irreducible — but they do not follow from a principle of distinction or 
opposition. Therefore their analysis demands other protocols. We are here 
in the vicinity of a generative graft in the body of our culture. ‘Our’ 
‘culture’ is such an old body, but such a young one too. It is a child’s body, 
the body of so-called European culture, between all these testaments, 
between Greek philosophy and the so-called Religions of the Book. A 
patriarch, born yesterday, who knows but forgets, too young and too old to 
remember that his own body was grafted at birth. There is no body proper 
without this graft. This body ‘begins’ with this prosthesis or this 
supplement of origin. Among other consequences, endless political 
consequences should follow from this law. Furthermore, this is the exact 
locus of what is happening today, today more than ever, and will continue 
endlessly. 

One last word to close this long parenthesis on ‘one soul in bodies 
twain’. 

‘One soul in bodies twain, according to that most apt definition of 
Aristotle’s’: between Aristotle and Montaigne, among all the discourses 
setting; off a powerful historical tremor, there is not only Cicero, but so 
many others. In the tortured landscape of these geological folds, on the 
crests of another massif rising out of it to leave on it an immense and 
singular signature, there is Saint Augustine. On the friend, the couple of 
friends, on mourning and the testament, the flow and the economy of tears 
on the death of a friend, the Christian infinitization of friendship or of 
spiritual fraternity which continues, beyond all ‘conversion’, to implement, 
in their translations, Greek and Roman schemata, Book IV of his 
Confessions would here deserve, for itself alone, an interminable 
meditation. We will, however, have to limit ourselves to a sort of 
preliminary topology. 

In the first place, Augustine adopts, without quoting it, the ‘most apt 
definition of Aristotle’s’: ‘one soul in bodies twain’. But he does so in 
surprise at having survived his friend. If he is one with the deceased, if their 
soul is indivisible, how could survival be possible? Augustine knew his 
Aristotle; thus he could write: ‘Still more I wondered that he should the and 


I remain alive, for I was his second self (il//e alter eram). How well the poet 
put it when he called his friend the half of his soul. I felt that our two souls 
had been as one, living in two bodies.’ From this admirable and rightly 
erroneous calculation, Augustine first draws — this will be a first stage to his 
move — a cunning, profound, troubling consequence, which bears both his 
inimitable signature and a form of universal revelation. He avows ‘horror’, 
and confesses to a double terror: that of surviving and not surviving, of 
surviving with half his soul amputated — the ineluctable arithmetical 
consequence of the Aristotelian axiom — but also that of not surviving, that 
is, of perhaps (forte) not keeping within himself, in what is left of self, at 
least a little of the beloved. ‘Perhaps’ signs the wager, and signs the 
calculation as well: ‘Life to me was fearful because I did not want to live 
with only half a soul. Perhaps (forte) this, too, is why I shrank from death, 
for fear that one whom I had loved so well might then be wholly dead.’ !4 
This is an abyssal calculation: do you desire to survive for yourself or for 
the person whom you are mourning, from the moment the two of you are as 
one? The paradoxes concerning the gift we were evoking above 
(concerning what would come down to giving in the name of the other 
[donner au nom de I’autre, also: ‘giving to the other’s name’ ]) in this case 
translate as follows: ‘to survive, or not, the name of the other [or: ‘in the 
name of the other’]’, for self or for the other, for the other in self, in a 
narcissism which is never related to itself except in the mourning of the 
other. Augustine can be suspected of offering his own egotistical interest in 
the conservation of the ideal pretext of the other’s survival in self. Let us 
not proceed too quickly. For Saint Augustine will have preceded us on this 
path, and he will perhaps have been mistaken to accuse himself so quickly: 
later on — in his Retractations, in fact — he will beat his breast in a 
retrospective denunciation of the ‘declamation’ and ‘ineptitude’ of the 
Confessions, when he presumed to desire survival in order to have his 
friend survive in him. But here he is assigning all the weight of the excuse — 
in truth, the chance of mitigation, of an extenuating circumstance if not of 
an exoneration — to a modest adverb, the one to which we have entrusted so 
much, on which we have wagered so much, the adverb perhaps: ‘This 
declaration appears to me as flimsy as the confession is grave, although the 
ineptitude is in some fashion tempered by the perhaps added to it.’!° 

In the second place, an economy without reserve is unleashed, 
announcing literally what we were calling above, with Montaigne, the 


arithmetical challenge of arithmetic, the indivisibility that induces a desire 
for an infinite multiplication of the subject. Hence a desire that aggravates 
all the more, to the point of vertigo, the originary guilt born with friendship. 
There is nothing fortuitous here, nothing necessarily indicating, the path of 
a historical influence. For it is due to the internal logic of the indivisibility 
of the soul in the couple of friends: ‘This is what we cherish in friendship, 
and we cherish it so dearly that in conscience we feel guilty if we do not 
return love for love (si non amaverit redamantem), asking no more of our 
friends than these expressions of goodwill (praeter indicia benivolentiae). 
This 1s why we mourn their death ... and life becomes a living death 
because a friend is lost.’!® 

Lastly, in the third place, the infinitization gua conversion in God, if this 
can be said, of this model of fraternal friendship. Here, one would then have 
to call on the testimony of the entirety of the Confessions, for this 1s the 
very law of their movement. In following our lead, we will limit ourselves 
to this point of passage where that which is turned towards God, towards 
His face, entrusted to God, trusting in God, assembled in and affected by 
God, in the dwelling place of God, in the home — that is, in the family or in 
the filiation of God, in this ‘God of virtues’ whom we pray to convert us 
and to tum us towards Him (‘Deus virtutum converte nos et ostende fadem 
tuam’!’), is not only the friendship of the friend but the enmity of the 
enemy. The enemy, too, must be loved according to God. The friend should 
be loved in God; the enemy must be loved not — to be sure — in God, but 
because of God. The question is not loving the enemy in God — this would, 
moreover, be impossible — but one can and must love one’s enemy because 
God ordains as much, for himself, because of the Cause he is. The enemy is 
thus inimicus, not hostis. One can imagine what Schmitt would have done 
with this passage, how he would have articulated it on to Christian politics 
and on to the properly political texts of Saint Augustine. Augustine says this 
at the heart of the Confessions: ‘Blessed are those who love you, and love 
their friends in you and their enemies for your sake.’!® 

Was this a digression? We shall go no further for the moment. This is 
perhaps enough to de-configure, if not disfigure, the exemplary paradigms, 
the classifications, and the customary periodizations. The fact that Saint 
Augustine and Montaigne (among others) continue to develop, deploy and 
make explicit Aristotelian and Ciceronian motifs, to claim authority for 
themselves in the letter of these texts while undoubtedly submitting them to 


a sort of infinite transplantation, to an uprooting and a transplantation of the 
infinite, is enough to cause us to suspect something untimely, some non- 
identity with self, in each of the presumed models: Greek, Roman, 
Christian. Later, and again on the subject of fraternity between brothers, we 
shall speak of other revolutions without revolution — the French Revolution, 
for example — and its relation to Saint Augustine among others. ] 


When Diogenes Laertius reads off Aristotle’s bequest, the issue is more 
than one of friendship. The lead is hardly hidden from view; it only 
disappears, to appear again a little further on. Instead of citing a sentence 
written by Aristotle, Diogenes is content with reporting the Memoirs of 
Favorinos, which themselves report sayings which are supposedly 
Aristotle’s. Some series of apophthegms seem to line up aphorisms. The 
deductive law seems non-apparent. Under their surface discontinuity, a 
secret logic is controlling the reported sayings and the indirect propositions. 
Immediately following this domestic quip, if you like, on the way in which 
the soul of friends inhabits more than one body, and on the arithmetical 
oddity that then transforms the habitat into a haunting fear (how might a 
single soul inhabit more than one body without haunting them?), here are 
two aphorisms on the brevity of life, on the economy of survival and on the 
blindness of the gaze: among men, there are the savers: they believe they 
are immortal; they economize, rein themselves in, abstain, dispense with 
expenditure as if they have to live for ever (6s aei zésoménous); then there 
are those who spend and dispense without calculation because life is too 
short, as if they are about to the the next minute (6s autika 
tethnéxoménous). As for the question of knowing why so much time is 
spent on the handsome, Aristotle would have rejected it as a blind question 
(tuphlou, éphé, to erdtéma). Why? Because one must be blind not to know 
the answer in advance: beauty itself? Or because only a blind person is 
interested in beauty, in the visibility of bodies? 

More or less under the safekeeping of writings to which reference is 
sometimes made, Aristotle’s sayings thus consigned are most often inspired, 
like all wisdom, by an ethical or political concern: equality, reciprocity (we 
might say a mutualism, a Friendly Society of antiphilein which we shall 
later distinguish, as rigorously as possible, however difficult 1t sometimes 
remains, from egalitarianism and social security), distributive or 
proportional justice, a certain concept of the rights of men or of the human 


person. All these themes come to conspire in the murmur of an ambiguous 
sigh: @ diAo1, ObdEio didOO, a cryptic phrase whose grammar, written form, 
and initial accentuation still remain to be determined. Let us repeat: for the 
moment we are writing it without accents. In particular without an accent 
on the @, without an underscored iota and without a spirit. This letter will 
have sketched, so as to give it space and form, a sort of crypt. Replete with 
twin ghosts. Around the crypt, mourning and ritual, in the course of 
centuries, ceremonies repeat themselves, and incantatory formulas inherited 
across generations of priests, and philological haunting, for love of a 
phrase: the history of a canonical sentence — a history, then, of exegesis, the 
work of the copyist: transcription, translation, tradition. All the transfers 
imaginable. But around a so-discreet diacritical mark, the underscored mark 
of a single letter which appears and disappears, around another 
pronunciation — in other words, around a way of saying otherwise. It would 
all come down to a difference in the way of accentuating, chanting, 
therefore of addressing the other. Would such a history really have 
depended on a single letter, the w, the omega opening its mouth and tossing 
a sentence to the other? Hardly anything at all? Less than a letter? 

Yes, it will have been necessary to decide on an aspiration, on the 
softness or hardness of a ‘spirit’ coming to expire or aspire a capital O, an 
@: 1s it the sign of a vocative inteqection, w, or that of a pronominal dative, 
@ with a hoi, and hence an attribution — the friends, oiAot, remain 
motionless, indifferent to what is happening to them in either case, the 
vocative or the nominative? 

® idol, OvdEi0 didOO. 

What does that change? Everything, perhaps. And perhaps so little. We 
shall have to approach prudently, in any case, the difference created by this 
trembling of an accent, this inversion of spirit, the memory or the omission 
of an iota (the same iota synonymous in our culture for ‘almost nothing’). 
We shall have to approach these differences wherever they count: in the 
modality of the uttering, the meaning of the sentence, the choice of 
philosophemes — in the very politics conforming to, or exploiting them [qui 
s’y plient ou emploient). 


* Further on, Montaigne will speak again of ‘the seam [couture] that joins [souls] together’, on the 
page preceding the exposition on perfect friendship, namely friendship among men: ‘brotherly 


harmony’ is a ‘solder binding brothers together’; the vocabulary of the artifice, seam and solder, are 
as important as — if not more important than — fraternity itself. Montaigne insists on this point: 
friendship is not and must not be a natural fraternity, but a fraternity of alliance, adoption, election, 
oath. Why, then, this ‘natural’ figure? Why this adherence or this reference again to a natural bond, if 
one has set out to de-naturalize? Why does the natural schema remain? This is our question. 

* Nicoimachean Ethics, VU], 1, 1115a 22-6; Politics, ll, 4, 1262b 7-9. 

+ Nicomachean Ethics, VII, 1, 1155a 26-7: ‘when men are friends they have no need of justice, 
while when they are just they need friendship as well’, p. 1825 [revised Oxford translation]. 


8 


Recoils 


In truth, those who have subscribed in complete confidence to the vocative 
reading that we have been pretending to follow from the outset (“O my 
friends, there is no friend’) have not even been properly haunted by the 
possibility of such a secret. They have gone so fast as to be unaware of its 
existence. Unless the haunting begins where the extravagance of the 
sentence thus accentuated is troubling enough to become unforgettable to 
the point of obsession, thereby allowing the unsuspectable to become 
unconsciously suspect. And those who have allowed it, those who have 
preferred the interjection to the dative, the eloquence of the interpellation to 
the attributive assertion, are by no means few in number. To my knowledge, 
those who have cited, celebrated, even published the vocative sentence 
under examination in henceforth canonical discourses have all, without 
exception, read the Oméga as an interjection, a vocative O, which is 
anything but certain — which would in fact be rather dubious, as we shall 
show. Montaigne, Florian, Kant, Nietzsche, Blanchot and Deguy, for 
example, rely on this reading. And the same goes for the French, German, 
and Spanish translations of Diogenes Laertius that we have been able to 
check.! This, then, is the most widespread reading, the only one to have 
become legendary, the one to which ‘On Friendship’ subscribes, where 
Montaigne distinguishes great friendship, “sovereign master friendship’, not 
only from ‘those other common friendships’ but, indeed, from ‘the most 
perfect of their kind’. The bond uniting me to the soul of the friend is not 
only the knot of an attachment between two, between two equals, two 
subjects, or two symmetrical wills. This bond places me under the law of 


the other. It disjoins and disproportions me, inspiring a confidence, a faith, a 
‘fidence’ [fiance] greater in the other than in myself, and this disymmetry 
itself, alone, marks the rupture between knowing and loving, reason and 
affect; between knowledge and the heart — or the body and the ‘entrails’. 
Here, ‘ardent affection’; there, coldness. The knowledge we have of each 
other may be symmetrical and reflective, equally shared in the glass of a 
mirror; it is nevertheless autonomous on both sides. As for trust, it could 
never be measured in this way; in truth it cannot be measured, it hails from 
the ‘depths’ [‘/e fin fond’], it is not aligned on knowledge — even if, in its 
own sublime way, it also has such knowledge: I must trust the other more 
than myself, and this sliver of mirror is indeed the sign that my friendship 
reaches towards, and is sustained in, the other. It depends more on the other 
than on myself. Passion and heteronomy: 


Our souls were yoked together in such unity, and contemplated each other with so ardent an 
affection, and with the same affection revealed each to each other right down to the very entrails, 
that not only did I know his mind as well as I knew my own but I would have entrusted myself to 
him with greater assurance than to myself. (‘On Friendship’, p. 213) 


This ‘fidence’ does not bear upon this thing or that: I do not trust the other 
more than myself relative to this or that object, this or that decision for 
which I would thus depend on his counsel, his wisdom, knowledge, or 
experience. No, it is on the subject of my very self ‘deep down’ in myself; it 
is regarding myself, in the inner recess of my ‘regarding myself, that I 
entrust myself, without measure, to the other. I entrust myself to him more 
than to myself, he is in me before me and more than me. ‘Because it was 
him; because it was me’: another Aristotelian topos*, another Ciceronian 
topos (‘Est enim is [verus amicus], qui est tamquam alter idem’>). 
Heteronomic trust exceeds the reflexive forms of knowledge and 
consciousness of a subject, all the certitudes of an ego cogito. No cogito can 
measure up to such a friendship. I think from out of it, it thinks me before I 
even know how to think. It needs only to become evil to start looking like 
the Evil Genius. 

Providing, however, that this friendship is not confused with the others, 
that the homonymy does not lead us astray. This is the moment when 
Montaigne quotes Aristotle, and trusts that he is quoting an interjection. He 
is seeking to limit its range to ‘common and customary’ friendships, those 
that can also turn into hatred (Montaigne, then, would not have been at all 


surprised at the Nietzschean reversal; he would have limited it to ‘common’ 
friendships and enmities): 


Let nobody place those other common friendships in the same rank as this. I know about them — 
the most perfect of their kind — ... you would deceive yourself. In those other friendships you 
must proceed with wisdom and caution, keeping the reins in your hand: the bond is not so well 
tied that there is no reason to doubt it. ‘Love a friend’, said Chilo, ‘as though some day you must 
hate him: hate him, as though you must love him.’ That precept which is so detestable in that 
sovereign master friendship is salutary in the practice of friendships which are common and 
customary, in relation to which you must employ that saying which Aristotle often repeated: ‘O 
my friends, there is no friend!’ (pp. 213-14) 


Is Montaigne therefore following Diogenes Laertius? Does he not, once 
again, distort the Aristotelian thematic, while developing and deploying its 
letter? Does not the heteronomic disproportion of sovereign friendship, 
once translated into the political realm, endanger the principle of equality, 
mutuality, and autarky which, it would seem, inspires Aristotle? But our 
question at every moment concerns political translation. It is indeed a 
question of knowing the rules of translation, but first of all of making sure 
that translation is possible and that everything can be translated into 
politics. Is the political a universal translating machine? 

We continue, then, to wonder what it might well mean for lawgivers to 
‘have shown more concern for friendship than for justice’, as Montaigne 
likes to say Aristotle liked to say. Concerning, for example, proportional 
justice or a measurable equality of rights, gua human rights, Diogenes is 
intent on saying on two occasions, and in two slightly different forms, what 
Aristotle never failed to say on the subject — that his concern was for the 
human qua human, the human before the individual, the human prior to all 
moral difference differentiating the human and the individual. If a man 
gives (for example, to someone unworthy — a conman, for instance — he 
gives to the human, to the humanity of the human in him, not to his 
character, to his manner of life [tvopos], or to his morality): “He was 
accused of taking pity on a knave. He answered that he was thinking of the 
man, not of his morals.’* He thereby invokes the form or essence of the 
human. This humanity of the human destroys the finite proportionality that 
would ordain the calculation of worth, to give following only this rule. A 
principle of infinity has already entered the proportionality. In proportioning 
everything on the scale of the human, in measuring everything against the 
standard of my friendship for the humanity of the human being, I no longer 


hold to the finite proportion of empirical determinations or of law (the 
conman is worth less than the gendeman, etc.). This excess of one 
proportion over another heralds, in certain respects, the excess found in 
Montaigne that is of interest to us. But here it remains measured by a 
generality (the human in each human being — in every man and woman) and 
not by the singularity of an attachment, by the ‘affection’ or sovereign 
friendship of a couple the likes of which is seen once in every three 
centuries. The problem of inegalitarian heteronomy remains intact. Unless 
equality, a certain equality, could be saved in respect of disymmetrical and 
heteronomic singularities. This equality would be at once calculable and 
incalculable; it would count on the incalculable. 

The same logic is at work on the subject of freedom, when Diogenes 
reports another of Aristotle’s sayings. This one speaks of freedom, as well 
as of servitude, in a language closer to that of On Willing Slavery than to the 
one sometimes attributed to it by the doxa which greatly reduces its 
complexity. Once again, it is approximately the same question as before: 
‘He was accused of giving alms to a knave: He answered (for the fact is 
related in this manner): “I have given alms not to the individual, but to the 
man.” He gave it not to a man, to a particular man, but to the human, to 
the humanity of the human race. This sentence can be compared to the 
Nicomachean Ethics (1161b). Aristotle recalls the friendship due to the 
slave, but the slave gua human, not gua slave. What makes the difference, 
here, what finally justifies friendship, is the soul or the life (psukhé) of the 
slave. More precisely, psukhé in so far as it will not be reduced to the 
technical, to the machine, to the automat or to the tool (6rganon). The soul 
is what makes the slave a man. One could not be friends with an organon as 
such. The slave is an animate tool (émpsukhon organon), the tool is an 
inanimate slave (apsukhos doulos). In so far as he remains a tool, the slave 
will never inspire friendship. But the animate tool is also a man, and there is 
general agreement that there is something just (dikaion), that there is a 
relation of justice between all men — that is, between beings capable of 
entering into a community of sharing or participation (Adinénésai) 
according to law (ndmos) or convention (sunthéké), the suitability of 
convention. To say that one can be friends with a slave gua man (kai philia 
di, kath oson anthropos) is to imply, in the same systemic cohesion, a series 
of indissociable concepts: friendship (philia), man (dnthrdpos), soul 
(psukhé), the just (dikaion), law (nomos), and the contract (sunthéké). A few 


lines above, Aristotle had underscored the bond between justice, friendship, 
and communal sharing (koindnia).© Two consequences for friendship can 
immediately be drawn: 

1. Friendship is irreducible and heterogeneous to the tool (6tganon), to 
instrumentalization or — if one can widen or modernize things in this way — 
to all technical dimensions. 

2. This same axiomatic dooms friendship in advance to democracy qua 
its destiny. There is here not a fact but a tendential law, a relation of 
proportion: since there are more shared things where citizens are equal, 
since communal sharing implies more law, more contract and convention, 
democracy is, then, more favourable to friendship than tyranny (1161b 5— 
10). For the paternal relation is a royal or monarchical one; the relation 
between a man and his spouse is aristocratic. But the relation of brothers is 
properly ‘political’ (often translated: ‘democratic’ [Salomon translates it: 
‘that of a commonwealth’]). The politeia is the brothers’ affair (ton 
adelphon: Eudemian Ethics, 1241b 30). Tyranny, oligarchy and democracy 
(Aristotle says simply demos here) are derived from these three forms. 
Between the political as such, fraternity, and democracy, their co- 
implication or mutual appurtenance would be quasi-tautological. 

This concept of democracy is confirmed in the Eudemian Ethics (1236 
ab): it is a politics of friendship founded on an anthropocentric — one could 
say humanist — concept. To man alone, in so far as he is neither animal nor 
god, is appointed the primary and highest friendship, that from which all the 
others receive their name, as it were, even if they are not simply its 
homonyms or synonyms, even if they are not its species, and even if they 
do not relate to this primary sense in a simply equivocal or univocal way. 
This friendship in the primary sense (é€ proté philia), which is also the 
highest, if not the universal, sense, is that of friendship founded upon virtue 
(di ’aretén). It is reserved to man, since it implies this faculty of decision, of 
deliberation or reflective choice (proairesis, bouleusis) which appertains to 
neither animals nor to God. A system link will be easily recognized here 
between this properly human faculty (neither animal nor divine) of 
deliberation or calculation, on the one hand, and on the other, the concepts 
of law (nomos), convention (sunthéké), or community (koindnia) which, as 
we noted above, are implied in friendship as well as in democracy, and 
which, furthermore, bind together, in their very essence, friendship and 
democracy. There is no friendship, at least in this primary sense, with 


animals or with gods. There is no friendship, either, between animals or 
gods. No more so than democracy, fraternity, law, community, or politics. 

But are things this simple? Is one entitled to speak only of friendship in 
the primary sense, of friendship founded on virtue, without slipping into 
aporias and contradictions? These aporias and contradictions are perhaps of 
another order than those Aristotle announces as such, while promising to 
undo them. Having multiplied the aporias (aporeitai de polla peri tes 
philias), beginning with those of all values that seem worthy of friendship 
(likeness, unlikeness, the contrary or the useful), the Eudemian Ethics had, 
as it were, set down the task: beyond these opinions (doxai), to find a 
definition, prior, precisely, to a Jogos of friendship allowing both for an 
account of different opinions on this subject ‘and to put an end to aporias 
and contradictions’ ./ 

We would like to approach here, perhaps, other aporias and other 
contradictions, knots of thought which perhaps promise something else 
(and this ‘perhaps’ to which we hold is perhaps no longer a mere working 
hypothesis). In any case, these knots would no longer promise such an 
analytical outcome. They would no longer submit to being understood by 
such a programme, by the tasks and bonds of such a /6gos of friendship. 
Consequently, they would no longer submit to being named, adequately, 
‘aporia’ or ‘contradiction’ — at least in this sense, in the /égos of this Jogos. 
They would exceed it — not towards the space or the hope of satisfactory 
solutions, in a new architectonic, analytical, or dialectical order, but in the 
direction of a sort of hyper-aporetic. It would be the arche-preliminary 
condition of another experience or another interpretation of friendship, and, 
by this very fact, the condition, at least negative, of another political 
thought — that is, another thought of decision and responsibility as well. 

Politics of friendship: our theme thus invites us to privilege — indeed, to 
isolate — the place of the political in the general logic of this hyper-aporetic, 
in the hierarchy or architectonic proposed by Aristotle. On the one hand, as 
we have seen, the work of the political, the properly political act or 
operation, comes down to creating (producing, making, etc.) the most 
possible friendship (1234b 22-3). This tendential law — one might say this 
telos — seems, in the same move — to bind friendship to politics — in their 
origin as well as their end. If the political carries out its work in the very 
progress of friendship, then the two motifs, as well as the two movements, 
seem contemporaneous, co-originary and coextensive. In each and every 


aspect, friendship would be political. Is this not confirmed in Book III of 
Aristotle’s Politics? Does it not stress that everything that comes to pass in 
the polis is ‘the work of friendship (philias éigon)’? That the deliberate 
choice (proairesis) of a living-together (tou suzén) is friendship itself (1280 
b 13)? Be it a matter of living together, cohabiting in the same place 
(topos), contracting marriages or participating in the life of the phratry, 
offering sacrifices, etc. — all this, in effect, defines the polis. Let us note in 
passing that the emphasis here is on the familial bond gua ‘phratry’. The 
phratry is certainly not dominated by the position of the brother (adelphos), 
but it could never, in its very derivation, be totally alien to the brother’s 
position. The télos of the State (polis) is the ‘good life (to eu zen)’, and the 
good life corresponds to the positivity of a living together (suzén). This is 
nothing other than friendship in general. The polis not only cannot not set 
itself up in dispersion or separation, but it cannot even be gathered into one 
place to answer in reaction to injustice or to be content with ensuring 
commerce. The final project of a community (koindnia) of the good life, for 
families, houses, filiations, is required. And this is in view of a perfect and 
autarkic life (zdés teletas kharin kai autarkous: 1242a, 11-12). The force 
and movement of this social bond qua political bond, the té/os assuming its 
origin no less than its end, is indeed philia. Philia seems, therefore, to be 
thoroughly political. Its binding or attractive force binds the state (the city, 
the polis) to the phratry (family, generations, fraternity in general) as much 
as to place. 

This is indeed a difficult conclusion to accept in the light of a reading of 
other analyses. Even if a// friendship is in some respect political, strictly or 
properly political friendship is only one kind of friendship. Above all, it is 
not the primary or the highest of its forms. One wonders how this disjoining 
in the very concept of the political, where it articulates itself on to the 
political, is to be interpreted. Why does its range seem to exceed itself or to 
annex a shadow which sometimes follows, sometimes precedes it? Why 
does the political seem to begin before the political? 

Lower in the hierarchy, under ‘primary’ friendship, under the friendship 
of virtue, two other kinds of friendship share at least the same name. The 
third and last is grounded in pleasure (dia to édu): it is unstable and most 
often found among young people. But concerning what is of the utmost 
importance to us here, the second type of friendship has something 
troubling about it for the very order of this conceptuallty as a whole. In 


question is a friendship grounded neither in virtue nor in pleasure, but in 
usefulness (dia to khrésimon). Unlike friendship between parents 
(suggeniké) or friendship among comrades (etairiké€), so-called political 
friendship is grounded in association or community in view of the useful. 
The political community (koindnia) is therefore neither the family nor 
comradeship. But given that the point of our question has for some time 
now directed us towards the political question of the family and, within it, 
to fraternity, we are obliged to take a closer look. 

The family is a friendship; Aristotle says so explicitly (oikia d’esti tis 
philia — Eudemian Ethics, 1242a 28). Oikia is the family, but also the house 
in the broad sense of the term: race as well as domesticity. Now this 
economic friendship, this parental or domestic friendship, also constitutes a 
community (Aoinonia), and thus features a kind of justice (dikaion ti). Even 
in the absence of polis, there would be a kind of justice, notes Aristotle 
(ibid.). In other words, the family, in this broad sense, features the two traits 
of the political (community and justice — but it would be better to say ‘law’) 
where the political as such has not yet appeared, nor appeared 
indispensable. Familial friendship is therefore already political, where it is 
not yet political. But the question of the brother returns in this equivocation 
or in this contradiction of already-not-yet (which could be found up to and 
including the Hegelian concepts of family, bourgeois society and the 
State)®. 

Familial or syngenic friendship in effect comprises several species, 
several forms or figures (éidé). The excursus found in the Eudemian Ethics 
contains only two of them: friendship between brothers and between father 
and son. Neither woman, daughter nor sister is named at this point. 
Although they are not excluded, they appear at least derivative or exterior to 
this syngenealogical cell. But more precision is needed around this crucial 
point. If the feminine figure seems exterior to the determining centre of 
familial friendship (father/son/brothers), this does not mean for Aristotle 
that all friendship is excluded, in general, between man and woman, 
husband and wife. It means only — and here is the exclusion — that such a 
friendship belongs neither to properly familial or syngenic friendship nor to 
friendship in the highest sense, primary or virtuous friendship. This 
friendship is based on the calculation of the useful, a friendship of 
partnership (koinOnia), hence one of a political kind (gunaikos de kai 
andres philia 6s khré simon kai koindnia, 1242a 32). Community between 


man and woman relates to useful goods; it is a community of services, and 
hence political. In this sense, it is true that it is more just if, as Aristotle 
notes above, the most just (dikaion) is found in friendship grounded on 
usefulness, for such is political justice (to politikon dikaion: 1242a 11-12). 
Let us be still more precise and, if possible, more just. We have been 
following the Eudemian Ethics as closely as possible. In the Nicomachean 
Ethics, in which numerous developments intersect with the former work, 
Aristotle not only proclaims once again that friendship between husband 
and wife is in conformity to nature (kata phusin). He adds that the 
inclination to form couples and to procreate is even more natural than the 
inclination to form a political community. The family is anterior to the city, 
and more necessary. But the thing is that, unlike animals, the human family 
goes beyond creation. Couples form not only for the sake of reproduction; 
because of the division of work, they spread out into life as a whole. Man 
and woman bring to the couple their ‘own’ capacities. This is a community 
for usefulness, and sometimes — this must never be excluded, and Aristotle 
never does exclude it — for pleasure. The two secondary friendships (of 
pleasure and of usefulness) are capable, therefore, of uniting husband and 
wife in a familial couple. Now among the secondary friendships, there is 
indeed politics. Up to this point, we have nothing but what is set out in the 
Eudemian Ethics. The clarification brought to bear by the Nicomachean 
Ethics on our previous subject, seemingly in contradiction with it, is that 
philia between spouses may also, sometimes, be grounded in virtue: this 
would make conjugal philia a friendship par excellence, primary friendship. 
For this to be the case, each party must have its own virtue so that both, 
reciprocally, may profit from and delight in (khairein) the virtue of the 
other. The enjoyment of this mutual delight, the joy of this mutual khairein 
that delights in and profits from the other’s virtue, and even his or her 
jouissance, is friendship par excellence, the virtuous friendship of spouses. 
Very well. But this does not last. If it does, it is owing to the children, who 
are the indispensable link of the bond (sundesmos). Without children, 
spouses part, their bonds unravel (dialaontai). The children are the common 
good, and only that which is common can maintain conjugal union. In other 
words, in short, conjugal friendship cannot be grounded in virtue, and thus 
be grounded durably (for duration is an essential trait of virtue) unless there 
are children. The child is the virtue of the parents. This virtue is deposited, 


bequeathed, delegated to the child. The difference from animal procreation 
is the testament. 

Now we have seen, and will verify once again, that the bond with 
children, the friendship between parents and children, is ordained to the 
father-son relation. The daughter is not named. Aristotle had just recalled, 
precisely in the Nicomachean Ethics, that if the affection between parents 
can take on several forms or figures, if it is “‘polueidés’, all of these species 
seem to depend on paternal love (pasa ek tés patrikés: 1161b 15-20). 

Without following up at this stage the taxonomic refinements that abound 
in the Aristotelian casuistic, let us retain at least its most determining 
criteria, at the points of greatest import to us — that is, in following out our 
guiding thread. 


1. In the androcentric family unit, the father-son relation is distinguished 
from the fraternal relation according to the type of equality involved: 
propositional or analogical equality in the first case (kat’analogian), 
numerical equality (kat’arithmon) in the second. This is why, Aristotle 
states, there 1s proximity between fraternity and comradeship (1242a 5). 
This proximity constitutes a major stake from the moment interest is taken 
in equality in the city, and an account is needed for the figurability of the 
brother: the possibility of calling a true comrade brother — legitimate 
brother, not bastard brother. For let us not forget that it is not the fraternity 
we call natural (always hypothetical and reconstructed, always 
phantasmatic) that we are questioning and analysing in its range and with 
its political risks (nationalism, ethnocentrism, androcentrism, 
phallocentrism, etc.), it is the brother figure in its renaturallzing rhetoric, its 
symbolics, its certified conjuration — in other words, the process of 
fraternization. There is no — there could never be a — political fraternization 
between ‘natural’ brothers. But here Aristotle stresses the resemblance or 
proximity between fraternity (which he supposes to be natural) and 
comradeship. And exactly in so far as it concerns equality, in all places 
where it can be a political model. Having remarked that friendship between 
brothers is eminently the friendship of comrades, friendship grounded in 
equality (é€ de ton adelphon pros allélous etairiké malista é kat’isotéta), 
Aristotle quotes Sophocles: 


for I was not declared a bastard brother to him; 
but the same Zeus, my kind, was called 


the father of us both. (1242a 35-9) 


The symbolic paternity of Zeus founds the equality of allied brothers, and 
therefore genealogical legitimacy: confraternity without bastardization. 


2. There are, then, three kinds of friendship, respectively founded, as we 
recall, on (1) virtue (this is primary friendship); (2) usefulness (for example, 
political friendship); and (3) pleasure. Now each species divides up into 
two: according to equality or according to difference (Aristotle says: 
according to superiority). In this move, justice too will divide into two, 
following numerical or proportional equality. Communities will organize 
the sharing out sometimes in terms of equality, sometimes in terms of the 
other. When numerically equal sums of money are contributed, they are 
shared according to their number; if the sums contributed are unequal, the 
money is shared out proportionally. When the inferior inverts the proportion 
and links up the terms crosswise (kata didmetron), the superior comes off 
the worse in the exchange: friendship or community remains that of service 
rendered, the liturgy (/eitoutgia) of public service; the proportion must 
therefore be restored and the profit, the benefit, the gain (kérdos) 
compensated. This is the distinguished role of honour (timé), of esteem or 
entitlement to consideration. This entitlement to honour belongs by nature 
(phusei) to the archon, to the ruler or to the god. The evaluation of honour is 
that of a priceless price. Priceless, honour would be what saves friendship 
from calculation and raises it above the bargaining of rendered services. 
Above a certain recognition (the thanks of commerce, the market of 
patronage), hence the recognition of gratitude, but in the name of another 
recognition: the recognition of entitlement to honour. 

Honour thus removes philia from the market. But providing that philia is 
strictly proportioned to a hierarchy! — and to a hierarchy which naturally 
(phusei) attributes it to the rule, to the beginning and to command, to the 
archon and to the god in their relation to the ruled.? Honour still commands 
from the site of the incalculable, but the incalculable is naturally in 
hierarchical form — and naturally so from the standpoint of arkhé. This 
hierarchization is nothing other than the sacralization of the beginning, qua 
command. And as it is on the side of god, it is on the side of the father. Of 
him of whom the brothers (‘natural’ or by alliance, but always by alliance, 
is it not; always by election or convention) say they are the legitimate sons, 


pure of all bastardization. Honour is on this side, it withdraws itself from 
the market only by reason of this proper filiation. This leads us to another 
important distinction. 

If political friendship essentially depends on usefulness, it may 
nevertheless be subdivided into /ega/ political friendship — nomic (nomiké) 
friendship — and ethical (éthike) political friendship. Cities (poleis) may be 
friends with one another, and citizens (politai) as well. If there is no longer 
what is called usefulness — which also supposes mediation, the means/ends 
relation, etc. — but, rather, an immediate, ‘from hand to hand’ relationship, 
States and citizens no longer know themselves as such. Everything passing 
‘from hand to hand’ is neither of the useful nor of the political order. As for 
the ruler/ruled relation (atkhon/arkhomenon), it is neither natural (phusikon) 
nor of the order of the kingdom (basilikon). It supposes the alternation of 
turns, “by turns’. This ‘by turns’ is destined not to do good or to do well, as 
God would, but to distribute received goods and the liturgy of rendered 
services fairly. For political friendship, gua absolute principle and general 
truth, desires equality-, it has as its decided and declared (bouletai) project 
to ground itself in equality. This is the moment when the distinction 
between the /egal and the ethical intervenes. Political friendship is attentive 
to equality as well as to the thing (the affair, pragma), to the former as 
much as the latter, to one inasmuch as it also relates to the other. This is 
what political friendship ‘looks to (blépei)’ and what concerns it. As in a 
market, in commerce between sellers and buyers. Equality and the thing, 
the equality of things, therefore the third party and the common measure: an 
account and a fixed wage [gage] are necessary: a salary, a fee, a counter- 
value (misthos). Aristotle quotes Hesiod: ‘A fixed wage for a friend 
(misthros andri philo)’, which has sometimes been translated: ‘short 
reckonings make long friends’. When it is grounded on consent, consensus, 
convention (omologia), this friendship is at once political and legal 
(nomiké). It is, then, a matter of a homology of reciprocity, as in the case of 
a contract, an agreement between two subscribing parties. When, on the 
other hand, the parties leave the matter to each other’s discretion, in a sort 
of trust without contract, credit becoming an act of faith, then friendship 
‘wants to be’ moral, ethical (éthiké) and of the order of comradeship 
(etairiké). Why is it that in this latter case recriminations and grievances 
abound? Because this ethical friendship is against nature (para phusin). 
Indeed, those who associate themselves in this way wish to have both 


friendships at once, one in the service of interest (based on usefiilness) and 
one appealing to virtue (the reliability of the other), friendship of the second 
type and primary friendship. Here we have an equivocal calculation, a 
barely honest accumulation — in sum, a way of backing these two horses of 
friendship. Through the sober aridity of his discourse, Aristotle thus 
describes a tragedy as much as a comedy, major and minor calculations: this 
irrepressible desire to overinvest in a friendship or a love, to count on a 
profit in renouncing profit, to expect a recompense, if only a narcissistic or 
symbolic one, from the most disinterested virtue or generosity. With the 
help of a distinction which should not be judged a summary one, Aristotle 
never gives up analysing the ruses that enable one friendship to be 
smuggled into another, the law of the useful into that of pleasure, one or the 
other into virtue’s mask. Those who prefer ‘ethical’ friendship believe it is 
possible to dispense with the legal, nomic form of political friendship; they 
disregard the contract or mutual agreement, thus opening themselves up to 
disappointment. Moreover, it is in ‘useful’ friendship, and within it, then, 
political friendship, that the greatest number of grievances and 
recriminations are encountered. Friendship based on virtue is, by definition, 
impeccable. As for friendship based on pleasure, friends part and bonds 
unravel once the enjoyment has run its course: the friends have had their 
delight, they have given, received, offered; they have had, and do not 
request anything more. Of course, all the forms of ‘aporia’ then spring up — 
aporia is Aristotle’s word (Eudemian Ethics, 1243a 14-35) — as to the 
criteria of the just, and when we must determine what is just (dei krinein to 
dikaion) from the vantage point of quantity or quality: the vantage point of 
the enjoyment of what is given or of the rendered service. On this count, 
how are we to get the person giving and the person receiving to agree? Who 
gives and who receives? It goes without saying that if political friendship 
considers the ‘homology’ (the contractual agreement) and the thing, it 1s 
less just, its justice is less ‘friendly (dikaoiosune philiké)’ than ethical 
friendship, which counts on intention, will, and choice (proairesis). The 
fundamental conflict lies in the opposition of the beautiful and the useful: 
ethical friendship is certainly ‘more beautiful’, but useful friendship is more 
necessary. 

The criterion is painfully lacking if we are to judge the just where 
friendship ‘based on usefulness’ and friendship ‘based on pleasure’ end up 
intersecting in a couple that may very well be called, then, a couple of 


friends or a couple of lovers. What is lacking at this point is the straight 
line, the straight and narrow path (euthuodria). When the straight and narrow 
path does not appear, it becomes difficult to measure the just. This happens 
with lovers, with ‘erotics (epi ton erdtikdn)’ when one of them seeks 
pleasure and the other usefulness. And undoubtedly when the sharing out of 
these quests becomes equivocal. Everything can function as long as love is 
there. When love ceases, the two lovers strive to calculate their respective 
share, and they wage war, like Python and Pammenes. But in this confusion 
of friendships, the conflict is not limited to the beloved. It arises 
everywhere when the straight and narrow path recoils, along with the 
common measure: between the master and his disciple, the doctor and his 
patient, the musician and the king. One then indeed wonders when such a 
measure would ever be accessible, capable of regulating any social 
exchange. And how do you calculate the just salary, or an equality of 
proportion, be it a case of instruction, medicine, technique or art? 

In each case of this ‘aporia’, each time it becomes impossible to ‘judge 
the just’ in friendship, each time a grievance consequently arises, not 
between enemies but between friends who, as it were, have been misled, 
and have misled each other because they have first mistaken friendships, 
confusing in one case friendship based on virtue with friendship based on 
usefulness, in another, legal and ethical friendship, etc. — each time that the 
common measure and the straight and narrow path are in default for these 
friends who are indeed friends, but have not managed to concur on 
friendship, one wanting one of its forms, the other yet another, a third 
wanting more than one in the same, etc. — each time in the grievance one 
can address to the other, calling him ‘friend’ but telling him that in their 
case there is no friendship: here where I am talking to you, my friend, there 
is no friend. This is indeed a question of accounts, once again, and of 
equality, of calculation between calculabilities, or calculation between the 
calculable and the incalculable. Friend, there is no measure of equality, I 
cannot count on you, don’t count on me any longer, etc. 

Is this what, according to Diogenes Laertius, Aristotle meant? Probably 
not at the moment when he is said to have uttered O philoi, oudeis philos 
(but in what manner, according to which spirit?) — not directly, in any case, 
not in a straight line, not in this form. But then — what did he mean? 


Let us return to Diogenes by another detour. If the three friendships 
(based on virtue, usefulness, pleasure) require equality, we have seen that a 
certain friendship can also entail superiority. Aristotle says this is another 
species of friendship, that of the divinity for man, of the governor for the 
governed, of the father for the son and the husband for the wife. Moreover, 
these friendships differ between themselves and imply no absolute 
reciprocity. In the development devoted to this inequality Aristotle evokes 
friendship with the dead, a friendship which knows without being known 
(Eudemian Ethics, 1239ab; see above, Chapter 1). The requirement of 
reciprocity is one of the most obscure themes of the doctrine. In certain 
cases, when superiority is excessive or ‘hyperbolic’, Aristotle judges the 
expectation of reciprocity incongruous, as for example in the case of God. 
Hence one must not ask to be loved in return (antiphileisthai) or to be loved 
in like measure to one’s own love. On the other hand, the reciprocity of 
antiphilein does not mean equality. If friends are friends in equality, a 
certain reciprocity without equality can also bring together beings who love 
each other but would not, for all that, be friends (1239a 20). Now, it is in a 
concatenation of sentences informed by this question of reciprocity and 
mutual justice that the exclamation attributed to Aristotle is reported by 
Diogenes Laertius: 

“To the question how we should behave to friends, he answered, “As we 
should wish them to behave to us.” He defined justice (dikaisosuné) as a 
virtue of the soul (aretén psukhés) which distributes according to merit. 
Education he declared to be the best provision for old age. Favorinus in the 
second book of his Memorabilia mentions as one of his habitual sayings 
that “He who has friends can have no true friend”. Further, this is found in 
the seventh book of the Ethics.’ One part of the enigma concerns the little 
word ‘true’ (‘no true friend’) which the French and English translations 
judge necessary or charitable to add to the text, without further ado — in the 
French translation the word ‘true’ is between parentheses, no doubt to stress 
the value of insistence often connoted by oudeis (no one or nothing, truly, 
no one or nothing worth its weight, absolutely no one, no (friend) deserving 
consideration, truly deserving the name of friend). The other part of the 
enigma lies in the syntactic instability — indeed, the apparent grammatical 
undecidability — of the sentence of which we have already spoken at such 
length. 


The time has perhaps come to decide the issue. It would be fitting in this 
case to give one’s reasons for deciding, for deciding to opt for one side 
rather than the other, even if — let us reassure ourselves — a tiny philological 
coup de thédtre cannot prevail in the venerable tradition which, from 
Montaigne to Nietzsche and beyond, from Kant to Blanchot and beyond, 
will have bestowed so many guarantees to the decision of a copyist or a 
rushed reader in staking a bet on a tempting, so very tempting, reading, but 
an erroneous one, and probably a mistaken one. Luckily for us, no 
orthographic restoration or archival orthodoxy will ever damage this other, 
henceforth sedimented archive, this treasure trove of enticed and enticing 
texts which will always give us more food for thought than the guard-rails 
with which we would protect them. No philological fundamentalism will 
ever efface the incredible fortune of this brilliant invention. For there is 
here, without doubt, a staggering artifact, the casualness of an exegetical 
move as hazardous as it is generous — indeed, abyssal — in its very 
generativity. Of how many great texts would we have been deprived had 
someone (but who, in fact?) not one day taken, and perhaps, like a great 
card player, deliberately feigned to take, one omega for another? Not even 
one accent for another, barely one letter for another, only a soft spirit for a 
hard one — and the omission of the subscript iota. 


And yet. We shall not say here what is true or false. But why should we 
not honour another passage? The passage from a neat but less probable, less 
convincing reading to one that is more discreet, more steadfast, more 
patient in the experience of the text? This passage could resemble a 
substitution, undoubtedly, even the correction of an error. But what should 
in truth be in question is something else — a less normalizing procedure, we 
hope. More respectful of the great ancestors. Without a trial around probity 
but in a concern for philological probability. In order not to go against a sort 
of statistical realism. There is in effect an improbable version, the one we 
know, the one we have been ceaselessly citing: the odds are less in its 
favour, as we shall attempt to show, and nothing convincing can come to its 
defence. However improbable it may be, this version will retain its titles — 
there can be no doubt about that — its coats of arms, a rich and henceforth 
archived tradition, a canonical authority protected by great names. It will 
have lined the library shelves of this tradition with illustrious variants, and 
remains available like a priceless stock. Better, like a capital with 


bottomless surplus-value. Another, more probable version, can henceforth 
make — or, rather, find — its way again. Without any value of orthodoxy, 
without a call to order, without discrediting the canonical version, this one 
might well engage, on other paths, sometimes at the intersection of the 
original one, with new adventures of thought. This other wager will 
certainly be less risky, since it corresponds to the greatest probability. It will 
call into play another ante, another bias, certainly, but without absolute 
assurance. There will be a pledge and a wager, as in all readings, there will 
be speculation on possible interest, where it is not only a question of 
spelling, grammar, and accentuation. 
Several questions arise. They urge us on, but we must distinguish them, 
even if we are unable to give a complete answer to each one: 
1. Where is the grammatical uncertainty in the ‘construction’ of 
Diogenes Laertius’ text? 
2. Who translated it differently? How was it done? 
3. Are there grounds for the other translation? Why? 
4. Does this other reading change anything in the original analysis? 
What? 


1. According to the way the w (Oméga) is written in O philoi, oudeis 
philos, we are confronted with either a vocative interjection (Oméga with 
smooth breathing and a circumflex accent) — this is the reading that has 
traditionally prevailed: ‘O my friends, no friends’ — or the dative of a 
pronoun (oméga with rough breathing, circumflex accent and iota subscript, 
hot). This reading has not been retained by the tradition: ‘he for whom there 
are friends (a plurality or multitude of friends) has no friend’; or again: ‘too 
many friends means no friend’. Paraphrased: he who has too many has 
none. This would be, in sum, a thesis on the number of friends, on their 
suitable number, and not on the question of the existence of the friend in 
general. 


2. This second translation is not unheard-of, even though it never comes 
to the foreground of discussion. It is true that this translation is flaccid and 
apparently lacklustre. We shall call it the recoil, the recoil version, the 
labour and the manoeuvre of recoiling: it is in effect more modest, 
laborious, craft-like and painstaking, it restrains the provocation, it adds or 
suppresses a coil, it counts the coils, attempting to flatten out the phrase, 


and above all, with this additional or withdrawn coil, it reopens the question 
of multiplicity, the question of the one and that of the ‘more than one’ (of 
the one gua woman and the ‘more than one’, of the feminine one and the 
‘more than one’ feminine one as well, of the feminine one and the ‘more 
than one’ feminine one, etc.). It thus explicates the grave question of 
arithmetical form which has been our obsession from the beginning: how 
many friends — men and women friends? 

So far as I know,!° there is an English edition of the text, giving for the 
Greek wo oiAo1, ovdsio diAoo: ‘He who has friends can have no true 
friend.’''. This could also be translated: ‘cannot have any true friend’. 

Then there is an Italian translation: ‘Chi ha amici, non ha nessun amico’, 
‘He who has friends, has no friend.’ !? 

Then another German translation: ‘Viele Freunde, kein Freund.’ !? 

But first of all, the translation closest to the source, in the best economy 
of its literal form, in Latin: Cut amid, amicus nemo. 14 


3. So it all comes down to less than a letter, to the difference of breathing. 
The third question (what grounds would there be for such a translation, and 
hence, for preferring such a written form?) requires a broader answer, in a 
more probabilistic style. Supposing that up against an original manuscript, 
or a first reliable (bébaios!) transcription, we had the means to choose 
between the two versions, such a possibility of literal deciphering, however 
interesting and determining it may be, seems to me, here, of secondary 
importance. It comes after and alongside other criteria: the internal 
coherence of Diogenes Laertius’ text, the systemic consequence ruling the 
Aristotelian text to which it refers. For one too often forgets to take into 
account — as one should, however — the following sentence: ‘alla kai en to 
epdomo ton Ethikon esti’: ‘Further, this is found in the seventh book of the 
Ethics’, as the English translation gives it. ‘A/ia’ can take on the value of 
‘what is more’, ‘at least’, ‘but also’, ‘moreover’ (Further, anche, auch, 
también, are the translations we have quoted). The point is to recall that the 
saying reported by rote is found (esti) also, moreover, ‘into the bargain’, in 
the seventh book of the Ethics. Diogenes would, in sum, be suggesting: for 
those who would rely only on the written word, without taking me at my 
word or without trusting the Memorabilia of Favorinos, they can refer to 
proof and seek confirmation or support for the reading in the text of the 


master. The same thought is also found elsewhere, consigned and archived 
in a book by Aristotle. 

One then begins to have doubts. Reading a reference as precise, as 
attentive, as cautious as this one, one begins to have doubts about the 
canonical version. For the contents of the interjection, the theme of the 
great apostrophe, the equivalent of the major tradition, cannot be found in 
Aristotle, it would seem — in any case, nowhere in the seventh book of the 
Ethics. On the other hand, the recoil version has more than one reference to 
account for it, to justify the dative, and hence to make Diogenes’ 
clarification in the ensuing sentence intelligible. More than one reference, 
hence more than one confirmation, more than one support: in both Ethics 
and — this clue should close the discussion — in the seventh book of the 
Eudemian Ethics. 


4. This leads us to the final question. We shall set out to split it into two. 
This will not, when the time comes, prevent us from combining them: 
content and form. 


A. Content. In the seventh book of the Eudemian Ethics (1244b) Aristotle 
undertakes an analysis of the relations between friendship and self- 
sufficiency. It is indeed a matter of a problem, even an aporia — Aristotle’s 
usual word returns here — the aporia of autarky (autarkeia). As Jean-Claude 
Fraisse rightly notes!>, this aporia also belongs to the Lysis tradition. A 
virtuous man, a good man, a man sufficient unto himself, in the way God is 
— would such a man need a friend? Would there be a friend for him? And if 
a friend were sought out of insufficiency, would the good man be the most 
autarkic, the most self-sufficient, depending only on himself in his 
initiatives and in mastery over himself? If the virtuous man is a happy man, 
why would he need a friend? In autarky, one needs neither useful nor 
pleasant people, not even company. ‘So that the happiest man will least 
need a friend, and only as far as it is impossible for him to be independent.’ 
This question of measure, then, opens up a space in which, it seems to me, 
one can then identify the declaration that might indeed be the sentence or 
one of the sentences attributed to Aristotle by Diogenes. Immediately 
following is Aristotle’s declaration: ‘Therefore the man who lives the best 
life must have fewest friends, and they must always be becoming fewer, and 
he must show no eagerness for men to become his friends, but despise not 


merely the useful but even men desirable for society’ (1244b 10). The chain 
seems clear and tightly linked: if virtue can unite with happiness only in 
autarky, the virtuous man should tend to dispense with friends; he must do 
everything in his power not to need them. In any case, a multiplicity of 
friends must be avoided, rarity must be sought after, thereby tending 
towards absolute scarcity — extreme scarcity, as it were — at the risk of 
having no friend: cut amici, amicus nemo. 

If this reconstitution were not sufficient, if one were not content with this 
reference to the Seventh Book of the Eudemian Ethics, the one explicitly 
evoked by Diogenes Laertius, then one could go to the Nicomachean 
Ethics. In the Ninth Book (9-10, 1170b 20—1171a 20), the same theme is 
handled with such elegance and so extensively that there would no longer 
be room for doubt. The arithmetical or met’arithmetical motif of extreme 
scarcity serves as its prop for an intertwining of themes which come to 
wind themselves around it, in a natural, elegant, supple, economic 
movement. Whether it be a matter of hospitality or politics, useful or 
virtuous friendships, poets or lovers, scarcity is worth more, and sometimes 
to the extreme. Scarcity sets the price, and gives the measure to true 
friendship. A scarcity which gives the measure, but one which one does not 
quite know how to measure. Is it not incommensurable? The word 
hyperbole crops up twice [the English translation gives: excessive]. Instead 
of following up this development in detail, let us be satisfied with moving 
to the outermost point of these two hyperboles. 

First hyperbole. In the first place, far from seeking to make the greatest 
possible number of friends, it would be better, as Hesiod says, to be neither 
the host of many guests (poluxeinos) nor inhospitable (daxeinos), neither 
xenophilic nor xenophobic, hence neither ‘friendless (aphilos)’ nor poly- 
philic, hospitable to too many friends, amenable to friendship to the point of 
excess (kat’upetbolén). No hyperbole; just a happy medium, a measured 
measure. But where does it stop? Next, a small number of friends should 
suffice, whether they be sought for the sake of usefulness or for that of 
pleasure, just as a small amount of seasoning in food is enough-As for 
friends based on virtue, must one, on the other hand, have the greatest 
possible number? Or is there a measure, as in the population of the polis? 
Ten men is not enough, one hundred thousand is too many, says Aristotle. 
In the Politics, he distinguishes between polis and éthnos in referring to 
what would today be called a demographic ‘threshold of tolerance’. Over a 


given number of people, as we would translate in modern terms, this is no 
longer the State but the nation, with all the problems created for the 
democratic model by demography. Since we are dealing here, as regards 
number, with an analogy between friendship and the polis, between 
friendship and what constitutes the political as such, it should be noted that 
Aristotle does not recommend a determined number but, rather, a number 
falling between given limits (to metaxu tinén orisménon). Happy medium, 
moderation, proper measure. For one cannot parcel oneself out among too 
many friends. Furthermore, and for this very reason, these friends must be 
friends of one another. This limits their number even more — who has never 
come across this limit in his or her experience? 

Second hyperbole. The example of love, of sensuous love, as it is 
translated. Eros is a ‘hyperbole’ of philia. A hyperbolic scarcity. Eros 
addresses only one at a time (pros end). But this is also the case with great 
friends, those whose friendship the poets praise. These hymns to friendship 
always concern couples. Never more than two friends. 

Although the end of Aristotle’s development seems to issue in a 
concession or an exception (to have too many friends is to be complacent, it 
is to be the friend of no one, except in the case of properly political 
friendship for fellow citizens) rarity still remains the law of all friendship 
grounded in virtue. Rarity is the virtue of friendship. He who has friends — 
too many friends — has no friend. The recoil version thus recommends a 
recoil. Friendship is what it must be — virtuous — only under the condition of 
a recoil or a retreat: several friends, one, two, three (but how many, 
exactly?), who are like brothers....!° 


B. Form. What difference is there, from the vantage point of the structure 
of the utterance, between the canonical version and the recoil version? 


(a) The first speaks to friends, the second of friends. Opening with the 
vocative O, the famous interpellation harbours what some would call a 
‘performative contradiction’ (how can you claim to address friends when 
you tell them there are no friends? A serious philosopher should not play 
such a game which, moreover, damages the transparency and necessary 
univocity in the communicational space of democracy, etc.!’). With all the 
reversals, all the revolutions it engenders ad infinitum, the above 
‘performative contradiction’, as we have amply seen, has the advantage of 


quickening — indeed, of dramatizing — a desire for friendship which, never 
renouncing what it says should be renounced, at least opens thought up to 
another friendship. As for the recoil version, it appears to remain merely 
reportive [constatif]. It is not an appeal or an address, but a declaration 
without an exclamation mark, a description or a definition. In a neutral tone, 
calmly, without a gaping-mouthed clamour, it claims to speak to what 1s. It 
no doubt still defines the truth of a contradiction (he who has many friends 
in truth has none), but this contradiction is pointed out from the position of 
a third party; it is not a self-contradiction which would come to torment the 
very act of enunciation. 

(b) To define the relation between the two versions, one cannot be 
satisfied with a simple opposition, however evident, between an apostrophe 
and a reportive utterance. Such an opposition would be of limited interest, 
especially for what we are calling here, so as to appeal to them, politics of 
friendship. What is precisely of interest to us is the chiasmus that the call 
structure introduces between the two versions. If the interjection of the 
canonical version launches a call which cannot be reduced to a report, the 
articulated phrase as a whole comprises, includes, clasps, a reportive-type 
declaration (‘O my friends, there is no friend’). This report is common to 
both versions. But in the apostrophe, the reportive determination forms the 
substantial content of a non-reportive utterance, a call in whose impulse this 
content is, as it were, carried up, swept off, overrun: I am speaking to you, 
calling you my friends, to tell you this: there are no friends. If there were a 
performative contradiction, it would then arise between this reportive 
moment and the form or performative force which included it and carries it 
along. This performative form a/ready itself entails, in effect, prior to this 
other report — that there is no friend — an enveloped reportive assertion (if I 
say ‘O friends’, I am supposing they are friends and that you are a friend). 
This enveloped report or observation [constatation], already at work in the 
vocative interjection (O friends), collides with the explicit, included, second 
observation: there is no friend. 

Conversely — and here is the chiasmus — reportive as it claims to be, the 
recoil version must indeed entail in turn a performative address. To whom is 
it said that he who has friends has none? Whether it receives an answer or 
not, the question is ineluctable. Everything is indeed prepared to sensitize to 
what will always remain inevitable in it, as if someone wished the 
addressee, the addressee of this sentence of uncertain origin (the auditor, the 


reader, them or her, you, all of us), to begin or end up wondering: to whom 
is this discourse addressed? And in what mode? 

It has often been noted that there is no cut-and-dried reportive utterance. 
Some ‘primary’ performative value is always presupposed in it: an ‘I am 
speaking to you’, ‘I am telling you that’, ‘I assure you or promise you that — 
I want to say something and I will get to the end of my sentence’, ‘listen to 
me’, ‘believe me’, ‘I am telling the truth’, etc. Even if, in the recoil version, 
you stick to the mere assertion of a report (for he who has friends, several 
friends, too many friends, more than one friend, for him there are no 
friends), it was indeed necessary that the assertion be addressed and that the 
address contain some performative force. We do not know to whom 
Aristotle is said to have said this or that, but it is not only the reader or 
auditor who is ‘entailed’ by the structure of the utterance. A minimum of 
friendship or consent must be supposed of them; there must be an appeal to 
such a minimal consensus if anything at all is to be said. Whether this 
appeal corresponds, in fact, to a comprehension or an agreement, if only on 
the meaning of what is said, appears to us secondary with regard to the 
appeal itself. The appeal is coextensive to the most reportive moment of the 
report. In short, there is indeed some form of silent interjection, some ‘O 
friends’, in the recoil version. It rings in the performative space of a call, 
prior to its very first word. And this is the irrefutable truth of the canonical 
version. As if, through and despite its philological precipitation, it were 
calling back to its truth the recoiling of the most convincing and most 
probable version. What the latter wanted to say is the call, 1s that which will 
have been ‘O my friends, there is no friend’. And this also holds for its 
Nietzschean quasi-reversal: the same chiasmus is at work. All the versions 
therefore inscribe the thetic kernel of a neutral declaration (no friend), one 
which witnesses or registers [prend acte], within and under the condition of 
an agitated scene, in the restless act of an inter-rogation and an apostophe 
which appeals. 

Where are we heading? Our intention is not to suggest an exercise in 
reading or to play off the two great competing mythical phrases against a 
‘speech act’ theory, albeit reduced, as here, to its rudiments. We wish only 
to recall, in order to appeal to them, the two great destinies of the sentence, 
destinies in which necessity and destination, the law and the other, strike up 
an alliance. The first destiny: however it is read, in the canonical or recoil 
version, and whoever its author, such a sentence is addressed to someone. 


The fact that this is absolutely necessary does not prevent — on the contrary, 
it commands — that the task of determination or identification of this 
addressee remain unfulfilled and always exposed to some undecidability. 
This is analytically inscribed in its event as well as in its structure. But 
when we say ‘someone’, we seem to be presupposing (1) that his gender is 
indifferent (neuter, that is to say, following the tradition, preferably 
masculine); (2) that this someone could, in a limited case, be one person, 
and that this ‘only one’ would be enough to meet the conditions of 
possibility of the utterance. Now it is not possible (in any case, not for a 
human being — and shortly we shall show the anthropocentric implications 
of the utterance in question) to be neuter in gender. And secondly — another 
destiny or ‘destinerrancy’ — it is impossible to address only one person, only 
one man, only one woman. To put it bluntly and without pathos, such an 
address would have to be each time one single time, and all iterability!® 
would have to be excluded from the structure of the trace. Now, for only 
one person to receive a single mark once, the mark must be, however 
minimally, identifiable, hence iterable, hence interiorally multiple and 
divided in its occurrence — in any case in its eventness [événementialité]. 
The third party is there. And the one gua ‘more than one’ which 
simultaneously allows and limits calculability. This drama or this chance of 
a singular multiplicity is witnessed in both versions, if only in the divide, 
within each of them, of singular and plural. Whatever way they are read, 
through all the possible modalities of reading (and we are a long way from 
their exhaustive examination; we would need a dozen sessions at least), 
both say that there is not a friend, a sole friend, some friend, no friend; both 
say a friend is not (oudeis philos). And both declare as much against a 
backdrop of multiplicity (‘O friends’, or for him who has ‘friends’). 
Independently of all detemtinable contexts, they could want to say, and both 
in unison, and they say so at any rate, with or without our consent: there is 
never a Sole friend. Not that there would be none, but that there never is 
one. And one is already more than one, with or without my consent. And I 
want this and do not want it. I do not want it because the desire for a unique 
friendship, an indivisible bond, an ‘I love you’ one time, one single eternal 
time, one time for all time(s), will never cease. But I do not want it. 
Montaigne said as much of the indivisible love bonding him to his friend’s 
soul, to the soul of the other ‘man’. For he never stopped pining after the 
desire for multiplication lodged within the very interior of indivisibility, 


which proliferates for the very reason of singular indivisibility: from the 
moment when, in ‘indivisible’ friendship, ‘each gives himself so entirely to 
his friend’, he cannot fail to be ‘grieved that he is not twofold, threefold or 
fourfold, and that he does not have several souls, several wills, so that he 
could confer them all to this subject’. Whatever this ‘subject’ may be, and 
whatever ‘to confer’ means, indivisibility harbours the finite and the infinite 
in itself simultaneously. Hence the possibility and impossibility of the 
calculation. Whether it is given or promised, indivisibility is immediately 
infinite in its finiteness. It appears as such only in the desire for repetition 
and multiplication, in the promise and the memory that divide the 
indivisible in order to maintain it. Furthermore it is here, pre-eminently, that 
the enemy is within, in the place of the friend. Friend and enemy take up 
their places in taking the place of the other, one becoming, prior to the 
slightest opposition, the ambiguous guardian, both the jailer and saviour, of 
the other. Canonical or recoil, both versions speak to the infinite in the 
‘none’, the becoming ‘not one’ of someone of either gender. This 
multiplicity makes the taking into account of the political inevitable, from 
out of the innermost recesses of the most secret of secrets. It cuts across 
what is called the question of the subject, its identity or its presumed 
identity with self, a supposed indivisibility which ushers in the accounting 
structure for which it appears to be designed. Indivisible in its calculable 
identity, it loses, by the same token, the indivisibility of its incalculable 
singularity, and one divides the other. 

We said: independently of all determinable contexts. Does one have the 
right to read like this? No, certainly not, if one wishes to imagine a sentence 
or a mark in general without any context, and readable as such. This never 
occurs, and the law remains unbreachable. But for the same reason, a 
context is never absolutely closed, constraining, determined, completely 
filled. A structural opening allows it to transform itself or to give way to 
another context. This is why every mark has a force of detachment which 
not only can free it from such and such a determined context, but ensures 
even its principle of intelligibility and its mark structure — that is, its 
iterability (repetition and alteration). A mark that could not in any way 
detach itself from its singular context — however slightly and, if only 
through repetition, reducing, dividing and multiplying it by identifying it — 
would no longer be a mark. Now this is exactly what occurs in the history 
of our sentence. Its entire history, from the beginning, will have consisted in 


abandoning of a unique context and an indivisible addressee. This will have 
been possible only because its original addressee (friend or enemy, but 
absolutely not neuter) will have first been multiple, potentially detached 
from the context of the first occurrence. In a way — willingly or reluctantly, 
consciously or not — every presumed signatory of the sentence under 
scrutiny also re-marks this, says it, says the ‘more than one’ of the 
addressee, the friend-enemy, ‘more than one [plus d’un]’ or the ‘more than 
a [plus qu’un]’: for example, a feminine ‘one’, a feminine other. This 
sentence cannot be signed or incorporated, it cannot be shifted elsewhere, 
anywhere, without re-marking this ‘destinerrancy’ due to the ‘more than (a) 
one [plus d’un ou plus qu’un]’ of destination. And this is friendship, and 
this is war! And however the ‘more than a’ is understood, is it not the abyss 
of ‘more than one’? An other, masculine or feminine, but ultimate solitude 
as well? (Later, Holderlin: ‘But where are the friends’; and ‘More than one 
of them / Is reluctant to return to the source’; and ‘Here it happens that I am 
alone’.) 

‘Aristotle’ — let us call him by that name — had indeed to address 
(himself) [devait bien s’addresser, also: ‘had to address (himself) well’]. 
Let us not even mention the circle of his living disciples, the presumed 
addressees of all his philosophemes and theorems. The most theoretical of 
each of his remarks — indeed, of the most theoretistic [théorétistes] among 
them — could never be neuter. Each of his judgements, and his judgements 
on judgement, had to let itself be orientated towards a reader or a listener. 
They had to set out to convince, to demonstrate, to produce an effect. A 
particular addressee whose place is marked in the very structure of the 
utterance might not belong to the circle of immediate presence — he or she 
was even capable of not belonging — but also had to find himself called by 
an allocution, by a speech gesture which was not limited to the theoretical, 
reportive, ‘judicative’ context. Hence no neutrality was possible around the 
two poles of this speech gesture, whatever the theoretical thesis posed at the 
time (there is or there is not a friend, an enemy; there are friends or there 
are not many, a few, just one, etc.). This speech gesture will never allow 
itself be neutralized, and its saying cannot be reduced to the said; we know 
a priori that he was addressing, as a friend or an enemy, a friend or an 
enemy. Or both: we know that he was addressing both, in turn or 
simultaneously. This move beyond the theoretico-reportive sphere could not 
fail to be a project: a project of friendship or of enmity, as one will say, or 


both at the same time; and a project of the corresponding political 
community, one of singularity or multiplicity (this is of little importance 
here). But such a project is irrepressible, and as old as the sentence. 

Will it be said — this would indeed be tempting — that beyond all the 
dialectics whose ineluctable experiences we multiply, beyond the fetal 
syntheses or reconciliations of opposites, the dream of an unusable 
friendship survives, a friendship beyond friendship, and invincible before 
these dialectics? And that it first of all stems from this evidence that 
‘Aristotle’ — let us call him by that name — at least asked the other to hear 
him, understand him, to be enough of a friend to do so, and therefore to 
consider him — Aristotle — as a friend, qua the friend of a promise of 
friendship? And even at the very moment of saying ‘no friend’? This 
request for friendship, this offer of friendship, this call to coming together 
in friendship, at least to hear, the time it takes to hear, at least to finally 
agree, the time it takes to agree on the meaning of the sentence, even if it 
were still saying, in the saying of its said, the worst in dialectics, is this, this 
saying of the said, not, then, the ‘I love you, listen’ of the ‘I love you; do 
you hear me?’. Is it not, then, this ‘perhaps you can hear me in the night...’, 
an inflexible hyperbole of philia — inflexible not in the sense of some 
indestructible, rigid and resistant solidity, but because its featherweight 
vulnerability would offer no foothold for a reversal of any kind, for any 
dialectical opposition? And if politics were at last grounded in this 
friendship, this one and no other, the politics of this hyperbole, would this 
not be to break with the entire history of the political, this old, tiring and 
tired, exhausted history? 

Temptation indeed. It is that of the book you are reading — there can be 
no doubt about it — but it is also the temptation this same book owes itself to 
resist, owes itself a time of resistance. Not to resist so as to deny, exclude or 
oppose, but precisely to keep the temptation in sight of its chance: not to be 
taken for an assurance or a programme. Again the question of the perhaps, 
the paradoxical conditions for an event or a decision. For not only could it 
never be a matter of grounding anything, above all of grounding a politics, 
on the virtue of a ‘perhaps’. But above all else, doomed as it may be to 
hyperbole, the logic of agreement or hyperbolic consent presupposes a little 
too quickly that the person addressing the other wishes to be heard, read, 
understood, wishes first of all to address someone — and that this desire, this 
will, this drive, are simple, simply identical to their supposed essence. If we 


believe and are saying that this is in no respect true, it is not to make a case 
for the demoniac by allowing it to appear, by staging it or leaving the stakes 
of the question in its favour. But we cannot, and we must not, exclude the 
fact that when someone is speaking, in private or in public, when someone 
teaches, publishes, preaches, orders, promises, prophesies, informs or 
communicates, some force in him or her is also striving not to be 
understood, approved, accepted in consensus — not immediately, not fully, 
and therefore not in the immediacy and plenitude of tomorrow, etc. For this 
hypothesis there is no need — this may appear extravagant to some people — 
to revert to a diabolical figure of the death instinct or a drive to destruction. 
It is enough that the paradoxical structure of the condition of possibility be 
taken into account: for the accord of hyperbolic lovence to be possible and, 
in the example we have just examined, for me to hope to be understood 
beyond all dialectics of misunderstanding, etc., the possibility of failure 
must, in addition, not be simply an accidental edge of the condition, but its 
haunting. And the haunting must leave an imprint right on the body it seems 
to threaten, to the point of merging indissociably with it, as inseparable 
from it as its essence or essential attributes. And it is impossible not to 
aspire to this haunting failing which no ‘good’ decision would ever accede 
to responsibility, failing which nothing, no event, could ever happen. 
Undecidability (and hence all the inversions of signs between friendship 
and its opposite) is not a sentence that a decision can leave behind. The 
crucial experience of the perhaps imposed by the undecidable — that is to 
say, the condition of decision — is not a moment to be exceeded, forgotten, 
or suppressed. It continues to constitute the decision as such; it can never 
again be separated from it; 1t produces it gua decision in and through the 
undecidable; there is no other decision than this one: decision in the matter 
and form of the undecidable. An undecidable that persists and repeats itself 
through the decision made so as to safeguard its decisional essence or virtue 
as such. This same necessity can be translated differently — we have done so 
elsewhere: the instant of decision must remain heterogeneous to all 
knowledge as such, to all theoretical or reportive determination, even if it 
may and must be preceded by all possible science and conscience. The 
latter are unable to determine the leap of decision without transforming it 
into the irresponsible application of a programme, hence without depriving 
it of what makes it a sovereign and free decision — in a word, of what makes 
it a decision, if there is one. At this point, practical performativity is 


irreducible to any theorem; this is why we have stressed the performative 
force which had to prevail in both versions of a sentence which in any case, 
in addressing another, could not count on any assurance, any purely 
theoretical criterion of intelligibility or accord; it could not count on such 
assurance, but above all it had to and desired not to want to count on such 
an assurance, which would destroy in advance the possibility of addressing 
the other as such. To express this in the case of a telegram: ‘I love you’ 
cannot and must not hope to prove anything at all. Testimony or act of faith, 
such a declaration can decide only providing it wants to remain 
theoretically undecidable, improbable, given over in darkness to the 
exception of a singularity without rule and without concept. Theoretically, it 
can always flip into its opposite. Without the possibility of radical evil, of 
perjury, and of absolute crime, there is no responsibility, no freedom, no 
decision. And this possibility, as such, if there is one, must be neither living 
nor dead. 

How this madness can then negotiate with what it is not, how it can be 
protected and translated in the good sense of ‘things’, in proofs, guarantees, 
concepts, symbols — in a politics, this politics and not another — this is the 
whole of history, of what is called history. But every time it will be singular, 
singularly iterable, as will the negotiation and contamination of singularity 
and concept, exception and rule. Furthermore — another side of the same 
law — the request or offer, the promise or the prayer of an ‘I love you’, must 
remain unilateral and dissymmetrical. Whether or not the other answers, in 
one way or another, no mutuality, no harmony, no agreement can or must 
reduce the infinite disproportion. This disproportion is indeed the condition 
of sharing, in love as well as in friendship. In hatred as well as in 
detestation. Consequently, the desire of this disproportion which gives 
without return and without recognition must be able not to count on ‘proper 
agreement’, not to calculate assured, immediate or full comprehension. It 
must indeed desire that which goes to make the essence of desire: this non- 
assurance and this risk of misunderstanding. And in not knowing who, in 
not knowing the substantial identity of who 1s, prior to the declaration of 
love, at the origin of who gives and who receives, who is in possession or 
not of what happens to be offered or requested. Here, perhaps, only here, 
could a principle of difference be found — indeed an incompatibility 
between love and friendship, at least according to the most conventional 
meaning of these words in ‘our’ culture, and supposing such a difference 


could ever manifest itself in its rigorous purity. If such an essential 
incompatibility or heterogeneity in their provenance were to be granted, 
despite everything claimed on the subject by those (we have referred to 
several of them) who derive love and friendship from the same passion, this 
would not mean that love and friendship cannot associate, or cohabit, or 
alternate, or naturally enrich themselves among those who love each other. 
It would mean only that friendship supposes a force of the improbable: the 
phenomenon of an appeased symmetry, equality, reciprocity between two 
infinite disproportions as well as between two absolute singularities; in the 
case of love, it would raise or rend the veil of this phenomenon (some 
would be tempted to say that it would reveal its hidden, forgotten, repressed 
truth) to uncover the disproportion and dissymmetry as such. The absolute 
dis-pair [dés-espoir| of an absolute act of faith and renunciation. But since 
we have evinced doubts on the possibility of these two essences ever 
manifesting themselves in their purity, as such, we are here dealing only 
with hyperbolic limits. 

Our objective was not to start down this path, but only to draw attention 
to a clue: in the canonical version as well as in the recoil version, 
Aristotle’s sentence named philos, the friend, not the lover or the beloved 
(of either gender). The question of knowing if it was a loved or a loving 
friend was no more clearly articulated than, in its Nietzschean obverse, the 
question of knowing whether the person who names the enemy is the 
enemy of enemies (and everything would indeed lead us to suppose that he 
or she could very well be the friend of enemies). In other words, when one 
names the friend or the enemy, a reciprocity is supposed, even if it does not 
efface the infinite distance and dissymmetry. As soon as one speaks of love, 
the situation is no longer the same. If one wished to translate in terms of 
love what Aristotle’s sentence says of the friend, of friends, and — as we 
believe it does — to friends, such a task would no doubt be fascinating (it 
would take another book) but altogether more dangerous (‘love, no love’, 
‘loves, no love’; ‘my love, there is no love (happy? virtuous? reciprocal’?)’; 
‘my loves, there is no love’, ‘my loves, there is no lover nor beloved (of 
either gender)’ — these are just a few of the translations which would be 
neither analogous nor homologous, above all because they would fail to 
name and to determine the ‘who’ (lover, loved one) which, for Aristotle’s 
sentence, was the friend, the friends. And let us not even mention the 
parentheses: their violence as much as their untranslatability. 


Here, we shall once again have to acknowledge the necessity of this 
‘zigzag’ which we would like to show, marks the history-without-history of 
what the French call amitié. This history does not consist in a linear 
succession or in a continuous accumulation of paradigms, but in a series of 
ruptures which intersect their own trajectories before turning back along a 
different one: all the mutations, all the new configurations, repeat, on the 
very day after they open, the same archaic motif of the day before yesterday 
without which they could not even come to speak their language. For 
another of these ‘zigzags’ that we have already multiplied, we must once 
again return to Aristotle, where, precisely, the motif of autarky ruled the 
arithmetic of scarcity. As we remember, the ideal of the virtuous sage 
prescribes that he be independent and self-sufficient, hence able to do 
without others, as much as possible: few friends, the fewest possible. 

In an extremely simplified schema, we might say that the interpretation 
of this law appeals to two great logics. It is still a matter of true friendship 
(primary friendship, proté philia, in the Eudemian Ethics; perfect or 
accomplished friendship, te/eia philia, in the Nicomachean Ethics). One of 
these logics can make of friendship par excellence (Montaigne’s sovereign 
friendship) an arkhé or a télos, precisely, towards which one must tend even 
if it is never reached. No more than the absolute scarcity of friends can or 
must be reached, in the case of a man. In this case, this inaccessibility 
would be only a distancing in the immensity of a homogeneous space: a 
road to be travelled. But the inaccessibility can be interpreted otherwise. 
Otherwise -that is to say, in terms of a thought of alterity which makes true 
or perfect friendship not only inaccessible as a conceivable fe/os, but 
inaccessible because it is inconceivable 1n its very essence, and hence in its 
telos. 

On the one hand, one would thus have a conceivable and determinable 
telos which in fad cannot be reached: one cannot reach it and it cannot 
happen, it cannot happen to us. This is a new way of interpreting, outside all 
context, the ‘no friend’. There is no friend, purely and simply because 
perfection is too difficult, and that’s that. We had not yet alluded to this 
difficulty. 

On the other hand, the fte/os remains inaccessible because it 1s 
inconceivable, and inconceivable because it is_ self-contradictory. 
Inaccessibility would then have an altogether different sense, that of an 
interdictive bar in the very concept of friendship. As Aubenque rightly puts 


it: ‘perfect friendship destroys itself’! It is contradictory in its very 
essence. On the one hand, in effect, one must want the greatest good for the 
friend — hence one wants him to become a god. But one cannot want that, 
one cannot want what would then be wanted, for at least three reasons. 


1. Friendship with God is no longer possible because of his remoteness or 
separation (Nicomachean Ethics, VIU, 7, 1159a 5). Presence or proximity 
are the condition of friendship, whose energy is lost in absence or in 
remoteness. Men are called ‘good’ or ‘virtuous’ from the vantage point of 
aptitude, possibility, habitus (kath’éxin), or in act (kat’enérgeian). It is the 
same for friendship: friends who sleep or live in separate places are not 
friends in act (ouk energousi). The energy of friendship draws its force from 
presence or from proximity. If absence and remoteness do not destroy 
friendship, they attenuate or exhaust it, they enervate it. The proverb on this 
subject quoted by Aristotle indeed makes the point that for him, absence or 
remoteness is synonymous with silence: friends are separated when they 
cannot speak to one another (this is aproségoria, non-allocution, non- 
address, a rare word appearing in this proverb of unknown provenance: 
‘aproségoria has undone many a friendship’). It is, then, not only a matter 
of distance between places, although Aristotle mentions this too, but of 
what, for him, will go hand in hand with topological separation: the 
impossibility of allocution or colloquium. (Question: how would this 
discourse have handled telecommunication in general? And how would it 
deal today with the telephone and all the new dis-locations which dissociate 
the allocution of co-presence in the same place? People can speak to each 
other from afar — this was already possible, but Aristotle took no account of 
it.) Again an aporia: 


but when one party is removed to a great distance, as God is, the possibility of friendship ceases. 
This is in fact the origin of the difficult question [the aporia] (aporeitai) whether friends in the 
final analysis really wish for their friends the greatest goods, as for example for them to be gods, 
for in this case they would no longer be their friends, since friends are goods. (VIII, 9, 1159a 5— 
11) 


No friendship with God is possible because this absence and this separation 
also signify the absence of common measure for a proportional equality 
between God and me. Then one cannot speak with this God: it is a case of 
absolute aproségoria. God cannot even be addressed to tell him there is no 
friend. One cannot, therefore, want God for a friend. 


2. The other reason is that friendship orders me to love the other as he is 
while wishing that he remain as he is and do so following his human nature, 
‘only so long as he remains a man’ (ibid.). In its origin and its end, in its 
primary sense or its culmination, friendship 1s still the distinctive feature of 
man. One cannot, therefore, want to deify the friend while wishing that he 
remain what he is, that he remain a man. 


3. And yet — the third and undoubtedly the most radical of the reasons — 
the man of friendship, gua man of virtue, should nevertheless resemble 
God. Now God has no need of a friend; he thinks himself, not some other 
thing. The ndésis ndéseods, the thought of thought characteristic of the Prime 
Mover as well as, in the same tradition, absolute knowledge in Hegel’s 
sense, could not care less about friendship because it could not care less 
about the other. Perfect or true friendship, that of the just and virtuous man 
who would resemble God, thus tends towards this divine autarkeia which 
can very easily dispense with the other and hence has no relation to 
friendship with the other, no more so than to its death. Precisely in a 
development devoted to autarky, Aristotle underscores this sort of aporia: 


For because a god is not such as to need a friend, we claim the same of a man who resembles a 
god. But by this reasoning the virtuous [spoudaios] man will not even think, for the perfection of a 
god is not in this, but in being superior to thinking of anything beside himself. The reason is that 
with us welfare involves a something beyond us, but the deity is his own well-being.” 


In sum, it is of God (or man in so far as he should or would want to 
resemble Him) that one must think in saying ‘there is no friend’. But one 
then thinks of someone who cannot think or who thinks nothing other than 
self, who does not think to the extent that he thinks nothing but self. Now if 
man has friends, if he desires friends, it is because man thinks and thinks 
the other. 

Friendship par excellence can only be human but above all, and by the 
same token, there is thought for man only to the extent that it is thought of 
the other — and thought of the other qua thought of the mortal. Following 
the same logic, there is thought, there is thinking being — if, at least, thought 
must be the thought of the other — only in friendship. Thought, in so far as it 
is to be for man, cannot take place without philia. 

Translated into the language of a human and finite cogito, this gives the 
formula: I think, therefore I am the other; I think, therefore I need the other 
(in order to think); I think, therefore the possibility of friendship is lodged 


in the movement of my thought in so far as it demands, calls for, desires the 
other, the necessity of the other, the cause of the other at the heart of the 
agito. Translated into the logic of a divine cogito, of the cogito of this god: I 
think, therefore I think myself and am sufficient unto myself) there is no 
(need of a) friend, etc. O friends (you other men), for me there is no friend. 
This is how such a god would speak, if he were to come down to speak. 
Divine might be the word that still holds us back. Divine remains a 
particular truth of Aristotle’s saying, as soon as friends can be addressed, as 
we have just verified, only providing they are men. In any case, it suffices 
that the concept of perfect friendship be contradictory for someone to raise 
his voice and say ‘O my friends, there is no friend’. 

Under the condition of the cogito. But all thought does not necessarily 
translate into the logic of the cogito, and we may meet up again, on another 
path, with this affinity of philein, of thought, with mortality. 


9 


‘In human language, fraternity...’ 


I am meditating a work, not one line of which yet exists. It would consist in 
establishing the relation between the Christian dogma and the political and social 
forms of the modern world.... Why then do they always advise us to wait for the 
realization of Christianity in the tomb? Are they afraid of disinheriting the dead? ... 
The Church has ceased to perform miracles; but humanity, and France particularly, 
have done them for her.... Saint Augustine, representing the old Roman mind, 
comes and closes the free discussion of ideas. 
E. Quinet, ‘Why the dogma of human brotherhood was 
inscribed so late in civil and political law’, in Christianity, in Its 


Various Aspects, from the Birth of Christ to the French Revolution! 


And in this great tradition there is not only a connected series of events but there is 
also progress. France has continued the Roman and Christian work that Christianity 
had promised, and France has delivered. Brotherly equality had been postponed to 
the next life, but she taught it as the law on earth to the whole world. 

This nation has two very powerful qualities that J do not find in any other. She 
has both the principle and the legend: the idea made more comprehensive and more 
humane, and the tradition more connected and coherent. 

This principle, this idea, which was buried in the Middle Ages under the dogma 
of grace, is called brotherhood in the language of man.... 

This nation, considered thus as the asylum of the world, is much more than a 
nation. It is a living brotherhood. 


Michelet, The People 


This book is more than a book, it is myself. That is why it belongs to you. It is 
myself and it is you, my friend, I dare say.... The entire variety of our work 
together began in the same living roots: The sentiment of France and the idea of the 
father-country. 

Accept it, then, this book of the People, because it is yourself, because it is 
myself. By your military origins, by my industrial ones, we ourselves represent, 
much as others perhaps, the two modem aspects of the People, and its recent 
occurrence. 


Michelet to Edgar Quinet? 


The sacred word of the new age, Fraternity — the woman can spell it, but does not 
yet know how to read it. 
Michelet, L "Amour* 


Who could ever answer for a discourse on friendship without taking a 
stand? The urgency of this question is no way lessened by the fact that this 
discourse on friendship, this de amicitia, claims to be theoretical or 
philosophical. Who will answer for a treatise peri philias without taking a 
stand, hence without assuming the responsibility of this stand — friend or 
enemy, one or the other; indeed, one and the other? Can one speak of love 
without declaring one’s love, without declaring war, beyond all possible 
neutrality? Without avowing, if only the unavowable? 

Now what have we been doing up to now? We said at the beginning that 
citing the citation of a citation was perhaps to assume, in one’s own name, 
the responsibility of no enunciation. Perhaps this may not even be 
addressing you, truly you, right here. An example of this aproségoria, this 
keeping silent, silence kept, this speech kept at a distance at which Aristotle 
said a friendship would not survive for long. Or a language at an 
incalculable distance? 

Once again it must be said (but to whom?): these matters are not so 
simple. Am I totally irresponsible for what I said from the moment I am 
irresponsible for what I said? Am I irresponsible for the fact that I spoke 
(the fact of having spoken) from the moment I do not hold myself 
responsible for what I have said, for the contents of my speech, for that 
which in fact I have contented myself with reporting? Defined by what are 
commonly called conventions, a certain number of artificial signs come 
here to attest the following: even if I have yet to say something determined 
in my name when, to start off with, I pronounced, without any other 
protocol, ‘O my friends, there is no friend’, one has the right (but what is 
this right?) to suppose that Jam nevertheless speaking in my own name. 

It is then a matter of the name bome, the bearing or the basis [le port ou 
le support] of the name — and the relation to the name. The range of the 
name — this is the question that has been bringing all its weight to bear here. 
It is in effect in the power of the name to be able to survive the bearer of the 
name, and thus to open up, from the very first nomination, this space of the 


epitaph in which we have recognized the very space of the great discourses 
on friendship. 


(We have not privileged the great discourses on friendship so as to submit 
to their authority or to confirm a hierarchy but, on the contrary, as it were, 
to question the process and the logic of a canonization which has 
established these discourses in a position of exemplary authority. The 
history of friendship cannot be reduced to these discourses, still less to these 
great discourses of a philosophical genre. But precisely to begin the 
analysis of the forces and procedures that have placed the majority of these 
major discourses in the major position they have acquired, all the while 
covering over, reducing, or marginalizing the others, one must begin by 
paying attention to what they say and what they do. This is what we wish to 
do and say.) 


You hold me responsible, personally responsible, by the mere fact that I 
am speaking. Responsible, for example, for the decision to begin by quoting 
Montaigne, rather than saying something else, before saying anything at all. 
Holding me responsible, personally responsible, you imply, with the utmost 
rigour, some kind of knowledge relative to what person and responsibility 
mean. 

What is happening at this very moment? This could issue in a 
‘pragmatic’ type of description. Suppose I am invited to speak to you (but 
exactly how and by whom, finally? And who invites you to read a book, 
that is, to invite the word of another into your home, and to put you in 
charge of it, at this very moment? And how many of you are there, 
exactly?). A hypothesis, then: invited to speak to you, while you would be 
alone or assembled to listen to me, then to examine me — in short, to answer 
me — I have already answered an invitation and am therefore addressing you 
who are beginning to answer me. Your rejoinder is still virtual as regards 
the content of the answer, but you already effect it in act through this first 
response consisting in the attention paid (with more or less energy, as 
Aristotle would say) or at least the attention promised to a discourse, 
whether the promise be kept or not, to whatever degree it be kept or not 
(infinite problems). 

With this distinction between potentiality and act, we are already 
virtually installed in the dominant code, in the very constitution of one of 


philosophy’s great canonical discourses on friendship, the discourse of the 
very philosopher quoted by Montaigne — Aristotle — whose major features 
we are questioning, the axiomatic and hierarchy-creating power diffused by 
its renown. This irradiation began before Aristotle (with Plato, etc.) and 
continues well beyond him, to be sure, well beyond Epicureanism and 
Stoicism, beyond Cicero, certain Church Fathers, and several others. But 
we thought it necessary to begin, precisely, by questioning the most 
canonical of the canonical, in this place in which is concentrated, for us in 
the West, the potential of maximum signification of the dominant power in 
its most assured authority. Will it be possible to (re)turn or to go elsewhere, 
beyond or below this potential of irradiation? 

But even to pose this question, and precisely to suspend it on a ‘perhaps’, 
we risk reaccrediting, with all its conceptual machinery, the potentiality/act 
distinction, the one between dunamis and enérgeia. It is never far away, in 
the Nicomachean Ethics, when it is a matter of distinguishing between the 
‘good’ who, always few in number, are friends in the rigorous sense of the 
term, in the proper sense, simply friends, absolutely friends (apl6s philoi), 
and the others who are friends only by accident or by analogy with the first 
(VIII, 6, 1157b 1—5); the same distinction is never far away when the issue 
is that of distinguishing between, on the one hand, friendship par 
excellence, the friendship of virtue (the prote philia of the Eudemian Ethics 
or the teleia philia of the Nicomachean Ethics) and, on the other, derived 
friendships, those grounded in usefulness or pleasure. Neither is the 
distinction ever far away when, having defined three forms of government 
or constitution (politeia), the Nicomachean Ethics sets out three 
corresponding types of friendship, each of them proportional to relations of 
justice (VUI, 10, 1160a 31 and 13; 1161a 10), in such a way that if man is a 
‘political’ being made to live in society (IX, 9, 1169b 28), and if, then, he is 
in need of friends, properly political friendship is nevertheless only a 
species of friendship, a derived one, the useful friendship demanded for 
concord, accord, consensus (homonoia). All these divides suppose the 
potentiality/act distinction, the accident/essence distinction, etc. And such 
distinctions would be called up here, and therefore necessarily implied or 
implemented — claims Aristotle in sum — by the correct use and 
understanding of the Greek word philia, by its very semantic constitution. 
By everything named friendship, by everything whose ‘true name is 
friendship’, as Nietzsche said in The Gay Science (para. 14). 


Let us then suppose, concesso non dato, that one can today translate by 
‘friendship’, by Freundschaft, by amitié, etc., these Greek words philia, 
homonoia, and all those which, one following upon the next, are 
inseparable from them. That would amount, here, to considering the 
possibility of this translation ensured, and the possibility of thinking 
thought, gua the thought of the same or the thought of the other, in the 
pathbreaking [frayage] of this transfer, train or tramway named philia, 
Freundschaft, friendship, amitié. 

Aristotle knew that this translation poses a critical problem, already from 
within the Greek language. His own language had to revert, in effect, to the 
same word, philia, for different and derived senses, inadequate to philia 
prote and teleia philia. The entire discourse of the two Ethics on philia can 
be read as a discourse on language, on the word philia: its uses, its contexts, 
its measured equivocation, its legitimate or improper translations. 

Now, even supposing, concesso non dato, that these words can be 
translated with no remainder, the questions of responsibliity remain here 
among us (but then how many of us are there?). How is this responsibliity 
to be exercised in the best possible way? How will we know if there is 
philia or homonoia between us, if we are getting on well, at what moment 
and to what degree? How are we to distinguish between ourselves, between 
each of us who compose this as yet so undetermined ‘we’? 

Let us therefore suppose that you hold me responsible for what I say by 
the mere fact that I am speaking, even if I am not yet assuming 
responsibility for the sentences I am quoting. 

Then, perhaps, you will grant me this: that as the first result of a practical 
demonstration, the one that has just taken place — even before the question 
of responsibility was posed, the question of ‘speaking in one’s own name’, 
countersigning such and such an affirmation, etc. — we are caught up, one 
and another, in a sort of heteronomic and dissymmetrical curving of social 
space — more precisely, a curving of the relation to the other: prior to all 
organized socius, all politeia, all determined ‘government’, before all ‘law’. 
Prior to and before all law, in Kafka’s sense of being ‘before the law’.° 

Let’s get this right: prior to all determined law, qua natural law or 
positive law, but not prior to law in general. For the heteronomic and 
dissymmetrical curving of a law of originary sociability is also a law, 
perhaps the very essence of law. What is unfolding itself at this instant — 
and we are finding it a somewhat disturbing experience — is perhaps only 


the silent deployment of that strange violence that has always insinuated 
itself into the origin of the most innocent experiences of friendship or 
justice. We have begun to respond. We are already caught up, we are caught 
out, in a certain responsibility, and the most ineluctable responsibility — as if 
it were possible to think a responsibility without freedom. We are invested 
with an undeniable responsibility at the moment we begin to signify 
something. But where does this begin? Does it ever begin? This 
responsibility that assigns freedom to us without leaving it with us, as it 
were — we see it coming from the other. It is assigned to us by the other, 
from the place of the other, well before any hope of reappropriation allows 
us the assumption of this responsibility — allowing us, as we say, to assume 
responsibility, in the name, in one’s own name, in the space of autonomy, 
where the law one gives oneself and the name one receives conspire. In the 
course of this experience, the other appears as such — that is to say, the other 
appears as a being whose appearance appears without appearing,° without 
being submitted to the phenomenological law of the originary and intuitive 
given that governs all other appearances, all other phenomenality as such. 
The altogether other, and every other (one) is every (bit) other,’ comes here 
to upset the order of phenomenology. And good sense. That which comes 
before autonomy must also exceed it — that is, succeed it, survive and 
indefinitely overwhelm it. 

In general, when one is dealing with law (nomos), the same good sense 
opposes autonomy, even autarcky, to heteronomy. Here we have the 
epitome of good sense, the unimpeachable in its uncontestable authority. 
Yet this oppositional logic must perhaps be distorted, in order to prepare, 
from afar, the ‘political’ translation of what thus ‘must be’. It is in fact a 
question of a ‘what must be’, and the relations between autonomy and 
heteronomy from the place of this what must be. 

In a word — and since it is good, for the sake of clarity, to multiply the 
anticipations and announce the heading — the point here is that of a 
‘political’ translation of which the risks and difficulties — indeed, the 
aporias — could never be exaggerated. Having made a problematic scansion 
appear in a sort of history of friendship, a scansion which would have 
introduced dissymmetry, separation and infinite distance in a Greek philia 
which did not tolerate them but nevertheless called for them, it would now 
be a matter of suggesting that a democracy to come — still not given, not 
thought; indeed, put down or repressed — not only would not contradict this 


dissymmetrical curving and this infinite heterogeneity, but would in truth be 
demanded by them. 

Such a dissymmetry and infinite alterity would have no relation to what 
Aristotle would have called inequality or superiority. They would indeed be 
incompatible with all sociopolitical hierarchy as such. It would therefore be 
a matter of thinking an alterity without hierarchical difference at the root of 
democracy. We shall see later that, beyond a certain determination of law 
and calculation (measurement, ‘metrics’), but not of law or or justice in 
general, this democracy would free a certain interpretation of equality by 
removing it from the phallogocentric schema of fraternity. The former 
would have been determining in our traditional, canonical, dominant 
concept of friendship, and simultaneously — despite the differences and 
discontinuities that we should never ignore or neglect — in the apparent 
‘finitism’ of Greek and Roman philosophical culture and in ‘infinitist 
testamentary culture, particularly in its Christian form. And in the preceding 
chapter, we were intent on showing how the philosophical horizon of philia 
(with everything it supposes, of course) carries in its determination, in the 
very form of its finity gua horizon, the potential but inexorable injunction 
of its infinitization, and hence also that of its Christianization. The privilege 
we are bestowing here on the latter, in what is, all in all, a history of 
fraternization, a history gua fraternization, in particular in its revolutionary 
ecstasies, would be justified — provisionally — only by the role it played, in 
the place of the theologico-political graft between the Greek and Christian 
worlds, in the construction of models and the political discourse of modern 
Europe. 

Questions, then: in what sense may one still speak of equality — indeed, 
of symmetry — in the dissymmetry and boundlessness of infinite alterity? 
What right does one have to speak still of the political, of law, and of 
democracy? Must these words totally change their meaning? Let themselves 
be translated? And what, then, will be the rule of translation? 


A moment ago we were evoking an excessive assignation of 
responsibility. What does responsibility have to do with what is called 
friendship? We are indeed saying ‘what is called friendship’, and we stress 
this precaution. That again looks like a quotation, as if we had to strive 
unceasingly to recall that before knowing what friendship is and what we 
mean by this word, here and now, we must first deal with a certain use of 


the word ‘friendship’. Referring first to the Anglo-Saxon distinction 
between ‘using’ and ‘mentioning’, between the gesture consisting in 
making use of a word and that of referring to a word between parentheses 
(by citing it, naming it, by provisionally suspending its use), let us say that 
we should first of all mention the uses of the word ‘friendship’, as well as 
the interpretations and experiences (for experiences are also interpretations) 
to which this ‘friendship’ gives rise. 

For we should not forget that we are first speaking in the tradition of a 
certain concept of friendship, within a given culture — let us say our own, or 
at least the one from which a ‘we’ is staking its chance. Now if this 
tradition harbours within it dominant structures, discourses which silence 
others, by covering over or destroying the archive, a tradition is certainly 
not homogeneous, nor, within it, is the determination of friendship. Our 
main concern will indeed be to recognize the major marks of a tension, 
perhaps ruptures and in any case scansions, within this history of friendship, 
the canonical figure of friendship. 

To make ourselves once again more sensitive to this heterogeneity and its 
internal potentialities, to make it and them a springboard for a leap further 
out, let us return to the ‘canonical’ version. Let us listen one final time, let 
us listen once again to Montaigne listening to Diogenes listening to 
Aristotle, but translating him too, interpreting him, authorizing him: ‘O my 
friends, there is no friend’. The painful and plaintive irony of the address 
also speaks the certainty of a strange affirmation. The sentence — we have 
heard it — is launched like a sort of apostrophe. Someone in effect turns 
towards his friends: ‘O my friends...’ — but the apostrophe turns on itself, it 
bears in itself a predicative proposition, it envelops an indicative 
declaration. Claiming to state a fact, it also utters a general truth in the form 
of a judgement: ‘there is no friend’. We have already pointed out that the 
general truth of the fact refers to the friend (‘no friend’, oudeis philos, 
indefinite singular, the negativity of just anyone) and seems to contradict in 
act the very possibility of the apostrophe, its possibility of being serious and 
eluding fiction, when it claims to be addressing friends, particular 
determined friends, not just any friends, and friends in the plural: friends 
are indeed necessary, I must posit or suppose their existence if I am thus to 
address certain of their number, if only to tell them that ‘there are no 
friends’. To be sure, there is also a contradiction in the reportive utterance 
or in the aforementioned recoil verson. And it remains. How will you affirm 


non-contradictorily that having some friends is to have no friend? But this 
contradiction is shown, denounced, objectified, stated, perhaps played out, 
between two meanings of the word friend or two quantities (the plural and 
the singular); it in no way affects the act of uttering, as would a 
‘performative contradiction’. 

However vivacious and present it remains, this ‘performative 
contradiction’ could still be handled as a mere piece of nonsense, a logical 
absurdity — indeed, in the best of cases, and if this does not distract us from 
the gravity of the political affair, as the playful exercise of a paradox, a 
pleasant fiction, a fabulous pedagogy. Yes, but provided that it really is a 
question of a simple performative contradiction — that 1s, as long as and 
provided that the two enunciative structures are sufficiently symmetrical to 
be mutually opposed and contradictory. Provided, therefore, that they make 
up a sentence and belong to a presently homogeneous ensemble. 

Now this is not necessarily the case. 

While its performative force sweeps up the entire sentence, while its 
form overwhelms and comprises within itself the alleged report, the 
apostrophe resembles at one and the same time a recall and a call [appel, 
also ‘appeal’ ]. 

First of all, a call, for it points towards a future. Thus one addresses 
friends by calling them friends. They are addressed presently in and of the 
future: O my friends, be my friends, I love you, love me, I will love you, let 
us exchange this promise, we will exchange it, will we not ... (Let us recall: 
Friendship, as Aristotle also said, “seems to consist in loving rather than in 
being loved’,® a proposition whose power of dislocation, infinitization and 
dissymmetricalization we have not finished meditating); listen to me, be 
alert to my call, to my complaint, to my expectation, understand and be 
sympathetic, I request of you sympathy and consensus, become these 
friends to whom I aspire. Yield to what is at one and the same time a desire, 
a request, and a promise — one can also say a prayer. And let us not forget 
what Aristotle says of prayer (eukhé): it is a discourse (/ogos) but one 
which, in some ways like a performative, is neither true nor false.? We 
know that there are no friends, but I pray you, my friends, act so that 
henceforth there are. You, my friends, be my friends. You already are, since 
that is what I am calling you. Moreover, how could I be your friend, how 
could I declare my friendship (and it consists in loving rather than in being 
loved), if friendship were not still to come, to be desired, to be promised? 


How could I give you my friendship there where friendship would not be in 
default, if there already were such a thing? More precisely, if the friend 
were not in default? If I give you friendship, it is because there is friendship 
(perhaps); it does not exist, presently. In any case, it is not at my disposal. 


(Let us note in passing that the logic of this call — ‘You-my-friends-be- 
my-friends-and-although-you-are-not-yet-my-friends-you-are-already,- 
since-that-is-what-I-am-calling-you’ — comes under the structure and the 
temporality of what we have been calling on several occasions a messianic 
teleiopoesis.) 


For neither the ‘recoil’ version nor the ‘canonical’ apostrophe says: 
‘there 1s no friendship’, but ‘there is no friend’. Perhaps because we have an 
idea of friendship and what it should be, in the ideality of its essence or the 
culminated perfection of its telos (teleia philia), an idea of invincible 
friendship in the face of all scepticisms, perhaps it is in the name of 
friendship that we must indeed acknowledge (constater) that if there is 
friendship, if there is indeed a promised friendship, alas, ‘there is no friend’. 
Is that not what Montaigne means in the context determined by his most 
thematic intention, a context which prevails in this passage up to a certain 
point? Is is not in reference to the ‘common friendships’, ‘ordinary and 
commonplace’ ones, that one must sigh in complaint? These common 
friendships are not this ‘sovereign master friendship’, and this is why ‘there 
is no friend’, no friend worthy of the name, in those friendships. 

But if presently there is no friend, let us act so that henceforth there will 
be friends of this ‘sovereign master friendship’. This is what I call you to; 
answer my call, this is our responsibility. Friendship is never a present 
given, it belongs to the experience of expectation, promise, or engagement. 
Its discourse is that of prayer, it inaugurates, but reports (constate) nothing, 
it is not satisfied with what is, it moves out to this place where a 
responsibility opens up a future. 

The fraternal figure of friendship will often bestow its features, 
allegorical or not, Greek or Christian, on what all revolutionary oaths 
involve with respect to responsibility to a future. Witness the turbulent 
history of the word and concept of fraternity during and after the French 
Revolution, in and around the Republican motto, the ‘holy motto of our 
forebears’ as Pierre Leroux said!° — a motto which, nevertheless, does not 


appear in the Declaration of Human Rights, the Constitution of 1793, or the 
Charter of 1830, but only in an addendum to the Constitution of 1791, then 
in the 1848 Constitution which at last seals the establishment of the new 
Trinity. 

But the apostrophe ‘O my friends’ also turns towards the past. It recalls, 
it points to that which must indeed be supposed in order to be heard, if only 
in the non-apophantic form of prayer: you have already marked this 
minimal friendship, this preliminary consent without which you would not 
hear me. Otherwise you would not listen to my call, you would not be 
sensitive to the element of hope in my complaint. Without this absolute 
past, I would not have been able, for my part, to address you thus. We 
would not be together in a sort of minimal community — but also 
incommensurable to all others — speaking the same language or praying for 
translation against the horizon of a same language, if only to manifest 
disagreement, if a sort of friendship had not already been sealed, before all 
contracts; if it had not been avowed as the impossible that resists even the 
avowal, but avowed still, avowed as the unavowable of the ‘unavowable 
community’: a friendship prior to friendships, an ineffaceable friendship, 
fundamental and groundless, one that breathes in a shared language (past or 
to come) and in the being-together that all allocution supposes, up to and 
including the declaration of war. 

Is this incommensurable friendship, this friendship of _ the 
incommensurable, indeed the one we are here attempting to separate from 
its fraternal adherence, from its inclination to take on the economic, 
genealogical, ethnocentric, androcentric features of fraternity? Or is it still a 
fraternity, but a fraternity divided in its concept, a fraternity ranging 
infinitely beyond all literal figures of the brother, a fraternity that would no 
longer exclude anyone? 

Here we are in the vicinity of the gravest of problems. It will have been 
understood that it is not our intention to denounce fraternity or 
fraternization. Of course, no one will contest the fact that all movements 
(Christian or revolutionary ones, for example) celebrating fraternity or 
fraternal friendship have universal range and theoretically challenge the 
limits of natural, literal, genetic, sexually determined (etc.) fraternity. 
Michelet’s gesture would be a good example: the assumption and 
overcoming of Christian fraternity in favour of the universal and 
revolutionary fraternity in the Enlightenment style, etc. The passages 


quoted as this chapter’s epigraphs are telling in this context. So many others 
could confirm the force of this movement. In Michelet there is even, to be 
sure, this hyperbolization of the fraternity concept which extends it not only 
beyond all boundaries but indeed beyond all juridical, legislative, and 
political determinations of the law. How can one oppose the generosity of 
so many analogous formulas to the one cited above: ‘Fraternity is the law 
beyond the law’? 

Whence, then, our reticence? 

In keeping this word to designate a fraternity beyond fraternity, a 
fraternity without fraternity (literal, strict, genealogical, masculine, etc.), 
one never renounces that which one claims to renounce — and which returns 
in myriad ways, through symptoms and disavowals whose rhetoric we must 
learn to decipher and whose strategy to outwit. Is it by chance, 1s it in the 
name of a ‘law beyond law,’ that Michelet couches this discourse on 
sublime fraternity in considerations (on the nation, the homeland, France, or 
womankind) of which the least that can be said is that their literalness, their 
literalism, does not readily brook transformation? According to what a 
Michelet, for example, says of the homeland, of the nation, of France, the 
alleged universalism of the discourse can be agreed upon only by way of 
the exemplarist logic in which we have recognized the profound strategy of 
all nationalisms, patriotisms, or ethnocentrisms. 

To give examples of the exemplarism we are putting into question, 
enunciations such as the following could be multiplied indefinitely: ‘She 
[France] found she was herself, and even as she was proclaiming the future 
common right of the world, she distinguished herself from the rest of the 
world more than she had ever done before.’ Or again: ‘The homeland is the 
necessary initiation to the homeland of all mankind.’ Or yet again: ‘France 
is a religion.” ‘France has been the pontiff of the Age of Enlightenment.’ 
And above all, then: ‘This nation, considered thus as the asylum of the 
world, is much more than a nation. It is a living brotherhood.’!! 

Let us not forget that this fraternity is another name for friendship. The 
last words of the book, whose author believes it will ‘remain the profound 
basis of democracy’,!? recall this: ‘All I have in this world — my friendships 
— I offer them up to her, and give to my country the beautiful name handed 
down by ancient France. I lay them all at the altar of the Great 
Friendship.’'> National singularity gives the example of universal 
friendship or fraternity, the living example, the ideal example in the sense 


Cicero gives to the word exemplar in De Amicitia. And this is said 
universally in the French language, in which what is called, ‘in human 
language, fraternity’, is uttered. To be exemplary, infinitely universal, 
French fraternity has as much need of being literal, singular, incarnate, 
living, idiomatic, irreplaceable, as fraternity tout court does, in order to 
become exemplary of universal fraternity, of being literally fraternal: that is 
to say, where a woman cannot replace a man, nor a sister a brother. The 
woman is not yet fraternal enough, not friend enough; she does not yet 
know what ‘fraternity’ means; above all she does not know what it will and 
should mean, she does not understand — not yet — the fraternal promise. She 
knows the word well enough, but she does not possess the concept; she 
reads it as one reads in nursery school, she reads it without reading it. She 
reads it literally but does not yet have access to what it thinks 1n spirit — and 
so it is the sacred that she misses, and history and the future, no less: ‘She 
can spell the sacred word of the new age, Brotherhood, but cannot yet read 
it.” Not yet. 

This is so well expressed. And L’Amour is so replete with the love of 
women that one feels mean indeed in showing the slightest irony in the fice 
of such vibrant eloquence, sometimes moving, always generous. And 
precisely so authentically democratic. Finally, so democratically well- 
intentioned, and so disarming. Actually more disarming than disarmed. For 
in the final analysis.... The book claims to be ‘the profound base of 
democracy’, and one indeed sees that it is unprepared, for the moment, to 
open universal democratic fraternity to those — in truth, to those women — 
who would precisely, in its view, not yet be ready for it — not yet. This logic 
of the ‘not yet’ slightly complicates matters and allows women to hope — or, 
at least, universal fraternity to hope — but this interests us all the more since, 
in the next chapter, we will again come across universal fraternity at work, 
in an analogous context (mutatis mutandis) in a distant relative of Michelet, 
but so far removed that no cousinly affinity between them would be 
imaginable: Nietzsche. Is not the thing all the more telling? The thing? The 
woman, the sister. 

Let us strive to be more equitable. If the thing does not allow itself to be 
thus classified, if it remains more ambiguous, ironic (again the woman, 
‘eternal irony of the community’, as Hegel said); if the thing still leaves 
room for other reversals, it is not only because Michelet’s L’Amour exudes 
the goodness of the man, the husband, the father. It is not because his 


phallogocentrism or his andro-gallo-fraternocentrism is also an exemplary 
universalism, and hence boundlessly generous. Why then? In his 
unbounded desire to give and take away at the same time, unreservedly to 
demonstrate his love of woman, to whom he denies any maturity in the 
historical experience of promised friendship, Michelet does not fail to 
bestow on woman more than he takes away. For here he is suddenly ready 
to concede to her, in the contortion of a gesture which will immediately 
contradict itself, the very thing he had placed in the extreme hyperbole of 
fraternity — that is: being a ‘law beyond the law’. Well, then, it would be 
almost the same for woman — if it were not the opposite, and if it did not 
immediately annul itself in its antithesis. Woman is /ike absolute fraternity, 
she resembles it, like law beyond the law, justice beyond justice. She is 
‘more than just’. Except for the fact that she destroys, with justice, what she 
thus is, what she could be, what she is without being it: pure friendship. Let 
us read. Having remarked: ‘She can spell the sacred word of the new age, 
Brotherhood, but cannot yet read it’, the author of Z’Amour continues: 

‘She sometimes seems to be above the virtues of the new age. She is 
more just than just — she is chivalrous, and extremely generous. But justice 


transcended destroys justice itself.’ '4 


Fraternization is always caught up, like friendship itself, in a vertiginous 
process of hyperbolization. There is always someone, something, more 
fraternal than the brother, more friendly than the friend, more equitable than 
justice or the law — and the measure is given by the immensity and 
incommensurability of this ‘more’. Thus it is refused while simultaneously 
given. As incalculable as that indivisible subject of which we were speaking 
above: the condition of possibility and impossibility of calculation, the 
condition of a decision which nevertheless becomes immediately 
impossible and of secondary importance once a subject is what it 1s: 
indivisible and identical to itself, subject to everything except to something 
ever really happening to it, actually affecting it. The mechanism of 
hyperbolization (for there is something of the mechanical and the technical 
in this regularity) works away at this semantics in the strict and proper 
sense of the term. The paradox is in this: that the strict, literal, restrained 
sense 1s not, as one might believe, what a literal sense promises, announces 
or defers in the figure of the figure, in the figurative sense. The strict sense 
conceals the literal sense, which would be on the same pole as the figurative 


sense, on the opposite pole of the strict sense: thus true fraternity, fraternity 
in the literal sense, would be universal, spiritual, symbolic, infinite 
fraternity, the fraternity of the oath, etc., not fraternity in the strict sense, 
that of the ‘natural’ brother (as if such a thing ever existed), the virile 
brother, by opposition to the sister, the determined brother, in this family, 
this nation, this particular language. And what we are picking up here 
around fraternity, gua the dominant schema of friendship, transports its 
upsetting hyperbole into friendship, as into all its associated semantic 
values. 

What, then, is friendship in the literal sense? Does this question still 
make sense, precisely? In a rather Aristotelian gesture, will one say of 
friendship that, if it is caught up in the bonds of fraternity in the strict sense, 
it possesses only an accidental, analogical or equivocal relation to 
friendship, hence to fraternity in the literal sense? 

The question then becomes, it returns and becomes again: ‘What is 
friendship in the literal sense?’ Is it ever present? What is presence for this 
philia proté or this teleia philia of which we have glimpsed the aporia? 
‘What is the essence of friendship?’, ‘What is a friend?’, ‘What is a 
feminine friend?’ 

If we are not even close to an answer, it is not only owing to the great 
number of philosophical difficulties still awaiting us. It is not only because 
we have discerned the presence of this value of presence at the very heart of 
that which was to be defined, which the entire tradition that we have 
acknowledged hitherto pre-defined or pre-understood precisely as the virtue 
of presence, the truth of proximity: the friend is the near one and friendship 
grows with presence, with allocution in the same place. This is its truth, its 
essence, its mode of existence, etc. If we are not even close to an answer, 
nor perhaps to a grasp of the question as one of proximity, this 1s — in a 
principled, preliminary, both simple and abyssal way — because the question 
‘what is (ti estin)’, the question of the essence or the truth, has already 
deployed itself, as the question of philosophy, from out of a certain 
experience of philein and philia. 

The question ‘What is friendship?’, but also ‘Who is the friend (both or 
either sex)?’ is nothing but the question ‘What is philosophy?’. 

Was ist das — die Philosophie?! In the conference bearing this tide, 
Heidegger pinpoints the moment when the philein of Heraclitus’ philein to 
sophon, having been determined as the ‘originary accord’ or ‘harmony’ (ein 


ursprunglicher Einklang, harmonia), would have become tension towards a 
search — a question, precisely — a jealous, nostalgic, and tense (strebende 
Suchen) inquisition, an investigation ‘determined by Eros’: the desire and 
tension of drexis.!° Thought (Das Denken) would have become philosophy 
only in the wake of this eroticization of questioning around being (‘Was ist 
das Seiende, insofem es ist?’). “Heraclitus and Parmenides were not yet 
“philosophers”.’ The ‘step’ to philosophy would have been prepared by 
sophistry, then accomplished by Socrates and Plato. Guided by a vigilant 
reading of this interpretation, we could attempt to follow the discreet lead of 
an unceasing meditation on friendship in Heidegger’s path of thinking.!” In 
the course of this meditation we encounter, in particular, a strange and 
isolated allusion to the hearing of the ‘voice of the friend (Stimme des 
Freundes] which every Dasein carries with it’.!® The existential analytic of 
Dasein, which ‘carries’ (trdgt) this voice within it, is — let us not forget — 
neither an anthropology nor a sociology, nor an analytic of the subject, the 
person, consciousness, the psukhe or the self; neither an ethics or a politics. 
For all these disciplines presuppose it. This bestows on the voice of the 
friend — and therefore on friendship itself — an especial ontological 
signification, in a chapter on Dasein und Rede, Die Sprache, and not even 
in the analytic of Mitsein. This strange voice, at once both interior and 
coming from without, is perhaps not unrelated to the ‘voice’ of 
consciousness (Gewissen) of which Heidegger also proposes an existential 
analytic (Sein und Zeit, paras 57 ff.). The provenance of the call, its Woher, 
is an Unheimlichkeit (para. 58) which would be sufficient to uproot all mere 
domesticity if it did not play a more ambiguous but spectral and always 
decisive role in Heidegger’s discourse. The voice of the call is always felt to 
be a foreign voice, a non-intimate one (‘unvertraut — so etwas wie eine 
fremde Stimme) by the One’ of the everyday (para. 57). The gender of this 
‘friend’ is not determined; we would thus be tempted to graft on to this 
reading a question posed elsewhere on the subject of the word Geschlecht 
and the question of sexual difference in Heidegger.!° 

The sophistic moment would signify a scission in the thought of 
harmony. To heal this wound, to calm this discord or this false note in the 
harmony of the Einklang, to reconstitute the originary philein thus 
interrupted, the worried and nostalgic philosopher asks ‘what is ...?’. It 
thereby becomes what it is, philosophy, as if, beneath the question ‘what is? 
(ti estin)’, or ‘what is being?’, ‘the beingness of being (tf to on)?’, 


philosophy was implicitly asking: what has happened? What has occurred? 
— in other words: What has happened to philein or to originary Einklang? 
Why has the harmony been interrupted? Why the discord and the false 
note? Why has Jogos been affected thus, this logos which means the 
gathering of the One? 

These same questions should lead, through the thinker’s Gesprach with 
the poet, a speech between two which always supposes some friendship, 
towards two types of texts: on the one hand those that address Holderlin 
(‘Wo aber sind die Freunde?, in Andenken), and on the other hand, those 
addressed to Trakl, to the figures of ‘the friend who follows the stranger’, to 
those of the brother and sister, precisely around this motif of Geschlecht.?! 
But the question ‘What is philosophy?’, philosophy qua philia tou sophou, 
is repeated and interpreted by Heidegger, often in the ringing out of philein 
as it rings in the Heraclitean sentence (‘Der Spruch Heraklits: phusis 
kruptesthai philev’). Heidegger translates philia as accorded favour (Gunst), 
benevolent protection, good grace.**’ ‘In phiisis reigns the benevolence of 
what accords or is accorded, as the favourable of the favour.’*? Or again: 
‘We understand philein as favour or solicitude.’?*Philia would name here 
the essential, reciprocal or alternative (wechselweise) relation between 
rising, Opening or opening up (Aufgehen) and the decline or the covering- 
over (Untergehen [Sichverbergen]) of phusis. 

What does to accord mean? In what language is it accorded to be able to 
hear it? 

Qua philia, phusis accords. It is the accord, the accord in itself of 
harmony and given accord, but its solicitude for revelation is also accorded 
to the dissimulation of self: accord in itself of what is accorded in rising and 
what is accorded in decline, the Aufgehen as well as the Untergehen. And, 
as always for Heidegger, under the law of a Jogos that assembles and 
gathers up. The gathering (Versammlung) always prevails, even if it accords 
the tensions of a false note. Phusis and philia, phusis qua philia: one, like 
the other, guards this at once generous and jealous relation to itself, as it 
were, it loves (in) hiding: [elle aime a se cacher], kruptesthai philein. It 
loves to hide and only loves in hiding, it loves providing it is hidden. The 
withdrawal of the sense of decency [pudeur] here bestows movement itself, 
it bestows originarily, and not in the twilight of some sin; it bestows the gift 


of what thus couples, in order to accord them, phusis and philia, and phuein 
to philein, with one another. 

And on the path of this phuein (to be born, to grow, to sprout up, to grow 
up, to mature), on the path of this generation qua philein, one might be 
tempted here to retrace the genealogy of this genealogy, that of this 
genealogism which we have so insistently recognized in the political figures 
of philia, in particular in autochthonism and its fratrocentrism. Would it be 
so difficult to find the trace of Greek autochthonism in Heideggerian 
thought? No one has the slightest doubt, so evident seems the trace. 

Up to a certain point, we must, to be sure, account for Heidegger’s 
concern with avoiding anachronism in this hearing of philia and philein. 
Now the most serious deafness would consist, according to him, in 
anthropologizing, psychologizing, subjectifying philein. Heidegger would 
appear to incriminate modern metaphysics for this deafness, in any case the 
post-Christian philosophy of subjectivity. It sometimes seems difficult to 
follow him along this epochal scansion, especially when he excludes 
Aristotle from this anthropologization of philia or philein. The 
subject/object opposition is no doubt anachronistic. But how can he claim 
that the anthropological — indeed, psychological — vantage point remains 
foreign to Aristotle? It is also true that Heidegger does not then speak of a 
discourse on anthropos or on psukhe in general, but of what is called in 
modem times anthropology or psychology. These are the so-called 
disciplines that would depend on a metaphysics of subjectivity, on an 
interpretation of the human qua subject. This allows us to read, in the same 
passage, that Christianity constitutes the preparatory stage of an education 
of the passions, and even a psychology. The first consequence, if Heidegger 
is to be followed here, would be that a// the discourses of friendship that we 
have evoked hitherto, all the post-Aristotelian treatises de amicitia, whether 
Roman, neo-Roman or not, come under a ‘Christian metaphysics of 
subjectivity’. And the same consequence would hold for all the ‘politics’ 
that we have been trying to decipher. They would remain politics of 
psychological subjectivity, exactly as would the concept of the political 
from which they claim to stem. Treatises, confessions, poems, fictions, 
would have begun, without exception, by subjectifying, anthropologizing, 
psychologizing — indeed, Christianizing — philia. 

Now, for the Greeks there would be no psychology. No anthropological 
‘subject’. Aristotle’s treatise Peri psukhés would have nothing to do with a 


‘psychology’. In its very accomplishment, metaphysics would become 
‘psychology’. Psychology and anthropology would be ‘the last word’ of 
metaphysics. Psychology and technics go ‘hand in hand’.*> Whatever the 
status of this epochal distribution and the problems it creates, the 
conclusion would be clear: when Heidegger evokes the friend or friendship, 
he does so in a space which is not — or no longer, or not yet — the space of 
the person or the subject, nor that of anthropos, the object of anthropology, 
nor that of the psuwkhe of psychologists. Nor, therefore, that of an attendant 
politics. 

When, in a rather late text, Heidegger attempts to return to an experience 
of speech or of language (Sprache) sufficiently originary to precede, as it 
were, questioning itself (das Fragen); when he recalls that this questioning 
— the very moment of research, knowledge, philosophy — presupposes a 
certain acquiescence (Zusage), an accord given to Sprache, engaged in it, 
he finds again, perhaps, that agency of philein which has not yet become 
philosophia: a questioning tension, an eroticization of a Streben, a jealous, 
nostalgic, mournful or curious contraction of Eros; then, against this 
backdrop, metaphysical subjectivization, psychologization, politicization. 


(We have attempted elsewhere, more than once, to recognize and draw 
the consequences of such an arche-originary pledge preceding all 
questioning. When we propose here to think a certain experience of the 
perhaps ‘prior to’ the possibility of such a pledge which must be found 
suspended therein, we can only raise the stakes in a Heideggerian warning 
against the ‘subjective’, ‘psychological’, ‘metaphysical’ interpretation of 
philia and its ‘polities’. But our aim is to propel this movement in another 
direction, and here towards a thought of friendship which could never thrive 
in that ‘gathering’ (Versammlung) which prevails over everything and 
originarily accords philia to phusis and logos.) 


It is perhaps in a region thus withdrawn from metaphysical subjectivity 
that for Heidegger ‘the voice of the friend’ rings out. The issue is perhaps 
what we were calling above a minimal ‘community’ — but also 
incommensurable to all others, speaking the same language or praying, or 
weeping, for translation against the horizon of a sole language, if only to 
manifest a disagreement: friendship prior to friendships. One would have to 
add: ‘prior to’ enmity. 


This promise before friendships would be linked to the ‘yes, yes’, this 
promise of memory that we have attempted to analyse elsewhere. The 
double affirmation must remain essentially risky, threatened, open. Above 
all, it cannot allow itself to be defined or posited, it cannot be reduced to a 
determined position. As such, it eludes opposition. It is therefore not yet 
‘political’ — at least, not in the strictly coded sense of the tradition Schmitt 
claims to have defined. We could, then, resituate the ‘concept of the 
political’. 

Without going back over the affinities of this ‘concept’ with a certain 
politics, in a context dominated by national socialism, at this precise point 
the attempt can in fact be made at least to discern topical differences: 
between Heidegger’s subject and Schmitt’s on the one hand, between these 
two poles and what we have been attempting to articulate, here or 
elsewhere. 

Against the backdrop of a sort of historical community or an affinity of 
co-appurtenance whose features would have to be reconstituted, Schmitt 
seems first of all to share with Heidegger a firm conviction: one must get 
behind the subjectal or anthropological determination of the Freund /Feind 
couple. Likewise, one would have to remove all corresponding or 
dependent determinations: psychological, anthropological, moral, aesthetic, 
economic. To shed light on the affinity and difference between Heidegger 
and Schmitt, we must return again to some of the latter’s analyses, in order 
to reread them differently, especially with respect to Schmitt’s logic or 
ontology of ‘real possibility’: 

The specific political distinction to which political actions and motives can be reduced is that 

between friend and enemy.... The distinction of friend and enemy denotes the utmost degree of 


intensity of a union or separation, of an association or dissociation. It can exist theoretically and 
practically, without having simultaneously to draw upon all those moral, aesthetic, economic, or 


other distinctions [to wit: the distinctions mentioned above: good-evil, beautiful-ugly].7° 


The friend and enemy concepts are to be understood in their concrete and existential sense, not as 
metaphors or symbols, not mixed and weakened by economic, moral, and other conceptions, least 
of all in a private-individualistic sense as a psychological expression of private emotions and 


tendencies. They are neither normative nor pure spiritual [vein geistigen|] antitheses.~” 


War is still today the most extreme possibility. One can say that the exceptional case has an 
especially decisive meaning which exposes the core of the matter. For only in real combat is 
revealed the most extreme consequence of the political grouping of friend and enemy. From this 
most extreme possibility human life derives its specifically political tension. 

A world in which the possibility of war is utterly eliminated, a completely pacified globe, 
would be a world without the distinction of friend and enemy and hence a world without politics. 


It is conceivable that such a world might contain many very interesting antitheses and contrasts, 
competitions and intrigues of every kind, but there would not be a meaningful antithesis whereby 
men could be required to sacrifice life, authorized to shed blood, and kill other human beings. For 
the definition of the political, it is here even irrelevant whether such a world without politics is 
desirable as an ideal situation. The phenomenon of the political can be understood only in the 
context of the ever present possibility of the friend-and-enemy grouping, regardless of the aspects 
which this possibility implies for morality, aesthetics, and economics. 

War as the most extreme political means discloses the possibility which underlies every 
political idea, namely, the distinction of friend and enemy. This makes sense only as long as this 
distinction in mankind is actually present (real vorhanden) or at least potentially possible (real 
moglich). On the other hand, it would be senseless (sinnwidrig) to wage war for ‘purely’ religious, 
‘purely’ moral, ‘purely’ juristic, or ‘purely’ economic motives. The friend and enemy grouping 
and therefore also war cannot be derived from these specific antitheses of human endeavor. A war 


need be neither something religious nor something morally good nor something lucrative.7® 


All in all, Schmitt proposes a deduction of the political as such from a place 
in which there was as yet no such thing as the political. Between the 
originary and the derived, the opposition must be rigorous and clear-cut 
(and this oppositional logic, on this point, is common to Heidegger and 
Schmitt). To deduce the political, the enemy as such must be thought — that 
is, the possibility of a properly political war: 


If there really are enemies in the ontological sense as meant here, then it is logical (sinnvoll), but 
of an exclusively political logic (aber nur politisch sinnvoll), to repel and fight them physically.... 
For as long as a people exists in the political sphere, this people must, even if only in the most 
extreme case — and whether this point has been reached has to be decided by it — determine by 
itself the distinction of friend and enemy. Therein resides the essence of its political existence.... 
The justification of war does not reside in its being fought for ideals or norms of justice, but in its 
being fought against a real enemy. All confusions of this category of friend and enemy can be 


explained as results of blendings of some sort of abstractions or norms.”? 


If Schmitt determines the political in terms of the enemy rather than those 
of the friend, this is doubtless no merely inconsequential dissymmetry. As 
we recalled above, Schmitt relies on a necessity he calls a dialectical one. If 
a politics of friendship rather than war were to be derived, there would have 
to be agreement on the meaning of ‘friend’. But the signification of ‘friend’ 
can be determined only from within the friend/enemy opposition. In his 
deduction of the political, Schmitt in fact reverts to this oppositional logic, 
to the friend/enemy opposition, to the possibility of war rather than to the 
dissymmetrical fact of enmity. Here, we are heading towards a question 
which would perhaps concern the possibility of an experience of friendship 
outside or on the near side of this oppositional or ‘polemological’ logic, and 
hence, also, of the purity that the latter seems to require. 


Now, although Heidegger shares Schmitt’s concern with oppositional 
purity, it would no doubt be vain to seek in his work such a determining 
deduction of the political. Is this a lack, an absence suffered or desired? Is it 
because, moving back under this determination, towards a more originary 
zone, Heidegger no longer possessed the means of a determining 
derivation? Is it the modernity of such a determination which is in default? 
But where, and whose? Heidegger’s or modernity’s itself? And what if 
Heidegger, in Schmitt’s very logic, had understood this properly modem 
depoliticization of a world in which the enemy concept loses its limits? And 
what if Heidegger had thought this depoliticization (nihilist, in sum, he 
would have said) is but the truth of politics, of the metaphysical concept of 
politics carried out to its culmination? Schmitt would then in this case 
become the last great metaphysician of politics, the last great spokesperson 
of European political metaphysics. Questionable or not (the issue will not 
be discussed here), such a hypothesis would lack, it seems to us, neither 
interest nor verisimilitude — nor, precisely, promise for political thought, for 
politics as such. For what is not in the least paradoxical and the least 
interesting in the Schmittian attempt is precisely this reactive stubbornness 
in conserving, restoring, reconstituting, saving or refining the classic 
oppositional distinctions at the very moment when, bringing his attention to 
bear on a certain modernity (that of ‘technics’, of war indissociable from 
technics, partisan war or the Cold War, wars in progress or wars to come), 
he is forced to register the effacement of fundamental distinctions, qua 
metaphysical, theologico-political — let us say, rather, onto-theological — 
distinctions. 

How can Schmitt be surprised? How can he bemoan the problems 
encountered through a reflection whose object is the friend/enemy 
distinction, when he himself admits that ‘our age ... simultaneously 
produces engines of nuclear extermination and effaces the distinction 
between war and peace’? Does he not dream of improving the instrument of 
a classical theory (which moreover, according to him, would never have 
been of great use) to adjust it to a modernity, to a modem theory of the 
political and a modem polemology which can perfectly well dispense with 
such an instrument? Schmitt can thus write: 


The era of systems is over. The beginning of the great epoch of the European republic (Epoche des 
europdischen Staatlichkeit), three hundered years ago, saw the birth of magnificent systems of 
thought. It is no longer possible, in our age, to construct the like. The only thing possible today is 


a historical retrospective gathering up the image of that great epoch of jus publicum Europaeum, 


with its concepts of the State, of war, and of the just enemy, in the consciousness of its 


systematics.*° 


Further on, he notes that the Cold War provokes 


the rupture of these axes of coupled concepts which up to now have sustained the traditional 
system of limits and forms imposed on war. The Cold War totally ignores the classic distinctions 
between war, peace, and neutrality, between the political and the economic, military and civilian, 
soldier and civilian, with the exception of the friend/enemy distinction, whose logic presides at the 
birth of war and determines its nature. 

Nothing surprising, then, if the old English word foe* has left the four-hundred-year-old 
lethargy of its archaism to return to common usage, over the past two decades, next to the word 
enemy. In an age which simultaneously produces devices of nuclear extermination and effaces the 
distinction between war and peace, how is one, consequently, to prevent the pursuit of a reflection 


whose object is the friend/enemy distinction?>! 


Here again, through deviations which one must refrain from reducing and 
which would demand patient work, Heidegger shares Schmitt’s disquiet; he 
subscribes to his diagnosis and prognosis: the distinction between war and 
peace is disappearing in the technological deployment of modem wars qua 
‘world wars’. A world war is no longer a war, nor is it, obviously, peace. 
Now Heidegger: 


The ‘world wars’ and their character of ‘totality’ und ihre ‘Totalitdt’) are already a consequence of 
the abandonment of Being (Seinsverlassenheit). They press toward a guarantee of the stability of a 
constant form of using things up (Vemutzung). Man, who no longer conceals his character of being 
the most important raw material, is also drawn into this process. Man is the ‘most important raw 
material’ because he remains the subject of all consumption. He does this in such a way that he 
lets his will be unconditionally equated with this process, and thus at the same time become the 
‘object’ of the abandonment of being. The world wars are the antecedent (Vorform) form of the 
removal (Beseitigung) of the difference between war and peace. This removal is necessary since 
the ‘world’ has become an unworld (Unwelt) as a consequence of the abandonment of beings by 
Being’s truth.... Changed into their deformation of essence (zu ihrem Unwesen abgeandert), ‘war’ 
and ‘peace’ are taken up into erring (/rmis), and disappear into the mere course of the escalating 
manufacture of what can be manufactured (Machen von Machbarkeiten), because they have 
become unrecognizable with regard to any distinction. The question of when there will be peace 
cannot be answered not because the duration of war is unfathomable, but rather because the 
question already asks about something which no longer exists, since war is no longer anything 


which could terminate in peace.** 


That which Schmitt and Heidegger have in common, it would seem, is the 
credit given to opposition: not only oppositional logic (dialectical or not, 
the one the Nietzsche of the ‘dangerous perhaps’ smiles at), not only pure 
distinctions, pure opposition between the originary and the derived, but 


oppositionality itself, ontological adversity, that which holds adversaries 
together, assembling them in /égos qua ontological pdélemos.** Despite 
these affinities, one could wager that Heidegger would have considered the 
Schmittian discourse as a tribute paid once again, on the part of a lucid 
theoretician, to a post-Christian metaphysics of subjectivity incapable of 
posing authentic ontological questions and carrying all his concepts to their 
level. Notably around these values of ‘possibility’, of ‘actual’ or ‘present’ 
‘possibility’ which play an organizing role in The Concept of the Political. 
And even more so around the friend/enemy couple, a couple of subjects, a 
couple that finally leaves unquestioned the very question of what in the last 
instance a subject (individual or collective) is, and what friendship or its 
opposite is. 


The very possibility of the question, in the form ‘what is ...?’, thus 
seems, from the beginning, to suppose this friendship prior to friendships, 
this anterior affirmation of being-together in allocution. Such an 
affirmation does not allow itself to be simply incorporated and, above all, to 
be presented as a present-being (substance, subject, essence or existence) in 
the space of an ontology, precisely because it opens this space up. The ‘I- 
who’ to which Nietzsche’s statement refers in Human All Too Human (‘Ruf 
ich, der lebende Tor’) would not necessarily suppose, in its grammatical 
appearance, the presence of such a subject, of a present-being gua subject. 
Therefore, of a calculability of this one indivisible and identical to itself, 
this one to which, all in all, nothing can happen which would affect it in its 
being, divide it or spoil it; no decision, above all, whereby this identity to 
self would be called into play; nothing, then, that would not float on the 
surface of a substantial and unmoving autonomy. 

Behind the logical play of the contradiction or the paradox, perhaps the 
‘O my friends, there is no friend’ means initially and finally this 
overrunning of the present by the undeniable future anterior which would 
be the very movement and time of friendship. Does not the sentence avow 
an undeniable future anterior, the absolute of an unpresentable past as well 
as future — that is, traces that can be disavowed only in convoking them into 
the daylight of phenomenal presence? 

A temporal torsion would thus knot the predicative proposition (‘there is 
no friend’) to the inside of the apostrophe (‘O my friends’). The torsion of 


the dissymmetry would envelop the theoretical observation or knowledge in 
the performativity of a prayer that it could never exhaust. 


This dissymmetry brings us back to the question of the response. 


How is the question of the response to be linked to the question of 
responsibility? And why make friendship a privileged locus for this 
reflection? A brief grammar of the response — or rather, of ‘responding’ — 
will afford a preliminary insight into our reasons. We are sketching such a 
grammar in terms of a language, the French language, but — at /east in this 
case — the concepts do not seem altogether limited by this language. This 1s 
not to say that they hold in general beyond all languages (syntax and lexis) 
but that, in this context, they appear translatable within a group of European 
languages which authorize us here to question something like our culture 
and our concept of responsibility. Suffice it to say that this grammar, 
however schematic, will be a little more than a grammar. 

One says ‘to answer for’, ‘to respond to’, ‘to answer before’. These three 
modalities are not juxtaposable; they are enveloped and implied in one 
another. One answers for, for self or for something (for someone, for an 
action, a thought, a discourse), before — before an other, a community of 
others, an institution, a court, a law. And always one answers for (for self or 
for its intention, its action or discourse), before, by first responding to: this 
last modality thus appearing more originary, more fundamental and hence 
unconditional. 

1. One answers for self, for what one is, says, or does, and this holds 
beyond the simple present. The ‘self or the ‘I’ thus supposes unity — in other 
words, memory that answers. This is often called the unity of the subject, 
but such a synthesis of memory can be conceived without necessarily 
reverting to the concept of subject, in any case without a subject qua living 
being (this predicate is difficult to reduce as long as the word ‘subject’ still 
means something not arbitrarily or conventionally ascribed to the semantic 
history of the word). This unity is never assured in itself gua empirical 
synthesis; the so-called proper name becomes the agency to which the 
recognition of this identity is confided. T am assumed to be responsible for 
‘myself — that is, for everything imputable to that which bears my name. 
This imputability presupposes freedom, to be sure — a non-present freedom; 
but also that what bears my name remains the ‘same’, not only from one 


moment to the next, from one state of that which bears my name to another, 
but even beyond life or presence in general — for example, beyond the self- 
presence of what bears the name. The agency called here ‘the proper name’ 
cannot necessarily be reduced to the registered name, patronymic or social 
reference, although these phenomena are most often its determining 
manifestation. 

The question of the proper name is obviously at the heart of the 
friendship problematic. Pre-socratic philia was perhaps capable of doing 
without the proper name, at least without what we are calling the proper 
name, if it is true, as Heidegger claims, that philia is older than subjectivity. 
But supposing that the proper name rigorously presupposes a concept of 
subjectivity (nothing seems less assured), we have a real problem thinking 
friendship without the proper name, whether it corresponds to a registered 
patronymic or not. The friendship for La Boétie, as Montaigne says, was 
first friendship for a name. The name preceded their encounter. More 
precisely, this encounter or ‘accointance’ took place long before ‘I met him 
and first made me acquainted with his name, thus preparing for that loving 
friendship...’: 


Meditating this union there was, beyond all my reasoning, beyond all that I can say specifically 
about it, some inexplicable force of destiny. We were seeking each other before we set eyes on 
each other — both because of the reports we each had heard, which made a more violent assault on 
our emotions than was reasonable from what they had said, and I believe, because of some decree 


of Heaven: we embraced each other by our names.*4 


2. One first responds to the other: to the question, the request, the prayer, 
the apostrophe, the call, the greeting or the sign, the adieu of the other. This 
dimension of answering qua responding to — appears more originary than 
the others for two reasons. On the one hand one does not answer for oneself 
in one’s Own name, one is responsible only before the question, the request, 
the interpellation, the ‘insistence’ of the other. On the other hand, the proper 
name structuring the ‘answering for oneself is in itself for the other — either 
because the other has chosen it (for example, the name given to me at birth, 
one I never chose, which ushers me into the space of law) or because, in 
any case, it implies the other in the very act of naming, in its origin, finality 
and use. The answering always supposes the other in a relation to self, it 
keeps the sense of this dissymmetrical ‘anteriority’ down to the apparently 
most interior and most solitary autonomy of the ‘as regards self’, of interior 
consciousness and moral consciousness jealous of its independence — 


another word for freedom. This dissymmetrical anteriority also marks 
temporalization as the structure of responsibility. 


3. Answering before: this expression seems first to modalize the 
‘responding to’. One anwers before the other because, first of all, one 
responds to the other. But this modalization is more than and different from 
an exemplary specification. And it plays a decisive role whose effects we 
should register. The expression ‘before’ marks in general, nght on the 
idiom, the passage to an institutional agency of alterity. It is no longer 
singular but universal in its principle. One responds fo the other, who can 
always be singular, and must in one respect remain so, but one answers 
before the law, a court, a jury, an agency authorized to represent the other 
legitimately, in the institutional form of a moral, juridical, political 
community. We have here two forms or two dimensions of the respect 
entailed in all responsibility. 


Considering the rigour, the force and the originality that Kant confers on 
this concept, will we say that respect introduces a new configuration into 
this philosophical history of friendship whose canon we have been 
questioning? Let us first note in passing that these two words, respect and 
responsibility, which come together and provoke each other relentlessly, 
seem to refer, in the case of the former, to languages of the Latin family, to 
distance, to space, to the gaze; and in the case of the latter, to time, to the 
voice and to listening. There is no respect, as its name connnotes, without 
the vision and distance of a spacing. No responsibility without response, 
without what speaking and hearing invisibly say to the ear, and which takes 
time. The co-implication of responsibility and respect can be felt at the heart 
of friendship, one of the enigmas of which would stem from this distance, 
this concern in what concerns the other: a respectful separation seems to 
distinguish friendship from love. 

Kant is undoubtedly the first, the first with such critical and thematic 
rigour, to have set out to locate what is proper to this friendly respect. There 
is no friendship without ‘the respect of the other’. The respect of friendship 
is certainly inseparable from a ‘morally good will’ (the tradition of virtue in 
the protée philia, from Aristotle to Cicero and Montaigne). However, it 
cannot, for all that, be simply conflated with purely moral respect, the one 
due only to its ‘cause’, the moral law, which finds in the person only an 


example. To respect the friend is not exactly to respect the law. One can 
have friendship for a person: an example of respect for the moral law. One 
has no friendship for law, the cause of moral respect. 

The fundamental passage that the Doctrine of Virtue devotes to friendship 
is formidably complex.*> Kant quotes in turn, in a slightly different form, 
Aristotle’s saying, and as if by chance, having hailed the great couples of 
friends, always men, only men. And in this short treatise on friendship — 
entitled, however, ‘On the Most Intimate Union of Love with Respect in 
Friendship’ — there is not the slightest allusion to woman, nor even to 
sexual difference. As for the great couples of great men, they furnish this 
analysis with its only historical example, in truth a mythological and Greek 
one, and cue the only proper names present in it. Kant, it is true, does not 
fail to note that he places himself, here, in the historical and canonical space 
of citation. He is then held by the law of a genre, an almost literary genre, a 
kind of novel: 


Friendship thought as attainable in in its purity or completeness (between Orestes and Pylades, 
Theseus and Pirithoiis) is the hobby horse of writers of romances. On the other hand Aristotle 
says: My dear friends, there is no such thing as a friend! The following remarks may draw 
attention to the difficulties in perfect friendship, (p. 148) 


What difficulties? And what are the schemata which, here again, impose 
themselves if we are to think these difficulties, to establish them in their 
concepts and to propose solutions for them? As always, Kant inscribes the 
most original and the most necessary critical signature in the lineage of a 
tradition. Following the Aristotelian distinction to which Montaigne also 
remained faithful, Kant begins by saying that he will speak of friendship in 
so far as it is “considered in its perfection’. But he confers on this perfection 
the perfectly rigorous status of what is called an idea in the Kantian sense. 
In its perfection, therefore — that is, gua an unattainable but practically 
necessary idea — friendship supposes both Jove and respect. It must be equal 
and reciprocal: reciprocal love, equal respect. One has the duty to tend 
towards and to nurture this ideal of ‘sympathy’ and ‘communication’ 
(Mitteilung). For though friendship does not produce happiness, the two 
feelings composing it envelop a dignity; they render mankind worthy of 
being happy. First difficulty: if it is a duty to thus tend towards a maximum 
of good intentions, if ‘perfect friendship’ is a ‘simple idea’, how will 
‘equality’ in the ‘relation to one’s neighbour’ be ensured in the process? For 


example, the equality in each of the constituent parts of a like duty (thus 
‘reciprocal benevolence’). For reciprocity is not equality, and the criteria 
which would ensure that sentiments are equally reciprocal, equally intense 
or ardent in reciprocity are lacking. The intensity or force, the ‘ardour’, of 
love (which is united with respect in friendship) can break the equality 
while maintaining the reciprocity. Even more seriously, Kant asks, cannot 
this ardour of love, this ‘excessive ardour in love’, this very excess, provoke 
the loss ‘of the respect of the other’? For we come now to the major 
difficulty in the very idea of friendship, inherent in the contradictory 
character and hence the unstable balance of these two feelings which are 
opposed qua fusional ‘attraction’ (Jove) and ‘repulsion’ which keeps at a 
distance (respect). 

We should register here a first limit, in our view an extremely significant 
one. In order to describe or present this contradiction (which formally 
recalls the contradiction in the Aristotelian concept of friendship as we set it 
out above), Kant affords himself no other resource than the natural law put 
at his disposal by the science or metaphysics of nature: the law of universal 
attraction (and repulsion). It will be said that this is a manner of speaking, a 
rhetoric of presentation. Perhaps, but for Kant there is no other, and he 
devotes no critical attention to it. Even when, from this situation described 
in natural terms, he claims to be able to draw up a rule or maxim. He writes: 


For love can be regarded as attraction and respect as repulsion, and if the principle of love bids 
friends to draw closer, the principle of respect requires them to stay at a proper distance from each 
other. This limitation on intimacy, which is expressed in the rule that even the best of friends 
should not make themselves too familiar with each other, contains a maxim that holds not only for 
the superior in relation to the inferior but also in reverse, (p. 261; emphasis added) 


The maxim of this rule concerns, as is often the case in this analysis, the 
necessity of testimony, of the testimony of respect that cannot, for all that, 
be reduced to the ‘outward manifestations’ of respect. When the superior 
finds his pride wounded, he may consent to not receiving testimony of the 
respect due him, but then this consent must last only a moment. The maxim 
commands that it last only a moment, Ming which the unmarked respect is 
irremediably lost, even though it may be mimicked in the ‘outward 
manifestations’ of a ceremonial. Hence an (exterior) testimony of respect is 
needed which must be the exterior of an interior, an expression and not a 
simple exteriority. And it must be capable of steadfastly resisting the ordeal 


of time, it must be steady and reliable, or — let us say it once more in Greek 
— ‘bébaios’. 


Yet with this imperative of a distance (albeit ‘proper’, as he says) Kant 
introduces into the continuum of a tradition, which is none the less 
confirmed by him, a principle of rupture or interruption that can no longer 
be easily reconciled with the values of proximity, presence, gathering 
together, and communal familiarity which dominate the traditional culture 
of friendship. Or at least, Kant grants the necessity of this distance, even if 
it never totally escaped the attention of his predecessors, a more rigorous 
philosophical status, and the dignity of a law with its rule and maxim. And 
what Kant here calls perfect friendship gua ‘moral’ friendship (which he 
distinguishes from aesthetic friendship) is no longer in any sense of the 
term what Aristotle called ‘ethical’ friendship (itself distinguished from 
‘nomic’ or legal friendship*®). If this respectful distance from the other was 
not countered by love and attraction, it ought to become infinite. 
Furthermore, a double objection to this distance can be levelled at Kant: (1) 
in the name of what moral right is the infinity of this respect owed the other 
to be limited? (2) Why and how should a law presented as natural (the 
‘force of attraction’ coming to be opposed to the ‘force of repulsion’) 
intervene here to limit the respectful distance? And why would this distance 
be presented as repulsion? The double objection would concern not only the 
concept of friendship but that of love as well. Why would love be only the 
ardent force of an attraction tending towards fusion, union, and 
identification? Why would the infinite distance which opens respect up, and 
which Kant wished to limit by love, not open love up as well? And even 
more so, perhaps, in the love experience or in lovence in general, as if it 
were necessary to say the converse: the infinite distance in love, a certain 
kind of coming together in friendship? And why would the moral principle 
be on the side of friendship, not on that of love? Would this bear no relation 
to the masculine model of friendship, of the virility of virtue, which, as we 
shall prove, is for Kant, too, the ultimate authorizing agency? 

This, then, is our hypothesis, and we are going to attempt to support it. It 
requires that we pay attention to what Kant calls ‘the friend of man’. 

Let us not forget that we are speaking here of virtue, of purely moral 
friendship, not of ‘aesthetic’ friendship, which does not suppose the respect 
of the other. Kant is neither very gentle nor very tender with friendship. He 


doesn’t think friendship should be tender. The friendship of Kant is not 
gentle, and if it were to become so, Kant would put us on our guard against 
it. He is quick to recall the suffering and the sacrifice, as well as the cost, 
involved in such friendship. Kant needs this negativity, even if ‘it is a heavy 
burden to feel chained to another’s fate and encumbered with his needs’. 
Friendship must therefore not be a social security, a mutual benefit 
insurance, and the assistance on which the other must be able to count could 
never be the end, the ‘determining ground’, of friendship. Help and 
assistance are nevertheless necessary, but once again, under the heading of 
‘outward manifestations’ of heartfelt benevolence. For this inner 
benevolence is never directly accessible, originarily and ‘in person’, as a 
phenomenologist would say, but only in ‘appresentation’ with the help of an 
outward sign: with the help of testimony. In other words, one must help the 
friend — not to help him, not because he needs assistance, or because that 
would be the principle or the end of friendship, but in order to give him the 
signs of friendship. 

Why, in sum, is Kant so suspicious of tenderness and gentleness, of 
teneritas amicitiae? This paradoxical movement must be correctly 
understood, for it sheds indirect light on the Kantian concept of love and, 
above all, introduces a catastrophic complication into the natural law of 
attraction/repulsion which none the less organizes this friendly ‘doctrine of 
virtue’. Let us first of all say it succinctly: an excess of tenderness tends 
towards reciprocal possession and fusion (excessive attraction) and — 
following this, or as a consequence! — this measureless gentleness 
inevitably leads to interruption — indeed, to rupture. This, then, is a case (the 
tenderness of reciprocal possession) where attraction leads to rupture, 
where attraction becomes the quasi-synonym of repulsion. Too much love 
separates, interrupts, threatens the social bond. Following this logic, the 
most paradoxical consequences are unleashed or, on the contrary, never fail 
to become rigorously bound, to the point of strangulation, in a double bind: 
the natural law of attraction/repulsion is perverted into a principle of 
absolute disorder. Here we have, in fact, a situation in which the principle 
of repulsion would have to be compensated not by attraction, which would 
lead to a worse repulsion, an interruption or a rupture, but by repulsion 
itself (repulsion against repulsion: painful respect). This, too, is a situation 
in which the principle of attraction would have to be compensated not by 
repulsion, which would lead to rupture, but by attraction itself (attraction 


against attraction: a slightly but not too tender friendship). The enemy — the 
enemy of morality, in any case — is love. Not because love is the enemy, but 
because, in the excessive attraction unleashed by love, enmity and war are 
allowed to take place. Love harbours hate within itself. Reciprocal 
possession and fusion towards which the tender one risks tending is nothing 
else but a principle of (non-natural) perversion at the heart of the natural 
law of attraction and repulsion. It could be compared to a death instinct or a 
demonic principle. It would end up haunting virtue. If this is indeed the 
case, friendship would then be at one and the same time the sign, the 
symptom, the representative of this possible perversion, yet also what 
protects us from such perversion. The evil and the remedy for the evil. 
Under these conditions, how could the concept of moral perfection not be 
contradictory? This, in any case, is the reading of these lines we are 
proposing: although they are couched in a rather conventional mode of 
moderating wisdom, as in the midst of cultivated people in a select club, 
they nevertheless carry a terrible message, a message of terror, news of 
death: love is the evil, love can be evil’s vehicle and evil can always come 
out of love, the radical evil of the greatest love. Abandon is the evil: 
abandon unto oneself or unto the other. And this begins very simply on the 
threshold, with ‘feeling’ — with the appearance of feeling or affect in 
general. Against abandon, a sole response: ‘rules’, and ‘strict’ rules at that: 


Although it is sweet to feel in such possession of each other as approaches fusion into one person, 
friendship is something so delicate (teneritas amicitiae) that it is never for a moment safe from 
interruptions if it is allowed to rest on feelings, and if this mutual sympathy and self-surrender are 
not subjected to principles or rules preventing excessive familiarity and limiting mutual love by 
requirements of respect. Such interruptions are common among uncultivated people, although 
they do not always result in a split (for the rabble fight and make up). Such people cannot part 
with each other, and yet they cannot be at one with each other since they need quarrels in order to 
savour the sweetness of being united in reconciliation. But in any case the love in friendship 
cannot be an affect; for emotion is blind in its choice, and after a while it goes up in smoke, (p. 
262; original emphasis) 


The black painting of a black-tinged passion. If one now compares this 
bedevilment of love (it’s simply a question of turning the page) to the 
appearance of a certain black swan, then another landscape of Kantism 
offers up an unconscious to be read. And it is certainly not the unconscious 
of only that philosopher named Immanuel Kant. 

What is the secret of this black swan? Secrecy [Le secret], 


A reflection on the Kantian ethics and politics of friendship should in fact 
organize itself around the concept of secrecy. The concept seems to 
(secretly) dominate this Conclusion of the Elements of Ethics, and to mark 
problematically the ideal of friendship gua communication (Mitteilung) or 


egalitarian sharing. In contradistinction to aesthetic friendship,*’ moral 
friendship demands absolute confidence, a confidence such that ‘two 
people’ must share not only their impressions, but even their secret 
judgements. The political stakes are obvious: Kant concludes that true 
friends ought to be able to say anything to each other on questions of 
government, religion, etc. This 1s quite dangerous, and rare indeed are 
reliable friends, those, then, who are able to renounce all public profit, all 
political or institutional consequence, to the possession or circulation of this 
secret. They are few and far between, and this cautions prudence. The 
existence and necessity of secrecy are hence correlative to the scarcity of 
which we have spoken at such length. It is owing to secrecy that it should 
be said: he who has many friends has none. What is rare, in fact, is not only 
men worthy of friendship, worthy of the secret we wish to entrust them 
with, but friends in couples. It should come as no surprise here if, once 
again, precisely on the subject of secrecy, we come across the topos of 
Cicero and Montaigne: a great friendship comes along once every three or 
four centuries (yet another implied difference with love, no?). But no 
friendship without the possibility of absolute secrecy. A friend worthy of 
such secrecy is as improbable, and perhaps as impossible to find, as a black 
swan. 

A black swan: the poetic figure of this ‘rare bird’ is taken from a satire by 
Juvenal. 


Every man has his secrets and dare not confide blindly in others, partly because of a base cast of 
mind in most men to use them to one’s disadvantage and partly because many people are 
indiscreet or incapable of judging and distinguishing what may or may not be repeated. The 
necessary combinations of qualities is seldom found in one person (rara avis in terris, nigroque 
simillima cygno*), especially since the closest friendship requires that a judicious and trusted 
friend be also bound not to share the secrets entrusted to him with anyone else, no matter how 
reliable he thinks him, without explicit permission to do so. 

This (merely moral friendship) is not just an ideal but (like black swans) actually exists here 
and there in its perfection. 


The black swan is found in Book VI, not Book IH. And Kant (but did he 
ever read Juvenal?) should know that Juvenal was speaking not of a friend 
but of a woman ‘more chaste than the Sabines who, with their scattered 


hair, threw themselves between the combatants’. ‘She has everything going 
for her: who could take her on as spouse? (quis feret uxorem cui constant 
omnia?) ’. 

Let us not dwell longer than is necessary on the experiences of the 
betrayed secret of which Kant murmurs a confession here. Let us consider 
only the following three surprising subjects that do not surprise Kant to any 
great extent. Three oddities will in fact have been noticed in passing: 

1. No one knows exactly what a secret is, and Kant doesn’t know either: 
only an infinite intelligence (one excluded here from the ranks of mankind) 
could give lessons to those whose ‘lack of intelligence’ prevents them from 
appreciating what must remain secret. For there are no secrets in nature — 
no one has ever encountered one there: the secret is that which one thinks 
[croit savoir] must remain secret because an engagement has been entered 
upon and a promise made in certain non-natural conditions. Now to the 
extent that, as Kant remarks, this also depends on ‘intelligence’, no one 
knows absolutely in all certainty where discretion begins and ends — no one, 
no finite subject, by definition, ever has the required theoretical intelligence 
to know for sure. Kant, therefore, is speaking of a secret which he must 
know no one ever knows enough about, of which, therefore, one never 
knows anything of absolute value. The secret is not, fundamentally, an 
object of knowledge. It is as if Kant did not know what he is talking about. 

2. If there is a problem with secrecy, on the other hand, it is in so far as 
there are two friends plus one (‘another friend, believed equally reliable’, 
notes Kant), and to the extent that this discourse on secrecy supposes the 
couple’s rupture. It supposes in any case that the third party, qua friend, as 
reliable and as equal as the other two, is already around. More than one, 
then, and consequently, yet another ‘more than one’ (for the third party can 
also have a reliable friend, to whom he or she could say ‘swear that you will 
not repeat what I swore not to repeat’, etc.). Hence N + | — this is the 
beginning of friendship, where a secret is both possible and impossible. 
Always the same arithmetic, always the same calculation: impossible and 
necessary. 

3. Despite or because of this third party, the originary irruption of this 
more than one, and despite the disorder this third party creates from the 
outset, this other friend as the condition of a different friend, the black swan 
is the only occurrence (random and improbable, but not excluded) of an 
event of friendship which bestows an effective chance, in history, to the idea 


of moral friendship. When Kant writes: ‘This (merely moral friendship) is 
not just an ideal but (like black swans) actually exists here and there in its 
perfection’, he wants to say, I suppose, that this purely moral friendship is 
not only an ideal (what it first of all is) but can also, sometimes, in history 
(perhaps!), take form in the black swan. 

This black swan is a brother. For Kant, it is a brother. 

Why? We have just spoken of purely moral friendship. It can, then, 
happen that this friendship ‘actually exists’ ‘here and there’ and ‘from time 
to time’: ‘the black swan!’. And it is the bond between two men, with the 
minor but inevitable complication of the third man, and the supplementary 
friend of whom we have just caught a glimpse. But there is also what Kant 
calls pragmatic friendship: this one, out of love, burdens itself with the ends 
of other men, this time of an indeterminate number. ‘Pragmatic’ friendship 
could never achieve the purity or perfection desired, that is, ‘requisite for a 
precisely determinant maxim’. It remains, therefore, the ‘ideal of a wish’. In 
the concept of reason it is infinite, in experience it is finite. In both cases, 
there is the rare but real uprising of the ‘black swan’, a limited but effective 
experience of pragmatic friendship, the taking place of the phenomenon of 
friendship. In history, in space and in time: yes, friendship does happen. 
Hence sensibility is a part of the game. And this cannot happen except 
against a backdrop of what unites mankind, this effective and sensible 
sharing out [partage] whose aesthetic dimension is thus required. What 
happens must be able to happen. And the condition of possibility must be 
universal. All this supposes, then, a general or generic possibility, the 
possibility of what Kant calls here the friend of man. 

The friend of man loves the whole human race. Whatever happens, he 
shares in what happens to other men, through sensibility — ‘aesthetically’, 
says Kant. He rejoices with them when something good happens (the ‘black 
swan’, pragmatic and humanitarian solidarity, however insufficient it may 
be), and will never disturb this joy without profound regret. This very regret 
is the sign that he is the friend of the whole human race. But if the ‘friend of 
man’ concept entails sensibility and aesthetic community, it also 
corresponds to an infinite rational rigour — that is, an Idea. This is what 
distinguishes the friend of man from the ‘philanthropist’ who is content 
with merely loving mankind, without being guided by this Idea. 

Now what is this Idea? Having stressed that ‘the expression “a friend of 
man” is somewhat narrower in its meaning than “one who merely loves 


man (als der des Philanthropen, die Menschen blofs liebenden Menschen)’, 
Kant establishes this Idea: it is not only an intellectual representation, a 
representation of equality among men, but consideration for this 
representation of equality, a ‘just consideration’ for such a representation. 
Equality is necessary. There is no equality, but there must be. For it is 
obligation that the soundness or justice of this consideration adds to the 
representation: ‘the Idea that in putting others under obligation by his 
beneficence he is himself under obligation’. Consequently, equality is not 
only a representation, an intellectual concept, a calculable measure, a 
statistical objectivity; it bears within itself a feeling of obligation, hence the 
sensibility of duty, debt, gratitude. This is inscribed in sensibility, but only 
in sensibility’s relation to the purely rational Idea of equality. This is the 
condition for the existence of something called ‘the friend of man’, ‘the 
friend of the whole race’. It goes without saying that cosmopolitanism, 
universal democracy, perpetual peace, would not have the slightest chance 
of being announced and promised, if not realized, without the 
presupposition of such a friend. 

And it is a brother. The black swan is a brother, for he can appear, 
however infrequently, from time to time, only providing he is already the 
friend of man. He must belong to this race to which the friend of man 
belongs, who is the friend of the whole race. He must be the brother of 
these brothers. For just when Kant has defined in this way, in the ‘strictest’ 
sense of the term, the friend of man, he tells us how the phenomenon of this 
idea of obliging equality is to be represented: as a father and brothers. 
Submissive and equal brothers. The men are brothers, and the father is not a 
man: ‘all men are represented here as if they were brothers under one father 
who wills the happiness of all’. 

This structure corresponds — with the curtness of a philosophical rigour 
that would have to be reconstituted in Michelet, Quinet, or others — to the 
secularization, in the style of the Enlightenment, of Christian friendship the 
promise of which the friends of the French Revolution (and Kant must be 
counted a member) said that it was the implementation, achieved in history 
— projected as such, in any case. This friendship is quite fraternal. It binds 
brothers together between themselves but not with the father, who wills the 
happiness of all and to whom the sons submit. There is no friendship for the 
father, one is not the friend of the one who makes friendship possible. One 
can be grateful to him, since one is obliged to him. There is even reciprocal 


love with the father, but this reciprocal love (non-equal) is not friendship. In 
friendship a respect that is not only reciprocal but thoroughly equal is 
required. This is impossible with the father; it is possible only with 
brothers, with what is represented as brothers. Friendship for the one who 
makes friendship possible would be a temptation of pride. And the father, 
who is not a brother, is not a man. Kant continues, and concludes: 


All men are here represented as brothers under one universal father who wills the happiness of all. 
For the relation of a protector, as a benefactor, to the one he protects, who owes him gratitude, is 
indeed a relation of mutual love, but not of friendship, since the respect owed by each is not equal. 
The duty of being benevolent as a friend of man (a necessary humbling of oneself) and the just 
consideration of this duty serve to guard against the pride that usually comes over those fortunate 


enough to have the means for beneficence.*® 


Let us recall that this discourse concludes the Elements of Ethics and 
belongs to a Doctrine of Virtue. The determination of friendship qua 
fraternity therefore tells us something essential about ethics. It also tells us 
something irreducible about the essence of virtue. It tells us its universal 
political horizon, the cosmopolitical idea of all virtue worthy of the name. 
This would be reason enough to place fundamental value on this ‘doctrine’. 
But this text, this presentation of the doctrine, is of import to us also 
because it locates, with remarkable topical precision, the place of the 
brother, the brother gua place. Especially qua topical place. Indeed, Kant 
says: ‘All men are here represented as brothers under one universal father’. 
It could be said that this is merely a representation, a presentation, a 
manner of speaking, an image or a schema of the imagination in view of the 
idea of equality and in view of responding to the obligation attached to it, 
responding to it and answering for it responsibly. To be sure. Or it will be 
said: no more than those who, throughout history, have linked friendship to 
fraternity (everyone, let us agree, all those who have spoken of friendship, 
the brothers, the fathers and the sons who are brothers — all those, at least, 
whose speech we remember because it managed to make itself heard) — no 
more than them, therefore, does Kant confuse this fraternity with the 
fraternity called ‘natural’, strict, literal, sensible, genetic, etc. To be sure. 
But, on the one hand, the schema of this presentation has become 
indispensable. One cannot and must not dispense with it. One should no 
longer be able to. On the other hand, qua sensible or imaginal schema, in its 
very necessity, it remains linked to sensible or imaginai fraternity, to the 
virility of the congeneric. And this adherence has become indivisible, it is 


posited as such, it sees itself as necessary, it does not wish to be 
conventional, or arbitrary, or imaginary. Failing which, Kant could have 
proposed another figure to speak of human community or of the universal 
equality of finite beings. He could have diversified the examples to name 
the link of kinship. Why did he not say, for example, the cousin, the uncle, 
the brother-in-law, the mother-in-law, the aunt or the mother? Let us see fair 
play here: why did he not speak of the sister? 

The anthropological schema of the family is doing all the work here. It is 
the desire for one family. Not even for the family in general, that thing too 
obscure for us to claim to be able to speak abstractly about, but for one 
family which can speak to us of the family, invent it and afford itself the 
favour of a representation. A family renders this service, it renders itself 
indispensable and renders indispensable the rendered service. At the centre 
of this familial schema, at the centre of what can again be called oikeidtés, 
the brother occupies the unique place, the place of the irreplaceable. In this 
place of the irreplaceable, a ‘pure practical reason’ is welded indivisibly to 
an anthropology, and even, as we shall soon see, to a pragmatic 
anthropology. 

We must know that the place of the irreplaceable is quite a singular place 
indeed. If it is irreplaceable, as the place, as the khora, it is so as to receive 
substitutable inscriptions. It is the place of possible substitution. It can 
never be confused with that which occupies it, with all the figures which 
come to be inscribed therein and pass themselves off as the copies of a 
paradigm, the examples of an irreplaceable exemplar. 

Is it not from the place of this very place that we gaze over the horizon, 
awaiting the black swan that does not come every day of the week? A place 
can never be situated anywhere but under a horizon, from out of this limit 
which opens up and closes off at one and the same time. Is it not from off 
this bank and under this horizon that a political phallogocentrism has, up to 
this point, determined its cosmopolitical democracy, a democracy, qua 
cosmo-phratrocentrism? 

Up to this point, at least up until now, through countless tremors. Some 
of them, in the past, have been so violent that, at least up to this point, they 
have not even been interpreted. Their traces have still to be gathered up, 
registered, archived by those in charge of the management of their memory, 
the archons of the same family. These tremors have only just begun, for the 


history we have been speaking of is only several thousand years old: the 
time of a twinkling of an eye. 


But what are we doing when we say ‘up to this point’? 
To what ‘perhaps’ can this pledge be given? 


(France, enfranchisement, fraternity. We have just been speaking of 
pledges. They are here inscribed in a plural heritage: more than one culture, 
more than one philosophy, more than one religion, more than one language, 
more than one literature. And more than one nation. Among all these given 
pledges, an ineffaceable lock maintains this book close to France. 

I would not attempt to deny it. 

Perhaps [Peut-étre| is itself, as we observed at the appropriate time, a 
French word. No translation could do it justice. This book is not written 
only in French, for this would be to claim for French the exemplary 
privilege of translation of all other idioms, and that of remaining the only 
point of passage for all conversations, as if a French interpreter were 
claiming the exorbitant role of third-party universal translator while 
insisting on the rights of a sublime monolingualism. No, there is still more. 
It must indeed be said of this book, in the chapter now coming to a close 
and in the next one, that it sets itself up to work and be worked relentlessly 
[s’acharne lui-méme]. 1 understand this French term ‘achamer’ in the 
hunter’s sense of the term, where it comes down to setting up a decoy of 
flesh. This book set itself up to work and be worked relentlessly, close to the 
thing called France. And close to the singular alliance linking nothing less 
than the history of fraternization to this thing, France — to the State, the 
nation, the politics, the culture, literature and language which answer for the 
name ‘France’ and, when they are called by this name, answer to it. From 
before the time of the French Revolution (Montaigne was only an example), 
then during the Revolution and in its aftermath (Michelet and Quinet were 
only examples in their turn, and we have and will hear other voices, 
sometimes breaking with tradition within the tradition — those, for example, 
of Bataille, Blanchot, Lévinas, Nancy or Deguy). But of course at the 
perceptible hinge between these two chapters, and in order to let the literary 
or poetic legend, the moment of language, ring out again from one century 
into the next, we must listen to the colossal figure of Victor Hugo. He must 


be watched giving in to the vertigo of French exemplarity, to what is most 
fraternally universal and revolutionary in it. Indeed, the most perceptive and 
most blind declarations of this visionary of Europe, of Humanity, of 
Technics, in the twentieth century were dedicated to the brother. But above 
all Hugo wrote eloquent, generous but, alas, also symptomatic pages on the 
subject of what every brother owes to France. To ‘sublimated France’, to be 
sure, as he put it so well. But fraternity is universal only in first being 
French. Hugo declaims this French universality with the generous frankness 
that Francis Ponge associated with the ‘Frenchness’ in which Hugo had 
already praised the values of ‘enfranchisement’. Essentially and as example, 
to be a brother is to be French. Above all, and naturally, if you are the 
eldest brother. For everything we are saying about fraternity must be said 
about the ‘natural law’ concept which will always fundamentally have been, 
like ‘generosity’ itself, inseparable from it. The brother concept is 
indispensable to anyone — Victor Hugo, for example — who would set out to 
think Humanity as a Nation. From the very moment of its ‘embryo-genesis’. 
Let us listen (I must ‘select’ or ‘underscore’; I regretfully excise the spirit 
from these sentences that I encourage you to read in full and in one sitting, 
again and again, for their own sake). It begins as follows, with France (and 
it 1s a text which begins, like Ponge’s poem, with ‘It seems that France 
begins’): 
In the twentieth century, there will be an extraordinary nation. It will be a great nation, but its 
grandeur will not limit its freedom. It will be famous, wealthy, thinking, poetic, cordial to the rest 
of humanity. /t will have the sweet gravity of an older sibling.... The legislation of this nation will 
be a facsimile of natural law, as similar to it as possible. Under the influence of this motive 
nation, the incommensurable fallow lands of America, Asia, Africa and Australia will give 
themselves up to civilizing emigration ... The central nation whence this movement will radiate 
over all continents will be to other societies what the model farm is among tenant farms. It will be 
more than a nation, it will be a civilization; better than a civilization, it will be a family. Unity of 
language, currency, measure, meridian, code; fiduciary circulation to the utmost degree, money 
bills making anyone with twenty francs in his purse a person of independent means; an 
incalculable surplus-value resulting from the abolition of parasitical mechanisms ... The illiterate 
person will be as rare as the person blind from birth; the jus contra legem [will be] understood.... 
The capital of this nation will be Paris, and will not be named France; it will be called Europe. 
Europe in the twentieth century, and in those following, even more transfigured, will be called 
Humanity. Humanity, definitive nation.... What a majestic vision! There is in the embryo-genesis 
of peoples, as in that of beings, a sublime hour of transparency.... Europe, one with itself, is 
germinating there. A people, which will be France sublimated, is in the process of hatching. The 
profound ovary of progress, once fertilized, carries the future, in this presently distinct form. This 


nation to come is palpitating in present-day Europe, like the winged being in the reptile larva. In 
the next century, it will spread both its wings: one the wing of freedom, the other of will. 


The fraternal continent is the future. May everyone enrol now, for this immense happiness is 
inevitable. Before having its people, Europe has its city. The capital of this people that does not 
yet exist exists already. This seems a prodigy; it is a law. The foetus of nations behaves like a 
human foetus, and the mysterious construction of the embryo, at once vegetation and life, always 


begins with the head.*? 


Let no one accuse me of unjustly incriminating the figure of fraternity — 
already so greatly, generously, brilliantly infused by Hugo himself with 
genetic rhetoric and sublimated organicism — with the supplementary 
accusation of phallocentrism or androcentrism. The brother is neither the 
universal class hospitable to women or sisters, nor a spiritual figure 
replaceable in its clear-cut determination — one would even say in its sexual 
resolution. The virility of the brother is an ineffacable letter in Victor 
Hugo’s text. Here is the proof: 


What has befallen Paris? Revolution. 

Paris is the pivotal city around which, on a given day, history has turned.... 

The Commune is rightful; the Convention is right. This is superb. On one side the Populace, 
but sublimated; on the other, the People, but transfigured. And these two animosities have a love, 
the human race, and these two collisions result in Fraternity. This is the magnificence of our 
revolution. 

It is certain that the French Revolution is a beginning. Nescio quid majus nascitur Iliade. 

Take note of this word: Birth. It corresponds to the word Deliverance. To say the mother has 
delivered is to say the child is born. To say France is free is to say the human soul has reached 
adulthood. 

True birth is virility. 

On the fourteenth of July 1789, the hour of the virile age struck. 

Who accomplished the fourteenth of July? 

Paris. 


The word Fraternity was not thrown in vain into the depths, first from the heights of Calvary, 
then from those of 1789. What the Revolution wants, God wants. 

... Jerusalem releases the True. It is where the supreme martyrdom pronounced the supreme 
words: 

Freedom, Equality, Fraternity. Athens releases the Beautiful. Rome for the Great.... Paris, the 


place of revolutionary revelation, is the human J erusalem.*° 


Like Marx, Hugo wishes at one and the same time to swear and to abjure; 
he is seen at once welcoming and chasing, convoking and conjuring the 
spectre away. In his Peace Declaration (signed at Hauteville House in May 
1867, during the International Exhibition), the man who had just written: 
‘Great poetry is the solar spectre of human reason’*! is appealing here to 
fraternization to put an end, once and for all, ‘to ghosts’, ‘to phantoms’, to 


the ‘spectre’, to death itself. And against Christ, the spectre of spectres: like 


Marx he borrows one of Christ’s sayings to say, in sum, ‘let the dead bury 
the dead’. The speech of a brother. Hugo had begun by recalling that this 
Paris of fraternity was also the Paris of ‘literary revolution’ (‘Paris after 89, 
after the political revolution, accomplished 1830, the literary revolution’ ... 
‘this Louvre out of which would emerge equality, this Champ-de-Mars out 
of which would emerge fraternity. Elsewhere armies are forged; Paris is a 
forge of ideas’); he had also described with extraordinary lucidity the future 
of ‘telegraphy’, the technology ‘which sends your own writing in a few 
minutes to a place two thousand leagues away’, ‘the transatlantic cable’, the 
“propeller in the ocean while we await the propeller in the atmosphere’; he 
had also praised Voltaire, ‘the representative, not of French genius, but of 
universal spirit’; and here come the brothers to put an end to the phantom 
(in Greek one would say: to put an end to the phantasm): 


Unity is forming; hence union. Man One is Man Brother, Man Equal, Man Free.... The immense 
winds of the future stir with peace. What can be done in the face of this storm of fraternity and 
joy? Alliance, alliance! cries out the infinite.... Why do you want to make us believe in ghosts? 
Do you imagine we do not know that war is dead? It died the day Jesus said: Love one another! 
and the only life left in war was henceforth that of a spectre. Yet following Jesus’ departure, the 
night lasted for almost another two thousand years — the night air is amenable to phantoms — and 
war was able to continue prowling in this darkness. But the eighteenth century arrived, with 
Voltaire the morning star, and the Revolution its dawn, and now it is the full light of day.... Are 
you the ones attacking, Germans? Is it us? Who is to be incriminated? Germans, A// men [in 
English in the text], you are All-the-Men. We love you. We are your fellow citizens in the city of 
Philosophy, and you are our countrymen in the land of Freedom..... France means 
enfranchisement. Germany means Fraternity. Can you imagine the first word of the democratic 
formula waging war on the last? ... Let the spectre be gone! ... From out of those very bodies 
lying cold and bloody on the battlefield springs forth, in the form of remorse for kings, reproach 
for peoples, the principle of fraternity.... What are all these peoples ... doing in Paris? They are 
here to be France.... They know there exists a people of reconciliation, a house of democracy, an 
open nation, welcoming anyone who is brotherly or wishes to be so.... What a magnificent 
phenomenon, a cordial and marvellous one, this extinguishing of a people evaporating into 
fraternity. O France; adieu! You are too great to be only a country. One separates from one’s 


mother, who becomes a goddess ... and you, France, become the world.*”) 


* Foe: (Shorter Oxford Dictionary): 1. in early use, an adversary in deadly feud or mortal combat; 
now one who hates and seeks to injure another (Old English) 2. One belonging to a hostile army or 
nation, an enemy in battle or war (Middle English). 

* Juvenal, Sat. I, 6, 165 (‘a bird that is rare on earth, exactly like a black swan’). 


10 


‘For the First Time in the 
History of Humanity”! 


We were friends and have become estranged. But this was right.... That we have to 
become estranged is the law above us; by the same token we should also become 
more venerable for each other — and the memory of our former friendship more 
sacred. There is probably a tremendous but invisible stellar orbit in which our very 
different ways and goals may be included (einbegriffen) as small parts of this path; 
let us rise up (erheben wir uns) to this thought. But our life is too short and our 
power of vision too small for us to be more than friends in the sense of this sublime 
possibility (erhabenen Moglichkeit)! — Let us then believe in our star friendship 
even if we should be compelled to be earth enemies (Erden/Feinde). 


Nietzsche, ‘Star Friendship’, in The Gay Science” 


Up until now. up until now, in sum, and still just a second ago, we were 
speaking of life’s brevity. How short will life have been, too short in 
advance, ‘Aber unser Leben ist zu kurz’, says the friend of Stemen- 
Freundschaft. 

Up until now we have been speaking of the infinite precipitation into 
which an eschatological sentiment of the future throws us. Imminence, a 
world is drawing to a close, fatally, at a moment when, as we were saying a 
moment ago, things have only just begun: only a few brief millennia, and it 
was only yesterday that ‘we were friends’ already. 

This is the way fraternal friendship goes. We have just had a hint that 
fraternal friendship is not without affinity with the history of an ascension. 
Not a progress but an elevation, a sublimation, no doubt in affinity with 
what Kant defines also as the stellar sublimity of the moral law (‘the starry 
heavens above me, the moral law within me’). The profound height, the 


altitude of the moral law of which fraternal friendship would be exemplary 
— ‘schematic’ or ‘symbolic’, to use Kant’s technical language, according to 
whether the figure, the presentation or the hypotyposis of the brother would 
be related to the understanding or to reason. 

This narrative can be told as the history of humanity. Let us be more 
precise: of a humanization of man that would have been reflected into 
fratemization. 


(As you will have noticed, we have deliberately refrained from recourse 
to ‘illustrations’ to ‘actualize’ our analyses or in an attempt to demonstrate 
their necessity today, by delving into the most spectacular ‘news’ on 
political scenes: local, national, European or worldwide. We have done so 
through a concern with sobriety: first, we do not want to exploit that which, 
as it were, screens out reflection by projecting itself with the pathetic and 
‘sensational’ violence of images on to a too easily mediatizable scene. Then 
again, these examples are in the mind, heart and imagination of anyone who 
would be interested in the problems we are dealing with here; such people, 
let us hope, will have found the path of these mediations by themselves. 
Lastly, the overabundance of such ‘illustrations’ would have swamped the 
least of our sentences. Be it a matter of new forms of warfare, of what is 
confusedly called the ‘return’ of the ‘religious’, of nationalism, of 
ethnocentrism (sometimes dubbed ‘tribal’ so as not to put off the other 
person living with us, at home); upheavals of ‘number’, of demographic 
calculation in itself and in its relations to democracy, or to a democratic 
‘model’ which will never have been inscribed in the culture or religion of 
an immensely ever-growing majority of the world’s population; 
unprecedented statistics on what can no longer even be tranquilly called 
‘immigration’ and all forms of population transfer; the restoration or calling 
into question of citizenship in terms of territory or blood; unheard-of forms 
of theologico-political intervention on a worldwide, inter-or trans-state 
scale; the refoundation of state structures and international law (in progress 
or to come, etc.) — the list would be endless: a// the themes broached here 
are, to all intents and purposes, situated at the articulation between these 
‘present-day examples’ and the history of problematics that we are striving 
to reconstruct or deconstruct. But they demand, above all, implicitly or 
explicitly, a new topic of these articulations. A single example, one that 
serves as the pretext for this parenthetical paragraph: a rigorous, critical, 


non-dogmatic definition of what is called today the humanitarian — with its 
ever more specific organizations, the accelerated multiplication of its 
interventions, its both continental and international scope, its complex 
relations with governmental and non-governmental institutions, its medical, 
economic, technical, militaro-policing dimensions, the new rights that this 
‘humanitarianism’ seeks between the usual ‘United Nations’ type of 
intervention and a right to interfere, to invent, etc. — all of this demands a 
conceptual and practical reformulation. But this cannot be done without a 
systematic, and deconstructive, coming to terms with the tradition of which 
we are speaking here. For example, what would the definition of 
‘humanitarian’ be in its unheard-of forms with respect to what Kant calls — 
let us recall — ‘the friend of man’, a concept Kant intends to keep separate 
from that of the ‘philanthropist’? In what respect does the humanitarian 
participate in this process of fraternizing humanization that we are 
questioning here? Another question: what would be today, in a new system 
of law, a crime against humanity? Its recent definition is no longer 
sufficient. It will be said that the question is very old, and this is true, but it 
is also as new, still intact, pregnant, replete, heavy with a future whose 
monstrosity, by definition, is nameless.°) 


Hence, the categorical imperative: not to betray humanity. ‘High treason 
against humanity’ is the supreme perjury, the crime of crimes, the fault 
against the originary oath. To betray humanity would be to betray, quite 
simply, to fall short of virtue — that is, short of the virtue of fraternity. In 
that humanity, one should never betray one’s brother. Curse or speak ill of 
him. Another way of saying: only the brother can be betrayed. Fratricide is 
the general form of temptation, the possibility of radical evil, the evil of 
evil. 

Kant reports elsewhere, another time, Aristotle’s saying. In the canonical 
version, of course, with the vocative and the exclamation mark: ‘Meine 
lieben Freunde: es giebt keinen Freund!’ And he will tell us a story, to get 
us to give credence to a sort of crime against humanity. 

AS we were suggesting a moment ago, it is indeed a matter of 
anthropology, and of Anthropology from a Pragmatic Point of View. Its 
‘didactic’ speaks to us of appearance, of this appearance authorized and 
even recommended by morality. Deceptive appearance is not as bad as all 
that, is not always inadvisable, Kant concedes. Nature was wise enough to 


implant in mankind a felicitous aptitude for being deceived. Certainly 
illusion does not save virtue, but in saving appearance, illusion rendets 
virtue attractive. Proper exterior appearance commands consideration: ‘an 
appearance which is not demeaning to associate with’, sich nicht gemein zu 
machen, Kant writes, thinking again of women, of course, and adding 
immediately afterwards, as a first example: ‘Womankind is not at all 


satisfied when the male sex does not appear to admire her charms.”* To 
which — strict as he always 1s, careful to select the Latin designation which 
will speak the law of the concept — he adds a reserve, the reserve of reserve 
— modesty, pudicitia: ‘Modesty [Sittsamkeit] (pudicitia), however, 1s self- 
constraint which conceals passion; nevertheless, as an illusion it is 
beneficial (a/s Illusion sehr heilsam), for it creates the necessary distance 
between the sexes so that we do not degrade the one as a mere instrument of 
pleasure (zum blossen Werkzeuge des Genusses) of the other.’ 

Modesty has the virtue of saving the other, man or woman, from its 
instrumentalization, from its degradation to the rank of means in view of an 
end — here, enjoyment. Keeping us away from the technical, from the 
becoming-technical of desire, modesty is therefore eminently moral and 
fundamentally egalitarian. Owing to modesty, the two sexes are equal 
before the law. But let us not forget that this modesty is classed under 
illusions, salutary appearances, in a sub-chapter devoted to comedy, to roles 
played in society, to deceit and to mirages. Like ‘propriety’, decorum, 
‘beautiful appearance’, ‘politeness’ — all related themes — modesty might 
well be a moral subterfuge. It would equalize the sexes by moralizing them, 
getting the woman to participate in universal fraternity: in a word, in 
humanity. The modest woman is a brother for man. 

Let us not conclude from this that she becomes less desirable for all that. 
Precisely the contrary! Modesty would then belong to a history [une 
histoire|, a history of fraternization, a history gua fraternization, which 
begins in a non-truth and should end up making non-truth true. Is this not 
what Kant says immediately afterwards? He has just named modesty, 
propriety and the beautiful appearance. Here is the moment when he recalls 
Aristotle: 


Politeness (politesse [in French in the text]) is an appearance of affability which instils affection. 
Bowing and scraping (compliments) and all courtly gallantry, together with the warmest verbal 
assurance of friendship, are not always completely truthful. ‘My dear friends,’ says Aristotle, 
‘there is no friend.’ But these demonstrations of politeness do not deceive because everyone 


knows how they should be taken, especially because signs of well-wishing and respect, though 
originally empty, gradually lead to genuine dispositions of the soul (zu wirklichen Gesinnungen 
dieser Art hinleiten). 


It is indeed a matter of a history of truth. A matter, more precisely, of a trial 
of verification, qua the history of a becoming-true of illusion. A history 
which is made qua the story one tells to oneself and others: history is made 
while the story is being told; it is made in being related. 


(This Kantian history of truth gua the history of an error could be 
converted by a good philosophical computer into Hegelian software, then 
into Nietzschean — it’s already happening, isn’t it?) 

Such a history of verification 1s inseparable from the history of 
humanization qua fraternization. As a consequence, the crime against 
humanity — what Kant will call ‘high treason against humanity’ — consists 
in not taking into account a history, precisely, of this history that makes that 
which was only appearance, illusion, ‘small change’ (Scheidemtinze: we 
have already noted this Kantian obsession: currency gua devalued currency, 


even counterfeit money’) become true and serious. The crime against 
humanity would be to disdain currency, however devalued, illusory or false 
it may be; it would be to take counterfeit money for counterfeit, for what it 
is, and to let it come into its truth as counterfeit money. The crime would be 
not to do everything in one’s power to change it into gold — that is, into 
virtue, morality, true friendship. To do this, as we shall see, one must leave 
childhood, and this is always the sign whereby Kant recognizes 
Enlightenment. It will always be asked, of course, on which side lies the 
greatest deception: on the side of the person who, in the name of truth, 
mocks the difference between real and counterfeit money; or — and this is 
Kant — the person who would entrust virtue with the obligation of changing 
small change into gold — on pain of betraying mankind, of being indicted 
for ‘high treason against humanity’: 


Every human virtue in circulation is small change; only a child takes it for real gold. Nevertheless, 
it is better to circulate pocket pieces than nothing at all. In the end, they can be converted into 
genuine gold coin, though at a considerable loss (mit ansehnlichem Verlust). To pass them off as 
nothing but counters which have no value, to say with the sarcastic Swift that ‘Honesty [is] a pair 
of Shoes worn out in the Dirt’, and so forth, or to slander even a Socrates (as the preacher 
Hofstede did in his attack on Marmontel’s Bélisairé), for the sake of preventing anyone from 
believing in virtue, all this is high treason perpetrated upon humanity (ein an der Menschheit 
verliber Hochverrath). Even the appearance of the good in others must have value for us, because 


in the long run something serious can come from such a play with pretences (Verstellungen) which 
gain respect even if they do not deserve to. 


The emphasis is mine. Kant says nothing of the price to be paid, of this 
‘considerable loss’ that can accompany the becoming-gold of currency, the 
becoming-truth of the simulacrum, its verification or its authentication. 
Who comes off worst? What exactly would be lost? 


We had recalled two dimensions in the relation to the other: respect and 
responsibility, stressing that which, from the vantage point of what might be 
called aesthetic in the Kantian sense, the former owes to the spatial figure 
of distance and gaze, the latter to the time of speech. These two dimensions 
intersect in the ethics or the virtue of friendship: responsible friendship 
before reason, when reason makes the Idea of equality an obligation. The 
absolute respect and responsibility of brothers before one another but in so 
far as they must be respectful and responsible before the father, this time 
reciprocally but not equally in either case, in a love and not in a friendship, 
in a reciprocal but not symmetrical love. 

In principle this double dimension maintains the absolute singularity of 
the other and that of ‘my’ relation to the other, as a relation of the other to 
the other I am myself, as its other for itself. But the relation to the 
singularity of the other also passes through the universality of law. This 
discourse on universallty can determine itself in the regions of morality, of 
law or of politics, but it always appeals to a third instance, beyond the face- 
to-face of singularities. This is why we have been so attentive, in Kant’s 
text, to the uprising of the third friend, and to the question of secrecy that it 
opens up and forever keeps from closing. 

The third party always witnesses a law that comes to interrupt the vertigo 
of singularity, this double singularity or dual in which one might see the 
features of a narcissism, in the most conventional sense of the term. Would 
we have here more than one model of friendship, more than one example as 
regards what Cicero called the example, the exemplar, the friend qua model 
and portrait — self-portrait in which I project my ideal image? If this were 
hypothetically the case, one of these models could find its motto in one of 
the Aristotelian definitions of the friend as ‘another oneself® or in the 
legendary response of Montaigne (‘If you press me to say why I loved him, 
I feel that 1t can only be expressed by replying: “Because it was him: 
because it was me.”’’). 


The other model (if it be other, and if it does not deploy the traps that the 
first sets the other) would rather inspire particular sentences of Zarathustra, 
who so often addresses the friend as a brother, beginning with the address 
on virtue (‘My brother, if you have a virtue and it is your own virtue, you 
have it in common with no one’®). Another model, at least as regards its 
form. The form of desire: to interrupt the jealous narcissism of the dual 
relation, which always remains imprisoned between ‘me’ and ‘me’, ‘I’ and 
‘me’; to do everything possible to keep it from sliding into the abyss of 
specular jealousy. Is there a worse jealousy than jealousy of self? In truth, is 
there any other? Is one ever jealous of another? Jealous of someone besides 
one’s very own brother? Who is the more-than-one, the supplement of the 
one-in-excess ’?: 


“One is always one too many around me’ — thus speaks the hermit. ‘Always once one — in the long 
run that makes two!’ 

I and Me are always too earnestly in conversation with one another: how could it be endured, if 
there were not a friend? For the hermit the friend is always the third person: the third person is the 


cork that prevents the conversation of the other two from sinking to the depths.” 


We were saying that this was another model of friendship. But is there more 
than one model here? And is it a matter of alternatives? Are there really two 
different, even antagonistic or incompatible, structures? Perhaps they imply 
one another — a supplementary ruse — at the very moment when they seem 
to exclude one other. Does not my relation to the singularity of the other 
qua other, in effect, involve the law? Having come as a third party but 
always from the singularity of the other, does not the law command me to 
recognize the transcendent alterity of the other who can never be anything 
but heterogeneous and singular, hence resistant to the very generality of the 
law? 

Far from dissolving the antagonism and forcing the aporia, this co- 
implication, it is true, only aggravates them — at the very heart of friendship. 

The singularity/universality divide has always divided the experience, the 
concept and the interpretation of friendship. It has determined other 
oppositions within friendship. Schematically: on the one hand, the secret- 
private-invisible-illegible-apolitical, ultimately without concept; on the 
other, the manifest-public-testamonial-political, homogeneous to the 
concept. 


Between the two terms of the opposition, the schema or the familial 
symbol (we will henceforth understand the terms ‘symbol’ and ‘schema’ in 
the Kantian sense: between the sensible singularity of intuition and the 
generality of the concept or Idea). On the one hand, fraternal friendship 
appears essentially alien or rebel to the res publica; it could never found a 
politics. But on the other, as we have proved, from Plato to Montaigne, 
Aristotle to Kant, Cicero to Hegel, the great philosophical and canonical 
discourses on friendship will have explicitly tied the friend-brother to virtue 
and justice, to moral reason and political reason. 

The principal question would rightly concern the hegemony of a 
philosophical canon in this domain: how has it prevailed? Whence derives 
its force? How has it been able to exclude the feminine or heterosexuality, 
friendship between women or friendship between men and women? Why 
can an essential inventory not be made of feminine or heterosexual 
experiences of friendship? Why this heterogeneity between érdés and philia? 
Why cannot such a history of the canon be reduced to a history of 
philosophical concepts or texts, nor even to a history of ‘political’ structures 
as such — that is, structures determined by a concept of the political, by this 
concept of the political? Why is it a matter of a history of the world itself, 
one which would be neither a continuous evolution nor a simple succession 
of discontinuous figures? From this vantage point, the question of 
friendship might well be at least an example or a lead in the two major 
questions of ‘deconstruction’: the question of the history of concepts and 
(trivially) so-called ‘textual’ hegemony, history tout court, and the question 
of phallogocentrism.!° Here gua phratrocentrism. 

These philosophical canons will have posed the moral and political 
conditions of an authentic friendship — and vice versa. These discourses 
also differ among themselves — no one would claim the contrary — and, well 
beyond what we have just delineated, they call for long and careful 
analyses. Such analyses should in particular not decide too quickly, in the 
name of the law, to identify morality and politics: it is sometimes in the 
name of morality that one has removed friendship from the separations and 
criteria of politics. 

Hence the endless raising of the stakes whose law we have attempted to 
formalize. This law confounds Aristotle, for example, when he attempts to 
place friendship above the law and politics. (“When men are friends they 
have no need of justice, while when they are just they need friendship as 


well, and the truest form of justice is thought to be a friendly quality.’!') 
But if friendship is above justice — juridical, political, or moral — it is 
therefore also immediately the most just. Justice beyond justice. Fraternity 
qua ‘law beyond law’ (Michelet). In all forms of government or 
consititution (royalty, aristocracy, timocracy, republic or politeia — and 
democracy as the least evil of constitutions: ‘for in its case the form of 
constitution is but a slight deviation’!*), one sees a form of friendship 
coterminous with relations of justice appear. And if, in tyranny, friendship 
and justice play only an insignificant role, the opposite is the case in 
democracy where, as we have seen, the brother relation prevails. !> It should 
also be recalled that justice has two dimensions, one non-written, the other 
codified by law; therefore, likewise, friendship grounded in usefulness — the 
case in political friendship — may be moral or legal.'* The oppositions we 
are thus recalling seem to dominate the interpretation and experience of 
friendship in our culture. An unstable domination undermined from within, 
but all the more imperious for that. 

What relation does this domination maintain with the double exclusion 
we see at work in all the great ethico-politico-philosophical discourses on 
friendship: on the one hand, the exclusion of friendship between women; on 
the other, the exclusion of friendship between a man and a woman? This 
double exclusion of the feminine in this philosophical paradigm would then 
confer on friendship the essential and essentially sublime figure of virile 
homosexuality. If, in the schema or the familial symbol, this exclusion 
privileges the figure of the brother, the name of the brother or the name of 
‘brother’!>, rather than the name (of the) father, it would be all the more 
necessary to relate this political model, especially that of democracy, to the 
tradition of the Decalogue, notably in its Christianization (which would not 
be terribly original, let us admit), as well as to the rereading of the Freudian 
hypothesis on the alliance between brothers — after but already before the 
parricide, in view of a murder all the more useless, all the more interfered 
with in its act by the simulacrum or the phantasm (which does not limit the 
effectiveness of its effects) since it bestows even more power on the dead 
father, and must indeed presuppose moral (egalitarian and universalist) law 
to explain the shame and remorse which, according to Freud, would have 
ensued in the wake of the crime, and then — and only then, have grounded 
egalitarian law qua the interdict of killing. 


(Having stressed the problems and paradoxes of the Freudian hypothesis 
elsewhere,!© I prefer not to return here, despite its importance, to the 
reference in ZJotem and Taboo or The Man Moses.... To sound the keynote 
of a development to come, and notably concerning the Christianization of 
the fraternal community, let us be content here with situating a comic, 
vertiginous, and highly significant episode in the history of psychoanalysis 
itself. In question is the politico-strategic strategy of the relations between 
Freud and his momentary Christian ally, Jung. One letter from Ferenczi 
says more, by itself, than any glosses, which we will not bother with here. 
We shall quote several passsages, following the selective principle of 
several themes: the psychoanalytic challenge to a ‘mutualist’ logic of all 
democratic communities, hence to philia par excellence; the dissymmetry 
of the analysand/analyst relation; the heterogeneity between transference 
(qua ‘love’, as Freud said) and all possible friendship; the irreversible 
transcendence of the archontic or founding agency with regard to the 
founded institution; the irreversible transcendence of the paternal position 
with regard to a fraternal community, singularly in its Christian form; the 
structural resistance of Christianity to psychoanalysis; the theory of the 
sovereign exception gua the power of the father (of psychoanalysis) of self- 
analysis for a unique and therefore ‘first time in the history of humanity’, 
etc. — the whole lot assumed with the utmost seriousness by one of the first 
disciples, without the slightest irony, in an address to the father that we shall 
also take seriously, despite the outburst of laughter -— terminable 
interminable — which will rock us to the end. To the end — that is, as long as 
we will be saying, in reading such a letter (for example), that really, if 
something has not happened to psychoanalysis up until now, this is indeed 
typical of psychoanalysis; and that undoubtedly nothing will never happen 
to it, especially not in the chain of generations of its founding fathers, 
unless psychoanalysis itself would already have happened in this non-event, 
the event of this non-event, and this would be what, perhaps, we must strive 
to think, to live, and finally to admit. Here, then, are a few excerpts, but the 
whole volume should be read from the first page to the last: 


Dear Professor, I thank you for your detailed letter. Jung’s behavior is uncommonly impudent. He 
forgets that it was he who demanded students from the ‘analytic community’ and that they be 
treated like patients. But as soon as it has to do with him, he doesn’t want this rule to be valid 
anymore. Mutual analysis is nonsense, also an impossibility. Everyone must be able to tolerate an 
authority over himself from whom he accepts analytic correction. You are probably the only one 
who can permit himself to do without an analyst; but that is actually no advantage to you, i.¢e., for 


your analysis, but a necessity: you have no peer or even superior analyst at your disposal because 
you have been doing analysis fifteen years longer than a// others and have accumulated 
experiences which we others still lack. — Despite all the deficiencies of self-analysis (which is 
certainly lengthier and more difficult than being analyzed), we have to expect of you the ability to 
keep your symptoms in check. If you had the strength to overcome in yourself, without a leader 
(for the first time in the history of humanity) [Ferenczi’s emphasis], the resistances which all 
humanity brings to bear on the results of analysis, then we must expect of you the strength to 
dispense with your lesser symptoms.... 

... I, too, went through a period of rebellion against your ‘treatment’. 

... Jung is the typical instigator and founder of religion. The father plays almost no role in his 
new work; the Christian community of brothers [Ferenczi’s emphasis] takes up all the more room 
in it. — His book [Metamorphoses and Symbols of the Libido, published in the Jahrbuch in 1911- 
12] has a frightfully repellent effect on me; I loathe its content and its form; its superfluous 
slyness, superficiality, and cloyingly poeticizing tone make me hate it. Imagine — I still haven’t 
finished reading it. 


Much further on in the same letter, Ferenczi tells two of his dreams, with 
accompanying drawings. Two more excerpts: 


I.... [(indistinct) A woman stands on a table and protects herself from the snake by tightly 
pressing on her dress.] You and your sister-in-law play a role in this dream ... 
II.... My younger brother, Karl, has just cut off his penis to perform coitus (!). I think 


something like: that is not necessary, a condom would have been sufficient! ...!7 


The double exclusion of the feminine would not be unrelated to the 
movement that has always ‘politicized’ the friendship model at the very 
moment when one strives to rescue it from thoroughgoing politicization. 
The tension is here on the inside of the political itself. It is at work in all the 
discourses that reserve politics and public space to man, domestic and 
private space to woman. This is also, for Hegel, the opposition of day and 
night — and therefore a great number of other oppositions.!® 

What is Nietzsche’s place in this ‘history’? And why do we thus 
unceasingly return to him? Does he confirm in depth this old tradition 
which refuses woman the sense of friendship, for the moment (‘not yet’, as 
Michelet also said)? 

Many indications seem in fact to confirm this. Beginning with 
Zarathustra’s sentences in ‘Of the Friend’. Three times over it 1s said that 
‘woman is not yet capable of friendship’ (“Deshalb ist das Weib noch nicht 
der Freundschaft fahig: ... Noch ist das Weib nicht der Freundschat fahig:’ 
... ‘Nach ist das Weib nicht der Freundschaft fahig’). 

These three times must be respected. They concatenate immediately, but 
what a leap from one to the next! The song ‘Of the Friend’ began with the 


speech of the Hermit, as one recalls (always more than one, always one too 
many, always one time one, that makes two, and three will be necessary to 
counter the specular jealousy between / and me, etc.). But the hermit is too 
attracted to the depths or the abyss, he is nostalgic for elevation; he is 
dreaming of a friend to gain altitude. This is all a matter of belief. What 
does the friend’s nostalgia reveal? That we wish to believe in the other 
because we want, in vain, to believe in ourselves. This nostalgia has some 
affinity with the one Heidegger believes he is able to pick up at the origin of 
philosophical philia. It therefore fires the envy towards the other as well as 
towards self. We envy each other. Love would be but the attempt to leap 
beyond this envy. And the aggression whereby we make an enemy, whereby 
we make ourselves our own enemy, is only a reaction. It hides and reveals, 
at one and the same time, our vulnerability. The true fear, the true respect, 
then pronounces: ‘At least be my enemy! (Sei wenigstens mein Feind!)’. 
Zarathustra takes on the tone of a Blake (‘Do be my enemy for Friendships 
sake\’) to address an enemy, to speak to him in the name of friendship. 
There is more friendship, and more nostalgia, in speaking to one’s enemy — 
more precisely, in begging the other to become one’s enemy — than in 
speaking of the friend without addressing him. There would thus be more 
declared friendship, more avowed community, in the canonical version of 
the Aristotelian sentence ‘O my friends...’, than in the reportive version of 
the recoil, which states and registers the bottom line on the friend and on 
friends. Even more friendly, more declared and avowed in its friendship, 
would be the inverted apostrophe ‘O enemies!...’. If there is more respect 
or fear here, it is because this demand for enmity comes from someone who 
dare not entreat the other to give him friendship: ‘At least be my enemy!’ 
he then says. Conclusion: if you want a friend, you must wage war on him, 
and in order to wage war, you must be capable of it, capable of having a 
‘best enemy’. 

A eulogy of friendship will now follow, drawing the ineluctable 
consequence of this axiom. To be capable of this friendship, to be able to 
honour in the friend the enemy he can become, is a sign of freedom. 
Freedom itself. Now this is a freedom that neither tyrants nor slaves know. 
Therefore, it is a political translation of the axiom. The slave and the tyrant 
have neither friend nor enemy. They are not free and ‘equal’ enough for 
that. With this political conclusion, Zarathustra brings up the case of 
woman. She is at once tyrant and slave, and that is why she (still) remains 


incapable of friendship, she knows only love. This thesis concerns not only 
woman, but the hierarchy between love and friendship. Love is below 
friendship because it is an above/below relation, one of inferiority and 
superiority, slavery and tyranny. It is implied, then, that friendship is 
freedom plus equality. The only thing missing is fraternity, and we are 
coming to that. Thus is the first of the three sentences engendered: ‘In 
woman, a slave and a tyrant have all too long been concealed. For that 
reason, woman is not yet capable of friendship: she knows only love.’ 
Feminine love causes only ‘injustice’ and ‘blindness’ to be seen in all that is 
not loved. In other words, woman remains incapable of respecting the 
enemy, of honouring what she does not love. Incapable of such a respect, 
incapable of the freedom entailed by that respect, she could never have 
either friends or enemies as such. Only a free and respectful consciousness 
could ever attain to this as such, this phenomenal essence of the friend or 
enemy, as well as of the couple they form. 

Such a judgement on the subject of woman has political value. It is a 
political judgement confirmed by the second sentence, the one immediately 
following, inscribing this political condemnation in its most traditional 
system. Incapable of friendship, enmity, justice, war, respect for the other, 
whether friend or enemy, woman is not man; she is not even part of 
humanity. Still addressing his friend as a brother, especially in speaking in 
truth to him of ends and virtues (‘Wahrlich, mein Bruder...’, he regularly 
says), Zarathustra declares here that woman is the oudaw of humanity — in 
any case as regards the question of loving, if not that of childbirth and 
suckling; the nurturing mother is perhaps human (like a ‘cow’) but not the 
lover that woman can be — woman, to whom friendship still remains 
inaccessible: ‘Woman is not yet capable of friendship: women are still cats 
and birds. Or, at best, cows.’ 

Now here we see a sort of apostrophical reversal: the third sentence. 
Confirming what has just been pronounced on women, Zarathustra 
suddenly turns towards men — he apostrophizes them, accusing them, in 
sum, of being in the same predicament. Woman was not man, a man free 
and capable of friendship, and not only of love. Well now, neither is man a 
man. Not yet. And why not? Because he is not yet generous enough, 
because he does not know how to give enough to the other. To attain to this 
infinite gift, failing which there is no friendship, one must know how to 
give to the enemy. And of this, neither woman nor man (up until now) is 


capable. Under the category of ‘not yet’ (noch ... nicht), hence this ‘up until 
now’ that we were questioning above, man and woman are equal in this 
respect. Up until now, they are equally late, although woman is lagging 
behind man. They are equal in avarice (Geiz), equally unable to give and 
love in friendship. Neither one (not yet, up until now) is one of these true 
brothers, these friends or enemies, these friends gua possible enemies, those 
whom Zarathustra nevertheless already, starting now, addresses and appeals 
to (teleiopoetically). This is the third sentence: ‘Woman is not yet capable 
of friendship. But tell me, you men, which of you is yet capable of 
friendship?/Oh your poverty, you men, and your avarice of soul! (und euren 
Geiz der Seele!) As much as you give to your friend I will give even to my 
enemy, and will not have grown poorer in doing so.’ 

One must be patient in the face of this ‘not yet’, and meditate in all due 
time the ‘up until now’ positioned on the threshold of this dissymmetrical 
gift. For it extends also to man (Mann), but first and foremost, again, to 
Zarathustra’s brother. He bears the future of a question, of a call or a 
promise, a complaint or a prayer. In the performative mode of the 
apostrophe. There is no friendship as yet, it has not yet begun to be thought. 
But, in a sort of mourned anticipation, we can already name the friendship 
that we have not yet met. A threshold naming: we are saying here, on the 
threshold, that we already think that we do not yet have access to 
friendship. May we have it one day! Such is the exclamation mark, the 
singular clamour, of this wish. This is Zarathustra’s ‘O my friends, there is 
neither friend nor enemy’. 

The end of the song rings out in a still more singular way. For is not what 
has just been repeated, doubled, parodied, perverted and assumed also the 
Gospel message? Is it not, more precisely, that which commands us to love 
our enemies as universal brothers, beyond our own family and even our 
own biological (foster, uterine, or consanguine) brothers? Yes and no — we 
shall have to return to this. Here now, after the raising of the stakes on the 
Christian heritage, is the reimplementation of the Aristotelian heritage, 
around the opposition we have already encountered between the friend and 
the companion. Fundamentally, that of which man will have been capable 
up until now — at least up until now — is certainly not perfect friendship 
(teleia or proté philia), only comradeship. Now comradeship must be 
surpassed. But given that it can be surpassed only in giving infinitely to the 
enemy, which Aristotle never said, the Gospels must be played against 


Aristotelian virtue and against Greek friendship par excellence. This is 
enough to discourage anyone wishing to establish a reassuring historical 
scansion — that is, a decidable and clear-cut one — to make this strategy 
coherent. It would be better to give up the idea immediately and think up 
different ways of doing history or the historian’s profession. For that which 
thus defies the tranquillity of the historian is a strategy of friendship, a war 
for friendship. Friendship is now the stake of these endless strategies. And 
must not one think, or at least approach, this other history, hence this other 
friendship, to leave comradeship? Comrades, try again! Zarathustra is 
speaking of friendship also to historians and theologians — and this is the 
end of his song: ‘There is comradeship: may there be friendship! (Es gibt 
Kameradschaft: moge es Freundschaft geben!).’ Since this ‘es gibt’ and this 
‘geben’ immediately follow a definition of friendship by the gift, for the 
friend as well as for the enemy (‘Wie viel ihr dem Freunde gebt, das will ich 
noch meinem Feinde geben’), it can be supposed that the ‘there 1s’ (‘es 
gibt’) or the ‘may there be’ (‘mdge es geben’) give themselves only to the 
extent of the gift. The gift is that which gives friendship; it is needed for 
there to be friendship, beyond all comradeship. 

But as woman has not yet attained to friendship because she remains — 
and this is love — ‘slave’ or ‘tyrant’, friendship to come continues to mean, 
for Zarathustra: freedom, equality, fraternity. The fragile, unstable and 
recent motto, as we have seen, of a republic. Unless it appeals to a 
friendship capable of simultaneously overwhelming philosophical history 
(Aristotelian, as we have just seen) and Enlightenment fraternity qua the 
sublation [reléve] (we have seen enough signs of this) of Christian 
fraternity: three friendships in one, the same, in sum, with which one must 
break. 

Another song leads us on to this path, one that begins shortly after ‘Of 
the Friend’. ‘Of Love of One’s Neighbour’ (Von der Ndchstenliebe) seems 
to oppose friend to neighbour, and blatantly to the neighbour of the 
Gospels. In truth, it does not oppose friend to neighbour, it wishes to raise it 
above the neighbour — and this in the name of the far-off and of the future. 
The neighbour is believed, like his name, to be close and _ present. 
Friendship is a thing of distance, a thing of the future; hence ‘Do I exhort 
you to love of your neighbour? I exhort you rather to flight from your 
neighbour and to love of the most distant (Femsten-Liebe)’. Zarathustra 
thus addresses brothers not yet bom, his brothers to come but supposed 


already to be prepared to hear him where they are as yet still incapable of 
doing so. And this is why they must be spoken to. Ready to hear, they will 
be ready when they have heard. This teleiopoetic word accomplishes the 
Gospel word in perverting it, it sets it awry and de-natures it, but in order to 
keep its promise. If this Gospel word promises spiritual fraternity, beyond 
milk and blood (but owing to other blood, to another eucharistic body — this 
is the whole question, and Zarathustra does not fail to take it up); if the 
word of Christ thus promises the true filiation of brothers of the ‘father who 
is in heaven’, is this not in terms of a love of neighbour which prescribes, as 
does Zarathustra, the love of one’s enemies? One becomes a brother, in 
Christianity, one is worthy of the eternal father, only by loving one’s enemy 
as one’s neighbour or as oneself. Here we have the profit of a sublime 
economy, an economy beyond economy, a salary that is transformed into 
the gold of non-salary. Let us cite here only Matthew, aware nevertheless 
that we are on the brink of a work of infinite reading: 


You have heard the commandment, ‘You shall love your countryman but hate your enemy.’ My 
command to you is: love your enemies, pray for your persecutors. This will prove that you are 
sons of your heavenly Father, for his sun rises on the bad and the good, he rains on the just and the 
unjust. If you love those who love you, what merit is there in that? Do ‘not tax collectors do as 
much? And if you greet your brothers only, what is so praiseworthy about that? Do not pagans do 


as much? In a word, you must be made perfect as your heavenly Father is perfect. " 


Does not Zarathustra also entreat the friend to come around to an absolute 
gift that breaks with the ruse of this sublime economy? Is not the friendship 
for his brother gua neighbour and son of God still in search of the pure gold 
of an infinite wage? Does it not still seek — to pick up once again the 
Kantian motif that we evoked above — the best exchange rate for virtue? In 
any case, it is in the name of the friend who ‘bestows’ that Zarathustra 
advises against the love of one’s neighbour, but a wageless, unrequited 
bestowal. 

The gift he then names must also belong to the finite world. One would 
thus have to think the dissymmetry of a gift without exchange, therefore an 
infinite one — infinitely disproportionate, in any case, however modest it 
may be, from the vantage point of terrestial finitude. From under its horizon 
without horizon. For we have just suspected infinitization itself of being an 
economic ruse. A certain ‘gild’ is denounced in the same song, and it would 
be like a Christian seduction, the love of one’s neighbour as _ the 


manoeuvring hypocrisy of a perverse seduction, a stratagem to mislead the 
other towards oneself: 


You cannot endure to be alone with yourselves and do not love yourselves enough: now you want 
to mislead your neighbour into love and gild yourselves with his mistake (und euch mit seinem 
Irrtum vergolden). 


Such a finitism would then revert from Christian to Greek, if we could still 
rely on this distinction, which we are doing less and less often: 


I do not teach you the neighbour but the friend. May the friend be to you a festival of the earth and 
a foretaste of the Superman. 

I teach you the friend and his overflowing heart. But you must understand how to be a sponge 
if you want to be loved by overflowing hearts. 

I teach you the friend in whom the world stands complete, a vessel of the good — the creative 
friend, who always has a completed world to bestow. 

And as the world once dispersed for him, so it comes back to him again, as the evolution of 
good through evil, as the evolution of design from chance. 

May the future and the most distant be the principle of your today: in your friend you should 
love the Superman as your principle. 

My brothers, I do not exhort you to love of your neighbour: I exhort you to love of the most 
distant. 


Thus spoke Zarathustra.”° 


Three remarks before interrupting — as we must — these songs. They 
concern the gift, the superman, and the spectre. 


1. The gift. This friend of the most distant belongs to the finite earth, to 
be sure, not to the world of Christian hinterworlds. But far from limiting the 
gift that he perhaps then gives, his finitude infinitizes it. Zarathustra’s 
friend, this friend to come, this friend of the far removed, does not give this 
or that, in just any economy (in which the virtuous would still want to be 
paid’!), he gives a world, he gives all, he gives that in which all gifts may 
appear; and like all gifts, this gift of the world must nevertheless be 
determined: it is this world, a completed world. A friend who does not give 
you the world, and a world which, because it exists, has form and limit, 
being this world and not another, gives you nothing. To think this 
friendship, which would be neither Greek nor Christian, this gift would 
have to be thought as the gift of the world, and above all (but above all) as 
gift of a finite world. 

2. The Superman. To be sure, he is awaited, announced, called, to come, 
but — contradictory as it may seem — it is because he is the origin and the 


cause of man. He is the originary (Ursache) cause of man. Man is called — 
and called into question — by his cause. His cause is naturally beyond him. 
With regard to this friend promised, announced, hoped for (always 
following the same thrust of the messianico-teleiopoetic perhaps) the 
friendship against which these men and women were judged up until now, 
and judged incapable, owing to a lack of humanity, precisely, and of liberty 
— well, this very friendship, this friendship to come, would still be too 
human. At the very least it deserves its name ‘friendship’, and properly 
human friendship, only providing it lets itself be transfixed by the 
expectation of the superman to come. But to come as cause or origin, — that 
is, aS immemorially past. This is the only possible experience of a ‘most 
distant? that remains approachable only in being unapproachable. 
Fundamentally, all the concepts of a friendship of presence and proximity 
whose anthropological, anthropocentric or humanist character we have been 
emphasizing hitherto would be situated and delimited here. Even if this 
anthropocentrism were also, sometimes, anthropo-theological or onto- 
theological, the profound structure of the concept would not be modified. 
Its centre of gravity would remain as close as possible to proximity, in the 
present of the closest. 

3. The spectre. In a passage that we were reading above,” and precisely 
in Human All Too Human, Nietzsche, as it were, had resurrected ‘phantom 
friends’, those who have not changed while we have been transformed. 
These friends returned as the phantom of our past — in sum, our memory, 
the silhouette of the ghost who not only appears to us (phantasmata, 
phenomena, phantoms, things of sight, things of respect, the respect which 
returns and comes down to the spectre), but an invisible past, hence a past 
that can speak, and speak to us in an icy voice, ‘as if we were hearing 
ourselves’. Here, this should be exactly the opposite, since it is a question 
of the friend, of the superman whose present friendship urges the arrival. 
Not the past friend, but the friend to come. Now what is coming is still 
spectral, and it must be loved as such. As if there were never anything but 
spectres, on both sides of all opposition, on both sides of the present, in the 
past and in the future. All phenomena of friendship, all things and all beings 
to be loved, belong to spectrality. ‘It is necessary to love’ means: the 
spectres, they are to be loved; the spectre must be respected (we know that 
Mary Shelley brought our attention to the anagram that makes the spectre in 
respect become visible again). And here we have the sentence addressed by 


Zarathustra to his brother. Here is what the song ‘Of Love of One’s 
Neighbour’ promises him: the friend to come, the arrivant who comes from 
afar, the one who must be loved in remoteness and from afar, the superman 
— and it is a spectre: 


Higher than love of one’s neighbour stands love of the most distant man and of the man of the 
future; higher still than love of man I account love of causes and of phantoms (die Liebe zu 
Sachen und Gespenstern). 

This phantom that runs along behind you, my brother, is fairer than you; why do you not give it 
your flesh and bones? But you are afraid and you run to your neighbour, (p. 87) 


A spectral distance would thus assign its condition to memory as well as to 
the future as such. The as such itself is affected with spectrality; hence 1s it 
no longer or not yet exactly what it is. The disjunction of spectral distance 
would, by this very fact, mark both the past and the future with a non- 
reappropriable alterity.”° 

Thus, at least, spoke Zarathustra. We have refrained from substituting 
Nietzsche’s name for his, as if, from one ghost to another, it never came 
down to the same one. Things are already unattackable and inappropriable 
enough as they are for each ghost. Neither should one rush to consider a 
single one of Zarathustra’s sentences as Gospel. Having commanded them 
to be capable of facing the enemy, of respecting, fearing, honouring him; 
having recalled that a humanity in default of an end also defaults itself — is 
itself lacking in humanity — Zarathustra demands of his disciples that they 
leave him: repudiate me, be ashamed of the one who ‘perhaps has deceived 
you’. ‘For the man of knowledge must not only love his friends: he must 
also be able to hate his enemies!’ This is the immense song ‘Of the 
Bestowing Virtue’, in whose end, in a neo-evangelical scene, Zarathustra 
addresses his brothers to promise his return. Then, after the separation, after 
the repudiation, another love — friendship itself — will be possible. 
Zarathustra swears, invites, bids, demands the oath: 


Now I bid you (Nun heisse ich euch) lose me and find yourselves, and only when you have all 
denied me will I return to you. 

Truly, with other eyes, my brothers, I shall then seek my lost ones; with another love I shall 
then love you. 

And once more you shall have become my friends and children of one hope: and then I will be 
with you a third time, that I may celebrate the great noontide with you.... 

‘All gods are dead: now we want the Superman to live’ — \et this be our last will, one day, at the 
great noontide! 


This is only the end of Part One. To relaunch it, it will become the epigraph 
of Part Two. The entire path of this abyssal altercation with Christian 
fraternity had begun, as we will recall, with the evocation of the hermit. As 
Zarathustra is also addressing another brother to come, but one who is 
already listening to him, there would be — among all the tasks that thus 
assign themselves to us but which, alas, we have to give up pursuing — an 
ancient and new history to relate and to make, from this point of view, of 
Christian fraternity: not only its theme, its concept and its figures but its 
orders, fraternities as institutions (an analogous and equally urgent 
investigation would deal with the figure of the brother in Arabo-Islamic 
culture — and with the ‘Muslim brothers’). Faced with this task, our 
shortcoming has no avowable justification here. Let it nevertheless be clear 
that we believe in the gravity of the obligation which the limits of this work 
oblige us to shirk. We have insisted sufficiently on the indefinite recoils of 
the discourse and strategy of Zarathustra in order not to be convinced in 
advance that the history of the brother in the Bible and in the Koran, as is 
the case in the history of orders called ‘fraternities’, contains in itself, here 
or there, in one fold or recoil or another, reason enough for finding 
ourselves beside Zarathustra or his disciples rather than in a posture of 
confrontation. 

Let us hold at least to this evidence: these songs of Zarathustra are also 
songs of mourning. He is taking leave, he asks to be repudiated, he will 
return, and the returning ghost who promises his brothers that they will then 
be his brothers or friends is indeed a testament, a ‘this is my body’ offered 
again to them. 

As if there were no interminable mourning other than the mourning of 
the brother, and as if the friendship we have been speaking about would dry 
up after this impossible mourning: only by deferring it can this friendship 
begin to mourn. There is no possible introjection or incorporation; this is 
the canon of friendship. Successful, a death without remainder, or an ideal 
death, the mourning of the brother would run too great a risk of allowing 
the father to return. This is what, at any price, the brothers’ conjuration 
desires — anything but the return of the father! — what we have hitherto been 
calling friendship, the one conjured away by Zarathustra as well as the one 
in the name of which he bids his brothers to come — one friendship against 
the other, but one along with the other. As if friendship were playing against 


the love of the father. And as if the scene could be framed thus: without a 
woman. 


Let us backtrack for a moment. If the great canonical meditations on 
friendship (Cicero’s De Amicitia, Montaigne’s ‘On Friendship’, Blanchot’s 
L’amitié, for example) belong to the experience of mourning, to the 
moment of loss — that of the friend or of friendship — if through the 
irreplaceable element of the named they always advance in testimonial 
order to confide and refuse the death of the unique to a universalizable 
discourse (*... my friends, there is no friend’: Aristotle-Montaigne; ‘But 
what has become of my friends?’: Villon; ‘Wo aber sind die Freunde?’: 
Holderlin), if by this token they simultaneously found and destabilize, if 
they restore, because they threaten them, a great number of oppositions 
(singular/universal, private/public, familial/political, secret/phenomenal, 
etc.), and perhaps al/ oppositions, can it be said that the relative invariance 
of this model 1s itself fractured and fractures itself [se fracture elle-méme], 
and opens on to its own abyss? Going back over all the motifs that we have 
just touched upon (the ethics and politics of friendship, death, the name, 
fraternity, etc.), reconsidering all these oppositions, could we not discern 
two major ruptures in what, for sheer convenience, would be called the 
history of friendship, whereas a certain friendship might very well (we have 
seen so many indications of this) shake up the most traditional concept of 
historicity? And how are they to be related to the double exclusion of the 
feminine, the exclusion of friendship between a man and a woman and the 
exclusion of friendship between women? The categories of ‘not yet’ and of 
‘up until now’ make this assurance tenuous. It might well urge us to stop 
speaking simply of exclusion. We have attempted to show that the Graeco- 
Roman model, which seems to be governed by the value of reciprocity, by 
homological, immanentist, finitist — and rather politist — concord, bears 
within itself, nevertheless, potentially, the power to become infinite and 
dissymmetrical. Montaigne (whom we are reading here as an example of a 
canonical paradigm) undoubtedly inherits most of these features. But when 
he breaks with the reciprocity and discreedy introduces — it seems to me — 
heterology, transcendence, dissymmetry and infinity, hence a Christian type 
of logic (‘... he infinitely surpassed me’; ‘I would have entrusted myself to 
him with greater assurance than to myself; ‘... For the very writings which 
Antiquity have left us on this subject seem weak to me compared to what I 


feel’), he also accomplishes the so-called Greek model of friendship. That 
which ensures the mediation or the solder — in any case, a certain continuity 
between the two times — that which also relates to the exclusion of woman, 
if only in the form or the pretext of ‘not yet’, is the brother, and, more 
precisely, the name, the name ‘brother’ and the brother’s name. We have 
quoted, without bringing them into comparison, two of Montaigne’s 
declarations. One praised the name ‘brother’, the other the brother’s name. 
Let us recall them. One spoke the name ‘brother’ in its genericity: ‘The 
name of brother is truly a fair one and full of love: that is why La Boétie 
and I made a brotherhood of our alliance.’*4 The other spoke the brother’s 
name, in its singularity. Montaigne, speaking precisely of the testamentary 
piece that forms the starting point of ‘On Friendship’, enunciates in two 
steps the incredible time of the name. The name ensures the ‘fraternal 
solder’ in that it precedes, as it were, the encounter with the friend and 
bestows on friendship a ‘force’ and an ‘effort’? which imparts existence to it 
prior to its existence, as it will also allow it, by the same dismembering of 
the surviving stance [survivance], to exist after it has existed. Owing to the 
name, friendship begins prior to friendship; owing to the name, friendship 
survives friendship; friendship always begins by surviving. One might just 
as well say friendship is never there; it’s as simple as that. Nor the friend of 
which, from this point of view, there are none. As we were saying, 
Montaigne enunciates this in two steps. 


1. First as the heir or legatee of the friend, “with death on his hps’: 


This is all I have been able to recover of his literary remains, I the heir to whom, with death on his 
lips, he so lovingly willed his books and his papers — apart from the slim volume of his works 
which I have had published already. 

Yet I am particularly indebted to that treatise, because it first brought us together: it was shown 
to me long before I met him and first made me acquainted with his name; thus preparing for that 
loving-friendship between us which as long as it pleased God we fostered so perfect and so entire 
that it is certain that few such can even be read about, and no trace at all of it can be found among 


men of today.” 


2. Next, when he does have to admit (but who, in the urge to quote a 
saying which seems to carry an ineffable singularity beyond the name, will 
have noticed it?) that the ‘Because it was him; because it was me’ goes 
‘beyond all my reasoning’ only by virtue of the name, owing to the name. 
The name is the cause of everything in this friendship. The time of the name 


is what bestows this force of approach, this power of proximity or of 
‘union’ which defies discourse: the name against the discourse, before and 
after it; the name gua force, affection, mediation, these nameless concepts 
(without common names) which speak the effect of the proper name. As in 
the passage quoted just a moment ago, God is named in the place where this 
name is so mysteriously active. Only the name of God and ‘some decree of 
Heaven’ can account for this reason of the name, for these effects of the 
name. Of the proper name, of course, and of a famous name, which comes 
more easily to men than to women, to brothers than to sisters, to sons than 
to daughters: 


... the seam which joins them together.... If you press me to say why I loved him, I feel that it can 
only be expressed by replying: ‘Because it was him; because it was me.’ Mediating this union 
there was, beyond all my reasoning, beyond all that I can say specifically about it, some 
inexplicable force of destiny. We were seeking each other before we set eyes on each other — both 
because of the reports we each had heard, which made a more violent assault on our emotions than 
was reasonable from what they had said, and, I believe, because of some decree of Heaven: we 
embraced each other by repute, and at our first meeting, which chanced to be at a great crowded 
town-festival, we discovered ourselves to be so seized by each other, so known to each other and 
so bound together that from then on none was so close as each was to the other, (p. 212) 


Concerning what is of import to us here, the two features of the name must 
undoubtedly be held together. On the one hand, the name constitutes the 
very structure of the testamentary survival stance, hence of a certain 
speciality: the name survives a priori, if this can be said, its bearer and the 
person to be called, before and afterwards, beyond presence. But this 
general and structural feature is also enframed [arraisonné], in a certain 
history, as the chance of filiation, of the inherited name, as well as of 
renown (and Montaigne speaks as often of the proper name as of the 
renown which brings this legendary name to the cognizance of the friend to 
come, thereby giving birth to friendship). Under the two forms of this 
enframing (inheritance of the name and social renown) this history leaves 
less chance to the woman, to the daughter, to the sister. We are not saying 
no chance, but /ess chance. When one speaks of hegemony — that is, the 
relation of forces — the laws of structure are tendential; they are determined 
not (do not determine) in terms of yes or no, hence in terms of simple 
exclusion, but in those of differential force, more or less. It is fitting here to 
emphasize the impossibility of a sheer exclusion in order to account for 
effects of repression, hence for returns of that which should not return: 


symptoms and disavowals that this very law can produce and reproduce, 
never failing in fact to do so. 

Hence one can no longer speak here of a simple fracture and say that it is 
Judaeo-Christian. Nor that it depoliticizes the Greek model nor that it shifts 
the nature of the political. 

Is another event then produced when, with Nietzsche or Blanchot, we 
come to call the friend by a name which is no longer that of the near one or 
the neighbour, and undoubtedly no longer the name of man? The words 
rupture or interruption — as we have just confirmed — are not sufficient for 
the determination of what occurs with Nietzsche, especially given the 
authority with which the brother still dominates all the reversals. 
Consequently, as we suggested at the beginning, we cannot and should not 
elude this other question: of all that which, in our time, responds to the 
event of which Nietzsche was at one and the same time the signatory and 
the witness, the cause and the effect, might we say, following certain signs 
that would lead us to believe it, that in some places of thought, for some — 
few in number, it is true — an unprecedented rupture will have taken place? 
Or rather, an unprecedented thought of rupture or of interruption as the 
place of friendship? We are obviously thinking — as we also indicated at the 
beginning — of Blanchot, Bataille and everything radiating around their 
work without their wanting, for all that, to become its centre or source, 
which in fact they are not. We would wish neither, on the one hand, to 
efface the singularity of their name, of their names, of their thought(s), their 
work(s), above all their friendship (another person would say: of the 
friendship of this legendary pair of friends of this century to which, Kant 
would add, a third reliable friend came to join them, already in fact being 
there from the very beginning — Lévinas — and the fact that these three knew 
each other to different extents is of little importance) nor, on the other hand, 
would we want to capitalize around them all the original thoughts linked to 
them or to which they themselves have referred, expressly or not. 

The remaining question — about which it can be asked what is left once 
these questions have finished ringing out — is one whose novelty we will 
keep in the very form which Plato gave it in Lysis, at the moment of his 
leavetaking following his failure: not ‘what is friendship?’ but who is the 
friend? Who is it? Who is he? Who is she? Who, from the moment when, as 
we shall see, all the categories and all the axioms which have constituted 
the concept of friendship in its history have let themselves be threatened 


with ruin: the subject, the person, the ego, presence, the family and 
familiarity, affinity, suitability (oikeidtés) or proximity, hence a certain truth 
and a certain memory, the parent, the citizen and politics (polités and 
politeia), man himself — and, of course, the brother who capitalizes 
everything? 

The stake of this question is, of course, also political. The political 
belongs to this series, even if it is sometimes placed in the position of the 
series’ transcendental. Is it possible, without setting off loud protests on the 
part of militants of an edifying or dogmatic humanism, to think and to live 
the gentle rigour of friendship, the law of friendship qua the experience of a 
certain ahumanity, in absolute separation, beyond or below the commerce of 
gods and men? And what politics could still be founded on this friendship 
which exceeds the measure of man, without becoming a theologem? Would 
it still be a politics? 

What happens politically when the ‘Who’ of friendship then distances 
itself from all these determinations? In its ‘infinite imminence’ — let us 
listen to Blanchot — the ‘who’ exceeds even the interest in knowledge, all 
forms of knowledge, truth, proximity, and even as far as life itself, and the 
memory of life. It is not yet an identifiable, public or private ‘I’. Above all, 
as we are going to hear, it is some ‘one’ to whom one speaks (if only to tell 
him or her that there is no friend), but of whom one does not speak. This, no 
doubt, is why Blanchot must prefer the vocative and canonical version to 
the recoil version: 


We have to renounce knowing those to whom we are bound by something essential; I want to say, 
we should welcome them in the relation to the unknown in which they welcome us, us too, in our 
remoteness. Friendship, this relation without dependence, without episode, into which, however, 
the utter simplicity of life enters, implies the recognition of a common strangeness which does not 
allow us to speak of our friends, but only to speak to them, not to make of them a theme of 
conversations (or articles), but the movement of understanding in which, speaking to us, they 
reserve, even in the greatest familiarity, an infinite distance, this fundamental separation from out 
of which that which separates becomes relation. Here, discretion is not in the simple refusal to 
report confidences (how gross that would be, even to think of), but it is the interval, the pure 
interval which, from me to this other who is a friend, measures everything there is between us, the 
interruption of being which never authorizes me to have him at my disposition, nor my knowledge 
of him (if only to praise him) and which, far from curtailing all communication, relates us one to 


the other in the difference and sometimes in the silence of speech.7° 


Consequently, if the testament or the epitaph remains the place of a De 
Amicitia for our time, all the signs of orison find themselves — if not 
negated or inversed, then at least suspended in a non-negative neutrality. 


Such a neutrality calls into question not only our memory of the friend, our 
thought of fidelity, but our memory of what ‘friendship’ has always meant. 
And yet we do sense that this discreet violence accomplishes an injunction 
which was already working away at the legacy of this tradition, and was 
being demanded from within our very memory. On the death of the friend, 
the ‘measurelessness of the movement of dying’, the ‘event’ of death 
reveals and effaces at the same time this ‘truth’ of friendship, if only the 
truth of the far-off places of which Zarathustra spoke. Oblivion is 
necessary: 


... not the deepening of the separation, but its effacement, not an enlarging of the caesura, but its 
levelling, and the dissipation of this void between us where once developed the frankness of a 
relation without history. In such a way that at the present time that which was close to us has not 
only ceased its approach, but has lost even the truth of extreme remoteness. We are able, in a 
word, to remember. But thought knows that one does not remember: without memory, without 
thought, it already struggles in the invisible where all falls back into oblivion. This is the place of 
profound pain. It must accompany friendship into oblivion, (p. 329) 


Oblivion must [Faut /’oubli]. Friendship without memory itself, by fidelity, 
by the gentleness and rigour of fidelity, bondless friendship, out of 
friendship, out of friendship for the solitary one on the part of the solitary. 
Nietzsche already demanded this ‘community without community’, this 
bondless bond. And death is the supreme ordeal of this unbinding without 
which no friendship has ever seen the light of day. The book has as its 
epigraph these words of Georges Bataille: 


... friends to the point of this state of profound friendship in which a forsaken man, forsaken by 
all his friends, meets in life he who will accompany him beyond life, himself lifeless, capable of 
free friendship, detached from all bonds. 


The moment when the hyperbole seems to engage with the greatest risk, 
with respect to the inherited concept of friendship and all the politics that 
have ever spun out of it (Graeco-democratic or Christiano-revolutionary) is 
when the ‘without sharing’ and the ‘without reciprocity’ come to sign 
friendship, the response or the responsibility of friendship. Without sharing 
and without reciprocity, could one still speak of equality and fraternity? We 
are again quite close to Nietzsche, although we are already invited to think 
a proximity of the distant to which Zarathustra called us (he must have had 
to suppose it too, teleiopoetically) and always under the neutral and non- 
dialectizable law of the ‘pas’ [‘step’ or ‘not’| and the ‘X without X’. 


And yet, to the proximity of the most distant, to the pressure of the most weightless, to the contact 
of what does not reach us — it is in friendship that I can respond, a friendship unshared, without 
reciprocity, friendship of that which has passed leaving no trace. This is passivity’s response to the 


un-presence of the unknown.”’ 


How could such a ‘response’ ever translate into ethical or political 
responsibility, the one which, in the philosophical and Christian West, has 
always been associated with friendship? The preceding pages respond 
(admirably and from within the same ‘logic’) to this question of 
responsibility. As in the passage we have just quoted, they are written to 
and inspired by the figure of Lévinas, the other great friend, the other 
unique friend, in a friendship of thought which is not exclusively one of 
thought. If this language seems ‘impossible’ or untenable with regard to the 
common sense of friendship, where it has commanded all the canonical 
discourses we have mentioned thus far, it is also because it 1s written in 
terms of a writing of the disaster. The disaster is less friendship’s (for 
friendship) than one without which there is no friendship, the disaster at the 
heart of friendship, the disaster of friendship or disaster gua friendship. Star 
friendship (Sternen-Freundschaft). 

Without being able to do justice here to these immense books, in 
particular L’Amitié or The Writing of the Disaster, let us fall back, under the 
sign of friendship, admiration and unmitigated gratitude, to several passages 
in which what is most enigmatic, if not most problematic, in friendship 
receives the keenest attention: 

Let us do so in three steps, taking up three questions: (1) the question of 
the community; (2) the ‘Greek question’; (3) the question of fraternity. 


1. The question of the community. It will be asked what ‘common’ can 
still mean as soon as friendship goes beyond all /iving community? What is 
being in common when it comes to friends only in dying? And what is it 
that renders this very value of the common valueless, valueless for thinking 
friendship, if not, fundamentally, this testamentary structure that we have 
constantly seen at work in all the great discourses on friendship? In order to 
think this ‘call to dying in common through separation’, Blanchot decides 
he must undo or suspend the gift, the very generosity of the promise which, 
according to Nietzsche, remained the essential feature of the friend to come. 
Here, we are no longer in affinity with Nietzsche — with one Nietzsche, in 
any case (for there is always more than one): 


Friendship is not a gift, or a promise; it is not generic generosity. Rather, this incommensurable 
relation of one to the other is the outside drawing near in its separateness and inaccessibility. 
Desire, pure impure desire, is the call to bridge the distance, to die in common through separation, 


(p. 50) 


Whatever can be thought of the gift or the promise from which such a 
friendship would free itself, from which it should indeed abstain, whatever 
can be thought of this duty or this possibility, it is true that in translating gift 
and promise by ‘generic generosity’, in associating them so closely — 
nothing could be less self-evident”® — risks are avoided, notably the political 
risks which, as we have pointed out, return incessantly: naturalization, the 
genericity of genre, race, gens, the family or the nation; and return, more 
precisely, with the features of fraternity. But once the necessity of all these 
neutralizations has been honoured (‘the outside drawing near in its 
separateness’, ‘pure impure desire’), once it has been clearly pointed out 
that the common is not the common of a given community but the pole or 
the end of a call (‘the call to bridge the distance, to die in common through 
separation’), the whole question remains: what is being called the call, and 
what is being called ‘common’? Why these words again, when they no 
longer mean what they were always thought to mean? When they still mean 
what they were believed not to mean — a meaning to which a memory, 
another memory, another friendship, ought to awaken them again? The 
question is not only the one which brings on semantic vertigo, but the one 
which asks ‘what is to be done?’: What is to be done today, politically, with 
this vertigo and its necessity? What is to be done with the ‘what is to be 
done?’? And what other politics — which would nevertheless still be a 
politics, supposing the word could still resist this very vertigo — can this 
other communality of the ‘common’ dictate to us? 

This type of question envelops another. If, through ‘the call to die in 
common through separation’, this friendship is borne beyond being-in- 
common, beyond being-common or sharing, beyond all common 
appurtenance (familial, neighbourhood, national, political, linguistic and 
finally generic appurtenance), beyond the social bond itself — if that is 
possible — then why elect, if only passively, this other with whom I have no 
relation of this type rather than some other with whom I have none of the 
sort either? Why would I call this foreigner my friend (for we are speaking 
of this absolute foreigner, if only the neighbourhood foreigner, the foreigner 
within my family) and not the other? Why am I not the friend of just 


anyone? Am I not, moreover, just that, in subscribing to such a strong and 
at the same time disarming and disarmed proposition? There could never be 
any appeasing response to this question, of course. But the hypothesis can 
come up that, if this is the way things are, it is because the friendship 
announced in this language, the one promised or promising without 
promising anything, is perhaps of the order neither of the common nor of its 
opposite, neither appurtenance nor non-appurtenance, sharing or non- 
sharing, proximity or distance, the outside or the inside, etc. Nor therefore, 
in a word, that of the community. Not because it would be a community 
without community, ‘unavowable’ or ‘inoperative’, etc., but simply because 
it would have nothing to do, with regard to what is essential in that which is 
called friendship, with the slightest reference to community, whether 
positive, negative, or neutral. This would (perhaps) mean that the aporia 
requiring the unceasing neutralization of one predicate by another (relation 
without relation, community without community, sharing without sharing, 
etc.) calls on significations altogether different from those of the part shared 
or held in common, regardless of the sign — positive, negative or neutral — 
assigned to them. This desire (‘pure, impure desire’) which, in lovence — 
friendship or love — engages me with a particular him or her rather than 
with anybody or with all hims and all hers, which engages me with these 
men and these women (and not with all of either and not with just anyone), 
which engages me with a singular ‘who’, be it a certain number of them, a 
number that is always small, whichever it is, with regard to ‘all the others’, 
this desire of the call to bridge the distance (necessarily unbridgeable) is 
(perhaps) no longer of the order of the common or the community, the share 
taken up or given, participation or sharing. Whatever the sentence 
constructed with these words (affirmative, negative, neutral or suspensive), 
it would never be related to what we persist in naming with these well-worn 
words: lovence, friendship, love, desire. Consequently, if there were a 
politics of this lovence, it would no longer imply the motifs of community, 
appurtenance or sharing, whatever the sign assigned to them. Affirmed, 
negated or neutralized, these ‘communitarian’ or ‘communal’ values always 
risk bringing a brother back. Perhaps this risk must be assumed in order to 
keep the question of the ‘who’ from being politically enframed by the 
schema of being-common or being-in-common, even when it is neutralized, 
in a question of identity (individual, subjective, ethnic, national, state, etc.). 
The law of number and of the ‘more than one’ which goes all through this 


book would not be any less crucial and ineluctable but it would, then, call 
for an altogether other language. 


2. The Greek question. Despite the infinite distance separating his 
thought of friendship from what we have called, all the way to its 
hyperbolic paradoxes, the Greek ‘model’ of friendship, and no doubt from 
the very idea of a ‘model’, why does Blanchot see fit, at one moment, to 
praise Greek philia, the ‘exalted virtue’ it demands and which is found only 
in ‘a few of us’? Why is it precisely when he too is speaking of philia as a 
‘model’ (Blanchot’s term) that he quotes in turn Aristotle’s sentence in its 
canonical version (‘O my friends, there is no friend’)? But this time, having 
taken account of everything we have just heard, the ‘there is no friend’ can 
and must become laden with the newest and most rebellious of 
significations: there is no longer a friend in the sense of what the entire 
tradition has taught us. 

And yet. And yet, a certain heritage is still affirmed, reaffirmed, 
providing it is ‘still capable of being enriched’. We shall first read this 
passage, but its sheer existence indeed attests to — rather, confirms — the fact 
that no actual rupture is possible, determinable, even advisable, even from 
the greatest distancing, and that the history we are referring to is not 
articulated in this way. 

In question again is a sort of epigraph. Here are the last pages of Michel 
Foucault as I Imagine Him,” a text first written for a journal, ‘the day 
following Foucault’s death’: 


.. asked about his projects, he [Foucault] suddenly exclaimed: ‘Oh! First I’m going to concern 
myself with myself!’ His comment is not easy to elucidate, even if one considers a bit hastily that, 
like Nietzsche, he was inclined to seek in the Greeks less a civic morality than an individual ethic 
permitting him to make of his life — what remained of it for him to live — a work of art. And it was 
thus he would be tempted to call on the ancients for a revalorization of the practices of friendship, 
which, although never lost, have not again recaptured, except for a few of us, their exalted virtue. 
Philia, which, for the Greeks and even Romans, remains the model of what is excellent in human 
relations (with the enigmatic character it receives from opposite imperatives, at once pure 
reciprocity and unrequited generosity), can be received as a heritage always capable of being 
enriched. Friendship was perhaps promised to Foucault as a posthumous gift, beyond passions, 
beyond problems of thought, beyond the dangers of life that he experienced more for others than 
for himself. In bearing witness to a work demanding study (unprejudiced reading) rather than 
praise, I believe I am remaining faithful, however awkwardly, to the intellectual friendship that his 
death, so painful for me, today allows me to declare to him, as I recall the words attributed by 
Diogenes Laertes to Aristotle: ‘Oh my friends, there is no friend.’ 


Instead of giving in to the indecency of the cold reading of the rhetoritician 
which would uncover the sublime calculations imposed on_ this 
extraordinary declaration of friendship in mourning, instead of analysing 
the writing of a ‘so painful’ fervour which still submits to the obligation of 
weighing each word on the scene (the concession, the parentheses, the 
‘perhaps’, the strict qualification of an essentially ‘intellectual’ friendship, 
etc.), let us limit ourselves to two points. 


1. First of all, the theme is indeed that of the Greek ‘model’. As it seems 
hardly compatible with the thought of friendship which Blanchot, in 
L’Amitié and elsewhere (especially in The Writing of the Disaster), had 
carried to the extremity of an uncompromising and, at the same time, gentle 
rigour, the entire effort — not to say the painful torsion — of this epigraph 
will consist in emphasizing above all: (1) the aporias which make this 
Greek model scarcely readable, enigmatic if not objectionable; and (2) the 
necessity, by way of consequence, of not receiving this heritage, in any case 
not without transforming it or enriching it (no doubt to the point of 
contradicting it at the heart of its contradiction). As this unconditional 
allusion to an ‘exalted virtue’ which he, in sum, promotes — this ‘exalted 
virtue’ that ‘a few of us’ have ‘recaptured’ — is, in Blanchot’s work, 
undoubtedly a hapax, the eulogy of ‘the model of what is excellent in 
human relations’ can only be immediately blurred, complicated, neutralized 
(‘with the enigmatic character it receives from opposite imperatives, at once 
pure reciprocity and unrequited generosity’). Since everything Blanchot has 
thought and written elsewhere on friendship should lead him to wish not to 
inherit from this model, the allusion to a heritage which is nevertheless 
necessary or indisputable must take place under the condition that the 
heritage be ‘enriched’, ‘always capable of being enriched’, and, since the 
heritage has ‘opposite imperatives’, let us understand enriched by the very 
thing it is not or which it excludes from within itself. For what else could 
ever enrich one, if not what one is not, what one does not have, what one 
can neither have or have been? The Greek model of philia could never be 
‘enriched’ otherwise than with that which it has violently and essentially 
attempted to exclude. 


2. Does the formal structure — this time formal more than thematic — does 
the composition, not to say the rhetoric, of these two pages not confirm this 


profound indecision, as if one could neither inherit nor not inherit what is 
left for us to inherit, the heritage of a culture, the heritage of a friend? Of 
course, it was necessary to speak of the Greek affair, notably because 
Foucault, for whose memory this text pre-eminently wants itself to be and 
describes itself as intended, was working on it before his death (and 
although philia remains strangely marginalized, not to say left in silence, in 
his last works, at least those published to date). But what is literally 
retained, in a declaration which means to bear witness to a work rather than 
to a person (‘in bearing witness to a work’), for a work for which the 
question is not partisan praise (for it ‘demands study (unprejudiced reading) 
rather than praise’*°), that which is kept in what finally is such a 
problematic heritage — this cumbersome model of Greek philia — is a 
reported sentence, and one which says what? — that there is no friend. The 
testimony of friendship (of ‘intellectual friendship’) is declared in the form 
of a sentence recalling that there is no friend, which neutralizes the 
declaration of friendship, pluralizes the address (O friends) and leaves the 
Greek model to put itself, by itself, into question. All by itself — this is what 
the model does best. Blanchot keeps the address. He does not speak of the 
friend or of friends, he speaks to Foucault, but to a dead Foucault to whom 
he thus declares, presently (‘posthumous gift’ of a ‘friendship’ “perhaps 
promised’), and in the plural: ‘O my friends, there is no friend.’ What is 
thus declared presently to Foucault (‘today allows me to declare to him’), 
that is, the ‘intellectual friendship’ to which Blanchot ‘believes he is 
remaining faithful’, is thus accompanied (without accompanying itself), 
following a colon, by a time of remembrance (‘I recall’). But a time of 
remembrance which recalls, no doubt out of modesty and reserve, less the 
friend than the saying attributed to Aristotle which says there is no friend. 
The incredible audacity of this ‘as’ [tandis que], following a colon, opens a 
solitary subordinate clause; it suspends the entire declaration in an epokhé 
of this intemporal time which is suited to mourning but also annuls in 
advance everything that could indeed be said in this saying and declared in 
this declaration. A colon: will an act of punctuation ever have unfurled a 
veil of mourning in this way, suspending even the logical sequence, letting 
only contiguity appear, the contemporaneousness of two temporal orders 
simply juxtaposed, without an inner relation between them? Will one ever 
have punctuated with more rigour, economy, reserve, even leaving open the 
hypothesis (but let us not dwell on this here) that there, perhaps, no one is 


around for anyone any longer, and that this is indeed death, this dying of 
which Blanchot has complained, so often, so profoundly, not that it is fatal 
but that it remains impossible? Like friendship, perhaps: ‘I believe I am 
remaining faithful, however awkwardly, to the intellectual friendship that 
his death, so painful for me, today allows me to declare to him, as I recall 
the words attributed by Diogenes Laertes to Aristotle: “Oh my friends, there 
is no friend.’” This is shown (performatively), by the fact, attested here, that 
this friendship could not have been declared during the lifetime of the 
friend. It is death that ‘today allows me’ to ‘declare’ this ‘intellectual 
friendship’, ‘as...’. May thanks be given to death. It 1s thanks to death that 
friendship can be declared. Never before, never otherwise. And never if not 
in recalling (while thanks to death, the friend recalls that there are no 
friends). And when friendship is declared during the lifetime of friends, it 
avows, fundamentally, the same thing: it avows the death thanks to which 
the chance to declare itself comes at last, never failing to come. 


Without seeking to conceal it, it will have been undersood that I wish to 
speak here of those men and women to whom a bond of friendship unites 
me — that is, I also want to speak to them. If only through the rare friendship 
I am naming, which always occasions in me a surge of admiration and 
gratitude. To my knowledge, among the aforementioned, those who cite 
Aristotle’s quasi-citation, always in the canonical version, there is, besides 
Maurice Blanchot, Michel Deguy. In a more Roman tradition (a Latin 
quotation) whose path he has not indicated to me, Deguy concentrates on 
the Aristotelian reminder, against Plato, of the singularity of this, of this 
friend. Let us cease speaking of friendship, of the eidos of friendship; let us 
speak of friends. This is the enormous vein, the inexhaustible topos of the 
quarrel Aristotle believed it was necessary to pick with Plato’s ghost. Now 
here we have what is happening to us today with the ruin which affects us 
and which we have adopted as our theme: this collapse of the friendship 
concept will perhaps be a chance, but, along with Friendship, the collapse 
carries off the Friend too, and there is nothing fortuitous in the fact that the 
sudden burst of this chance at the heart of the ruin is still linked, in what in 
our time is most untimely, to literature, to the ‘literary community’, of 
which The Unavowable Community also speaks. (Is not literature today, in 
the saturation of a geopolitical process of a becoming-worldwide 
[mondialité]|, the very thing which remains intolerable to the intolerance of 


the theological-political systems for which, the idea of democracy having 
no unconditional virtue, no speech can elude the space of theological- 
political authority? Absolute theologization gua absolute politicization?) 
For it is above all a question of poetry and literature in the pages Deguy 
devotes to ‘O amid mei’, and the word ‘literature’ is the only word, along 
with ‘friendship’, or with the singularity of ‘this one’, that he wishes to 
underscore: 


O amici mei 


If a certain Latin tradition is to be believed on this subject — O Amid mei, sicut Aristoteles dicere 
solitus est, nullus est amicus! — it is under the heading of friendship that Aristotle undertook to 
ruin the capital letters of Platonism, and called to the witness stand the ousia proté: this man. O 


my friends, there is no Friend.*! 


Under the sign of the capital letter in ruins, where Friendship should give 
way to friends who henceforth no longer answer the call to the witness 
stand, a narrative could follow (for it would be a question of narrative, 
signed by someone who presents himself, with all due irony, as a reader for 
‘a major publisher’, the same one, as a matter of fact, which houses the 
great work of Bataille and Blanchot). The narrative would be prepared only 
‘to tell stories of the monuments and ruins of friendship’. Such a hypothesis 
is handled, poetically and philosophically, through a number of themes 
which have appeared to us, up until now, to embody the enigma: sexual 
difference, misogyny and the monastic order of ‘brothers’ (‘What is thought 
of love can be said in favour of friendship, the alibi allows one to speak of 
the amiable. There are two conditions conducive to the firing of the spirit: 
that of the “Muse”, prosopeia of eros, and now “libido”, and sexual 
difference forces poetry to cry out its adieu: “A single being is absent and 
everything comes alive ...”. The second is the womanless condition, 
outside of difference, and this is the monastic flame-up of the spirit, 
“philosophy”, which sometimes takes flight from out of a little misogyny 
(which can be misandry in the community of women)’), the ‘free and 
dissymmetrical relationship’ of the ‘most generous’, again from out of a 
‘dying in common’ (‘... singing over dying together’), and lastly, above all, 
the war of friendship between family and literature: 


Most men will have existed only through and for their families; when men live and die in being 
loved, commented on, at times a little deplored. Among the despairing attempts to exist beyond 
the family: writing, or ... loving; which carries off, alters, adulters. Of the other, an other, truly 
other, ravishes: it is a god. And see how, as soon as they are torn away from the family by love, 


they found a family. Unless they die in loving, loving to die, Tristan and Juliet, this is the choice 
left them by /iterature. 

(Remember, says the conjugal quarrel, that we are not of the same family. And this is why we 
have never really spoken of the same thing.) 


3. Lastly, fraternity. What can the name ‘brother’ or the call to fraternity 
still mean when one or the other arises in the speech of friendship which, 
like that of Blanchot — at least in his L’Amitié or The Writing of the Disaster 
— has so radically delivered itself from the hold of all determined 
communities, all filiation or affiliation, all alliances — families or peoples — 
and even all given generality, if only by a ‘gift, a promise, a generic 
generosity’? We have already noted that allusions to fraternity are rare in 
Blanchot. But for this very reason, for this reason as well, these allusions 
are worth dwelling upon. Besides the brief, obviously affirmative, 


connotations we have already examined in The Unavowable Community,** 
a particular generous declaration of friendship addressed to the Jews and to 
Judaism requires us to question what it says or does not say of the 
friendship of which L’Amitié speaks: 


It is obviously the Nazi persecution (which was in operation from the beginning, unlike what 
certain professors of philosophy would wish to convince us of — to have us believe that in 1933, 
when Heidegger joined, national-socialism was still a proper, suitable doctrine, not deserving of 
condemnation) which made us feel that the Jews were our brothers and that Judaism was more 
than a culture and even more than a religion, but, rather, the foundation of our relationships with 


the other [autrui].°° 


I shall not hazard an interpretation of this definition of Judaism, although I 
sense both its highly problematic character and its imposing necessity 
(which is of course unquestionable, from the moment one decides to call 
Judaism the very thing one thus defines: a question of a circle with which 
we cannot here engage again). Putting aside, then, what is most difficult in 
this definition, but supposing, precisely, that Judaism is ‘the foundation of 
our relationships with others’, then — and this will be my only question — 
what does ‘brothers’ mean in this context? Why would autrui be in the first 
place a brother? And especially, why ‘our brothers’? Whose brothers? Who, 
then, are we? Who is this ‘we’? 

(Reading this sentence, and always in view of the admiring and grateful 
friendship which binds me to the author, I was wondering, among other 
questions (more than one): why could I never have written that, nor 
subscribed to it, whereas, relying on other criteria, this declaration would be 


easier for me to subscribe to than several others? In the same vein, I was 
wondering why the word ‘community’ (avowable or unavowable, 
inoperative or not) — why I have never been able to write it, on my own 
initiative and in my name, as it were. Why? Whence my reticence? And is it 
not fundamentally the essential part of the disquiet which inspires this 
book? Is this reserve, with respect to the above definition of Judaism, 
insufficiently Jewish, or, on the contrary, hyperbolically Jewish, more than 
Jewish? What, then, once again, does ‘Judaism’ mean? I add that the 
language of fraternity seems to me just as problematic when, reciprocally, 
Lévinas uses it to extend humanity to the Christian, in this case to Abbot 
Pierre: ‘the fraternal humanity of the stalag’s confidential agent who, by 
each of his movements, restored in us the consciousness of our dignity. The 


man was called Abbot Pierre, I never learned his family name.’**) 


It is rather late in the day now to issue a warning. Despite the 
appearances that this book has multiplied, nothing in it says anything 
against the brother or against fraternity. No protest, no contestation. 
Maligning and cursing, as we have seen often enough, still appertain to the 
inside of the history of brothers (friends or enemies, be they false or true). 
This history will not be thought, it will not be recalled, by taking up this 
side. In my own special way, like everyone else, I believe, I no doubt love, 
yes, in my own way, my brother, my only brother. And my brothers, dead or 
alive, where the letter no longer counts and never has, in my ‘family’ and in 
my ‘families’ — I have more than one, and more than one ‘brother’ of more 
than one sex, and I love having more than one, each time unique, of whom 
and to whom, in more than one language, across quite a few boundaries, I 
am bound by a conjuration and so many unuttered oaths. 

Where, then, is the question? Here it is: I have never stopped asking 
myself, I request that it be asked, what 1s meant when one says ‘brother’, 
when someone is called ‘brother’. And when the humanity of man, as much 
as the alterity of the other, is thus resumed and subsumed. And the infinite 
price of friendship. I have wondered, and I ask, what one wants to say 
whereas one does not want to say, one knows that one should not say, 
because one knows, through so much obscurity, whence it comes and where 
this profoundly obscure language has led in the past. Up until now. I am 
wondering, that’s all, and request that it be asked, what the implicit politics 
of this language is. For always, and today more than ever. What is the 


political impact and range of this chosen word, among other possible words, 
even — and especially — if the choice is not deliberate? 


Just a question, but one which supposes an affirmation. If my hypothesis 
must remain a hypothesis, it cannot be undone with a pledge. The pledge of 
a testimony irreducible to proof or certitude, as well as to all theoretical 
determination. If one wishes to retranslate this pledge into a hypothesis or a 
question, it would, then, perhaps — by way of a temporary conclusion — take 
the following form: is it possible to think and to implement democracy, that 
which would keep the old name ‘democracy’, while uprooting from it all 
these figures of friendship (philosophical and religious) which prescribe 
fraternity: the family and the androcentric ethnic group? Is it possible, in 
assuming a certain faithful memory of democratic reason and reason tout 
court — I would even say, the Enlightenment of a certain Aufklarung (thus 
leaving open the abyss which is again opening today under these words) — 
not to found, where it is not longer a matter of founding, but to open out to 
the future, or rather, to the ‘come’, of a certain democracy? 

For democracy remains to come; this is its essence in so far as it remains: 
not only will it remain indefinitely perfectible, hence always insufficient 
and future, but, belonging to the time of the promise, it will always remain, 
in each of its future times, to come: even when there is democracy, it never 
exists, it is never present, it remains the theme of a non-presentable concept. 
Is it possible to open up to the ‘come’ of a certain democracy which is no 
longer an insult to the friendship we have striven to think beyond the homo- 
fraternal and phallogocentric schema? 

When will we be ready for an experience of freedom and equality that is 
capable of respectfully experiencing that friendship, which would at last be 
just, just beyond the law, and measured up against its measurelessness? 


O my democratic friends ... 


Notes 


Foreword 


1. In particular before the American Philosophical Association in Washington, in 1988, and for a 
colloquium of the Jan Hus Association at the French Institute in Prague, in 1990. 

2. In the form of an article (in English: ‘Politics of Friendship’, in The Journal of Philosophy, vol. 
LXXXV, no.11, November 1988, New York; a longer version of this article appeared in American 
Imago, Studies in Psychoanalysis and Culture, vol. 50, Fall 1993, Johns Hopkins University Press, 
Baltimore, special issue on Love, Thomas Keenan, Special Editor, trans. G. Motzkin, M. Syrotinski 
and Thomas Keenan; in Italian, in Aut Aut, March-April 1991, 242, trans. M. Ferraris, Milan); and in 
Czech in book form (Politiky Pratelstvi, trans. K. Thein, Philosophia, Prague 1994). 


1 Oligarchies: Naming, Enumerating, Counting 


1. Michel de Montaigne, The Essays [trans. M.A. Screech, Allen Lane, Penguin Press, London 
199 LI, 

2. Cicero, Laelius de Amicitia, [trans. FO. Copley, On Friendship, Ann Arbor Paperbacks, 
University of Michigan Press 1971], p. 56. For the numerous translations we will henceforth be 
quoting, the following rule will be followed, no revision or modification (one always says: ‘slightly’ 
modified) of any kind, nor additions in parentheses from the original text except when we deem them 
indispensable for the clarity of our argument. 

3. Ibid. 

4. Eudemian Ethics, 1234b, 18 ff. [Revised Oxford trans. ] 

5. A fortunate coincidence: in the seminar that I am following here, I believed the word aimance 
indispensable for the naming of a third or first voice, the so-called middle voice, on the near or far 
side of loving (friendship or love), of activity or passivity, decision or passion. Now, luckily, I come 
across this word, invented by a friend, a poet-thinker I admire: Abdelkebir Khatibi, who sings this 
new word in Dédicace a l’année qui vient [Dedication to the Upcoming Year], Fata Morgana 1986: ‘I 
will have desired only aimance, lovence’, ‘our law of lovence’, ‘on the frontiers of lovence’, ‘Go and 


come in the cycle of lovence’, ‘Lovence, Lovence.... The only word I ever invented/In the sentence 
of my life?’. He recalls the word at the beginning of Par-dessus 1’épaule [Over the Shoulder], Aubier 
1988, which presents ‘lovence in two sequences, one addressed to women, and the other to men’. 

6. Eudemian Ethics, 1234b 21. 

7. 1234b 18-20. 

e..12394 5, 

9. 1234b 22-3. 

10. 1239a 33-4. 

11. Ibid. 

12. 1237a 35—40. 

13. 1239a 27-30. 

14. For example, Eudemian Ethics, 1239a 4, 20; Nicomachean Ethics, 1159b [revised Oxford 
trans. ]. 

15. Eudemian Ethics, 1239a 36; Nicomachean Ethics, 1159a 30. 

16. Eudemian Ethics, 1159a 29. 

17. 1239a 40; 1239b 1-2. 

18. 1237a 40, 1239b 1-2. 

19. Ibid. 

20. 1237b 17. 

21, 12376 13. 

22. 1237b 10-15 

23. Plato, The Banquet, 182c. 

24. Plato, Timaeus, 37b. 

25. Eudemian Ethics, 1237b 15. 

26. For these distinctions marked notably by Heidegger, and for the questions they bring up, allow 
me to refer to ‘Comment ne pas parler’ in Psyché, Inventions de l’autre, Galilée 1987, pp. 586 ff. 
[‘How to Avoid Speaking’, in Languages of the Unsayable, ed. Sanford Budick and Wolfgang Iser, 
trans. Ken Frieden, Columbia University Press, New York.] What I called elsewhere iterability might 
not dissolve this alternative but might at least give access to a structure of experience in which the 
two poles of the alternative cease to oppose one another to form another node, another ‘logic’, 
another ‘chronology’, another history, another relation to the order of orders. 

27. Eudemian Ethics, 1237b 30-34. 

28. 1237b 34, 1238a 3. 

29. 1238a 5-10. 

30. 1238a 10-15. 

31. 1238a 30. 


2 Loving in Friendship: Perhaps — the Noun and the Adverb 


1. ‘Seine Feinde lieben? Ich glaube, das ist gut gelernt worden: es geschieht heute tausendfaltig.’ 
Nietzsche, Beyond Good and Evil [trans. R. Hollingdale, Penguin, Harmondsworth 1981, 216]. 

2. ‘Das Leben des Feindes. — Wer davon lebt, einen Feind zu bekampfen, hat ein Interesse daran, 
dass er am Leben bleibt.’ Nietzsche, Human All Too Human, A Book for Free Spirits [trans. R. 
Hollingdale, Cambridge Unversity Press 1986], 1, 531. 

3. The seminar whose first session I am following here will have in fact proposed twelve 
variations or twelve modalities of reception of the ‘same sentence’. Perhaps someday I will prepare 
this for publication. 

4.‘... und vielleicht kommt jedem auch einmal die freudigere Stunde, wo er sagt 


“Freunde, es gibt keine Freunde! so rief der sterbende Weise; 

“Feinde, es gibt keinen Feind!” ruf ich, der lebende Tor.’ 

Human All Too Human, 1, ‘376: Of friends’ [trans. R. Hollingdale, Cambridge University Press, 
1986, p. 149], Emphasis added. 

5. Beyond the timid prolegomena that we are amassing here with reference to Nietzsche, a 
systematic study of the ‘category’, if it is one, should be undertaken, the ‘category’ or the ‘modality’ 
of the ‘perhaps’ in all languages and in all the world’s cultures. In a very fine essay on Heidegger, 
Rodolphe Gasché begins by recalling the disdain with which classical philosophy considers the 
recourse to ‘perhaps’. He sees in this disdain — as for Hegel in his awful sarcasms against the 
unfortunate Krug — a pre-philosophical failure, an empiricist slip back into the approximate 
formulations of ordinary language. ‘Perhaps’ would belong to a vocabulary which should remain 
outside philosophy. That is to say, outside certainty, truth, even outside veracity. In this respect, the 
philosopher himself echoes the common sense of the German proverb which says: ‘Perhaps is 
practically a lie’ (or a half-truth?) (Vielleichit ist eine halbe Luge). Having recalled the German 
etymology of vielleichit (villithe in Middle High German gathers the significations of sehr leidit 
(easy), vermutlich (probably, conceivably), and moglicherweise (possibly), which marked then, more 
so than now, an expectancy, not a simple possibility and, as Grimm takes note of, the presumed 
possibility that a statement might correspond to a reality or that something will happen, as Gasché 
translates: thus perhaps), and before dealing with the abundant use that Heidegger makes of vielleicht 
in one of the essays in Unterwegs zur Spradie, Gasché poses the question which is of the utmost 
interest to us here: ‘And what if perhaps modalized a discourse which no longer proceeds by 
statements (declarations, affirmations, assertions) without being for all that less rigorous than the 
discourse of philosophy?’ (‘Perhaps — a Modality? On the Way with Heidegger to Language’, in 
Graduate Faculty Philosophy Journal, vol. 16, no. 2, 1993, p. 469). 

6. Nietzsche, Beyond Good and Evil, \st part, On the prejudices of philosophers’, 2. 

7. Ibid. 

8. See Bonnie Homg, Political Theory and the Displacement of Politics, Cornell University Press, 
1993, pp. 66—9 (‘Nietzsche’s Recovery of Virtue as Virtit’). 

9. Beyond Good and Evil, p. 135. 

10. Ibid., para. 214. 

11. On the Prejudices of Philosophers’, para. 2. 

12. Ibid., para. 42. 

13. “Freund. — Mitfreude, nich Mitleiden, macht den Freund’, Human All Too Human, para. 499: 
‘Fellow rejoicing, not fellow suffering, makes the friend.’ 

14. In one of the most blinding passages of The Writing of Disaster, Blanchot evokes (with the 
audacity and prudence required here) ‘certain commentators’ of ‘Jewish messianism’, where Jewish 
messianism ‘suggests the relation between the event and its nonoccurrence’ : 


If the Messiah is at the gates of Rome among the beggars and lepers, one might think that his 
incognito protects or prevents him from coming, but, precisely, he is recognized; someone, 
haunted with questioning and unable to leave off, asks him: ‘When will you come?’ His being 
there is, then, not the coming With the Messiah, who is there, the call must always resound ‘Come, 
Come.’ His presence is no guarantee. Both future and past (it is said, at least once, that the Messiah 
has already come), his coming does not correspond to any presence at all . . And should it happen 
that, to the question, ‘When will your coming take place’ die Messiah responds ‘It is today’, the 
answer is certainly impressive: so, it is today! It is now and always now. There is no waiting, 
although this is as an obligation to wait And when is now? When is the now which does not belong 
to ordinary time ... does not maintain but destabilizes it? . ., L’Ecriture du désastre, Gallimard 
1980, pp 214-15 [trans. Ann Smock, The Writing of Disaster, University of Nebraska Press, New 
Bison Book Edition 1995, pp. 141—2 (trans, modified)]. 


15. It is well known that these words are Bataille’s. Why do we quote them here? In order to bear 
witness — too briefly, shabbily — to the grateful attention that draws me to those thinkers and texts to 
which I am bound without ever being their equal. Without hope, then, of ever giving them their due 
here. These words of Bataille are chosen by Blanchot as an epigraph to La Communauté inavouable, 
Editions du Minuit, 1983 [The Unavoidable Community, trans. Pierre Jons, Tarrytown, NY: Station 
Hill Press 1988], a work which, from the very first lines, is in conversation with an article by Jean- 
Luc Nancy which later become a book: La Communauté désoeuvrée, Bourgois 1986, 1990 [The 
Inoperative Community, University of Minnesota Press 1991]. Like Blanchot’s L’Amitié (Gallimard 
1971), which we will take up later, this is yet another book on friendship, in particular friendship 
according to Bataille (see, for example, pp. 40 ff.). As those towards which or from which they shine 
in so singular a fashion, these works are no doubt among those that count the most for me today. 
Without being able to refer to them here as abundantly and directly as would be necessary, I would at 
least like to situate my subject with regard to what they have staked out: to pre-name, singularly 
around the texts of Nietzsche that I am attempting to read here, a seismic event whose “new logic’ 
leaves its mark on all the necessarily contradictory and undecidable statements that organize these 
discourses and give them their paradoxical force. A paradigm here might be, for example, this 
‘community of those without community’, ‘the inoperative operation of the work’, like all the ‘X 
without X’ that open up the sense at the heart of these thoughts. These thoughts invent themselves by 
countersigning, according to the feleiopoesis that we have been referring to, the event signed 
‘Nietzsche’. They belong — but the word is not appropriate — they belong without belonging to the 
untimely time of Nietzsche. I could have placed the following as epigraph to this entire essay, in any 
case to that part dealing with Nietzsche, taken from ‘The Negative Community’ in Zhe Unavowable 
Community: 


For example, Bataille says: ‘The community I am speaking of is that which will exist virtually 
from the fact of Nietzsche’s existence (which is the demand for such a community) and that each 
of Nietzsche’s readers undoes by shirking — that is, by not solving the posed enigma (by not even 
reading it)’ But there was a huge difference between Bataille and Nietzsche Nietzsche had an 
ardent desire to be heard, but also the sometimes haughty certitude of being the bearer of a truth 
too dangerous and too superior to be able to be embraced. For Bataille, friendship is a part of the 
‘sovereign operation’; it is no accident that Le Coupable has at the very beginning the subtitle, 
Friendship; friendship, it is true, is difficult to define friendship for oneself to the point of 
dissolution, friendship from one to another, as the passage and affirmation of a continuity starting 
from the necessary discontinuity. But reading — the inoperative operation of the work — is not 
absent from it. (pp. 41-2) 


Further on, Blanchot insists on the fact that ‘these movements are only apparently contradictory’. 
“What is then the case concerning friendship? Friendship: friendship for the unknown [one] without 
friends’ (p. 44; original emphasis). 

In subscribing in turn, in countersigning, in taking it seriously, as I have always done, the necessity 
of these ‘apparently contradictory’ statements, I would like to return (for example, here with 
Nietzsche) not to some archaeological ground or platform summoned to support them (by definition 
this ground always gives way, escapes) but to an event that opens up a world in which we must today, 
now, write in this way, and deliver ourselves over to this necessity. As we are doing. 

Then, yes, what I will say — starting from and on the subject of Nietzsche, and in his favour also — 
will be a salute to the friends I have just quoted or named. What I will say against Nietzsche also, 
perhaps — for example when, later, I will protest against the evidence and the guarantees that he still 
gives for such fraternization. There is still perhaps some brotherhood in Bataille, Blanchot and 
Nancy, and I wonder, in the innermost recess of my admiring friendship, if it does not deserve a little 
loosening up, and if it should still guide the thinking of the community, be it a community without 


community, or a brotherhood without brotherhood. ‘The heart of brotherhood’, for example, which, 
in the last words of ‘The Negative Community’, still lays down the law: ... ‘not by chance, but as the 
heart of brotherhood: the heart or the law’. I am also thinking — without being too sure what to think 
— about all the assembled ‘brothers’, all the men ‘gathered into fraternities,’ in The Inoperative 
Community, when ‘The Interrupted Myth’ is taken up (pp. 109, 111, 112). Must not the interruption 
of this mythical scene also, by some supplement to the question concerning what transpires ‘before 
the law’, at the mythical moment of the father’s murder (from Freud to Kafka), reach and affect the 
figure of the brothers? 

16. See my De l’esprit, Heidegger et la question, Galilée 1987 [Of Spirit, Heidegger and the 
Question, trans. G. Bennington and R. Bowlby, University of Chicago Press 1989, p. 129.]; and, 
notably, ‘Nombres de oui’, in Psyché, Galilée, 1987, pp. 644-50 [trans. Brian Holmes, ‘A number of 
yes,’ in Qui Parle, 2, 2:120-33]. 

17. In particular, in Donner le temps, Galilée 1991, [trans. Peggy Kamuf: Given Time, University of 
Chicago Press 1992]. 

18. Beyond Good and Evil, 2, para. 44. 

19. Ibid, [for the last two quotations]. 

20. Ibid. 

21. Ibid., para. 43. 


3 This Mad ‘Truth’: The Just Name of Friendship 


1. Comment tirer profit de ses ennemies [How to Take Advantage of Ones Enemies], trans. P. 
Maréchaux, Payot 1993, pp. 33-4. 

2. Le Liévre, ses Amis et les Deux Chevreuils, Fables |The Hare, His Friends, and the Two 
Roebucks, Fables], Book HI, Fable VII. 

3. Human All Too Human, 2, para. 376. 

4. Ibid.; emphasis added. 

5. Ibid., 2, para. 252. 

6. Le Pas au-dela, Gallimard 1973, p. 107. 

7. Human All Too Human. 2, para. 251. 

8. [These passages have not, to my knowledge, been published in English translation. Derrida 
cites them from: Par-dela bien et mal, Oeuvres philosophiques completes, Gallimard 1971, vol. VI, 
pp. 362-3 — Trans. ] 

9. Being and Time, trans. John Macquarne and Edward Robinson. New York: Harper & Row 
1962, para. 62, p. 356. 

10. The Gay Science, trans. W. Kaufmann, New York, Vintage 1974, para. 374. 

11. Human All Too Human, 2, para. 248. 

12. The Gay Science, 1, 8, ‘Unconscious virtues’. 

13. Human All Too Human, 2, ‘Assorted opinions and maxims’, para. 241. 

14. The Gay Science, para. 61. 

15. The Gay Science, 4, para. 289. 

16. The Gay Science, 1, 14, ‘The things people call love’. 

17. Mémoires — for Paul de Man [trans, by Cecile Lindsay, Jonathan Culler, Eduardo Cadava and 
Peggy Kamuf, Columbia University Press, New York, second edition, 1989, p. 150], 

18. See Blanchot, The Unavowable Community, pp. 17, 78. 

19. See ‘To forgive Enemies H{ayley} does pretend/Who never in his Life forgave a friend,’ 
William Blake, Complete Poems, Penguin Classics, p. 617. See also, pp. 617-18, ‘On H{ayley}s 


Friendship’ and ‘To H{ayley}’: ‘Thy Friendship oft has made my heart to ake/Do be my Enemy for 
Friendships sake.’ 

20. William Blake, Jerusalem, The Emanation of the Giant Albion, ibid., pp. 635, 642, 643. 
Everything would have to be reread. For example: ‘Each man is in His Spectres power/Until the 
arrival of that hour/When his Humanity awake/And Cast his own Spectre into the Lake,’ p. 494; or 
this: ‘Never shalt thou a [lover] true love find/My Spectre follows thee Behind,’ p. 495. Is Stirner so 
far off? Spectral affinities, the friendship of ghosts. And Marx? 


4 The Phantom Friend Returning (in the Name of ‘Democracy’) 


1. Human All Too Human, 2, Assorted opinions and maxims, 242, p. 274. 

2. ‘As for the name ... that is called democracy’, in L’Invention d’Athénes. Histoire de l’oraison 
funebre dans la ‘cité dassique’, 1981, second edition, Payot, 1993, pp. 225, 227. [The Invention of 
Athens: The Funeral Oration in the Classical City, trans. Alan Sheridan, Harvard University Press, 
Cambridge, MA and London, 1986, pp. 217, 219.] 

3. La Boétie, ‘To Michel de Montaigne’. 

4. In order to limit at least one inevitable ambiguity, let us say immediately and straightforwardly 
that the deconstructive reading of Schmittian thought that we shall attempt here will keep two 
convictions in view. 

The first concerns the undeniable link between this thinking of the political and political thought 
on the one hand and, on the other, Schmitt’s political commitments, those which led to his arrest and 
conviction after the war. In many respects, these commitments often appear more serious and more 
repugnant than those of Heidegger (see, for instance, his anti-Semitic declarations on the ‘Jewish 
falsifications of the concept of spirit’ quoted by Habermas in ‘German Idealism and its Jewish 
Thinkers’, Profiles philosophiques et politiques, TEL, Gallimard 1974, p. 83; and, more recently, ‘Le 
besoin d’une continuité allemande. Carl Schmitt dans l’histoire des idées politiques de la RFA [‘The 
Need for German Continuity. Carl Schmitt in the History of Political Ideas in the GFR] in Les Temps 
modernes, no. 575, June 1994). 

But the second conviction is that thus should not distract us from a serious reading, nor keep us 
from taking up a thought and a work so deeply rooted in the richest tradition of the theological, 
juridical, political and philosophical culture of Europe, in that of a European law of which this 
Catholic thinker (who probably remained a Nazi for a much longer period of time than he publicly 
confessed, and no doubt remained anti-Semitic for the rest of his life — and the forms of his anti- 
Semitism were extremely virulent) claimed to be the last — fervent — advocate. To exactly this extent 
this thought and this work repeatedly presaged the fearsome world that was announcing itself from as 
as early as the 1920s. As though the fear of seeing that which comes to pass take place in effect had 
honed the gaze of this besieged watchman. Following our hypothesis, the scene would be thus: 
lucidity and fear not only drove this terrified and insomniac watcher to anticipate the storms and 
seismic movements that would wreak havoc with the historical field, the political space, the borders 
of concepts and countries, the axiomatics of European law, the bonds between the tellurian and the 
political, the technical and the political, the media and parliamentary democracy, etc. Such a 
‘watcher’ would thereby have been more attuned than so many others to the fragility and 
‘deconstructible’ precariousness of structures, borders and axioms that he wished to protect, restore 
and ‘conserve’ at all costs. This lucidity — that is, the courage of his fear — also led him to multiply, in 
the panic of a defensive strategy, the most paradoxical of alliances, thereby revealing formal 
combinations whose possibility is still today in the greatest need of meditation: how does the most 
uncompromisingly conservative discourse, that of Schmitt, manage to affirm, in certain respects, so 
many affinities with what are apparently, from Lenin to Mao, the most revolutionary movements of 


our time? Who would have been their common enemy? And how can one explain the interest in 
Schmitt shown by a certain extreme-left-wing movement, in more than one country? How is this still- 
active influence to be explained, despite so many trials? There is more to be learned from these 
equivocations than from many right-minded denunciations that take shelter behind a chronic wave of 
contagious or objective alliances. These indolent denunciations often use this disquiet and the 
empirically established fact of ‘evil influences’ as a pretext, without having anything else to say on 
the matter, for shirking and for deterring others from the task of reading, from the work and from the 
question. Those who are satisfied with mere denunciation too often conceal their apathy and 
misapprehension — indeed, their denial of the very thing that Schmitt at least, in his own way, through 
his reactive panic, apprehended. Which way was that? This is what we would like to consider 
temporarily. 

5. Under this title, we will be referring regularly to Der Begriff des Politisdien (1932), reissued in 
1963, and once again in 1974, by Duncker & Humblot, Berlin, with the subtitle ‘Text von 1932 mit 
einem Vorword und drei Corollarien’, as well as to the French translation, La Notion du Politique, 
Théorie du Partisan, trans. M.-L. Steinhauser, with a preface by J. Freund, Flammarion 1992. We 
have again slightly modified this translation, at several points. We will indicate each time the page 
number of the original followed by the page number of the translation. [Translated into English by 
George Schwab as The Concept of the Political, Rutgers University Press, New Brunswick, New 
Jersey 1976; hereafter CP. The page numbers following those of the original will be from this 
edition. | 

6. On the relationship between Schmitt and Strauss, see Heinrich Meier, ‘Carl Schmitt, Leo 
Strauss und “Der Begriff des Politischen”. Zu einen Dialog unter Alwesenden.’ This work contains 
Strauss’s paper on The Concept of the Political [which is found in English translation at the end of 
the English edition of Schmitt’s work] and three unpublished letters of 1932-33. 

7. Ibid., p. 26; p. 26. 

8. Ibid, p. 29; p. 28 [translation modified], 

9. Ibid., pp. 33-5; pp. 34-7. Further on, to warn against the confusion that may ensue, Schmitt 
recalls the profound analogy between theological and political postulates. He then speaks, concerning 
the friend—enemy distinction, of ‘effectivity-actuality or of real possibility’ (die reale Wirklichkeit 
oder Moglichkeit der Unterschieidung von Freund und Feind). This distinction would be 
presupposed by ‘pessimistic’ theoreticians of the political, such as Machiavelli, Hobbes, and even 
Fichte (p. 64; p. 65). We shall see below what makes these pessimistic theoreticians, in Schmitt’s 
eyes, the only authentic thinkers of the political. 

10. See The Crisis of Parliamentary Democracy, trans. Ellen Kennedy, MIT Press, Cambridge, 
MA, and London, 1985; and Théologie politique, trans, and presented J.-L. Schlegel, Gallimard, 
1988, p. VII [English translation, Political Theology, by George Schwab, MIT Press, Cambridge, 
MA and London 1985], 

11. pp. 29-30; pp. 28-9. 

12. We shall attempt to do so elsewhere, especially around several examples from the Old 
Testament which, to us, appear difficult to incorporate into Schmittian logic. 

13. p. 29, n. 5; tr.p 28, n. 9. On the theme of stdsis, as on so many related themes, we already refer 
here, and shall do so again, to the original and indispensable works of Nicole Loraux. For the 
moment, let us simply note this sensitive place where Loraux points out the suspension of the 
opposition stasis/polemos. When citizens are ‘killed by other Athenians’ while they were coming to 
the rescue of democracy against oligarchy, ‘their death actually transgresses the opposition of stasis 
and polemos, the norm of all organized political life, thereby creating an exceptional situation’ (The 
Invention of Athens, p. 201]. 

Long after The Concept of the Political (1932), in 1969, Schmitt went back to this notion of stasis, 
and devoted several truly pregnant pages to it. Their starting point is Gregory of Nazianzus’s 
argument according to which any s¢dsis in the Trinity would be unthinkable, whereas ‘the One — to 


hen — is always in revolt — stasidzon — against itself — pros heauton’. Schmitt thus notes that the word 
stdsis, meaning revolt, appears ‘at the heart of the most irreproachable formulation of the thorny 
dogma’. He recalls not only Plato (Sophist, 249-54), and the passage from the Republic that we are 
dealing with here, but also the Greek Church Fathers, neo-Platonism and Plotinus. He goes on 


Stasis means in the first place repose, state of rest, position, arrest (status), the opposite notion is 
kinesis movement But secondly, stasis also means (political) unrest, movement, revolt and civil 
war. Most Greek lexicons juxtapose with no further ado the two opposed meanings, without 
attempting to explain them, something which, moreover, could never be legitimately demanded of 
them. However, even the simple juxtaposition of numerous examples of such an opposition is a 
gold mine for the knowledge of political and theologico-political phenomena In this case, a 
veritable theologico-political stasiology emerges from the heart of the doctrine of the Trinity The 
problem of enmity and of the enemy could never be eclipsed. In the linguistic usage of the modern 
world, a significant fact has been recently added in the Anglo-American linguistic zone’ the word 
foe, judged outdated and of only ‘rhetorical’ value since Shakespeare, has a new lease of life since 
the Second World War (Théologie politique, 1922, 1969, pp. 127, 173-5). 


On the modern rehabilitation of the word foe, see also the end of the preface to the French reissue of 
Le Concept du politique (1963). On the difficulties in maintaining these distinctions in the etymology 
of the German Feind, see the unwieldy development in Corollaire II (3), 1938. We shall return to this 
later, in the next chapter, around the figure of the brother. 

Schmitt’s usage of status here should be set beside that which he emphasizes elsewhere, on the 
first page of The Concept of the Political: the State is Status, status par excellence, sheer status (der 
Status schlechthin). As for the stasiology evoked therein (which would be working either at the heart 
of the One, or in the centre of a Trinity or Holy Family), this is a motif which — in different words, in 
another style and in view of other consequences — could very well describe one of the subterranean 
but utterly continuous themes of this essay: how the One divides and opposes itself, opposes itself by 
posing itself, represses and violates the difference it carries within itself, wages war, wages war on 
itself, itself becoming war [se fait la guerre], frightens itself, itself becoming fear [se fait peur], and 
does violence to itself, itself becoming violence [se fait violence], transforms itself into frightened 
violence in guarding itself from the other, for it guards itself from, and in, the other [il se garde de 
l’autre], always, Him, the One, the One ‘different from itself’. 

14. Schmitt adds a specification that he judges analogous to the opposition between hostis (public 
enemy) and inimicus (private enemy); this does not mean — let us note the dissymmetry of which 
Schmitt does not seem to take account — that ekhthros, who can be the enemy in a ‘civil war’ (stasis), 
is a ‘private’ enemy: can one not have ‘private’ (therefore political) enemies in a civil war (stasis)? 
As for the Latin, Schmitt’s reference is as follows: ‘Hostis is est cum quo publice bellum habemus ... 
in quo ab inimico differt, qui est is, quocum habemus privata odia. Distingui etiam sic possunt, ut 
inimicus sit qui nos odit; hostis qui oppugnat’ (Forcellini, Lexicon totius Latinitatis, II, 320, 511), 
pp. 29, 196. 

15. *... absolute evil’, writes Nicole Loraux, but also ‘a parasitical evil grafted on to the proper 
nature of the city’ (The Invention of Athens, pp. 198, 199). 

16. Ibid.., pp. 175, 189, 310, 312-13. 

17. Menexenus, 244ab [in Plato, The Collected Dialogues, ed. Edith Hamilton and Huntington 
Cairns, Princeton University Press 1961, p. 194]. 

18. Ibid., 239a. 

19. Ibid., 326e, 237b. 

20. This passage from Menexenus is also evoked by Nicole Loraux, in particular in Les Enfants 
d’Athéna. Idées athéniennes sur la citoyenneté et la division des sexes, Maspero, 1981, p. 41 [The 
Children of Athena: Athenian Ideas about Citizenship and the Division Between the Sexes, trans. 


Cardine Levine, foreword Froma I. Zeitlin, Princeton University Press, Princeton, NJ, 1993], 
precisely in one of her priceless chapters on ‘Autochthony, an Athenian Topic’, and ‘the required 
theme of the epitdphioi’ (p. 41) and in a footnote to her Les Méres en deuil [Mothers in Mourning], 
Le Seuil 1990, p. 128, n.29 On most of these questions, I naturally refer back — and, as is meet and 
fitting, with much gratitude — to all the works of Nicole Loraux, to those just mentioned and to 
Fagons tragiques de tuer une femme, Hachette 1985 [Tragic Ways of Killing a Woman, trans. 
Anthony Forster, Harvard University Press, Cambridge, MA, and London, 1987]. 

To my knowledge this has never been done, but it would undoubtedly be interesting to compare 
the two lines of research — so different in so many respects — of Nicole Loraux and Paul de Man on 
the laws, genre, poetics and rhetoric, and also the paradoxes, of the epitaph. See in particular Paul de 
Man, ‘Autobiography as De-Facement’ (around Wordsworth’s Essays upon Epitaphs) in The 
Rhetoric of Romanticism, New York 1984. See also ‘Mnemosyne’, in Mémoires — for Paul de Man, 
in which I also followed through this motif of the discourse of mourning, the funeral oration and the 
epitaph (Galilée, 1988), especially pp. 43 ff. [trans. Cecile Lindsay, Jonathan Culler, Eduardo Cadava 
and Peggy Kamuf, Columbia University Press, New York 1986, 1989, pp. 21 ff.]. 

21. Le Vocabulaire des institutions européennes. Minuit, 1969, vol. 1, pp. 220 ff. Undo-European 
Language and Society, trans, by Elizabeth Palmer, London: Faber & Faber 1973]. 

22. Ibid., trans., p. 179. 

23. Ibid., pp. 335 ff., pp. 352-3; trans, p. 288. 

24. See Loraux, The Invention of Athens, pp. 312-13. 

25. As we have indicated from the epigraph on, and then repeatedly, the argument of this chapter 
intersects in its own way, in paying homage to it, the reflection that Nicole Loraux entitles, in The 
Invention of Athens, ‘For the name ... It is Called Democracy’. The particular orientation of this 
essay on friendship, in discussing the name of democracy and the deconstruction of a certain concept 
of democracy in the name of democracy, could take the following form today, still today and perhaps 
more than ever: how do you deconstruct the essential link of a certain concept of democracy to 
autochthony and to eugenics without, for all that, giving up the name of democracy? Nor its 
historicity? But how do you think this historicity to which no history has ever been able to measure 
up? Such a question would resemble at least that of the ‘immemorial’ or the relations between ‘myth’ 
and ‘history’ as it is formulated, for example, in these following lines by Nicole Loraux: 


It is not only in the temporal unfolding of the text that demokratla, annexed to autochthony and 
flanked by noble exploits, is linked to eugéneia, but also, in absolute terms, the time of the myth is 
for the orator the moment of democracy. In other words, it has no origin, it is immemorial, ‘they 
were thus the first and only ones of that tune who abolished kingdoms among themselves and 
established democracy’ (Lysias, 18), en ekelnoi toi khrondi referring either to the first birth of the 
autochthons, that is, to the origin of mankind, or, beyond the passage on autochthony, to the period 
of the great mythical exploits So there is, to say the least, a tension between myth and history in 
this passage, (p. 194) 


‘Either ... or’: I have underlined these words. A question, then: is it possible, will it ever be possible, 

for us to keep the name democracy beyond this alternative, in excluding it both from history as the 
history of autochthony or eugenics and from myth? In order to confide it to or open it to another 
memory, another immemoriality, another history, another future? 


5 On Absolute Hostility: The Cause of Philosophy and the Spectre of 
the Political 


1. Die endliche und die unendliche Analyse, 1937, GW, Bd XVI [trans., Analysis Terminable and 
Interminable, Standard Edition 23, p. 246]. 

2. CP, p. 63; p. 63 [The English translation has omitted the quotation marks. | 

3. For example, ibid., p. 64; p. 65. 

4. Ibid. [Translation modified. ] 

5. Ibid., p. 64; p. 65. 

6. 472e. 

7. See above, pp. 90-91. This would suffice to justify circumspection in having recourse to this 
opposition, and especially to the single word stasis. But there is more. Recalling that ‘Plato shares 
with all his contemporaries’ the ‘logic’ of the opposition of complementarity between pdlemos and 
stasis, Nicole Loraux adds, by way of drawing interesting consequences, the following point: ‘But 
the insistence on emphasizing that, in the case of civil war, stasis is a name is especially Platonic. 
Only a name: a simple appellation, indeed, as a passage from Laws suggests, an inaccurate 
appellation. Defining “the worst scourge for a city”, the Athenian-nomothete is at great pains to 
contest the pertinence of the standard appellation of civil war, “whose right name would indeed be 
rather diastasis than stdsis.”’ “Cratyle a l’épreuve de Stasis’, in Revue de philosophie ancienne, no. |, 
1987, pp. 56-7. 

8. 473a. 

9. For Benjamin, spectral (gespenstische) is the force of law in the figure of the police, such that it 
can assure politics and protect the State in ‘the life of civilized States’. We have analysed the 
implications of this passage of Benjamin’s ‘For a critique of violence’ in Force de loi (Galilée 1994) 
[‘Force of Law: The “Mystical Foundation of Authority” ’, in Deconstruction and the Possibility of 
Justice, ed. Drucilla Cornell, Michel Rosenfeld and David Gray Carlson, Routledge, New York and 
London 1992]. 

10. Whether by polemical strategy or not, whether or not he was sincere (that is the whole 
question), Schmitt did not fail, here or there, to present such and such of his incriminated political 
discourses as acts of knowledge, as the neutral diagnostics of an analysis, not as Nazi or anti-Semitic 
interventions or position-takings This was the case, in exemplary fashion, in the course of his 
interrogation by Professor Robert Kempner, a German immigrant and American prosecutor at 
Nuremberg after the war. Asked if he had intended to contribute to the ‘institution’ of a new 
international order of right in conformity with the ideas of Hitler, Schmitt answered that he did not do 
this in conformity with Hitler’s ideas, and that he was not searching to institute [instituer], only to 
diagnose. This did not prevent him from presenting himself elsewhere as an adventurer of 
intelligence who had always assumed the risks of his actions and never sought to avoid paying their 
price. The same ruse — the same answer, in any case — before a sentence refusing ‘Jewish authors’ 
responsibility not only in the development of the theory of space (Raum) but in ‘the creation of 
anything at all’. ‘Do you deny’, Kempner then inquires, ‘that this passage is in the purest Goebbels 
style?’ Schmitt denies it, of course, in its form and content. He requests that the ‘serious scientific 
context’ of the passage be taken into consideration: ‘in its intent, method, and formulation, it is a pure 
diagnosis.... Everything I stated, in particular in this passage, was intended as scholarship, as a 
scholarly thesis I would defend before any scholarly body in the world’ (pp. 98—100 of the English 
translation of this interrogation, presented by Joseph W. Bendersky: ‘Schmitt at Nuremberg’, in 
Telos, New York, special issue, ‘Carl Schmitt: Enemy or Foe?’ no. 72, Summer 1987). 

11. CP, pp. 30-32; ibid. 

12. See above, pp. 108-9, n. 13. 

13. CP, p. 25, p. 24. 

14. Ibid., p. 32; p. 32. 

15. A long note gives numerous historical details on this point: pp. 44-7 (the English translation 
has excised them). For example, this phrase of the Comité de salut public (10 October 1793), quoted 
in E. Friesenhahn, Le Serment politique (The Political Oath): ‘Since the day the French people 


manifested its will, everything opposed to it is outside the sovereign; everything outside the 
sovereign is an enemy.... Between the people and its enemies there is nothing left in common but the 
sword.’ 

16. CP, p. 33; p. 32 [translation modified]. 

17. An attentive reading of ‘Thoughts for the Times...’ in this context would undoubtedly be 
necessary. To my knowledge, Schmitt never showed much interest (no more than Heidegger in any 
case, and this fact is by no means without import) in someone he could have classed, according to his 
own criteria, among the authentic thinkers of the political — that is, those beginning with a pessimistic 
vision of mankind. Man is not originarily good — according to Schmitt, this is the fundamental thesis 
of a theory of the political. It is also the resigned thesis of ‘Thoughts for the Times on War and 
Death’, which, in addition, on the subject of the essential violence of the State, piles up statements of 
a Schmittian or Benjaminian sort. Freud indeed insists on the fact that if the State forbids the 
individual from having recourse to injustice, it is not in order to suppress injustice but to maintain a 
monopoly on it. Concerning the ‘optimistic’ answer to the question of man (‘man is born noble and 
good’), Freud declares it ‘of no value’: ‘we do not have to concern ourselves with it here’. The 
interdict ‘thou shalt not kill’ confirms that we descend from a generation of murderers. Not to speak 
of the law of ambivalence inscribing hatred in the very mourning of our friends, and of a love which 
is as old as the drive to murder. The epitaph and the funeral oration are a theme of Chapter 2. To this 
fundamental violence, Freud never proposes (nor does Schmitt, for that matter) anything but 
compensations in the name of a life which, however, does not know death, and does not have to deal 
with it as such (we shall clarify this paradoxical point concerning Schmitt). The si vis vitam, para 
mortem that Freud proposes as a substitute for the si vis pacem para bellum at the end of ‘Thoughts 
for the Times’ only confirms this fundamental political pessimism. That could be verified on every 
page of Group Psychology and the Analysis of the Ego, and is illustrated by the Schopenhauerian 
fable that Freud enjoys quoting in this context: some porcupines give up cuddling each other to ward 
off the cold: their quills hurt them. Obliged one cold winter day to huddle together, they end up, 
finding a mean distance between attraction and repulsion. 

18. Proximity to Heidegger. Does the being-for-death of Dasein include, in the structure of its 
essence, war and combat (Kampf) or not? We have taken up this point in ‘L’oreille de Heidegger’ 
[‘Heidegger’s Ear, Philopolemology (Geschlecht IV),’ in John Sallis (ed.) Reading Heidegger, trans. 
John P. Leavey, Jr, Bloomington: Indiana University Press 1991]. Among the many themes of the 
chiasmus through which the Heideggerian and Schmittian discourse intersect in a distancing and an 
opposition, there is not only the theme of technics (which, according to both thinkers, seems only to 
depoliticize or neutralize — and this only within certain limits, limits we are approaching in this 
century which we, however, believe to be delivered over to technics), there is also the theme of death. 
But here divergence prevails. This may seem paradoxical, but the real possibility of putting-to-death 
(execution), which is an irreducible condition of the political, and indeed the ontological structure of 
human existence, means for Schmitt neither an ontology of death or of dying nor a serious 
consideration of a nothingness (néant) or of a Niditigkeit; nor, in another code, the position of a death 
principle or instinct. Execution indeed proceeds from an oppositional negativity, but one which 
belongs to life through and through, in so far as life opposes itself in affirming itself: Not to life 
against death, but to life against life, to spirit against spirit, as The Concept of the Political concludes, 
here again, in Hegelian and anti-Hegelian expressions (Hegel would not have affirmed as easily as 
Schmitt that spirit, or life as the life of the spirit, does not confront death itself). This affirmation of 
life (in the war of life against life) culminates precisely in a condemnation of modern technologism 
which would strive to neutralize the political (and the politicity of technics) by relying on the 
antithesis mechanical/organic qua the antithesis the dead/the living: ‘A life confronted with nothing 
more than death is no longer life; it is pure impotence and distress.’ Life can only love life, even 
when it is opposed to itself. One should therefore (Schmitt does not say so) ‘love’ one’s enemy, at 
least in so far as he is living. To be put to death, the enemy must precisely be a living being. ‘The 


° 


person knowing no other enemy than death, and who sees in this enemy but an unhinged mechanism, 
is closer to death than to life, and the facile antithesis that opposes the organic to the mechanical 
stems itself from a primitive mechanism (etwas Roh-Mechanisches)’ (p. 95). We shall come across 
the logic of this evaluation of the ‘technicized earth’ and economic planning once again, in Ex 
Captivitate Salus (Greven Verlag, Cologne 1950), with a pathos more marked by history, and a stress 
that is not so far from that of Heidegger. 

19. But what would a purely collective or communal affect be without the least individual or 
‘private’ dimension, a purely public affect? Yet it is essential to Schmitt to have this undiscoverable 
limit. He is hopelessly seeking the signs of such an affect everywhere — linguistic clues, testimonies 
that would at least come to mark the desire or the need of this impossible distinction. This is why he 
would undoubtedly judge our indistinct usage illegitimate and lacking in rigour (but who does not 
use them in this way? And why, fundamentally, are they thus used? What is the shared root, the 
analogy, of such use?) of words such as philia, ‘friendship’, ‘love’, ‘enmity’, ‘hostility’, and so forth, 
as long as we do not specify if it is a matter of feeling or not, of a universal or political feeling (that 
is, from one community to the other), of private or public feeling, one being heterogeneous to the 
other. Philein or amare, for example, would not mean ‘to love’ in the Christian sense of love of one’s 
neighbour. A footnote to the 1963 edition of The Concept of the Political (p. 118) recalls that in the 
New Testament, enemy in Latin is inimicus, not hostis; to love is diligere, not amare; in Greek, 
agapan, not phileia. The concept of hatred, as a feeling, would have not juridical or political 
meaning, and the concept of enemy (juridical or political: hostis) in no way implies hatred. Alvaro 
d’Ars: ‘hate is no term of law’ [in English]. Spinoza, in the Theological-Political Treatise: ‘hostem 
enim imperii non odium sed jus fecit’ (ch. XVI). 

20. CP, p. 33; p. 33. Derrick’s emphasis [translation modified]. 

21. CP, p. 67; p. 68. 

22. CP, pp. 34-5; p. 34. [The English translation has been modified (including, above all, the 
restitution of the stress on ‘presupposition’, absent in translation) to follow Derrida’s modifications 
of the French translation of the German original.] 

23. CP, p. 35; pp. 34-5. 

24. CP, p. 35; p. 35. 

25. We are evidently thinking here of another delimitation and of another beyond-the-political in its 
traditional form, of another ‘withdrawal of the political’. I refer the reader to the rewarding volume 
with this tide (Le Retrait du politique, Galilée 1983) which, after Rejouer le politique (Galilée 1981), 
brought together remarkable papers given at the Centre for Philosophical Research on the Political at 
the Ecole normale supérieure, under the direction of Ph. Lacoue-Labarthe and J.L. Nancy. If my 
memory serves me well, there is no mention of Schmitt, nor of his concept of depoliticization, in 
these papers. My work here would be, as a sign of gratitude, a modest and belated contribution to 
work that was important for my own. 

26. CP, p. 35. 

27. Ibid. 

28. Ibid. 

29. Ibid., pp. 36-7. 


6 Oath, Conjuration, Fraternization or the ‘Armed’ Question 


1. ‘Nach deutschem Spradisinn (wie in vielen anderen Sprachen) ist “Freund” ursprtinglidi nur 
der Sippengnosse. Freund ist also urspriinglich nur der Blutsfreund, der Blutsverwandte, oder der 
durch Heirat, Schwurbriderschaft, Annahme an Kindes Statt oder durch  entsprechende 


Einrichtungen “verwandt Gemachte’”’ (The Concept of the Political, Corollary II, p. 104 of the 
German edition). 

2. ‘Umeis ara ei philoei eston allélois, phusei pé oikeioi esth’umin autois’ (Lysis, 221e). 

ae CP, p29. 

4. Ibid., pp. 74-5. 

5. Ibid., pp. 62-3. [Hegel’s definition of the enemy, which Schwab has not included in his 
translation of this section of CP, is from the System of Ethical Life, trans. H.S. Harris and T.M. Knox, 
Albany, State University of New York Press 1979, p. 147.] 

6. Ibid., p. 63 (Derrida’s emphasis). 

7. Theorie des Partisanen, Zwischienbemerkung zum Begriff des Politischen, Duncker & 
Humblot, Berlin 1963. p. 25 [henceforth abbreviated TP. Page references are to the German edition, 
and all English translations of this work are my own — Trans. ] 

8. TP, pp. 25-6. 

9. (‘Tellurischer fundiert als die Lenins.’) Ibid., p. 61. 

10. Ibid., pp. 29, 41. 

11. (‘die diinne Briicke tiber einem Abgrund.’) Ibid., p. 37. 

12. ‘aus ihrem Bewusstsein verdrdngt.’ Ibid., p. 41. 

13. TP, p. 46. 

14. Ibid. 

15. ‘Begriffsauflosung’. Tbid., p. 25. 

16. ‘eine umstiirzende Wendung.’ Ibid., p. 53. 

17. TP, p. 49. 

18. Ibid., p. 52. Thanks to the spectral ‘evocation’ (Beschworung) of the partisan. 

19. Ibid., p. 56. 

20. Ibid. 

21. Ibid., p. 57. 

22. Ibid., p. 65. 

23. (‘Bruderkampf.’) Tbid., p. 59. 

24. (‘gegen den eigenen, nationalen Bruder.’) Ibid., p. 63. 

25. On this question, that of surrogate mothers — in sum, well before the surrogate mother — on its 
‘classical and modern’ stakes, on the ineradicable phantasm of an identifiable mother on the basis of 
the testimony of the perceptible (the identity of the father, a ‘legal fiction’ as it is called in Joyce’s 
Ulysses, remaining inferred in a judgement), on the phallogocentric blindness of Freud, among 
others, who sees, in the Rat Man, patriarchy as the condition of progress in human reason and 
culture, I would like to refer the reader to my essay: Le concept d’archive, une impression freudienne, 
Galilée 1996. 

26. The tradition that Schmitt refers to, that of the oath of fraternity or the sworn brother, is no 
doubt not foreign to the rich strands of the tradition found in the Icelandic sagas. ‘Fdstbrodir’ means 
foster brother or sworn brother. The Saga of the Sworn Brother and that of Gisli Sursson describe a 
friendship formed in rituals and sacred liturgies. The concept of sworn brother has wide application. 
It also determines adoptive fraternity between so-called natural or legitimate brothers and brothers 
welcomed into the same family, following the usage of fostri (no doubt of Celtic origin), often 
intended to increase clan power or to save an inheritance. See La Saga des fréres jurés or La Saga de 
Gisli Sursson, in Sagas islandaises, texts translated, introduced and annotated by Régis Boyer, 
Gallimard, ‘Bibliothéque de la Pléiade’, 1987. 

27. On this point see De l’esprit, Heidegger et la question, Galilée 1987, pp. 147 ff. [Of Spirit. 
Heidegger and the Question, trans. Geoffrey Bennington and Rachel Bowlby, University of Chicago 
Press, Chicago and London 1989, pp. 129-36.] 

28. CP, pp. 14-15. [The preface to the 1963 edition of CP has not been translated. I have done so 
from the French — Trans. ] 


29. Lysis, 220ce. 

30. Ibid., 222a. 

31. I hope I have not stretched too far the limits of the semantic field generally ascribed to 
oikeiotés. I refer the reader here, as I should do more often, to Jean-Claude Fraisse’s fine study, 
Philia, La notion d’amitié dans la philsophie antique (Vrin 1984). In the chapter devoted to an 
analysis of Lysis, to its place in the Platonic corpus and to the idea of oikeiités, the analysis provides 
an enlightening definition, but one which I would like to expand slightly, while suspending the values 
of ‘personality’ and ‘interiority’, which are perhaps difficult to fit into this Greek context. The 
definition is as follows: ‘in a lather rich ambiguity, the adjective oikeios connotes, in Plato as in 
common language, that which is one’s own, personal, even intimate and interior, as well as that 
which is close, from the parent or the friend to the compatriot. It thus takes on all the original 
signification of the term philas, while undoubtedly stressing more than that word the relation to 
personality and to interiority. Plato will play on this ambiguity to designate the good as our oikeion, 
to the extent to which it is always simultaneously exterior and intimately present for us....’ And a 
quotation from the Symposium (205e) confirms this result, yet introduces — Fraisse makes no note of 
it — a distinction, perhaps a veritable disjunction generating desire, between what belongs, as one’s 
own, and the good, designated as oikeion: ‘Love longs for neither the half nor the whole of anything 
except the good.... Indeed, I think we prize our own belongings only in so far as we say that the good 
[is our own] (oikeion), belongs to us, and the bad belongs to someone else (allotrion)’ (pp. 143-4). 

Is it not this last difference, as important as that which disjoins the what is one’s own and 
distinguishes it from the homogeneous (oikeion/homoion), a difference stressed in the last page of 
Lysis? 

32. Hamlet oder Hekuba. Der Einbruch der Zeit in das Spiel, Stuttgart, Klett Verlage 1985. We will 
attempt elsewhere to take up this essay in its own right. It conducts a dialogue in passing with 
Benjamin (Schmitt recalls Benjamin’s debt to his own definition of the sovereign decision, which the 
latter acknowledged in a letter of 1930). Beyond ancient tragedy and the Atreides, through the 
themes of vengeance, of the brother and of election, this essay also questions the political destiny of 
the ‘European spirit’. If the latter has been ‘demythologized’ since the Renaissance, how is it that 
Hamlet (or the process of a ‘Hamletization of the avenger’) has become a myth? Among the three 
major works of European literature, among the three symbolic figures that have marked a reversal — 
indeed, a deranging and derailing of the spirit, a madness of the spirit that becomes out of joint or is 
derailed (‘Alle drei sind vom Geist aus der Bahn geworfen’): Don Quixote, ‘Spanish and purely 
Catholic’; Faust, “German and Protestant’; finally Hamlet, occupying the middle position between 
the two (the German and the Spaniard, let us remember, the two Resistance fighters, the two 
inventors of the war of partisans against the State, the Napoleonic army and its ‘humanitarian 
ideology’), Hamlet would connote this between-the-two, the fission or the division of this milieu, this 
Spaltung which has ‘determined the destiny of Europe’ (Hamlet steht zwischen beiden mitten in der 
Spaltung, die das Schicksal Europas bestimmt hat’, p. 54). 

But — a well-known theme (see Heidegger) — this between-the-two as a rending is also a name for 
Germany. Recalling that in Hamlet has been recognized the figure of ‘the German people’, a people 
‘torn and divided within itself, Schmitt quotes several times from the poem ‘Hamlet’, written shortly 
before the liberal revolution of 1848 by Ferdinand Freiligrath. The poem begins: ‘Deutschland ist 
Hamilet!’. 

33. Since he calls upon the Republic when he needs to explain his concept of podlemos, Schmitt 
might have remembered that Plato, in precisely these same passages, has a word to say for women in 
war. He tries his best, a little, in his own way, to do right by them, whether they fight on the front or 
remain behind to frighten the enemy. Having noted that the warriors would be all the more successful 
in war for knowing each other ‘by the names of brothers, fathers, sons’, Plato adds: ‘And if the 
females should also join in their campaigns, whether in the ranks or marshalled behind to intimidate 


the enemy, or as reserves in case of need, I recognize’ that all this would make them irresistible.’ 
Republic, V, 471d. 

34. ‘Weimsheit der Zelle’, in Ex Captivitate Salus, Erfahrungen der Zeit 1945/47, pp. 80-87. 

35. ‘According to a remark by a commentator in the immediate post-war period, Schmitt “could be 
neither nazified nor denazified” (‘Der Fall Carl Schmitt: Charaktermord’, Der Fortschritt, 4, 25 
January, 1952’, J.-W. Bendersky, ‘Carl Schmitt at Nuremberg’, Telos 72, Summer 1987, p. 96. 

36. This is the central and organizing affirmation of his Political Theology, 1922, 1969. As for 
these problems, particularly the way they are posed in Schmitt, I refer the reader to a remarkable 
article by Jean-Francois Courtine, ‘A propos du “probléme théologjco-politique” ’, in Droits, Revue 
francaise de théorie juridique, 18, 1993, pp. 109-18. 

37. ‘Und wer kann mich wirklich in Frage stellen? Nur ich mich selbst. Oder mein Bruder. Das ist 
es. Der Andere ist mein Bruder. Der Andere erweist sich als mein Bruder, und der Bruder erweist 
sich als mein Feind’, Ex Captivitate Salus, p. 89. 

38. On this theme (‘All men are brothers’ or ‘All human beings are siblings’) see Marc Shell’s rich 
and recent Children of the Earth, Literature, Politics and Nationhood, Oxford 1993. 

39. Heraclitus, fragment 53. We shall take up the Heideggerian reading of this fragment later. We 
shall mention a letter that Heidegger, still rector, sent in August 1933 to Schmitt, who had just sent 
him the second edition of The Concept of the Political and had no doubt, in the dedication or in an 
accompanying letter, quoted this fragment of Heraclitus. 

40. Sang an Palenno. In August 1946, Schmitt dedicated a text to ‘two Berlin graves’, Kleist’s and 
Daubler’s. This and the following verse (‘Und er wird uns, wir ihn zum selben Ende hetzen’) form 
the epigraph of a recently published book on which I regret that I am not able to comment: Heinrich 
Meier, Die Lehre Carl Schmitts, Metzler, Stuttgart/Weimar 1994. 

41. On Antigone, Hegel, and Greek, Jewish, or Christian families, on the speculative thought of the 
Holy Family, I refer the reader to Glas [trans. John P. Leavey, Jr and Richard Rand, University of 
Nebraska Press 1986 (1974)]. 


7 He Who Accompanies Me 


1. ‘For it is love, the thing that gives us our word for friendship...’; ‘from this a flame bursts 
forth, whether of love or of friendship’, Laelius de Amicitia, VII, 26; XX VII, 100. 

2. Slaves by Choice, [trans. Malcolm Smith, Egham: Runnymede Books, 1988], p. 48. 

3.Chapter 2 and passim. 

4. We are quoting — as we often do, but here without modifications — M.L. Steinhauser’s 
translation of Schmitt’s preface [hitherto untranslated in English], in La notion du politique, Théorie 
du partisan, Flammarion, ‘Champs’, p. 41. It is not without interest that Schmitt cites, in the original 
German (1542), the chronicle (Cillierchronik) of a noble Slovene family. Schmitt quotes from a book 
by Otto Brunner published in 1939: ‘Aristoteles spridit, das etlich weis sprechen und rnainen, und 
spricht es mitsambt in, das freundtschaft und krieg ursach sindt der Stiftung und Stoérung.’ 

5. ‘Mia psukhé duo somasin enoikousa.’ In the Eudemian Ethics (VII, 1240b 2-15) there are 
formulas whose letter is the closest to this reported statement. But here, already, Aristotle reports 
something said, not without manifesting a certain reserve: ‘Further, we say about friendship such 
things as that friendship is equality (os isites phildtés), and true friends have but a single soul (mian 
psukhen). All such phrases point back to the single individual; for a man wishes good to himself in 
this fashion.... And wishing the existence above all of the friend, living with him, sharing his joy and 
his grief unity of soul with the friend, the impossibility of even living without one another, and the 
dying together are characteristic of a single individual. (For such is the condition of the individual 
and he perhaps takes pleasure in his own company (isds omilei autyos auto.) ... And for this reason it 


seems possible for a man to be at enmity with himself, but so far as he is single and indivisible, he is 
an object of desire to himself. Such is the good man, the man whose friendship is based on 
excellence, for the wicked man is not one but many...’ (emphasis added.) 

6. From the beginning of the essay ‘On Friendship’, Montaigne evokes the authority of the 
‘Ancient schools’ to justify not only the inadequation of the marriage model to the model of perfect 
friendship but the incapacity of the female sex even to approach it. And it is certainly not 
insignificant for what is of import to us at this exact point, that the justification is couched in the 
logic of the gift, the market or commerce. Marriage is a free market (‘a market to which only the 
entrance is free’ — which is counted as a liability — free, that is, contractual and reversible by 
definition), and a market above all, not having its signification, its end and its form in itself. It is a 
market without immanence, without autonomy and without the disinterestedness that fit friendship: 
while the ‘market’ of marriage is normally made ‘for other purposes’, ‘in friendship there is no traffic 
or commerce except with itself. In this, friendship is freer than the ‘market’ whose ‘entrance is free’ 
(‘Our “willing freedom” produces nothing more properly its own than affection and loving 
friendship’: p. 208). Furthermore, the fault lies less with marriage than in woman, in her sex: 


In addition, women are in truth not normally capable of responding to such familiarity and mutual 
confidence as sustain that holy bond [saincte couture]|* of friendship, nor do their souls seem firm 
enough to withstand the clasp of a knot so lasting and so tightly drawn. And indeed if it were not 
for that, if it were possible to fashion such a relationship, willing and free, in which not only the 
soul had this full enjoyment but in which the bodies too shared in the union — where the whole 
human being was involved — it is certain that the loving-friendship would be more full and more 
abundant. But there is no example yet of woman attaining to it, and by the common agreement of 
the Ancient schools of philosophy she is excluded from it. (p. 210) 


When he sends La Boétie’s sonnets to Madame de Grammont, Montaigne is intent on warning her 
about certain verses, those that ‘were written in favour of his future wife in that time when he was 
preparing his marriage, and which already smack of God knows what marital coldness’. 

7. p. 208. Here again the Ciceronian theme, always working through presence and proximity 
(propinquitas). The law is that which is close. Although Cicero maintains that social bonds grow 
stronger to the extent that men are close to one another (ut quisque proxime accedere), that men 
naturally prefer their fellow citizens to foreigners (peregrini), their relatives to others (propinqui 
quam alieni), if he is intent on recalling that it is ‘nature’ itself that ‘brings about’ a friendship 
between relatives, Cicero specifies that this familial friendship can come to lack a sufficiently firm 
and stable base (firmitatis). Friendship is not always sufficiently durable and steadfast — ‘bébaios’, as 
it would have been expressed in the Greek tradition. Hence the advantage of friendship over a 
propinquitas (the proximity of the close and familial alliance), which may sometimes lose this good 
feeling, this favourable disposition (benevolentia), this wanting-the-good which is never absent from 
friendship. This benevolentia associated by Cicero with caritas is the best gift of the gods but, in 
general, unites ‘no more than a handful of individuals’ (V, 19, 20). We are slowly approaching that 
arithmetic concealed in the enigma of ‘O my friends...’. 

The conclusion of De Amicitia firmly ties the bond of friendship to virtue as that which correctly 
assures the firm basis of the bond. That which in friendship is ‘bébaios’, following this Greek lead, is 
what binds it to virtue. And it is recalled precisely through an address to friends: ‘Virtus, virtus 
inquam, | tell you — you, Gaius Fannius and you, Quin tus Mucius: it is virtue, yes, virtue, that 
initiates and preserves friendship. For virtue assures harmony (convenentia rerum), stability, 
earnestness.’ The whole passage is dominated by a metaphorics of glint, light, and fire. The glint of 
virtue is reflected from one to the other, and the reflection creates participation. The light becomes 
fire, and ‘from this [reflection] a flame breaks forth, whether of love or of friendship (ex quo 
exardescit sive amor sive amicitia). Both terms, after all, are derived from the verb “to love” 


(Utrumque enim ductum est ab amando).’ After this Cicero distinguishes love from friendship: if to 
love, the act of loving, in both friendship and love, is always disinterested, advantage in fact does 
grow out of friendship, even if it is not sought (XXVII, 100). 

8. This is yet another Ciceronian topos, a quasi-quotation from Laelius de Amicitia (‘I have been 
bereaved of a friend such as the world will never see again — at least, so it seems to me. One thing I 
am sure of is there was never such a one before.... How beloved he was of his fellow citizens was 
made clear by the mourning at his funeral.... For I cannot agree with those who in the last few years 
have begun to ... say that the soul dies with the body and that death is the end of all things. I am 
more inclined to accept the point of view expressed by men of earlier days — by our own ancestors, 
for example, who so scrupulously observed the honours due to the dead’; and after a eulogy of 
Greater Greece and its institutions, after recalling shared political and personal cares, the hope that 
‘for all time to come men will remember my friendship with Scipio’: ‘in all the course of history men 
can name scarcely three or four pairs of friends (paria amicorum)’ (11—15). To the couple Laelius 
and Scipio must be added the other masculine couples cited here or elsewhere by Cicero: Orestes and 
Pylades, Theseus and Pirithotis, Damon and Phthias. 

9. Cited in the entry ‘Fraternity’ in the Dictionnaire critique de la Revolution frangaise by 
Francois Furet and M. Ozouf, Paris: Flammarion 1988, ch. IV. Reissued in the collection ‘Champs’ 
1992, p. 210. 

10. p. 207. Jean-Claude Fraisse provides an excellent clarification of this point of Aristotelian 
discourse. On the subject of ‘ideas of reciprocity and equality’ guiding justice, Fraisse points out, in 
effect: ‘This is all identical to what friendship realizes. Yet the paths are not the same: while bringing 
about friendship among citizens seems to be the lawgiver’s ideal,* the existence of frienship makes 
the existence of justice and legislation useless. While justice proceeds by constraint ... friendship ... 
is linked to virtue alone.... Thus do we see Aristotle being careful to avoid the slightest corruption of 
friendship by law.’ 

11. Emphasis added. In the wily reasoning of this page, which we are unable to follow here as 
meticulously as we should, the parenthesis seems to imply that if Montaigne gives his approval to 
unconditional obedience in certain cases, it must remain informed by reason and by virtue, without 
which there is no perfect friendship. Virtue and reason are not empirical conditions but appertain to 
the structure of sovereign and unconditional friendship. In the same move, the unconditionally cannot 
be blind. Faithful obedience is trusting, and trust is enlightened a priori by reason as well as by virtue 
which, in each of the two friends, were, from the beginning, indissociable from what binds their two 
wills together in the same ‘harness’. As a consequence, the position taken by Montaigne appears less 
opposed to Cicero’s than it would at first seem. Concerning the same example — Montaigne has then 
borrowed it from him once again — Cicero manifests an unequivocal hostility towards Caius Blosius: 


Wrongdoing, then, is not excused if it is committed for the sake of a friend; after all, the thing that 
brings friends together is their conviction of each other’s virtue; it is hard to keep up a friendship if 
one has deserted virtue’s camp Let us, then, lay down this law for friendship: we must not ask 
wrongful things, nor do them, if we are asked to. For if a man should declare that he has done a 
thing of this kind for a friend’s sake, the excuse does him no honour and is absolutely unacceptable 
even in ordinary affairs, and especially so if the act was treasonable (contra rem publicam) 
(Laelius de Amicitia, XI, XII). 


12. Ibid., V, 18. 

13. Ibid., VIII, 26. 

14. The Confessions [trans. P.S. Pine-Coffin, Penguin Books, 1961], pp. 77, 78-80. 

15. Retractations, II, V1, 2 [as quoted by the editors of the French edition of the Confessions — my 
translation — Trans. ] 


16. Confessions, TV IX, 14, p. 79. [Pine-Coffin’s translation is too telegraphic at this point: ‘... if 
we do not return love for love’ gives short shrift to Augustine’s Latin, which Derrida has respected 
more closely: ‘if he does not love his beloved, redoubled in love (si non amaverit redamentem) or if 
he is not redoubled in love for his beloved (aut si amantem non redamaverif)’ — Trans. ] 

17. Confessions, IV, X, 15, p. 80. 

18. ‘Beatus qui amat te et amicum in te et inimicum propter te’: ibid., TV, IX, 14, p. 79. 


8 Recoils 


1. Thus there is, to my knowledge, unanimity among the ‘canonical’ citations, the most famous or 
the most popular among them, even if the situation is more complex for the existing translations in 
use. Clues will have to suffice for our argument, since one translation has prevailed, not the other. 
This certainly does not justify the failing? of the investigation. I have not checked all the existing 
translations in the world. The version I am calling the canonical one also justifies itself through 
recourse to existing translations. Here are a few: 

In French: ‘O mes amis, il n’y a pas d’ami (véritable)’. Diogéne Laérce, Vie, Doctrines et 
Sentences des philosophes illustres, traductions, notice et notes par R. Genaielle, Garnier— 
Flammarion, 1965, t. 1, p. 236. 

In German: ‘O Freunde, nirgends ein Freund!’ Des Diogenes Laertius Philosophische Geschichte 
Oder Von dem Leben, den Meinungen und merkwiirdigen Reden der Beriihmtesten Philosophen 
Griechenlands aus dem Griechischen das erstemal ins Deutsche tibersetzt, Leipzig, im 
Schwickertschen Verlage, 1806. 

In Spanish: ‘Oh amigos! no hay ningun amigo’, Diogenes Learcio, Vidas de los mas ilustres 
filosofos griegos, Orbis, Barcelone, 1985, Traduccion del griego, prélogo y notas, José Ortiz y Sainz, 
vol. 1, p. 189. 

Unlike the translations we will soon be quoting, which construct the sentence differently, these 
three translations share the fact that they do not give the Greek text on the facing page. One therefore 
cannot know how, in the view of the translator, the 6méga is to be accentuated. 

2. Eudemian Ethics, 1240b 5-10. 

3. Laelius de Amicitia, XXI, 80 (‘for the true friend is, so to speak, a second self). We shall meet 
this topos again between Michelet and Quinet. 

4. ‘Ou ton tripon, eipein, alla ton anthropon éléésa’, V, 17, 4-5. 

5. Lives of the Eminent Philosophers, V, 21, 3-4: ‘ou t6 anihripo, phésin, édoka, alla to 
anthropino’. 

6. Nicomachean Ethics, 1159b 25-30. 

7. 1235b 12: ‘Kai tas aporias lusei kai tas enantiiseis’ . 

8. I take the liberty of referring the reader to Glas, pp. 133-4 and passim. 

9. T6 arkhonti phusei kai theé pros to arkhomenon’, 1242b 20. 

10. Here again I must remind the reader that this is not an exhaustive investigation. These factual 
limits will never be justifiable, but my aim has been in the first place to set up the bearings for the 
possibility and stakes of an alternative reading — this is what I am doing here; I am not dealing with 
the worldwide philological state of the question. Here I should thank the men and women friends 
who have helped me along these international paths, through the several languages, libraries or 
bibliographies to which I refer, be they Latin, Italian, Spanish, English, or German: Giorgio 
Agamben, Maurizio Ferraris, Cristina de Peretti, Aileen Philips, Elisabeth Weber. 

11. Diogenes Laertius, Lives of Eminent Philosophers, with an English translation by R.D. Hicks, 
vol. 1. The Loeb Classical Library, Harvard University Press, Cambridge, MA and London 1925-91, 
pp. 464-5. 


12. Diogene Laerzio, Vite dei filosofi, c. di Marcello Gigante, ed. Laterza, Roma-Bari 1962, p. 204. 

13. Diogenes Laertius, Leben und Meinungen ..., t. 2, Von Otto Apelt, unter Mitarbeit von H.G. 
Zekl, Hamburg 1967 (second edition). 

14. Diogenis Laerti, De darorum philosophorum vitis, dogmatibus et apophtegmatibus. Libri 
decern ex italids codidbus nunc primus excussis recensuit, C. Gabr. Cobet ... Parisis, Ed. Ambrosia 
Firmin Didot ... MDCCCV. 

15. Fraisse, Philid, p. 238. 

16. Without jumping the gun, without neglecting a leap which resembles an infinite leap, let us 
nevertheless take note of the numerous analogies which regularly align Christian friendship or 
fraternity with the Aristotelian, even Ciceronian, tradition. The rule of religious orders in retreat, 
starting from a certain date, includes a recommendation of scarcity for monks: ‘Those wishing to live 
as monks in a hermitage are allowed to be as many as three, four maximum’, we read in the 
Opuscules of Saint Francis of Assisi (cited in La Régle des fréres mineurs, Editions franciscaines, 
Paris 1961, p. 58). 

17. On particular present-day aspects around this ‘performative contradiction’, I must refer the 
reader to Mémoires-pour Paul de Man, ch. III. 

18. On this point we must refer the reader to ‘Signature Event Context’ in Margins of Philosophy 
[trans. Alan Bass, University of Chicago Press 1982] and to Limited Inc. [trans. Samuel Weber, 2nd 
edn, Evanston, II: Northwestern University Press 1990]. 

19. ‘Aristotle on Friendship’, the appendix to La Prudence chez Aristotle, PUF, 1963, p. 180. This 
five-page essay forcefully establishes a series of conflicts or contradictions that concern not only 
‘friendships that are imperfect, or grounded in some misunderstanding’ but ‘the very essence of 
friendship’ (ibid., Aubenque’s emphasis). 

20. ‘Aition d’oti €min men to eu kath’éteron, ekeino de autos autou to eu estin.’ Eudemian Ethics, 
VII, 12, 1245b 14-19, quoted and translated by Aubenque, p. 183. 


9 ‘In human language, fraternity...’ 


1. [Trans. C. Cocks, London: Longman, Brown, Green & Longmans, 1846], pp. 45-52; emphasis 
added. 

2. Trans. John P. McKay, Urbana, Chicago, London: University of Illinois Press 1973, p. 191; 
emphasis added. 

3. Michelet, Le Peuple, introduction and notes P. Viallaneix, Paris: Flammarion 1984, p. 57. 
Emphasis added. As a footnote points out: ‘the friendship between the two men ... never lapsed’. 
Initiated by Victor Cousin into the philosophy of history, one translating Vico and the other Herder, 
simultaneously, together at ‘the College de France in 1842, united in the struggle against the priest- 
party, they mutually dedicate the two works I have just cited. And do not hesitate, if one is to judge 
by the choice of words, to talk to one another like a Montaigne and a La Boétie, who would have 
grown old together at the Collége de France. 

4. 1856, Book V, Chapter 6, ‘Does unity obtain?’, Vienna: Manz, p. 305. 

5. Here I allow a reference to ‘Before the law’ [trans. Avital Ronell, enlarged trans. Christine 
Roulston, in Derek Attridge (ed.) Acts of Literature, London: Roudedge 1992 (1985)]. 

6. See ‘Violence and Metaphysics’, in Writing and Difference [trans. Alan Bass, London and 
Chicago: University of Chicago Press/Roudedge & Kegan Paul 1978]. 

7. [‘tout autre est tout autre’: | have followed here David Wills’s translation, in Derrida, The Gift 
of Death, University of Chicago Press 1995, ch. 4, pp. 82-8. — Trans. ] 

8. Nicomachean Ethics, VIII, 9, 1159a 25-30. 


9. See ‘all’ outié alethiés outié pseudes’. On certain stakes of this proposition which are crucial 
today, see ‘How to Avoid Speaking: Denials’ [trans. Ken Frieden, in Sandford Budick and Wolfgang 
Iser, eds., Languages of the Unsayable: The Play of Negativity in Literature and Literary Theory, 
New York: Columbia University Press 1989], pp. 3-70. 

10. Quoted by Francois Furet and Mona Ozouf in the fine article devoted to this theme in their 
Dictionnaire critique de la Révolution francaise, pp. 199ff. We learn, among so many other things in 
this work, that Leroux “prefers to place fraternity in the middle of the motto, as the affective term 
linking freedom and equality’ (p. 212). For Louis Blane and Buchez, on the other hand, fraternity 
should appear first, at the origin or principle, as its divine origin dictates. 

The Christian roots of the motif explain at once the attraction and the repulsion of a ‘fraternity’, its 
to-and-fro movements throughout revolutionary and post-revolutionary history: 


For where else can we find a better justification for the ‘consanguinity established by nature 
among the inhabitants of the earth’; where else, then, a justification of fraternity, than in the 
Christian religion? ... This consciousness of a link between the Christian message and the 
Revolution was to find its full use in federative ceremonies, in dramaturgies of the abolition of 
differences: the priests celebrating them recall that, to create a perfect society, all particular 
interests must be snuffed out, as in the example of this invention of Christ, ‘gentle fraternity’... 
The Gospel itself intended — Fauchet’s federative oath stresses the point — ‘to spread over all the 
earth the sacred fire of universal fraternity’ ... the link between Christianity and Revolution ... 
explains the appearance, at the sides of freedom and equality, of fraternity, to achieve what was felt 
as another Trinity, (pp. 202-3) 


Analysing the phenomena of fraternization, recalling the ‘obsession of the [fraternal] oath’, the habit 
of greeting, from 1791, as ‘brothers and friends’, of signing ‘salvation and fraternity’, the same 
article rightly stresses the ‘infinite enlargement’ (p. 204) of fraternization, this potential of 
infinitization which is so important to us here and in which, above, we could identify a Christian 
logic only after acknowledging also, in the same move, with all its subsequent consequences, the 
deployment of a Greek memory. When have these two memories been more efficiently coupled, and 
come face to face, than in the ideal instant of what is called the French Revolution? 

11. Le Peuple, pp. 178, 181, 190, 190, 191. 

12. Preface to the 1866 edition, p. 247. 

13. Ibid., p. 210. 

14. Ibid., p. 305. Emphasis added. The following ‘scene’ should be read, really read: in a bed, 
between spouses who love each other. Nothing is missing: they are talking about a political ‘secret’, 
an ‘enemy of public welfare’, a wanted criminal, an enemy of law and justice. The husband hesitates 
to ‘betray law, justice’, to give ‘a victory to injustice’. The wife: ‘But you are saving your enemy.... 
Be great.... And be good to me. Make this beautiful sacrifice for me. It will make me feel young 
again.’ 

Yes. What was stated above is now confirmed: ‘Woman is always higher or lower than justice. 
Love, holiness, chivalry, magnanimity, honour; all of that she feels marvellously, but law she feels 
more slowly’ (p. 304). 

15. Giinther Neske, Pfullingen 1956. What is Philosophy was a lecture given in Cérisy-la-Salle, 
Normandy, in August 1955. [Trans. Jean T. Wilde and William Kluback, Albany, New York, NCUP.] 

16. ‘The philein to sophon, that already mentioned harmony with sophon, harmonia, thus became 
orexis [yearning], a striving for sophin. Sophon — the being in Being — is now especially sought. 
Because the loving is no longer an original harmony with sophon but is a particular striving towards 
sophon, the loving of sophon becomes “philosophia’. The striving is determined by Eros’ (English 
trans, p. 51]. 


17. We have broached this task in a still preliminary way in ‘Heidegger’s Ear, Philopolemology, 
Geschlecht IV [trans. John P. Leavey, Jr, in J. Sallis (ed.) Reading Heidegger, Indiana University 
Press 1991]. 

18. Being and Time, para 34 [trans. John Macquarrie and Edward Robinson, New York: Harper 
1962], p. 163. 

19. ‘Geschlecht: Sexual Difference, Ontological Difference.’ Research in Phenomenology, XIII, 
1983, 64-85. Also ‘Heidegger’s Hand (Geschlecht IT)’ [trans. John P. Leavey Jr in Deconstruction 
and Philosophy: The Texts of Jacques Derrida, Chicago University Press 1987]. 

20. See also Heidegger’s text under the same title in Er/duterungen zu Holderlins Dichtung, 
Klostermann, Frankfurt-am-Main 1951. Jean Launay translated it into French under the title 
‘Souvenir’, in Approche de Hoélderlin, Paris: Gallimard 1973. Having noted that ‘the unison of the 
same thoughts and hence coappurtenance are revealed as the substance and constancy of friendship’, 
Heidegger quotes the verse ‘But where are the friends? Bellarmin/with his comrades?’. Heidegger 
dwells at length on the unicity of this ‘true question’ (there is no other in the poem) which might well 
be addressed to friends — the only ones who speak, who speak to each other and are in agreement — 
rather than posed on the subject of friends (p. 163). One would have to follow up more thoroughly 
than is possible here the Heideggerian meditation on the singular One, the ‘More than one’ (‘More 
than one/Is reluctant to go to the source’) and the ‘Now it is that I am alone’, from the standpoint of 
which the poetic meaning of the question ‘But where are the friends?’ is announced: ‘We know them 
not. The other has already arrived home. He has begun now, at home, what can properly be called the 
way to the source’ (pp. 175-6). 

21. I shall take up this question in a forthcoming essay (Geschlecht IIT), and refer the reader to the 
remarkable works of David Farrell Krell, especially Intimations of Mortality, Pennsylvania State 
University Press, University Park and London 1986, pp. 163ff; and to ‘Passage a la soeur, Heidegger 
et Geschlecht’, in Le Passage des frontiéres, Galilée 1994, p. 459. 

22. See the 1943-44 course on Heraclitus, Gesamtausgabe, ed. Manfred S. Frings, 1979, Bnd 55, 
pp. 127ff. 

23. Génnen, Gewdhren. ‘In der phiusis waltet die Gunst, p. 132. We have stressed these heavily 
charged words ‘walten’ (reign, dominate, prevail) and ‘Gewalt’ (force, violence, power, etc.) in 
‘Heidegger’s Ear’ and in ‘Force of Law’. 

24. ‘Wirverstehen das philein als die Gunst und das Gonnen’ (p. 136). 

25. ‘In the Greek world, there is no psychology. Aristotle’s treatise Peri Psukhés has nothing to do 
with a “psychology”. In the accomplishment of metaphysics, metaphysics becomes “psychology” — 
that is, psychology and anthropology are the last word of metaphysics: psychology and technics go 
hand in hand.’ Ibid., p. 130. 

26. Schmitt, CP, p. 26. 

27. Ibid., pp. 27-8. 

28. Ibid., pp. 35-6; emphasis added. 

29. Ibid., pp. 49-50. 

30. Preface to CP, p. 17 of the German edition. This preface recalls the retrospective proposed in 
Nomos der Erde, 1950. 

31. Ibid., p. 18 of the German edition. 

32. ‘Uberwindung der Metaphysik’, in Vortrdge und Aufidtze, Neske 1954, pp. 88-9. The quoted 
section, later published in the Darmstadt Cahier Barlach, is from fragment XXVI of notebooks from 
1936 to 1946. [The English translation, “Overcoming Metaphysics’, is by Joan Stambaugh in 
Heidegger, The End of Philosophy, London: Souvenir Press 1975, pp. 103—4.] 

33. We hope we have demonstrated this in ‘“Heidegger’s Ear’. 

34. ‘On Friendship’, p. 212 [translation slightly modified]. 

35. It constitutes precisely the Conclusion of the Elements of Ethics in the Doctrine of Virtue, 
Metaphysics of Morals, second part, paras 46-7, [trans. Mary Gregor, Cambridge University Press 


1991]. 

36. See above, Chapter 8, pp. 204-5. 

37. On this point the reader can consult the extraordinary Appendix on ‘virtues of society (virtutes 
homileticae)’, and read what is said about humanitas aesthetica, which adds grace to virtue. Grace is 
not virtue; it belongs to these exterior works, these ornaments, these parerga of virtue, to be sure, but 
to add grace to virtue is a duty of virtue! Even if this be a matter of ‘small change’, like ‘sweetness of 
language’, ‘politeness’, ‘hospitality’, the ‘ease with which one lets oneself be approached’, etc., — in 
a word, neither friendship nor friendliness, but amiability. We shall meet this ‘small change’ in a 
moment, in Anthropology from a Pragmatic Point of View. 

38. Kant, p. 264. Emphasis added [translation modified]. 

39. Victor Hugo, ‘L’avenir’, in Paris (Introduction to the Paris Guide), Paris 1867, pp. 5, 9, 11-15. 

40. ‘Suprématie de Paris’, in ibid., pp. 54, 60, 62, 63, 67, 72, 74. 

41. ‘Fonction de Paris’, in ibid., p. 83. The meaning of spectre is different here, but up to what 
point? The relation is not that of simple homonymy. (‘The hearth of reason is necessarily the hearth 
of art. Paris enlightens in both respects; on one side real life, on the other ideal life.... Truth bestows 
pristine light; by cutting through this strange milieu called the past, it remains light and becomes 
volume. One of the powers of genius is that it is a prism. It remains reality and becomes imagination. 
Great poetry is the solar spectre of human reason.’) The first poem of the youthful period of the 
author of ‘Phantoms’ was a classic ‘Ode to Friendship’. This poem, the first to be chosen for Hugo’s 
Cahiers de vers frangais, sings of Castor and Pollux, Orestes and Pylades, the name and the virtues. 

42. ‘Peace Declaration’, in Paris pp. 104-6, 110, 114, 118-24. 


10 ‘For the First Time in the History of Humanity’! 


1. From one of Ferenczi’s letters to Freud; see below, p. 280 

2. Book Four, para. 279, trans. W. Kaufmann, New York, Vintage 1974, pp. 225-226. 

3. [See the epigraph to Derrida’s Of Grammatology: the future is ‘that which breaks absolutely 
with constituted normality and can only be proclaimed, presented, as a sort of monstrosity’: trans. 
Gayatri Spivak, Johns Hopkins University Press 1976, p. 5. — Trans. ] 

4. Anthropology from a Pragmatic Point of View, [trans. Victor Lyle Dowdell, Carbondale and 
Edwardsville, Southern Illinois University Press 1978], p. 38. 

5. See above, ch. 9, pp. 257-8. 

6. ‘ésti gar o philos allos autos’, Nicomachean Ethics, IX, 4, 1166a 32. Aristotle posits here that 
man, with his friend, is in a relation similar to the one he has to himself. He then defers the question 
of whether there can be friendship between a man and himself, only to return to it further on, 
answering in the affirmative. It is in terms of this friendship for self that friendship can extend to 
other men. The best I can wish for my best friend is what I wish for myself in the highest degree 
(1168b 5). 

7. Montaigne, Essays, p. 212. 

8. ‘Mein Bruder, wenn du eine Tugend hast, und es deine Tugend ist, so hast du sie mit 
niemandem gemeinsam’ (trans. R. Hollingdale, Penguin Classics 1961]. 

9. “Einer ist immer zu viel um mich” — also denkt der Einsiedler. “Immer einmal eins — das gibt 
auf die Dauer zwei!” 

Ich und Mich sind immer su eifrig im Gesprdche: wie ware es auzuhalten, wenn es nicht einen 
Freund gabe? 

“Immer ist fiir den Einsiedler der Freund der Dritte: der Dritte ist der Kork, der verhindert, dafs 
das Gesprdch der Zweie in die Tiefe sinkt’’, Vom Freunde, in Also sprach Zarathustra (trans. R. 
Hollingdale, Harmondsworth, Penguin 1961], p. 82. 


10. And even of sacrificial ‘carno-phallogocentrism’. See Points de suspension, Galilée 1992, p. 
294 [Points ...: Interviews 1974-1994, ed. Elisabeth Weber, trans. Peggy Kamuf and others, Stanford 
University Press 1995], pp. 280-81. 

11. Nicomachean Ethics, VIII, 2, 1155a 25. 

12. Ibid., 10, 1160b 18—20. 

13. Eudemian Ethics, VU, 9, 1241b 30. 

14. Nicomachean Ethics, VIU, 15, 1162b 20; Eudemian Ethics, VII, 10, 1242b 30. 

15. The brother’s name or the name of brother: Montaigne again, on his friendship with La Boétie: 
‘The name of brother is truly a fair one and full of love: that is why La Boétie and I made a 
brotherhood of our alliance’ p. 208). 

16. Before the Law. 

17. Budapest, 26 December 1912, in The Correspondence of Sigmund Freud and Sandor Ferenczi, 
vol. 1, 1908-14 [trans. Peter T. Hoffer, The Belknap Press of Harvard University Press, Cambridge, 
MA and London 1993], pp. 449-51. 

18. On all these problems, and again on the ethico-political question of the woman/wife, the sister, 
and the brother in Hegel, I refer the reader to Glas, Galilée 1974 [trans. John P. Leavey Jr and 
Richard Rand, Lincoln and London: University of Nebraska Press 1986], 

19. The Gospel According to Matthew, V, 43-8 [trans. Members of the Catholic Biblical 
Association of America, from The New American Bible, World Publishing 1972]. This is evidently 
the passage to which Schmitt refers (see above, ch. 4, pp. 88-9). 

20. Thus Spoke Zarathustra, pp. 87-8. 

21. “You want to be paid as well, you the virtuous! Do you want reward for virtue and heaven for 
earth and eternity for your today?’, ibid. ‘Of the Virtuous’, p. 117. The reference is undoubtedly, 
among many other possibilities, to the Gospel according to Matthew, cited above. But the logic of 
wages is everywhere in the Gospels. 

22.Chapter 4. 

23. In a recent and beautiful essay, Alexander Garcia Diittmann says of this passage and of ‘Star 
Friendships’ that it is a question of an ‘originary alter-ation’ gua a non-dialectizable, non-relevable, 
un-sublatable distancing. See ‘What is called Love in all the Languages and Silences of the World: 
Nietzsche, Genealogy, Contingency’, in Imago, Fall 1993, p. 314. 

24. Montaigne, ‘On Friendship, p. 220. 

25. Ibid., pp. 206-7. 

26. L’Amitié, Gallimard 1971, pp. 328-9. Emphasis added. 

27. Maurice Blanchot, The Writing of the Disaster [trans. Ann Smock, Bison Book Edition, 
University of Nebraska Press 1995], p. 27. 

28. Elsewhere I have suggested the opposite: that the gift ought to exclude the too natural value of 
generosity. See Donner le temps, Galilée 1991, p. 205 [trans. Peggy Kamuf, Given Time, 1. 
Counterfeit Money, University of Chicago Press 1992], p. 162. 

29. Fata Morgana 1986, pp. 63-4 [trans. Jeffrey Mehlman, Zone Books 1987], pp. 108-9. 

30. The work of the lost friend should not be ‘praised’ — it is the same word as the one used in the 
text on Bataille, so many years before, which we cited above: ‘if only to praise him’. 

31. Le Comité. Confessions d’un lecteur de grande maison, Champ Vallon 1988, pp. 88-9. 

32. ‘... the heart of fraternity: the heart of the law’, p. 47. 


‘The problem of being committees of action without action, or circles of friends which would 
disown their former friendships in the name of an appeal to friendship (comradeship without 
preconditions) which would carry the exigency of being there, not as a person or subject, but as the 
demonstration of a brotherly, anonymous, and impersonal movement. 

The presence of the “people” in its limitless power which, so as not to limit itself, accepts to do 
nothing’, (p. 55) 


33. A letter to Salomon Malka, L’Arche, no. 373, May 1988. Emphasis added, obviously. 
34. Emmanuel Lévinas, ‘Qui étes-vous?’, Interview with F. Poirié, La Manufacture, 1987, pp. 84-5, 
cited in M.A. Lescourret, Emmanuel Lévinas, Flammarion 1994, p. 121. 


